Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid petal shapped three and three quarters inch long offers some protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. There is nothing more irritating than reviewing your images to find dust spots or other flaws. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing or replacing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 70-200mm f/2.8L IS EF lens and normally comes included with the lens when sold new. There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. Fortunately Canon provides a storage case with the lens that can be used in addition to your camera bag.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the len</review_text>
this backpack was very uncomfortable. the inserts are stiff. it doesn't represent canon quality (I hope)</review_text>
I'm really pleased with this bag, it holds all my gear with room to spare. There are enough adjustable straps to fine tune the bag to your comfort level. It stays nice and tight against my back and doesn't feel like a burden at all.This is a great value compared to some of the other options.The only drawback to this bag is that there isn't a convenient way of grabbing your camera without taking the bag off and opening it up. Other than that, no faults</review_text>
I like the bag.  Pleanty of pockets and pouches for all my little small accessories.  Just wish it were a little better suited for 2 cameras like I have.  But, everything fits...comfortable to haul around all day.  Nice pads and straps to secure it to my back.  Well padded for the equipment.I'd highly recommend it to anybody</review_text>
I needed a camera bag with greater portability, comfort, and security for athletic venues as well as being in the outdoors (i.e. mountains, valleys, trails, etc.)  This bag delivered.  I can fit my two primary lenses, a telephoto, an external flash, a colapsing tripod and my camera with room to spare.  I can even attach my monopod to the side if needed.  I like pockets so the extra internal zipper pockets plus the exterior side and front pockets are great for tucking away all of the extras too; like lense cleaning suplies, batteries, and memory cards.The backing and shoulder straps are nicely padded so it wears comfortably as well.When I purchased the backpack I planned to only use it for more "active outings" but have since found myself using it in place of my original camera bag</review_text>
My husband and I recently bought this bag to take on a trip to Mexico. It was perfect, fit our video camera, small digital camera, Canon Digital Elph, 2 lenses and all the chargers and accessories we needed for the trip. Plus, the tripod!! Also my husband used it for his carry on bag which was helpful given how tight airport security can be these days.I totally recommend this bag to someone who travels with several different pieces of photographic equipment</review_text>
I humped this thing around DC last week for 7 hours, and not a worry to mention.  Well balanced, I had it full of a camera, 4 lenses, flash and miscellany.  I cut all the extra straps off, and just have the shoulder harness left.  And it looks good too.  Of course, it's a great advertisement for thieves so never let it out of your grip.</review_text>
this item is great.... i love it...i have my 35 mm and digital camera in it along with everything else i need..</review_text>
This item was a perfect fit for my Rebel XT. Well padded, lots of compartments to accommodate my accessories in one location. Awesome product to protect my priced possession. Highly recommended for digital SLR owners</review_text>
This monopod is very sturdy and easy to set up. I was looking for a monopod that was capable of handling the weight of my large Canon lens (over 3 lbs), and this one does the job very well. I mainly use it for taking soccer pictures, and so far, I'm very pleased. I highly recomend it</review_text>
This is a very good product, the price is cheap, come with the bag which is a plus, if you are looking for a cheap but sturdy monpod, this is the right one, highly recommanded</review_text>
Sure, this isn't a pro mono pod and it doesn't have a mobile head but for the money it's great. Easily holds my Olympus E1 with 50-200mm lens. Great as a walking stick as well. Stores tight and light.Highly recommend this product. I may just get a back up</review_text>
I use this monopod for my pentax optio w20 camera and for a panasonic video camera. I use it when camping and it doubles as a sturdy walking stick. When I'm out in the wilds people think it's a walking stick until they see my small camera perched on top of it.It has really improved my ability to stay steady and blur free with my new pentax which has no optical viewfinder. I like the quick adjustment legs as opposed to screw type.I've also used this tripod to stick my video camera out of my sunroof to cruise through New England to catch the Autumnal leaves while driving which has given some interesting results. I plan to do the same thing on Rt 1 to film the big sur highway.The only thing I need to get is a ball head to adjust the angle of the camera.For the price this was a steal and a hearty deal</review_text>
The Optika MP100 Pro Photo Monopod is surprisingly sturdy, functional and well-made.  It is supplied with a reasonably decent quality zippered nylon case with carrying strap.  No, it is not "professional grade", but it is something every amateur photographer can use for weekend shooting.  I've used it both with digital still and camcorder, where it offers respectable improvement in long-distance shots (versus trying to hold the camera still, or propping it up on the roof of the car, a not-nearby-enough fence post, and so on.)  Certainly a LOT handier than the old tripod!  I bought two, keeping them ready-for-action in the trunk of my cars.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Good quality, particularly for the amazing price. Sturdy, well-made, and even the case is nice. Pops open in a second, collapses just as easily.Keep in mind that fully collapsed it's wider than a standard backpack, so if you lash it under a backpack it will be awkward. But the strap on the carrying case makes it easy to loop the monopod and carry it vertically</review_text>
The MP100 has served us well since getting it 2 months ago. Like other reviewers, I wasn't expected a whole lot after being disappointed by a $40 monopod made for those well under 6 feet tall. Quite stable, usable as a walking stick, easier to reset height than competition under $50 with twist-lock legs. This monopod definitely exceeded my expectations!Seems to be a niche here for a higher priced version with a pan/tilt head, but I had a 30yr old Leica table top tripod pan/tilt head and the combination works great!On balance, can't be beat even if all you order is the MP100 and pay $6 or so s/h!For use at the beach or where dirt and grit is in the air, you'll want to wipe down the legs before collapsing (cloth used for gun   storage work great) or you may have grit in the legs and scratching the MP100 legs in subsequent use.</review_text>
Not knowing fully what I was getting into, on a whim I purchased this monopod hoping that is was a half-way decent product, I mean-it was so cheap.  I was pleasantly surprised to find how sturdy the unit was and that what I had was a very high quality monopod.  This was my second monopod and so I had another to compare it with (the other was bought on an auction website).  In comparison the Opteka was a far better monopod in height and robust thickness and I use it exclusively on my miniDV shoots</review_text>
This is my second "L" lens the other being 70-200L f4 and both are exceptional. If you are looking for professional results you will need good equipment used within it's limits.</review_text>
This is my favorite lens. I could not carry the heavier long range teles, and it was a hard decision for me. In the end, I chose this because it was lighter than the zooms.Having previouly used the 75-300 IS zoom, I was leary of getting another 300mm prime, because I may miss the 70-300 range of shooting. But the clarity and colors are so true for this 300 prime, I don't look back.Easy to handle, not so bulky. Fast, impressive photos. Even when I add a 1.4 teleconverter shooting in the 500mm range on my 20D. I use the f4 alot, no problem, great clarity. Awesome lens for the price</review_text>
I got this lens for shooting architecture from a distance--an unsual application. I've also found myself using it to shoot kids soccer games. It's super sharp and very fast focusing. I haven't done formal tests at all apertures, but images appear vivid and contrasty at a range of settings. Online reviews rank this lens very highly and my own experience supports those findings.The Image Stabilization seems to work very well, although be sure to turn it off if you're using a tripod--I've found that it can reduce image quality if you forget to turn it off in that application.For shots where you'll be standing around a lot with the lens to your eye, ready for a shot, it gets kind of heavy to carry. If you're shooting sports, you might want to consider a monopod. For other applications, its weight is low enough not to be too big of a problem.It comes with a canvas-like case that includes a loop you can use to attach it to your belt. I've found this works pretty well out in the field, particularly when combined with a photo-vest. The case also can be carried with a neck strap, but this gets in the way of your camera strap and is also thin, so it kind of cuts into your shoulder.As I write this, the Amazon site has a link for 58mm filters for this lens. It takes 77mm filters</review_text>
I am THRILLED with this lens's capabilities and the pictures it does. I test shot a corner of a window to determine if it would be good for my insect shots that I like so well.I bought this add-on converter and am thrilled to have added this and the 50mm lens of these necessary items for my set-up. I like nature photography the best and like to use my off summer days for hiking and finding photographs to take in perhaps well-known places but finding unique angles and subjects is what I like to specialize in. This lens will greatly enhance your experience in that 'little world' we commonly trod over or weed-ate away. I built a diffuser using a ping-pong ball over the flash so the lighting would work better. (Works great, btw).As usual, it's great Canon glass that does the trick.</review_text>
Amazing quality for an affordable price (still not cheap tho). This lens takes great quality photos and is my daytime/outdoor performer. Although I don't think the IS is equal to 1 f-stop when it comes to low light situations but it sure is very helpful at these high f-stop numbers</review_text>
I got this lens to complement my 10-22mm and 100-400mm lenses.  It is a great general purpose lens (not too wide, not too narrow) for everyday walk around shooting.  The image stabilization and constant aperture are nice features.  It is also weather sealed so you don't have to worry about the elements as much as with most other lenses, of course you would need a weather sealed camera body to be completely safe, but it still makes me feel a little better in sandy or snowy conditions.  I use this on the Rebel XT and Rebel XTi which are 1.6X crop bodies and make this closer to a 38-168mm which can be useful for portrait work, landscapes, large animals, or somewhat close macro.  Of course there are lenses that do all of these things better, but to get this all in one package is really valuable.  After all you are less likely to miss a shot if you have 1 versatile lens vs. 5 really great specialized lenses (not that you shouldn't get those too, but this is a good all around contender.)  I have posted a few photo examples above to show the range of colors and versatility of this lens.  It is not the sharpest lens I have, nor the fastest, but it is the one that is on my camera most often unless I am going out to shoot something specific.  If you don't want to spend quite as much, the 28-135mm is also a very good lens</review_text>
I picked up a 5D in March with a 28-135. Worked with that for 3 months and felt something was missing. I went and bit the bullet, got the 24-105 and what an amazing difference it made. Color=vivid, clarity=sharp, good walk-around lens. After 4 months, I have not one bad thing to say about this lens. My suggestion, if you are looking for a lens, would be this one</review_text>
While this review is not as technical as others all I can say is the quality of the end result is well worth the money! I shot a wedding this past weekend 2 days after receiving this lens and am just going over some of the photos and all I can say is this piece of glass has given me the razor sharpness I've been looking for. I've been hesitant into jumping into the "L" lens arena but now that I'm here I could never go back! Don't settle for less! Your photography is worth it</review_text>
Yes it is a very fine lens. IS and 105 mm long end are also appealing but after buying this I decided to sell it in favour of my EF 24-70 2.8L after 2 weeks of usage.f4 makes clearly the autofocus slower and fuzzier. Bokeh is also worse than the other one.the viewfinder gets darker in 1.6 crop bodies.105 mm does make a very little difference in image size.Plus the macro option is weaker on this one.If you don't care about the weight go with the EF 24-70 2.8L imho.</review_text>
My first L lens and I'm sold. While I did spend a lot of time - a lot, this isn't a small purchase - on deciding between this and the 24-70/2.8, I feel I made the right decision. First, I took into account what I actually shot. Not what I thought about shooting or wanted to shoot, but what I really spent my time shooting. Then I backed that up by looking at the past six months' worth of photos. For me, this is the right choice.The big decision wasn't over image quality - rather it was the max aperture. 2.8 vs 4.0. The 4.0 with IS won. I absolutely LOVE the IS! Even at higher speeds, IS rocks. (It also eats batteries like a Hummer guzzles gas)OK, so shooting with it is a dream. Incredibly fast focus. Wonderful fit and finish. I could gush all night.If you're spending a lot of time trying to justify it, don't. If it won't break your bank, it's well worth it. If you're trying to decide which lens, try what I did. It made all the difference to me.What's the downside? I'm ordering a 17-40 today. The L lens bug has bitten. Next will have to be the 70-200/2.8. There goes the kids college fund. :-</review_text>
I own several Canon lens for my 20D and this is hands down the best.  I had a 28-135 which was a very good lens regardless of some reviews, and I got many excellent photos with it - this is distinctly better in all ways.  (Of course, it costs a lot more).  Recently went with the grandchildred to Sea World and I got 100% good photos, with several really outstanding ones.  It is light, accurate and has IS - what more do you want?  You can replace a slew of lens with this one and perhaps selling the old ones will help pay for it.  Bought it as soon as it was available and have not regretted it one moment.  If you have one lens, this is the one</review_text>
This is a great range for use as an every day walk around lens. It's very versatile, light and produces great image sharpness throughout the range. There is a bit of vignetting at the wide end, which I actually like.However, being f4, this lens is simply not fast enough for me. I shoot a lot of images where I want the out of focus areas (bokeh) to be glassy smooth (for weddings, portraits and such) and you cannot get that with this lens as good as you can with the 24-70 f2.8. The 24-105 f4 lens does have image stabilization which will help you to hand hold and get the shot in lower light situations, but there is not much that can be done to get super smooth bokeh with it. If you zoom all the way in, your DOF will be low and pretty darn smooth though in my case, I just prefer the look and bokeh of the 24-70 overall rather than this lens. Although the 24-70 is super heavy in weight compared to the 24-105.But I'm a professional photographer and so while my needs and likes are geared towards preferring the 24-70 f2.8, this doesn't mean the 24-105 isn't ideal for many if not most.</review_text>
I have both lenses, the 24-105 4 L IS and the 28-135 3.5-5.6 IS. I have a 20D, but my wife and I decided we each wanted a camera to ourselves so I bought the 24-105 lens along with the 30D about 2 months ago.  I was so sure that I'd see a big difference with the L lens since my 70-200 2.8 IS L is such a superior lens. The thing is, I can't justify it.  I've set the camera on a tripod and switched the lenses back and forth taking pictures with identical light and settings on a variety of subjects.  (They both take extremely nice pictures)  Maybe with a full frame sensor the difference would be apparent.  At this point I like the extra reach of the 135mm.  I'll let my wife use the $1200 L lens. My recommendation is: for the money on a cropped sensor camera I'd stick with the 28-135 lens</review_text>
While it isn't fashionable to use anything but a zoom lens anymore, this L series 135mm fixed focus lens is the "real deal". It is superbly sharp, and fast, and easy to use. I took it to Africa with me and was astounded with its brilliant clarity. Great for portraits... and for anything requiring a mid-length telephoto. Highly recommended</review_text>
Despite reading glowing reviews about this lens, I was still surprised to see how well it performed.  The lens is SO sharp you can get very good cropped pictures of running athletes, from a distance of three quarters of a Football field away, shooting hand held, with late afternoon light, which will print a 5x7 and still look like a Pro took them!If you want a tack sharp lens for indoor sports pictures and can't afford, or otherwise do not want another long lens for outdoor sports pictures, then you should give this lens your serious consideration.</review_text>
Everyone gives this lens a rave so maybe i should approach this terrific lens from a shooting POV.Shooting wide open at f2at 135 gives your pictures a distinct quality you would never get from zooms, there isn't a zoom at this focal length that is this speed either. A few primes come close but they're nowhere near as sharp wide open.the af is fast and very accurate and the lens has a great feel on a 20d/5d/10d body even wo the battery grip of the cameras.Close up magnification of .19x to.21 therabouts is a nice bonus of this lens, letting you get closer wo being too in your face for tight headshots.I always felt that photographers usually have a sweet spot when shooting certain things like some portrait photographers like the distance the 85mm gives them when approaching a subject, turns out I'm liking the 135 focal length quite a bit for headshots and the 85 for torso and head shots.One thing I like about this 135/f2 combo is that there's enough DOF to get most of the main subject in view and focus but the background will still be blurred out. It's really great when you want the subject in focus and nothing else, as opposed to the 85 1.2 parts of the subject could melt into the background resulting in images that be a little too ethreal for some tastes. Couldn't you just stop down the 85? Sure but the relationship of the foreground to background would still be different with the 135.The 135 f2 can give a result that's juuust right. The backgrounds just a little more compressed with the foreground but the foreground is sharp but the background is gone. Almost like you lurred the background in photoshop. But you'll never get the same results from blurring in photoshop, for one thing the highlights would get muddied in a blur treatment in PS while the highlights stay clean at f2.Don't just use this thing for portraits, use it the way you would use a 50mm and try and frame as such, again the focal lenth and wide aperture will give an interesting result. I basically use it for candids and portraits during a wedding.Fantastic lens, very sharp, very handholdable, the focal length is terrific for portraits and the bokeh is very beautiful, equal in sharpness to the 85 1.2 or any of Canon's $5k lenses. This is probably the best lens you can get for the price, the only lens I've used with better saturation and contrast is the 35 1.4L.Downside: Not as handholdable as the 50,35 1.4 or the 85 1.2 during low light situations due to it's focal length</review_text>
At a recent NYE event, I shot a lot of photos in a concert setting without a flash and am very impressed with the sharpness & clarity of this lens performance. Its so fast and the colors are vibrant. I am not a seasoned pro but with the 20D and this lens, it makes me look pretty close. I did shoot in manual and once I got my aperture & shutter speed dialed in, it pumped out a lot of great pics.I have also shot some pics of waterfalls (slowing down my shutter speed to get that soft flowing image) and portraits of people and again, it oozed excellence. The 135mm focal range is not as convenient as a zoom, but the quality of this prime lens makes up for any incovenience</review_text>
If you don't want to get hooked on canon L series lens, do not buy this one.  I made a mistake of buying one and now all I want are L canon lens.  It is super sharp, contrast and saturation is fantastic.  No need to retouch any of your photos.  So far, I've used it on candid shots of my kids and dance gigs.  f/2.0 helps a lot to get the right shutter speed to freeze action.  A very good buy.  I got mine here at Amazon</review_text>
Man. what a lens!!! It's not cheap, and I dont' find the 135mm to be a particularly useful focal length with my 20D but after seeing glowing reviews of this one both at [...], I decided to buy one and try it for myself. It's not cheap at $900, but it's worth every penny. This one is an absolute stunner. I cannot believe my eyes at the sharpness at f2 and it improves very little when stopped down. The bokeh is unbelievable!!! I dont' hesitate to shoot at f2 and I don't find it necessary to stop down just to increase sharpness. The size and build is perfect although I don't like Canon's hood design. Why can't they simply make the hood with the same crincked finish  of the lens?? Then they would not so easily scratch. It's beyond me. But that's not a problem with the lens itself and whenever I use this lens, I know I have one of the best lenses ever designed. It forces me to excel myself knowing that now,the only limitation is me, the photographer and not the camera or the lens. An absolute beauty. Go try it yourself. I try to shoot with this as much as possible and the results are stunning. I just wish it came with weather proofing and Image Stablization like Canon's modern lenses but that's just nitpicking. I love it as it is</review_text>
This is my all time favorite lense. Eat your hearts out Nikon, Olympus & Pentex, because this baby alone is reason enough to go with Canon. I cannot begin to tell you how sharp this "L" lense is. Words fail me. On second thought, no they don't. Use this lense and you'll wind up with photos shaper than an lightening blade, clearer than a ghost's eyes, crisper than a new dawn on an uncharted island.I shot the portrait on two book covers with this lense. Did the wedding photos for my best friend's wedding and every one turned out better than the ones they paid the wedding pro hundreds of dollars to do. I'm documenting the growth of my child with this lense and I've caught hundred's of my girl's smiles with it and yes, sometimes even a tear or two.You cannot go wrong with a Canon "L" lense. They are the tops, they really are.Jack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
This lens is the best in its class.  I wish every lens I had was this sharp.  This thing is top notch</review_text>
Bought this lens a few months back and shot volleyball with it, occasionally used it for football when it got dark.What can I say or add to other reviews?? F/1.8 is great, although the lens is sharper at f/2 or 2.2. I use it near the wide open edge all the time - indoor gyms simply do not have much light.The USM autofocus is great - demoing it in the store, it seemed to nearly anticipate my actions. No rotating front filter, and it doesn't protrude, either. It's got a full time manual focus ring, so I don't have to worry about killing my autofocus  motor. In combination with c.Fn 4-1, this is killer.Why the four stars? Chromatic aberration at lower apertures. I do not know where it starts to go away, because I almost never shoot in good light. This was most apparent in a shot of a recent football game. Granted, the team's jerseys were white, and the background was the pitch black of an unlit parking lot, and I had to perform a 100% crop. Nevertheless, an alien-like purple halo surrounded the huddled offensive team. Oh well, you can't have it all!As for volleyball pics, this is the lens. I regularly shoot at f/2.2, ISO 1600, and 1/500, but I might change that soon because that is pushing it. The photos are pretty sharp and the USM definitely helps here. I bought this lens because my 50mm 1.8 just wasn't cutting it - I'd get shots with a tack sharp background and a beautifully bokeh'd subject - just the opposite of what it should be. Using the 85mm removed about 85% of those shots. There are still extreme instances when I swing my camera around and instantly shoot when the USM can't keep up, but there are other instances when I am amazed that it got the shot in focus. From the sidelines, 85mm is too long to get the outside hitter nearest to you, but that's why you move around! Shooting volleyball requires a strategy.The focal length is also good on my 350d for shooting events and staying a bit back from the subject.I'm overall pretty pleased with the lens. I can see what many people call this a "hidden L lens.</review_text>
I recently purchased this lens along with the 24-105mm as a part of the fall cash in with cannon rebate program.  So, originally, my main reason to get this lens was because it would save me another $50 off of the other lens via doubling the rebates and make it pretty cheap.  But now that I have used it for awhile, I am really happy that I got it.  The 1.8 maximum aperture does two things really well, lets you take low-light handheld shots and isolates the subject.  See my example photos for examples of both of these features.  I use this on the Canon Rebel XT and Rebel XTi which have a 1.6X crop factor and make this lens more like a 135mm which is good and bad depending on your usage.  This lens produces very sharp results and doesn't weigh much, so it is easy to carry around.  If you already have a good range of zoom lenses and are looking for something that will just take really nice, sharp, handheld shots, consider this lens</review_text>
All the reviews about this lens are all true.  It's a great lens.  I love the quality of it.  However, if you like to take in door photoes and don't have very big rooms, you might want to consider the 50mm f/1.4.  I mostly find my self backed up in a corner trying to take a picture at home</review_text>
This lens changed it all for me. I was happy with my Tamrons and Tokinas - I thought. Then I bought this lens. The colors and contrast simply POPPED out from the pics. It is amazing! While there's no red ring around it, it deserves one.The difference in the shots was incredible. It's very well built, focuses (like all Canon USM lenses) fast and quiet and provides the photog with truly beautiful bokeh. For low light, it's awesome. Using an extension tube for macro, it's great. And for portraits, it's nearly unbeatable.So what's the downside? For sure there is one: you'll be sold on Canon lenses. Since this one, I've bought five more, including two "L" series. If that's a downside, so be it!Just buy the lens - you'll love it</review_text>
I am really impressed with the results I get from this lens.This is my first USM lens and 85mm is new to me. It serves me really well taking people pictures outside - fantastic background blur and fast enough for low light indoor close ups.Full time manual focus is handy too at times. With my tamron 17-50, this lens is great combo for me</review_text>
bought this for my daughters karate tournements and i am very pleased with the quality of pictures i have gotten. this baby never comes off my xt</review_text>
Not much to add on top of the other reviews. The only thing you should be aware of is that the depth of field at f/1.8 is paper thin, which is excellent for portraits, but requires perfect focussing.The bokeh (the structure of the background blur) is nothing short of great, easily competing with much more expensive lenses. Yes, it has "L" quality</review_text>
The answer is most likely yes; since its price make it the best value for a fast canon prime lens. But before you make the $350 plunge here are few useful things to know about how it can be used. Keep in mind that I use this lens on the Rebel XT (1.6 factor), which means it provides me with an angel of view similar to 135mm on film cameras.SHARPNESS: Yes that's one feature you can count on when buying this lens. This lens produces very sharp pictures. So much so that it will blow away your 18-55 kit lens (if you have one) and all other zoom lenses.  Exception to that are the L-series zooms. The sharpness difference will be obvious even in the smallest of prints (4 by 6). If you can't envision such difference then consider this. Sharpness can be viewed as contrast between the edges of different color objects. Hence, the sharper an image the greater the contrast in the edges between such groups of color. This lens captures the contrast in such setting better than most other lenses.SPEED: This lens is blazingly fast. As such you will have the opportunity to shoot at higher shutter speeds wide open (remember the inverse relation between aperture and shutter speed). More importantly you gain the ability to shoot in low light situations (concert for example) and still maintain a decent shutter speed for handholding. Here's the best part, if you're like most new people to photography, you probably plan to take self portraits. This lens will give you that ability, as you will be able to buy few clamp on lights coupled with 100-150W bulbs and start shooting at medium ISO speeds wide open.ANGEL OF VIEW: Assuming you will be using this lens on a 1.6 digital format consider that you will be having a tight crop, more like that of a 135mm lens on a film camera (1.6*85=136). What does that translate to in practical terms? You will have to stand 6-8 feet away from your subject to be able to cover their head and shoulders at landscape orientation.SPECIAL EFFECTS: Here are two special effects you will find useful in this lens depth of field and compression. To some degree or another every lens offers depth of field, which can be summarize as having only the subject of interest in focus and the rest of the picture blurred. This lens is unique in that it creates a very shallow depth of field in which the subject is truly isolated from the whole scene. Set the aperture to 1.8 and focus correctly and you can achieve such results. More importantly the lens quality of such blur (known as bokeh) is outstanding as there are eight diaphragm blades that control the aperture opening vs. 5 or 6 in many other lenses.As for compression, since the camera is a telephoto it will compress everything in its sight closer together to fit in its sight. For example, if you are photographing a person, their face will look wider and their nose will look smaller or flatter. Keep in mind that unlike some of the longer telephoto lenses (300mm for example) the effect with this lens is subtle and pleasantSIZE AND BUILD: Its size and weight are perfect! It balances my XT very nicely. So much so, that I can take pictures at very low shutter speeds with this combination (though I don't find my self doing that that often with this fast lens). All this translates to comfort and confidence when I am shooting with this lens. The build quality is excellent, I find no inherit weakness in the design.If you plan to photograph friends and family then this is the lens. You will take sharp pictures with the right kind of effects for portraits like compression and beautiful bokeh. The lens is fast and designed excellently for maximum control and comfort. You won't miss a shot because of shake with slow shutter speeds and even if you do (that's a big if) you can put its speed to use by dialing a higher aperture. It's only draw back is that it has a pretty tight angel of view on 1.6 factor SLRs. I can't think of any other prime in the non-L canon line up that matches this lens (other than possibly the 50mm 1.4). Truly an incredible value, buy it with confidence!Ps. By no means does this review cover all the merits of this lens. To name a couple, the lens offers precise auto focus and low chromatic aberration. Rather, I covered the features that were most useful for its intended purpose; taking pictures of people.</review_text>
I decided to rave about this lens after taking about 80 portraits, or head shots, for a children's theater production.  I set the aperture at 1.8 and shot away inside a temple with great indirect soft lighting.  And the results were exquisite!  The background, located five feet behind the subjects was a subtle blur while the subjects came to life (with single strands of hair resolution).  Not bad for my first experience shooting portraits.Now the better part is that I get equal or better results with the thousands of pictures I have taken at high school basketball games.  I set my ISO to 400 on my Digital Rebel XT and get shutter speeds of 1/200 to 1/1250.  Again, the intended subject jumps out.  And there is no red eye (or white eye) from using a flash to light the scene and freeze the action.  So after much experimenting, I prefer this to my 70-200 f4/L and my 24-105 f4/L IS lenses as an indoor sports lens.I love all these lenses.  This one wins in the area of price and being the fastest lens. This is my lens of choice for a majority of my current shooting situations.</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well.  The build is solid (metal construction).  The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation.  The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens.I got this filter for a friend of mine for his Nikon 18-70mm ED DX lens.</review_text>
I bought this to keep the dust of Iraq out of my Canon EF-S 17-85 lens. It does a fine job and I've seen no noticeable change in the quality of images that I'm capturing with my Canon 20D</review_text>
I bought this filter to put on the front of the 18-70 DX lens on my Nikon D50.  It works well and protects the front element of the lens from dust, dirt, fingerprints and whatnot.It seems to cause a little vignetting (slightly darkened corners) at extreme wide angles (~18mm) -- but from what I've seen so far it isn't terribly noticeable, 'specially for the price</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer.  Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare.  Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality.  A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light.  The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one.  This hood being a solid conical three and three quarters inch long offers some protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element.  There is nothing more irritating than reviewing your images to find dust spots or other flaws.  When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects.  Replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L EF lens and normally comes included with the lens when sold new.  There is no need to buy one with the lens as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position.  This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch.  An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge.  Fortunately Canon provides a storage case with the lens that can be used in addition to your camera bag.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the len</review_text>
This hood comes with the 100-400, so don't buy it separately.Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
The 10D is an outstanding digital camera. I have been using both of mine for over a year now and they have done everything I needed, when I needed it, wthout a single flaw. I really use the 10D. I have taken over 30,000 pictures with it. I use the optional 2 battery Bg-Ed on the 10D which gives me an easy 400 pictures. The 17-40 Canon Zoom Lens  has worked spotlessly as well. Pictures are crisp. Easy manual focus and the auto focus works well even in low light. I like the solid feel of the 10D, especially with the 2 battery pack, and 550EX flash. I shoot exclusively on manual mode so I can't comment on the other settings. Adjusting the flash output, ISO etc are all easy and quick. I have found this to be a very intuitive camera. The viewing screen on the back of the camera is clear and gives me good feedback for adjusting my flashes or hot lights.  I use Lexar 1GB CompactFlash cards. And I carry an Epson P-2000 Multimedia Storage Viewer for my back up.  The only drawback that I have found has been with a couple of my women friends who have found it a bit heavy. I have not only gotten use to its weight but have come to really appreciate the "feel" of the camera. I can tell you that I will NEVER use film again. With an Epson Photo 2200 printer, iPhoto and my own digital darkroom thanks to Photoshop CS I have everything I need right here at home. For downloading the pictures to my MacIntosh G4 or Powerbook I use a firewire SanDisk Reader. It too works perfectly. So if you don't need the increased megapixal of the 20D I would suggest you consider the 10D. One great camera.</review_text>
Since there are tons of rave reviews about the features of this camera, I won't bother you with the details. Instead, I will tell you about the one HUGE letdown of this camera and the likes (Rebel, 20D): the 1.6x focal length factor. This means my dear 28-105 lens is now a sorry 45-170. To recoup the loss I'd have to spend $700 on a 17-40 4.0 lens. This is a consequence of using a small CCD. Cameras like the 1D with full-size 35mm CCD sell for over $4,000. I cannot wait for that price to go down. I also cannot help to wonder whether the focal reading of the Speedlite flashes will be correct (I own a 540EZ and discovered with dismay that it doesn't work in these cameras).I look at my A2 (still infatuated with it) and I wonder if I did the right thing. I think I will keep it around for a while, just in case..</review_text>
I've used the Canon EOS 10D for 5 months now and I'm absolutely thrilled with it. The EOS cameras are extremely comfortable to hold and handle. In auto mode, the camera produces correctly exposed, sharp photos. Unlike my Canon Powershot, the camera takes the picture with very little delay after depressing the shutter button.In the creative zones, you can set aperture priority to take, for example, selective focus shots, or use shutter speed priority and set a slow shutter speed to take some good blurring shots.The auto focus is quick and accurate, though how much of that is the camera and how much is the lens I do not know. I never use the manual focus mode. The pop-up flash works great for lighting subject that are in shadows or back lit.I now find it a bit frustrating to use my film camera; I'm addicted to viewing my shots on the spot.I have a Canon EOS A2 film camera that I purchased in 1995. Since I'm familiar with the EOS system and have Canon system lenses, I chose the 10D over the similarly priced Nikon prosumer digital camera.I like my Canon cameras so well that I bought the Canon digital Elf for my sister and the Canon Powershot A80 for my mother. Both have reportedly been excellent cameras.With the 10D, I've used a Canon 50mm/compact macro, a Tamron 28-200mm and a Canon 15mm fisheye lens. Because of the difference in the way a film camera and this digital camera operate, you multiply the focal length of the lens by 1.6 to figure the effective focal length when used with a digital camera. So, for example, the 15mm fisheye lens is effectively a 24mm lens on the 10D.I bought a 1 gig IMB microdrive storage card and that allows me to take 400 high res jpg or about 160 raw format files. If you shoot in auto mode, the camera will only capture in jpg format. If you shoot in manual mode, you can select jpg or raw format.If shooting raw format, ensure you have a software program, such as Photoshop CS, that will open raw files. And know that not all developing and printing shops will accept raw format. But many of the image libraries will ONLY accept raw files (or a high resolution tif scanned from a slide).With the raw format files, I've found that many of my shots require a bit of exposure adjustment, but this is simply a matter of moving a slider bar in Photoshop CS. When you first open a raw file, you get an adjustment window allowing you to play with exposure, tint, saturation, white balance and more. You can even simulate warmup filters and such. Very cool stuff!I bought an extra battery to take along on trips. One battery typically lasts me for 2 days of shooting, as long as I don't do much reviewing of my shots through the camera monitor.Unless you need the quality of the 1Ds immediately I would recommend getting the 10D because technology is moving so fast that the quality of the 1Ds will be available for the current price of the 10D in the near future</review_text>
This camera is everything I desired in a digital camera and so much more.  While other kids played baseball and football I grew up with a Pentax MX strapped around my neck.  Photography was and is my passion.  This camera allows me the expression I always dreamed of.  Combined with Adobe Photoshop, this is the best camera/darkroom setup I've ever worked with</review_text>
This lens bag is a fine product but don't be fooled into adding it as an accessory to Canon's 1.4x or 2x extenders.  Both of them come with this exact pouch.  Amazon should remove this as a "Suggested Accessory" on the web pages for the two products above</review_text>
This timer/cable release has a lot of features. Works well. The cord is somewhat short though, and it is of cheap plastic construction. Hard to imaging that it costs this much. I think it's over priced. But it does the job.</review_text>
I've had my remote switch for almost 3 months now.  I love it.  So far the only feature I have used is the remote switch and it works flawlessly.  If you want to trip the shutter from a distance without shaking the 20D (the camera I use) this is what you need.  I use it with the extension cord since I am generally about 30 feet away from the camera.  I am very pleased with this purchase.  No complaints at this point</review_text>
I also received this remote with only the international warranty.  I called Amazon and they immediately sent me out a replacement free of charge; Yeah.  But alas, it too had the international warranty; @#$%!.  I have returned both, unopened and unused on their dime. Perhaps this is the only version they have</review_text>
Well I too have recieved a "grey market" version of the product, with an international warranty only.  As this has been mentioned before, and apparently has been rectified by Amazon, I hope I'll recieve the same treatment.  But this still troubles me.  Is Amazon continuing to sell off cheaper merchandise, only addressing the issue on an individual basis when people complain?What grey market means is that the product was originally intended for sale outside the US, but has been imported because that version of the product is cheaper than the version intended for US sale.  While it's a legitimate enough process, they should be telling us if they do it, because the warranty has been invalidated by being sold outside the boundaries of the system Canon has put in place.I'm not even touching the hardware until I find out what's going on about it, so I can't rate its quality.. but I have no doubt that it's a quality piece of hardware, I've never heard anyone have anything bad to say about it, except its price, a gripe I totally agree with.  Let's face it folks, if it wasn't a proprietary accessory to a high priced camera system, it should really cost about $20.  It's just a simple programmable timer no more sophisticated than most wristwatches</review_text>
I have had this product for over two years and used it extensively in my travels. Yes it has shortfalls and "may" be considered expensive, but for the price it is better than some other "aftermarket" designs for other Camera makes. For amature timelapse and timed exposures it works quite well. As far as a remote for instant low light or exposure shots it is expensive, get the Canon RS-80N3 Shutter releaseThe biggest complaints seems to be the limited number of shots [99] in certain modes and the shortness of the connecting cable length. Using the "continous" mode I have not failed to capture timelapse photos that filled my needs.The short connecting cable can be corrected by purchasing the Canon ET-1000N3 extension cable [33 ft]. Now that at $2.50+ a foot, is expensive! But in my persuit of remote control capability a must have.Battery life is fantastic, thousands of shots and still going strong. Of course like camera battery a spare is a blessing [and in this case cheap].I think it is a good accessory, if you enjoy time lapse and have spent the money for one of the new EOS cam's then the price is comparable to your continuing outlay for your hobby.A "gadgeteers must"..Too each their own, that is what supports "Horse Races". Enjo</review_text>
I was somewhat surprised to receive my TC80N3 with only an Canon international warranty....did anyone else receive a grey market version of this remote control? I have ordered $1000s of Canon products from Amazon.com and always received a Canon USA warranty card with the items....not sure why this item didn't carry the USA warranty.I have sent several emails to Amazon.com regarding this matter.I'll update the review when I receive an answer that is satisfactory. PLEASE NOTE: Amazon is shipping a replacement remote!  I'll amend again once the replacement is received.Control itself is a wonderful product but for this price I DID expect a Canon USA warranty card.Gar</review_text>
The ability to combine four different delay and interval modes makes this product able to accommodate almost any automatic-shooting situation.You can control the delay until the sequence starts, the delay between shots, the total shooting time, and the number of shots.That last one, however, is where the glaring flaw comes in: The controller is limited to 99 shots when you use the total-number-of-shots setting. In correspondence I've had with Canon, they have had no explanation for this asinine limitation. Even a modest CF card these days holds more than 99 shots, even in raw mode. For time lapse, 99 shots is woefully inadequate.You can work around this defect by simply letting your card fill up or by doing the math and using the total-duration setting. But sometimes you want to shoot multiple sequences on one card. If you know you want about 300 frames (for example), it's annoying to have to baby-sit the camera and stop it manually, or to do the math and figure out how many seconds total your sequence will take, convert that to minutes and seconds, and then dial that into another setting on the controller. And if you then decide to use a different interval, you get to re-do all that. Dumb, Canon.The fact is, this device shouldn't be necessary anyway.  Every camera today should come with this functionality; it's technically trivial, since every one of these digital SLRs is a computer with plenty of on-board timers and logic for this task</review_text>
This remote is a handy tool to have.  It's very basic use is as a shutter release.  It's best to use a shutter release for when your camera in on a tripod in low light situations.  Using the shutter release in this way helps to limit camera shake which improves your images.Other programmable features include a self timer, interval timer, long exposure, and exposure count.  You are permitted to use any combination all or none of these settings making the possibilities virtually limitless.I have used to self timer so that I could both take the picture, and be in it.  The self timer can be set for just shy of 100 hours if you wanted to.For time lapse, a combination of the interval timer which can be set for just shy of 100 hours and the exposure count which can be set for up to 99 shots should be set.  The self timer can be used to delay the first shot if desired.The long exposure can also be set up to just shy of 100 hours.The settings can be entered at any time without worry of inadvertent alterations.  Pressing the light button until the hold indicator is displayed will deactivate all but the light button or prevents the stop/start button from being deactivated once an operation has been started.The TC-80N3 is operated by one CR2032 battery.  I've had my remote for over 2 years and the battery is still going strong.  I'm not sure how long the battery is supposed to last, but there is an indicator in the display panel to let me know when the battery starts to get low. If the battery is fine, I don't see the indicator at all.There is a storage place on the back for your cameras RC socket cover if you have one.  I use this with a Canon 20D so it is of no use to me.  The plug connects to the camera simply by pressing the plug into the socket.  To disconnect, pinch the plug on the side and pull out.For me, this item is a must have.  I enjoy low light photography and I get plenty of use just for this reason.  It's great to have the option available for other photographic opportunities.  It is clear to me that this is a well thought out, quality product by Canon.PROS:Acts as a simple shutter releaseProgrammable options include a self timer, interval timer, long exposure, and exposure countCONS:Cable only about 34 inche</review_text>
Made of a durable nylon outer shell and a soft lining in the interior, this soft case offers the ability to protect your lens.  The double front zipper easily opens to reveal easy access to the lens cavity.  The top of the zippered flap is secured in place with Velcro for a solid seal.  Securely attached to the sides of the case are D rings.  These rings are used to snap the quarter inch thin shoulder strap in place for carrying the case and lens around.  If this carrying option doesn't appeal to you, a belt loop is included on the back of the strap for carrying the case and lens attached to your belt, or possible your camera bag if it accepts attachments.  The bottom of the case features a cardboard lined fake leather surface allowing the lens to rest standing on solid surfaces such as a table.This case is meant for use with the 180mm f/3.5L, 70-200mm f/2.8L, 80-200mm f/2.8L & 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L EF lenses.  These L lenses normally come with the case when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.  However if your case is worn, replacing it to protect your lens is recommended.PROS:Protects your glass investmentDurable constructionBuilt for mobility outside of your camera bagCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
I want to protect my lens. While not the most expensive, the Canon is adequate for what I nee</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I picked up the Canon 350d while I was in Italy.  I was thinking to upgrade the camera to another Canon that didn't have the built in flash.  This flash is great, I've only used it a few times, but I am more than impressed by it's functionality.In the title, I only said "oops" because I think it's more flash than I really need, at least for this camera.  Overall, I am more than impressed with this flash</review_text>
Super easy to use and significantly extends your flash photo distance over in-camera flashes.  Versatile flash direction accommodates multiple scenarios and moods</review_text>
I bought this flash for my Canon 30D because of the numerous promises Canon makes for how it performs with all of the 30D's automatic and manual functions...and they are RIGHT!  In spite of it's relatively small size, it is THE most powerful flash I've used of any brand.  Having replaced a non-Canon brand flash that was supposed to work with the 30D but didn't, I could not be more delighted with the 580X.  Whether you're shooting in AV, TV, P, or M modes, you will not be disappointed with its performance.  It's expensive; but it's worth the price if you rely on your flash to perform to your camera's capabilities</review_text>
I hesitated for a year to upgrade from the 550 to the 580 because, on paper, I did not see much advantage.  In fact, the 580 is a worthwhile upgrade.  I like the new dial on the back for adjusting exposure compensation, etc. and the catchlight screen is a nice touch but the biggest advantages are the incredibly fast recycling time and smailler size.  I can machine gun my 1Ds2 and this flash keeps up.  The 550 could not.  It is small enough not to overwhelm my little Rebel too.  I did note that there is some vignetting at 24mm with a direct flash unless I drop the wide lens screen.  The manual says ths will not happen but it does.  Not a big deal since I use a Gary Fong diffuser or bounce flash almost always</review_text>
Like most every Canon accessory, the 580EX is well made and very expensive. I cheaped out when I bought my Digital Rebel and bought the Sigma EF-500 DG, which was represented as being "almost as good as" the Canon 580EX. That appears to be true. The problem is that "almost" leaves me with no master/slave lighting. So when I picked up a EOS 30D, I bit the bullet and paid the big bucks for the Canon. It works as advertised and nicely makes the Sigma the slave it was really born to be</review_text>
I'll spare the technical review of the 580ex Flash for now. I've been using this new flash for on-the-go shootings and find it very helpful especially with the capabilities of using multi flash units and off-shoe mode. It's great on hard to reach places where I want to produce more light or fast moving subjects, i.e. wedding guests and fast pets. I do plan to pick up at least 2 more of these units for it's compatibility on the most part. Not only that I can get good light coverage on the subjects, but the possibilities of making a more interesting artistic photographs that defines my work. Still nothing beats the use of the higher end lighting kits like Profoto Acute systems. But that's alot to lug around.</review_text>
The 580EX is a wonderful flash and I would not hesitate to buy it again.  In fact I might even buy a second one.There are however a couple of issues that you should be aware of.1. The battery compartment door takes a little getting used to.  You may feel like you are going to snap it off at first.  Not really a big deal though.2. (and in my opinion this IS a big deal).  The `Auto Focus Assist' is completely useless.  Its just an LED pointed through a rather bad `lens'.  It won't do anything past a couple of feet.  A laser diode with diffraction grating would have made it work far past the useable flash distance and at this price Canon should know better.All told however it is a wonderful flash.  The circular command dial make adjusting the flash exposure easy (dial in more or less flash relative to ambient light).If you do not have an external flash get one.  It makes a huge difference.  And this is a great offering.</review_text>
Good basic set of inexpensive filters.  Nice case.  Great for a beginner/starting set.  If you're willing to spend more money on filters, getting B+W or Hoya will suit you better.</review_text>
I feel that these filters are not required if you have digital camera the coze you you can do what ever you like by computer graphics programs only  the UV protector is important</review_text>
Excellent performance, at a reasonable price.  Highly recomend this product</review_text>
I have found that Tiffen filters offer unlimited possibilites.  With this kit you get three great filters.  Most important being the Circular Polarizer.  If you are shooting outdoors it is a must have.  You also get the 812 warming filter which I have found to bring great depths of warmth to photographs.  Filters protect lenses and Tiffen I have found to be great quality and this is a great value</review_text>
...in that it diffuses the light energy of the flash in different directions, essentially turning the flash into a point light source.  The light going off in different directions then bounces off nearby objects to fill in the shadow areas on the subject, making for a more pleasing softer look, especially on people.Note of caution: because this device diffuses the light from the flash, it takes much more energy per flash.  Using the Stofen will drain your battery much quicker (about 4X in my experience) and it takes the flash much longer to fully charge after each shot, say 8-10 seconds vs 2-3s.  Always keep a spare set of flash batteries with you.Another note...because it requires bouncing light of nearby objects to be effective, using this outdoors is not recommended.  You're better off removing the omni-bounce and aiming the flash directly at the subject (and living with the harsh lighting).</review_text>
This seemingly simple piece of molded plastic was recommended to me by a professional photographer.  Basically it's the shape of an open box that slides firmly onto the flash.  It is small and sturdy enough to stash in your camera bag without worrying about damage.  When used the light disperses more evenly and is less harsh on the subject being photographed.The white box is for general use.  Also available are the green Omni-bounce for florescent lighting and the gold Omni-bounce for a warming effect.PROS:Inexpensive solution for better flash photography.A quality product that works.CONS:Non</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This is my lens for handheld images of birds in flight. It's sharp and exhibits no color fringing or other chromatic aberration. By comparison, my Leitz 400mm f/6.8 Telyt shows a fair amount of color fringing outside the center region. To be fair, the Telyt is a much simpler design.The Telyt does have higher contrast than the EF 400mm f/4 DO IS, but a levels layer in Photoshop can fix that.The 400mm f/4 DO IS is much lighter than any 400mm f/4 lens with conventional optics. DO lenses have a diffraction element that compensates for the color dispersion of spherical lens elements. It also reduces optical complexity and size.The f/4 speed makes autofocus faster, and allows even better isolation of subjects using narrow depth of field. While bigger and heavier than Canon's 400mm f/5.6L, the f/4 lens is light enough at 4.3 pounds that it's still easy to carry. I've used mine on hikes above 10,000 feet to photograph bighorn sheep.IS definitely makes a difference handheld, and on a tripod below 1/125 second. Canon's 400mm f/5.6L is a non-stabilized lens.I've taken some of my sharpest wildlife images with this lens - you can see every feather in some bird shots. Highly recommended if you can afford one.</review_text>
I am a technology guru and this camera is simple to use and has great results. The touch screen is awesome!!! Battery life is so much better than other cameras i have owned. I think this one will outlast and perform any of them. BUY IT NOW if you want a quality camera that will make you happy!!</review_text>
I am not the most experienced photographer, but this camera takes terrific pictures, in my opinion.  Nice big LCD screen and the touch screen is a great feature</review_text>
Quick, compact, light and brilliant pictures but lacking veiw finder and "anti-shake" syste</review_text>
Photos were excellent. But photo print quality depends very much on the print shop. For the same photo file, it can look like a 4M photo when taken to a below quality printer shop. Photos taken indoor with marginal lighting (no flash used) turned out to be yellowish. Battery life is very long despite its large 3" LCD. Battery charging time is over 3 hours - too long. Photos files viewed on computer looks just great. 8'x10' prints are great but have not tried larger prints. Touch screeen control is a delight and very easy to choose and set. Date on photo is red (would be better if it is black). And the location of the date is not at the far right hand corner</review_text>
Camera works great for us so far... we had a 3 year old digital camera so this was an upgrade to better technology... takes much better pictures than our old one... the video is great (except in very low light)... we've taken a lot of short video clips of our kids for grandma (etc)... nobody in our family wants to watch more than about 5 minutes of any one home video anyway... so this camera saves us from having to buy a camcorder... (although with our 1GB card we could take 45 minutes or so of continuous video at the medium setting)... the touch screen is great and simple... the camera has quick response time and the indoor and action pictures are again great for pictures of our kids running around or birthday parties... I took about 92 minutes of video and 55 pictures (plus sharing images and videos with others) before the battery ran out for the first time (a couple of weeks of shooting in our family).  I guess everyone has their own needs when picking a digital camera, but this one works great for ours</review_text>
The camera is a superb, light-weight wonder.  The controls are logical and the large display area is amazing.  I love it.</review_text>
A good quality filter set at a great price. I was so happy with it I purchased sets for all my lenses and cameras! The same filters in my local camera store is more than double in price</review_text>
If you would like a list of sites with reviews emailgumby (at) dontquotemeonthat (dot) comPros:  Great sharpness even wide open (wayyyyy better than the F2.8 zooms at F2.8). nice weight and size. shallow DOF in a wide angle lens.Cons:  Lateral CA glows purple and green in close and distant bokeh. Watch for high contrast situations. My first copy was DOA. No weather seal. Hood is too tight.Pros:  Fantastic! This is one excellent piece of glass. Incredible in low light, with vibrant clarity and color. Well balanced with 20D/Batter pack or a 1D.Cons:  None what so ever.if your a newbie here's some infoA lens is "fast" when it has a low f-stop... ok so when you have a smaller number the apature is bigger which allows more light through, so this means you can up the shutter speed. and still have enough light reach the sensor.ok so lets say you have an out door shot if you have say an f/4 lens the shutter speed could be 1/250 of a second and you would get a good exposer. Now this lens can only go f/4but if you in the same outdoor setting, had an f/2.8 lens you could jump to 1/500 of a second and get the same exposer. and freeze the action mmore effectivly, this i believe is why it's a "fast" lens.ok have fun and get it done</review_text>
This is a great lens if you need to shoot wide angle in very low light siuations. If you don't need a lens for this exact purpose, you'd be better off spending a few extra dollars on either the 16-35L or 24-70L. These two zoom lenses cover 24mm (and more) at a very reasonable f2.8 with good results. They won't bag a shot in the shadows, but they will handle any decently lit scenario with ease.If you just have to own an f1.4 prime lens, the 35mm f1.4 is a much more universally well-regarded L lens than the 24mm f1.4. The 50mm f1.4 is 1/3 the price of either and just as amazing in my opinion so long as you don't need the wide angle.The only reason I give the 24mm f1.4 a 4 instead of a 5 is the price</review_text>
You'll never regret buying the Canon L series.  The fit and finish is perfect and image quality is excellent</review_text>
If you have the big lenses (400mm f/2.8L IS USM or even the 70-200mm f/2.8L IS USM) this is totally worth the addition. The 2x does NOT kill the autofocus on the f/2.8 and effectively doubles your lens with very little distortion around the edges. Check compatability on Canon's website. You won't be disappointed</review_text>
What a great little piece of kit. It's great with my EF 70-200mm f/4L.  The only drawback is you've no AF.  You are forced to use manual focus. Now this isn't a big problem, unless you're photographing wildlife or moving objects.  Well worth the price though and very useful</review_text>
Just received Canon EF 2X II from Adorama. Paid $279.95 plus $17.95 shipping. Len has been previously used and placed back in the pouch and sold as new. Len cap is marred with several scratches. Looks to have been handled rough. My advice is bypass Adorama as a third party vendor and buy directly from Amazon. Adorama refunds within 14 days less shipping. Thats $17.95 for me to return a used product sold as new. Won't go there again</review_text>
This high quality extender is a great addition to my Canon EF 70-200 L f/4 !! With a top-notch build quality and a tough, weather resistant design equal to that of their highly respected line of &quot;L&quot; lenses, Canon has produced a great product for its unbeatable zoom lens !! Although the 2X extender renders the A/F function useless on many Canon cameras, I found this to be a Very small drawback overall ( I prefer to manually focus under many of my shooting conditions). This extender is more suited for a low f/number lens due to the 2-stop change in brightness, but it is still VERY effective with my f/4 in normal lighting. A lightweight and fairly inexpensive way to double your focal length, while maintaining the incredible optical quality of the main lens...My backpack will always contain my 2X and 1.4X extenders !</review_text>
Manufactured of a soft gray felt like material, a tough leather bottom, and draw string closure at the top, this lens pouch helps protect your lens from dust and the elements.  I store my lenses in a camera bag, and these cases fit nicely around the lens taking up little precious space.This case is meant for use with the Canon EF 135mm f/2L USM, EF 24-70mm f/2.8L USM, EF 24-105mm f/4.0L USM, EF 28-70 F/2.8 L, EF 50 F/1.0 L USM, EF 85mm f/1.2L USM lenses. These L lenses normally come with the case when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.  However if your case is worn, replacing it to protect your lens is recommended.PROS:Protects your glass investmentCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
When digital cameras first came out, I, like many people swore I'd always be loyal to film. Digital could never take the place of film. I'm not convinced that it has replaced film completely. There's still something I love about putting a roll of film in the camera, shooting away, sending the film to be processed, and seeing the results. I also know it's a bit expensive. I know that the argument about quality has always been paramount in the discussion, but digital cameras are improving in this regard, and most manufacturers are assuring users that while the technology will always be improving, we are at a point where a good investment can be made in a digital SLR and it will not be outdated as soon as the buyer purchases the camera. So I figured now is the time to get a digital SLR.I have been a loyal Nikon user for nearly ten years, and have owned the Nikon N60, N70, and N80. My first love was, and still is the N70 (I've been told by the person who sold me the camera he thought I was the only person who loved the N70).  I purchased the N80 only after my N70 cost too much to repair, but I've enjoyed the way my various Nikon cameras have handled all sorts of situations and the fact that they can be as simple to use as a point and shoot if I don't have the time to use specific controls, but it also has options for more creative and artistic purposes. My Nikon cameras have allowed me to capture family moments with ease and majestic landscapes, wildlife shots and all sorts of other things I can't resist to capture forever.I decided to purchase the D70 since it was close to what I've already experienced with Nikon. In many ways it works in a similar way to the N70 and 80, except it's a digital rather than film version. Like the film versions of the midrange Nikon SLR's, it has a dial that allows an automatic setting,  portrait, landscape, sports, close-up, nightscape, and night portrait modes, the ability to select aperture, shutter speed or manual controls. The camera has auto and manual focus abilities. Photos can be as easy or technical as the photographer desires. The controls are easy to use, though it takes practice to be comfortable. On a personal level, the camera has passed the Halloween test, niece's birthday test, and fall foliage in New England test and favorite scenic spots test. The only real difficulty I've had with the camera is trying to capture stained glass windows in a dark setting. Auto focus has not worked at all and I'm not thrilled with the manual focus of these shots, but at this point I'm sure it's the photographer and not the camera.I do have one suggestion for anyone who purchases this camera. The manual is very confusing. It uses all sorts of symbols and can be more of a distraction than anything else. I've had luck with the "Magic Lantern Guides" with my other cameras, but have not as of yet used it for this camera. I did purchase the NIKON D70 FIELD GUIDE (David Busch, Wiley Publishing) which has been helpful. It can be a quick reference for anyone already familiar with Nikon and photography in general but it also provides and introduction for the novice to photography.</review_text>
I've had my D70s for about a year now, haven't regretted it for a second.The controls are laid out logically, with everything to hand. The dual control wheels make adjustments fast and accurate. I personally love the optional grid overlay, I have no excuses for horizons that aren't horizontal. The wireless flash system is great, though you have to buy an SB-600 or SB-800 to get the full benefit. This camera is bigger and heavier than the D50 and D80, which in my opinion is a positive thing.</review_text>
I am a professional photographer, and I have owned this camera for nearly two years.  I also have a D70 for backup.  The batteries go forever, it is very quick to respond, the images are beautiful, and it has the typical Nikon durability and reliability.  If you are already a Nikon user, the controls will fall easily to hand.That having been said, the computer software with this camera is a joke.  For the best image quality shoot RAW files, color balance with a grey card, and render the images with software like Capture One LE.  The uselessness of the included software is the only reason that this camera gets four instead of five stars.  Come on, Nikon, be real!!!Shortly after I got my first D70, I shot a model for a small photo for a side bar in a catalog.  I got an ugly feeling in my gut when I was told that the designer had taken a shot that was 3/4 figure, cropped to the head and shoulders, and enlarged the image for the cover of the 8.5 x 11 in catalog.  By the time I found out, it was already at the printer.  As it turned out, I was pleasantly surprised: the cover shot looked great.  After that incident, I have trusted this camera and have always been pleased with the results.This camera is better than 35 mm in every way except response to the shutter button.  In resolution and color reproduction it is more comparable to a medium format film camera.  It is imperative to shoot RAW and process the files properly to get the most out of this camera.I can't wait to try the D80</review_text>
I do weddings, portrait, and outdoor photography and I don't see any reason why I'd ever switch from the D70 (other than the D80 :).  This camera is professional grade at the consumer price point.  Don't be scared by the 6.1 MP.  I print at 20x30 all the time w/ out any problems.  I'd recommend reading Thom Hogans manual</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
Excellent camera kit. Versatile. I have a lot to learn about the camera, though, as it is no simple point-and-shoot. However, in Auto mode, it takes great point-and-shoot pictures. I look forward to learning how to use it fully. Lenses came with warranty cards, but the camera itself did not. I bought the SB-600 flash as well and another battery and two 1 GB compact flash cards to round out the kit. Camera with lens attached is large, which I underestimated. $80 camera bag is too small for it all. Great camera, though. Price was the best I could find anywhere</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
I have owned this camera for about two months now and have taken about 100 photographs (keepers) to date.  Because I have been involved in photography for almost 35 years, I have developed certain prejudices. In particular, I have never been comfortable with auto exposure and even less comfortable with auto focus. In fact, the last auto focus camera I owned was a Nikon N8008s that I ultimately sold at auction because I could not adapt to using the various auto settings.However, I like this camera. Why? The D70s is a very easy camera to use and I have only had to refer to the manual to check on a couple of settings and look up some features. Honestly, set up takes only a few minutes and handling is not terribly different from a film camera. I should point out that this camera is really designed for auto focus lenses and if you choose to use your manual focus lot, you will disable many of the camera's features.Because I am both stubborn and cheap (but mostly only when it comes to spending money on myself) I am using my manual focus lenses on this camera. It is true that I do not get any internal exposure meter readings and must rely on a handheld Gossen or the sunny 16 rule (quite effective, really) for exposure determination. The LCD preview screen thus is critical for determining or adjusting exposure. I should also point out that the depth of field preview feature is also lost when using manual focus lenses. I was stunned when I could not stop my lens down and burrowed through the manual to find out what I was doing wrong--which was nothing except that I was using the wrong type of lens. While I really miss this feature, I am not sure how big a loss it really is because of the viewfinder. Others have made mention of the low magnification and tunnel like views through the finder and I can attest to this fact. I compared finder views to my trusty old FM and was just stunned by how poorly the D70 compared.Ultimately the best camera is the camera you use and the D70 has become my camera of choice. Even though I am using this camera like a vintage M series Leica--i.e., handheld meter and presetting exposure in anticipation of a photograph--I find that I can live with this level of usability. At some point I will probably buy an auto focus lens (maybe the 35 f2) and make full use of the feature set.  But for now I content on using the camera the old fashioned way</review_text>
I am 67 years old and started out in photography as a kid with a contact printer and a box camera. I have had all types of cameras over the years, mostly 35mm film Canon slr's. I too bought all sorts of these 5-7 MP point and shoot digital cameras before returning to my true love, SLR's. I have had my digital Canon Rebel XT about a month now and I can't keep my hands off of it. It lacks nothing. Although the kit lense is good, I bought a 28-135 Canon zoom lense with image stabilizion and have produced stunning photo's with it. I love the way you can use the 7 points to focus, I mainly use only the center point with focus lock and never get an out of focus picture. I guess the nicest thing for me is that I now don't have the urge to buy every point and shoot camera that is paraded out on QVC or HSN that has a "wonderful" new feature like "low light or non-shake." This Canon has every good feature in the known universe and you can't outgrow it. Its a camera that will let you be as good as you can be, it won't hold you back. The battery life is great, the built in flash is good but I bought a 430EX and that's even better. I never figure I'm wasting money buying accessories for this camera as it will be my main squeeze for many years to come. I always missed my 35mm Canon slr's and now feel that I have an old friend back again, only much much better. Believe me, you can't go wrong getting this camea, its beyond description...</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
I love the new digital Canon. The only problem is it's not nearly as tough as it's film twin.  I had the camera less than a month when the pop-up flash quit working.  The Canon people have been great, and very helpful, but I'd rather not have had to send a brand new camera back to the factory.  The photos, however, are wonderful.  Film quality for the most part - printable and enlargable.  (It would probably be better to use the camera with a tripod when using the 300mm telephoto but I hike with it, so just remember to steady it before taking wildlife photos.</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
I already had a digital rebel and was able to sell it to a co-worker and use the proceeds for my new rebel xt. Faster, lighter, better. Simple review. It took everything that was great about my digital rebel and made it better. Some complain that it feels "too light"...OK...it that's your thing. To me, it's still solid and the pictures speak for themselves.Now, with the addition of the 10 MP rebel xt, I'll bet the original xt can be purchased for an even better price.No downsides that I can think of..</review_text>
I have had digital cameras for about 5 years and still own an Olympus 5 megapixel, and a Casio 7 megapixel. Seems like Megamixels alone just don't cut it for me.I read about the rebel XT in a magazine and looked up the user reviews here on Amazon.I decided to go and buy one and though I am really a novice, I am extremely impressed. I have never seen such stunning quality or realistic colors from a Point & Shoot. I started with the basic settings and love the results.I am slowly progressing to more advanced settings and am getting better everyday.Even a novice who just wants stunning photography will be amazed with this camera.I also bought a Tamron 75-300 Autofocus zoom lens (look for it here on Amazon.com) and after lots of practice, have been able to take some great pictures.I have a brother in the UK who is also into digital photography, and after seeing some (full reso) photos I sent him, he rushed out and bought the XTi (called the EOS 400D across the pond)and is amazed with it.I still have a lot to learn but really cannot fault this camera. The included software is also excellent.For the record, some reviews seem to think it is too small to hold, I have big hands and don't have any problems at all. I admit though this is the first SLR I have ever owned.I will still keep a point and shoot to keep in my travel bag for spontaneous photography but I am in love with my Rebel XT!!This camera costs quite chunk of change but I think it is well worth it and I do recommend it to everyone</review_text>
I am a severe novice at photography and do not know much on the subject but I really wanted to take better pictures of my boyfreind who does freetstyle motocross.  I was having a hard time getting the timing down and getting a good zoom with my old camera and with this camera I have been getting some amazing pictures. At first when reading the manual I became extremely overwhelmed and scared that I made a bad decision.  I still do not know what the fancy functions are and how to use them.  But I did find that it is very user friendly if you just go with the automatic shooting modes. I'm very excited about the wonderful picture quality I've been getting. Some of his sponsors are even using my shots for their advertisements! I highly recommend this camera!!</review_text>
It's not the best looking remote you'll ever find but the design is made practical to fit the strap. You'll never lose this remote and it works like a charm</review_text>
I decided to get this after buying the Rebel XTi and already owning the Rebel XT (this works with both.)  I already had the corded shutter release which was nice when doing long exposures or macro work where even a little camera shake can make a huge difference.  But this goes to a new level, you can set the camera up get everything in focus and then step back and take as many shots as you want without any risk of touching the camera.  Make sure to cover the eyepiece when using this so stray light doesn't ruin your exposure.  This is also handy when you want to take pictures with you in them.  I have even used it with two cameras at once to get multiple angles of the same shot.  I am thinking about setting up a blind and setting up the camera on a tripod to try to get some close up pictures of wildlife that would not be possible otherwise.  Basically if you ever have a need to take pictures without holding the camera this is your solution</review_text>
I bought the remote control so that I could trip the shutter while my camera was on a tripod.  Mostly landscape stuff.  It works great for my intended use.  The only minor problem is that you have to point the remote control at the front of the camera.  I have found that it works fine if I hold the remote in front of, and below the lens (out of view of the lens)</review_text>
My photography does not have much call for a wireless remote but this was too easy to pass up.  It delivered as advertised and I am finding that I am using it in place of a wired remote for ultra close up and low light photagraphy when using a tripod.  It is very small so it is easy to pack away anywhere</review_text>
I bought this remote for canon digital rebel XT. Pretty much programs itself. Great asset that it clips to camera strap. Works from good distance. Highly recommen</review_text>
Got it. worked as per described. value for money. works both from front and behind for rabel XT(somebody wrote here it doesn't work from the back side of the camera)</review_text>
Wonderful camera. Very flexiable, very versitile. Can be the most wonderful creation device in someone whom is capable. Def a good buy now that the 30D is out.I've had this camera for over a year and I STILL love it</review_text>
Excellent Camera with high end capabilities. Easy to use and intuitive system controls</review_text>
I am just a hobbyist.  This was a big purchase and a big step for me to get into this level of camera.  I still haven't mastered using it yet, and I've had it for a few months.It does a wonderful job of taking pictures.  If you have the right lenses, it can take some of the most beautiful pictures you've ever seen.  Again, I'm just a hobbyist/enthusiast.  I use it to take pictures for work, too.I highly recommend getting a couple of VERY good lenses to go with it.  Don't go with the cheap lenses that Canon, Tamron, Sigma, etc. make for this camera.  Do yourself a favor and get a nice zoom - spend some bucks.  You'll be happy you did.The camera itself is pretty easy to use if you leave it on auto, but that's like buying a race car and never shifting out of first gear.  The auto settings are great, and they do a wonderful job, but you can do so much more if you learn to use the camera in Manual, Av, Tv, or P mode.  It allows you so much more creativity that you'll be amazed at the difference.The 30D came out right before I bought the 20D, and I would probably buy it for the price now, but I'm very happy with my 20D</review_text>
This camera is really great.  I knew I liked it before, but I immediately began to appreciate this camera all the more when I ended up with a Rebel XT as a "loaner" while my 20d was in repair.Not that the XT is a bad camera, it just doesn't really compare to the 20d.The 20d has a nice feel to it; it is fairly large, which is great since I have somewhat large hands.  The features are great too.  And the image quality is awesome.  I don't really need to go into all of the details, as most of the other reviewers have done an excellent job.  Let me just say that it is a great camera and is worth the five stars.The only complaint I have about the camera is that it doesn't have spot metering.  The ability to do your light metering off of a single point of interest would be great - and they did add it to the 30d.</review_text>
Impressive feature list wih affordable price, for the serious ameteur. i've been using the 20D with 18-55, 50mm 1.8, 35-80, 80-200 and 500/1000mm lenses. i am not disappointed. i am planning to upgrade to the L series lenses but slowly.i do not mean to be over entusiastic about canon, but i am yet to see a Nikon camera with the same specs at the same or ever a near equal price. i've got the FM10 for film photography. i love both my cameras.Impressive features include:Mirror lockupISO 3200 with noise reduction18 custom functionsaccepts the entire series of canon lens.heavy metal body (no cheap plastic feel</review_text>
This camera is amazing, I couldn't have asked for more. Just be warned that the manual is pretty terrible. It's best to just play around with the camera until you figure it out, rather than wasting time trying to decipher the manual</review_text>
My kids are in competitive Tae Kwon Do. I have now used the camera my wife gave me one year ago at several tournaments. It is able to stop action and take great shots even in low lighting. Now, we tried it when we went skiing and it also worked great in the glare conditions of the snow. I bought a monopod that worked real well to stabalize and I use software called PhotoFinale to crop and share the photos.One year into the usage I am still looking forward to each chance I get to play with this "toy".Next options: battery grip, flash diffuser, extra remote flash..</review_text>
I bought this camera about 2 months before my son was born.  I knew little about Digital SLRs, but after research I found that this was the one for me.  This camera is well constructed and durable.  The pictures are excellent.  I have blown a few of my pictures up to 11X17 without any problem.  Also, if you are going to be doing any editing of photos on your computer, this camera would be great.  I would recommend purchasing the newest version of Photoshop or Photoshop elements (when I bought mine it only came with Elements 2.0 and 3.0 was already on the market).  Also, if you want your pictures to turn out, you MUST purchase a larger flash.  The onboard flash is weak, will leave shadows and it does not allow you to do any type of "bounce" flash.  On the whole, this is the best camera I have ever had in my life and it would be great for anyone who has previous experience with SLR cameras.</review_text>
I love the capacity of these batteries.  Use them for my handheld GPS, digital cameras, 35MM cameras, flashes, and everything else that I can.  The car power adaptor is really nice for road trips!  The charger can recharge 4 batteries at a time (either AA or AAA), and can charge even the 2100 mAH batteries in under 75 minutes (under an hour for "typical" rechargeables of 1600 or fewer mAH).  I do not like leaving the charger plugged in, because I can hear it clicking when there are no batteries in it (but I hear lots of things that wouldn't bother a normal person).  Also, the price is pretty high.  I have succesfully used other batteries in the charger (it comes with 8 2100 mAH NiMH batteries that do seem to last longer than other brands of rechargeable).  Ask for it for Christmas...hope for a discount (which appears to be pretty rare for MonsterCable products)</review_text>
I have been delighted with the quality of pictures I get with this lens.  The autofocus is fast and quiet, while the manual focus is very solid and smooth.I'm finally taking pictures worthy of the jewelry my partner creates</review_text>
I purchased this lens primarily for use as a macro lens.  Since I shoot mostly wildlife (including bugs) I thought the field of view of 160mm (used with my Canon Rebel XT) would be just about ideal.  In reality the FL was not enough.  I had to approach the bugs much too close and they frequently left the scene quickly.  The pictures taken with the lens were extremely sharp and the bocah (out of focus area behind the subject) was very nice.  I wound up selling the lens on eBay since it didn't meet my needs</review_text>
This is a really handy lens to have in your bag.  I added this lens to my collection several months ago, and I haven't regretted it one bit.  I took a trip to Montana in August and used this lens to photograph a ton of wildflowers.  I was also using a 70-300mm telephoto lens and a 24-70mm wide angle lens heavily, but most of my favorite shots on that trip were taken with this lens.Autofocusing is very quiet since it's USM powered, but it's often tricky to get the right focus if you're doing an extreme closeup.  This is a general facet of macro lenses, so you'll probably find yourself using manual focus 90% of the time or more.  The manual focus on this lens is quite excellent though, and responds well to fine adjustments.  It's also quite easy for me to handhold it, as long as I have a decent amount of light or pop up the flash.With all that being said, this is a nice lens to grab after you have a decent telephoto lens, if you like photographing small things.  Otherwise, you might look into getting some other lenses first, i.e. wide angle, fisheye, etc. (unless you already own all of them :-))</review_text>
I bought this lens a little over a year ago for macro shooting.  I quickly found out, however, that to shoot Macro-only with this lens is a crime.  It is a very versitile lens.  Its fast f/2.8 aperture makes for good shooting in low light.  I pretty much use this outdoors as the 100mm with the 1.6x crop factor of my Rebel XT eliminates most indoor oppurtunities.I frequently use this lens for family portraits, the resultant photo is so crisp and clear and the bokeh really helps add snap to the primary subject.As others have stated, this is a heavy lens.  It doesn't have Image Stabilization (IS) so a tripod or monopod is a great accessory to get the best images.  I use a beefy monopod for my best shots, although I have a lot of handheld gems...If you are tight for cash, this isn't the "one lens" that does it all.  If you are looking for a versitile lens that can do outstanding macros and portraits, THIS is that lens.</review_text>
This is a fantastic piece of glass.  Extremely sharp and little artifacts.  An awesome lens that I recommend highly.  I love going to the local botanical gardens and mounting this baby on my 20D.  WELL worth the cost.  If you dont have a tripod, buy one</review_text>
I wanted to get a macro lens and everyone told me this was the one to get... I'm so glad I did. With the smaller sensor on my 30D, the 100mm is more like 150mm or so, so it's a nice , wide-open telephoto/portrait lens as well. I've uploaded a few photos I've taken w/ this lens to show what it's capable of in macro and telephoto. I thought the 17mm-85mm IS USM lens that came e/ my camera was sharp - but compared to this lens, the kit lens might as well be from a DIY pinhole camera.My less than perfect rating is that there is no image stabilization available for the macro lenses. When I'm trying to hone in on bees pollenating a flower, there is a lot of shake. I can't practically use a tripod when the insects are bouncing from bud to bud, so I have to take 100 shots to get one that's not shake blur - and I miss some really cool shots.In addition to the lack of image stabilization, I am frustrated w/ the sometimes unpredictable focusing that will happen as the lens is trying to decide whether it should be focusing at telephoto or macro. I wish there was a switch on the lens to make it macro only or telephoto only, so it wouldn't be bouncing from one focal length to the other all the time.I've taken far more successful telephoto shots than macro. The telephoto focal length is a bit long (for those of us who cannot afford a full-frame sensor camera) for most casual photography. I recently used this lens to shoot some promo shots of some massage therapists in a small eatery. I practically had to set up in the restaurant's bathroom to get the photos I wanted, but opted for this lens because it's much faster (2.8) and I wanted to use natural light over flash.The lens is long and heavy for its range. With the addition of the battery pack grip, this lens added on is very weighty, so I may not take it w/ me in my kit bag on every shoot. Once I add another short fixed focal length lens and a moderate telephoto to my kit, my guess is that this lens will be pulled out for only special occasions.It's tack-sharp, but it can be frustrating at times</review_text>
This is a fantastic lens not only for Macro shots but for portraits too. Having the extra distance allows for far more flexibility when out and about.Having tried both the 50, 60 and 100mm - I'm glad I went with the 100mm</review_text>
This lens is one of my favorites... not only is it an awesome macro lens, it also can easily be used as a portrait lens.  The sharpness that I have seen in my macro work has thoroughly pleased me... it ranks right up there with my "L" lenses</review_text>
"Wow!" is all I can say to express my reaction after getting prints taken with my 17-40.  I've been using Nikon manual-focus Nikkors since 1988 and was always satisfied with the color and sharpness.  However, after using the Canon "L" series, I've sold a lot of my Nikkors.  The color, clarity, sharpness, and detail of the "L" lenses are amazing.  The prints have this 3-D effect (without having to use those silly red/blue glasses!) 8-)  Within 3 weeks of receiving my 17-40, I ordered the 70-200.  Those two lenses will replace my whole Nikkor collection.  Build is really good.  The "L" zooms are a little bulkier, but very managable.  The Nikkors are smaller, but very heavy.  But lense technology and coatings have improved so much in 20 years, I can see the difference.  I tested the lens by pointing it toward the sun.  The 17-40 surprising handles flare very well.  With the sun just outside the field of view, there was very little flare and loss of contrast.  I also make 12x18 prints, and this lens handles them easily.  The body is going to be the limiting factor (refering to digital bodies).Warning: once you use "L" glass, you are going to be spoiled.  You may not settle for consumer lenses anymore, although some non-L lenses are quick good from what I read</review_text>
This is my first L lens.  As an amateur, this really makes you see the difference in lenses.  I use this as a general lens and have basically put away the lens that came in the kit.  I am also planning to purchase the 100-400mm IS for better wildlife and family sports photography.  Wish it came with a better lens hood.</review_text>
The walkaround lens. This very topic leads to a heated discussion among DSLR photographers.First, determine your budget, focal length, and aperture needs.If you frequently find yourself zooming out to get everything in a frame, you will want a wide angle lens such as this. If you frequently find yourself zooming in, this is not the lens for you. On a full frame body such as Canon EOS 5D, this lens becomes ULTRA wide angle. On an APS-C crop body such as Digital Rebel XTi (which I used for this review), it becomes MEDIUM wide angle. But thanks to 1.6x crop factor, this lens expands to more usable 35mm equivalent focal length of 27 to 64mm.Second, audition the lens if you can.By definition, a walkaround lens should be relatively portable. At 1.1 lbs., Canon's EF 17-40mm f/4L USM is neither super light nor neck breakingly heavy. In fact, it weighs almost the same as Digital Rebel XTi -- really nice balance. The lens feels very solid with supreme build quality that only L-series lenses offer. Although this lens is weather proof and therefore sealed against liquid and dust, I strongly recommend getting a 77mm filter to protect the front lens element. With it, this lens is made to last.In terms of looks and feel, it doesn't get much better. Its rubberized full-time inner focus manual ring USM focuses smoothly, quietly, and quickly. Since it's inner focus, the lens will not extend beyond its metal casing whether you zoom in or out. The focus window shows focusing distance from 0.28 meter (0.92 feet) to infinity. The focal length marker indicates 17, 20, 24, 28, 35, and 40mm. The lens exudes quality from tip to tip.You may tolerate heavier lens or may not mind lesser build quality of cheaper lenses.  A walkaround lens will be used very often, so make sure you will be comfortable with it.This lens is famous for saturated color and deep contrast. Its images are simply stunning. At 17mm wide angle, barrel distortion is noticeable but relatively mild. From 24mm to 40mm, its images are distortion free and perfectly suited at capturing people.Vignetting (corner darkness) is minimal with mild chroma abberrations (color shadows). At f/4 aperture, details become noticeably softer toward the edges. The center region is very sharp and at f/5.6, edges remain fairy sharp. Thanks to 7 diaphragm blades, this lens can produce very nice bokeh at 40mm (blur effects).One of the most cited weaknesses is the f/4 aperture. In my experience, a bump in the ISO speed and steady hands are all you need to take well focused images indoor. On the other hand, if you are shooting with very little amount of light, you might wish for f/2.8 or image stabilizer. Although the difference between f/4 and f/2.8 is just 1 stop, my other lens, Canon EF 24-70mm f/2.8L USM (too heavy to be my walkaround lens) easily outperforms in such challenging situations. But by and large, I was not handicapped by the f/4 aperture.Some of the main competitions (sorted by price):- Sigma 18-50mm f/2.8 EX DC: Arguably the best wide angle lens for limited budget. The focus mechanism is a bit slow, corner is very soft, chroma abberrations can be a bit of an issue, and the lens is highly prone to flare. Works only with EF-S mount.- Sigma AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC macro: A bit more expensive than Sigma 18-50mm, but has wider focal range with macro capability.- Canon EF-S 17-85mm f/4-5.6 IS USM: This "traveler's lens" has a wider focal range than most wide angle lenses (widest among Canon) and is equipped with an image stabilizer. But the lens is famous for extreme barrel distortion at 17mm and chroma abberrations. Works only with EF-S mount.- Tamron SP AF 17-50mm f/2.8 Di II LD Aspherical (IF): This is the most direct competitor. It takes sharper images with faster aperture while costing less. Both the build and focus mechanism are significantly worse, but should be good enough for many. Works only with EF-S mount.- Canon EF-S 17-55mm f/2.8 IS USM: This is THE reference, if you can afford it. Its images have razor sharp details and great performance all around (minus vignetting, which is typical of EF-S lenses). The build quality is worse than L-series but not too shabby. Works only with EF-S mount. This is the best EF-S lens hands down.- Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L USM: One of the most expensive wide angle zoom lenses. It's larger and heavier, but has f/2.8 aperture.This is how Canon EF 17-40mm f/4 USM stacks up.Pros:- Among the very best build quality.- Excellent, buttery smooth, super fast front-focus system.- Top notch color and contrast. Very sharp center resolution.- Almost non-existent vignetting, generally low distortion, and well controlled chroma abberrations.- Ideal weight and size for walkaround purposeCons:- Edge softness at f/4 aperture.- Narrower focal length than most competing lenses.- Slower than some third party lenses.All in all, this is an excellent wide angle walkaround lens. It may not offer the most bang for the buck, but if you value full frame compatibility (EF lens mount) and excellent build quality, this is the default choice. This lens comes with a nice pouch and a lens hood. I find the hood to be somewhat ridiculously shaped and because the lens is resistant to flare, I do not use it often when shooting outdoor</review_text>
This is a great lens.  I use it on full-frame film and digital SLRs, and love getting ultrawide shots.  However, if you have the cash, you'll probably be happier with the 16-35/2.8 lens, as f4 can be pretty slow indoors</review_text>
This lens produces magical images.  I am stunned by its sharpness, contrast and color saturation.  Simply amazing!  This is a great option as a standard zoom for APS-C cameras and a great wide-angle option for full-frame.For APS-C ussers, I have sold my EF-S 17-85 IS USM because this is just miles better.  I simply love this lens!  I am now so sold on the difference an L makes, that I have also sold my telephoto lens for a 70-200 f4 L.I believe this is a great investment because:* Canon lenses lose very little of their value* Should Canon abandon the APS-C sized sensor for full-frame 35mm, then the EF lens range will make your kit far more future-proof* Once the initial sting of the price has receded, you will never regret the quality of the images you take with this lensJust try it - it's awesome!Some reviewers call this a slow lens - I would disagree.  Many zooms are f3.5-5.6, or perhaps f3.5-4.5 in the pro-sumer range.  There is virtually nothing between f3.5 and f4, and a constant f-stop is an advantage.  f4 is not fast, but it's certainly not slow, either</review_text>
I am really glad that I bought this lens. It comes with hood which can be reversed when not in use so it is very useful. Leather pouch, front cap, and back cap is included. Focusing is super fast with USM.</review_text>
Having owned the distortion-prone Nikkor AFS 17-35 f2.8D for six years, it was time to switch over to Canon's EF 17-40 mm f4L USM.  Canon's version was over a $1000 cheaper, optically superior and lighter in weight.  For me, an outstanding standard lens when coupled with the Canon 5D.Vignetting at f4 is minimal.  Adobe Photoshop CS2's vignetting tool can correct the vignetting.Distortion at 17mm is minimal.  Less than Canon's EF 16-35 mm f2.8L USM set at 16 mm.With the 5D pointed at a blue sky, the EF 17-40 hunted for a focus point while the EF 16-35 didn't.Flaring is minimal when compared to the EF 16-35.Portraits taken at 40 mm produced better results than the EF 16-35 and AFS 17-35 at 35 mm.Images produced at f4 are sharp.  At f8, the images are very sharp.This lens is a definite keeper.</review_text>
This is a magnificent lens deserving of high praise. In general, I tend to shoot "available light" and towards wide angle, and EF 17-40 F4L is one perfect lens for someone like me. On an APS size sensor camera (mine is Rebel XT), it works approximately like a 28-70 mm zoom--a perfect walk-around lens, giving you decent wide angle and at the tele end, a pleasing perspective on faces you expect from a moderate telephoto. I spent two weeks with EF 17-40 on the coast shooting nature and street stuff in small towns. It performed perfectly. But I only realized what a real treasure I have when I began having second thoughts about it on the eve of a long overseas journey. I asked myself whether I would not have done better buying EF-S 17-85 F4-5.6 IS. After all, it gives you better reach - an equivalent of 28-135 mm zoom on a 35 mm camera. Would it not be a perfect lens on an overseas trip? A dilemma worhty of Hamlet. So I decided to order it from Amazon while I still had time to return EF 17-40. As soon as EF-S 17-85 came, I did some tests taking pictures of still life, flowers and a portrait at similar focal lengths and at full zoom. The results put 17-85 to shame. Color and light were flat and paled next to 17-40. But there was still the problem of reach. I took a portrait at full zoom of the same person (40 mm or 65 mm equivalent and 85 mm or 135 equivalent), cut out the critical focus area from both pix and equalized the two crops in terms of pixel numbers. Unprocessed, 17-85 produced a perfectly focused picture, the 17-40 crop was visibly softer, but in terms of tonality and richness of gradations, it was way ahead of its rival. Photoshop to the rescue! After I fiddled with sharpening and contrast in CS2, the focus softness in 17-40 was gone, and the result was a better all-around picture of the same portrait detail. In other words, if you wish to take a picture, say, of a building's detail or a monkey mug shot in a zoo--a situation calling for a telephoto of 135 mm that 17-85 is capable of--EF 17-40 F4 can do the job, in fact a better job in terms of textures and tonality--and focus, too, if you do a little post-processing in SC2. I am returning EF-S 17-85 and will stick with EF 17-40, taking it on my overseas trip. Unlike EF-S 17-85 F4-5.6, which is a feels like a decent consumer zoom,  EF 17-40 F4L is built like a tank and has weather sealing. It should also come in handy if and when I decide to switch to a full-frame camera (EF-S lenses work only with the APS-size sensors).</review_text>
May I introduce you to one of the least know and yet most superb lenses Canon makes. You probably even stumbled on to this page by accident, looking for another Canon lens, looking at various macros, or even just intrigued by this higher-priced lens you've probably never even considered.Let me just say this about this lens: Ultra sharp. Ultra colorful. Ultra contrast. Ultra solid.Like everybody else, I initially bought this lens for its macro. The 60mm and 100mm options were a lot cheaper, but my collection is entirely L-class and I'd learned to trust putting gobs of money into the lenses with the red ring. So I put my money where my L-faith is and went with this lens. Needless to say, my faith was rewarded again.Yeah, sure it's got the 1.0x macro capability, and this is important. But what I wasn't expecting was the image quality. It is unbelievably good. Now I'm not somebody who's taking his first trip into L land and comparing this lens to the $300 run-of-the-mill glass. I've used six L-class lenses significantly and I'm comparing this lens' image quality to THOSE.You will find yourself using this lens as much as its 180mm focal length and f/3.5 aperture dictates. The lens is versatile both as a super-fine telephoto and as a 1.0x macro.The macro capability is the main feature. 1.0x macro literally means that a 35mm wide object will completely fill a 35mm frame. Basically, it's a small microscope. If you dare to dial in the aperture to the wide-open f/3.5, the DOF is approximately that of the thickness of two sheets of writing paper at 1.0x. Needless to say, you'll need a tripod, preferably with macro rails that slide forwards and rearwards for ultimate control.(For those of you new to macro, focusing the lens changes the magnification factor. So as one focuses the object, the object's size in the viewfinder changes. This is why I mention the macro rails, they allow you to achieve focus and physically move the lens/camera in and out to reachieve the desired composition.)As a telephoto, due to this lens' superb image quality, it actually produces images of a much greater quality than the 70-200mm f/2.8L IS. (I know firsthand, as I own it too)  The difference is in the 70-200mm's versatility. If the light drops too low, the f/2.8 and the IS bests the f/3.5 quite rapidly. If the distance of subjects change quickly or you are unable to move your feet to frame images, the 180mm will be too constricting and the zoom will win. But under conditions where the 180mm f/3.5 can perform unhindered (such as at an airshow or out flower hunting), it will consistantly produce brighter, more saturated, and sharper images than the 70-200mm F/2.8 IS.There is a complaint that circulates about the slow speed at which this lens autofocuses, expecially annoying when trying to be used as a telephoto. This is actually incorrect. The lens' autofocus drive does infact move very quickly, but it must traverse all the way from infinity to about 4" in front of the lens to find the subject. This is where the wait time comes into effect. Here's the solution: utilizing the AF limiter switch allows you to limit the AF search to only between infinity and about 5' in front of the lens. Consequently, this range is about 10% of the focus range (the other 90% is in between that 5' and the 4"). I no longer experience AF "hunting" problems when trying to use the 180mm as a telephoto.Some other info about this lens:The front objective element is actually concave. I think this is the only L lens Canon makes with a concave front element. It's probablyexpensive to replace if an accident should occur, so utilize a UV filter (72mm filter size). I recommend only the B+W or Hoya Multi-coated brands. (Yes they're pricey, but worth it)The hood for this lens is actually a little too small in my opnion. If shooting a backlit object, I sometimes get the heavy orange glow in the viewfinder soI am forced to use my hand as a "hood extender" and block the sunlight.For its size, this lens is relatively lightweight. It is much lighter than the 70-200mm F/2.8L IS and easily handholdable for extended periods of time.This lens is compatible with Canon's extenders. I have personally used it with the 1.4x extender. The results are excellent. While CA and sharpness degrade noticeably on the 70-200mm, this lens shows barely a difference in image quality, except for the change in designation to a 252mm F/5, of course. And add to the fact that the macro capability is now gone from 1.0x to 1.4x, a big bonus.So for whom does this lens apply?-Those who neither have a macro or a telephoto prime who desire a single piece that can handle both aspects with excellent results.-Those who plan on performing professional product photography.-Those that are looking into serious nature photography (packing this lens with a wide-angle is pretty much all you'll need on a day hike).What this lens does not do well:-Low-light photography.-Event photography.-Landscapes.Alternatives:-60mm/100mm: lesser image quality, less telephoto compression in macro images, no real double-duty as a telephoto, but a whole lot cheaper and wider aperture.-MP-E 65mm: much greater magnification (5.0x), lower image quality, no telephoto capability, odd design means studio use almost exclusivel</review_text>
When this lens is used with a 1.6X camera body such as the XT, 20D, or 30D it ends up giving you an amazing 288mm Macro or you can go one step further with the 1.4x or 2X TC's and make it a 403/576mm super power.  Of course whenever doing this you must either use a tripod or flash except in blazing light.  It is a little slow to focus compared to many of the other lenses canon offers, but since you will most likely be using manual focus a lot of the time anyway, this is not a huge drawback.  It also gets heavy to carry after a few hours and you will have people ask you questions about both your and their cameras.  On a good note parents are pretty good about keeping small children out of your way when you have this lens mounted.  The narrower background as compared to the 60mm or 100mm macro lenses makes cluttered areas easier to deal with.  The extra working distance is also a plus when working with wary insects etc.  It is best to use a shutter release and mirror lockup for shutter speeds longer than 1/30 if you want sharp pictures.  The 60mm Macro wins in convenience, but for absolute clarity and improved working distance the 180 comes out on top</review_text>
I spend most of my time as a photographer taking macro photographs of flowers and other small things in nature.  I chose this lens over Canon's 50mm macro and 100mm macro for two reasons: (1) it is constructed with higher quality UD glass, so it has great color and contrast, and it's incredibly sharp at all f/stops, and (2) at 180mm, it allows you to stay farther away from your subjects and still focus to 1:1.  This makes it easier take photographs without disturbing your subjects and it allows you to have a smaller, more blurry area in the background so that the background doesn't compete with the subject for attention.  The lens also comes with a tripod color, which allows you conveniently change from vertical to horizontal, and it adds stability with your lens better balanced on your tripod.The lens has an ultrasonic motor, so it's fast and quiet when focusing, though I highly recommend setting the focus limiter 1.5m-infinity when not shooting macro photography.  It will speed up the time it takes for the lens to focus.  The only drawback I can find with the lens is that it is constructed with only an 8 blade aperture diaphram.  Theoretically, with a higher number of blades, it would allow more natural blurs, but I can say I've never noticed a problem in my photographs</review_text>
I have seen glowing reports on this lens in several magazines, most notably in Shutterbug. It is truly a splendid performer and one well worth paying for if a photographer needs the extra working distance afforded by a macro lens in the 180mm to 200mm range. Its performance is certainly as good, if not better, than Nikon's venerable 200mm f4 Micro Nikkor, which was one of the first - if not the first - telephoto macro lenses in this focal length. This Canon lens excels not only in macro photography but also in nature photography, getting close-up images of animals in the wild without working too close to disturb them. If I owned Canon equipment, then this lens would be an essential part of my kit</review_text>
There is nothing like a telephoto to bring boats at anchor up close when you're halfway up a mountain. I got a great shot in Tahiti just that way with just this lense and a friend of mine used it on the cover of her romance novel. It's true the lense is heavy. Canon says it weighs 1.7 pounds, but it seems heavier. No matter though, because you won't have to go to the gym if you heft this baby around for awhile, and as a side benifit, you'll get crisper, sharper photos then you would with any other 200mm out there today. Just think of it as body building and photo shooting both at the same time. Also this one won't break your wallet.Serously, this is one darned fine piece of glass, you just simply cannot go wrong with a Canon "L" lense, just can'tJack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
Canon L lenses are known for their great optics and priceyness.  This fast tele is an excellent value.  The only thing that would improve this lens would be the addition of the image stabilizion feature found on a few Canon optics.  Of course, the advantage of large aperature lenses is that you can set a fast shutter speed and still have enough light for a shot.  This lens is surprisingly compact, (as long focal length teles go).  The autofocus is very fast and quiet.  Comes with a hood, too.</review_text>
The product is a top quality product. The filters work excellent with my Canon Powershot S2. Without a doubt, worth every penny, especially considering the price I paid for it, which was at least half of where I saw it listed at other places. Very happy with the purchase</review_text>
The filters that I got are poorly finished.  The 812 filter has a smudge on it, while all 3 filters don't screw on properly on my lens.  All filters come off EASILY.  They are totally useless.  I suggest that you buy filters in a real store so you can try them on your lens</review_text>
This set of basic filters is a must have for every camera bag...even new SLR users will find them easy to use and they will enhance your pictures - without a doubt</review_text>
The backpack holds all my stuff with extra room. The only thing was that I thought I was ordering a bag not a backpack based on the picture shown. The backpack is a little on the heavy side for me but I do like it</review_text>
This bag easily accomodates my new Canon S3 IS, along with the lens adapter and hood, with room to spare. Recently, during a trip to Europe, I was also able to fit several other items into the bag: the rechargeable battery charger, AC adapter, and outlet adapter, along with two sets of rechargeable batteries, as well as a UV filter, and I still had room for more. I've no doubt the wide- and tele-converters for this camera would also have fit, with room to spare</review_text>
If you are at the intermediate level with photography and need a camera bag that is strong and comfortable this bag may be for you. I can fit my canon s2is, adapter, two filters or a lens in this bag. This is all I expected from what I read about this product. If you have a SLR with multiple lenses,,, sorry,,, you will have to spend more bucks for a bigger bag.</review_text>
Absolutely love this camera bag! I hate dealing with a purse and camera bag while traveling, so I just carry this bag. Everything I need (wallet, cell phone, car keys & chap stick) plus all the camera equipment fit just fine in this bag.You can't go wrong with this. My husband will even hold it for me since it's not a purse!</review_text>
I've had many camera bags over the years, and this one seems to fit the bill the best. It is roomy - carries camera body and one lens, plus charger, extra batteries, manual, memory card, and has room for another lens or two. I wouldn't say it would be able to hold more than three lenses. We recently took this on a trip to St. Lucia and it held up well, even repelling some unexpected rain. We were very pleased. The size is perfect - roomy but not overly bulky. I'd highly recommend this bag!</review_text>
I love the bag for all the reasons others did not like it.  The product is listed as a gadget bag and that is what it is good at.  The S2 IS is a large camera for a point and shoot and it fits in very few bags.  This bag fit the camera easily and had space for all types of extras including batteries, chargers and extra media cards.  There is also enough room for another small digital camera or a film point and shoot.The correct way to advertise this case would have been for up to two bodies or four small lens.  Given that limitation, this is a great bag.The bag is very well made and holds my Canon Powershot S2 IS very securely.  I lay the camera on it's back and that means that even if I accidently power it on the lens opens harmlessly.  The material is great and the waist belt is very practical.  The strap is well padded and after a day of use I believe it is one of the most comfortable straps I have used.Buy this bag for the correct camera and you will be very happy with it.</review_text>
I would have rated this bag with ***** if it would have been a little bit larger.It will fit only a SLR camera with its lens on. No aditional space. Actually, there are some good spots to keep your extra flash cards, you extra battery and charger.So, if you want to move around with your SLR with at least two lenses, get a bigger one</review_text>
This bag is small, but it fits my Canon Rebel XT with the kit lens and battery grip. I also carry the 50mm/1.7 lens in there and still have room for the manual, battery charger and other small components. I will be getting a bigger bag when I start acquiring more lenses, but it is great for now and for summer travel.It also looks nice and is very sturdy</review_text>
First of all it took me a few months to decide on what lens to buy because I did so much research. My choices were between Canon 70-200L 4, 70-200L 2.8 and the 70-200L 2.8IS. After much investigation I opted not to buy the 4.0 because I knew that I would be shooting in dim lights and needed the 2.8. So to save money I bought the 2.8 NON IS. The lens is great and I travelled to Utah with it. All was great until I tried to shoot a deer at full zoom. Every one came out blurry and could not use. Apart from that it is a fantastic lens. As a result I decided to fork out for the 2.8 IS lens and it is amaizing. It has the same optics as the non IS but handheld the IS really works great. Like on some of the reviews it does not make every shot in focus but certainly most of them and the picture quality is amaizing. Fast focus, great colours. Fantastic. If you can afford it buy it and the IS is def worth it because the lens is heavy and you do shake a bit, which is noticeable at full or close to full zoom. Hope this helps</review_text>
It's a bit heavy but a superb lens.  Interior construction has quite a bit of plastic however which is a bit of a concern.  I've dropped one onto hard packed dirt/soccer field w/no damage...so it's pretty sturdy :)If you can live with 1 stop less light consider the newly released 70-200 f/4 L IS.  This is the new 70-200 f/4 with IS from Canon and will save you some weight if that is a concern</review_text>
Had the 70-200 f/4 and loved it to pieces with a D60, and now with a 1D MKII, but sold the 4.0 in order to pay for a 35-350, which is my work horse. Due to the push and pull feature however, the 35-350 gets dusty quick in good ol' Montana land, so it has to go in for cleanings every once in a while, and the f/stop isn't always desirable for certain situations.  The 70-200 F/2.8 is amazing. The twist zoom is a little close to the camera, so it takes some twisting of the wrist to get it where you need it, and IMHO, is a bit too much of a turn to be from 70 to 200 in the time one might need for extreme sports. (Rodeo, NASCAR etc) The clarity of this piece of glass just blew me away. I did a comparison of images from my 70-200 F/4 when it was new, and the 2.8 is still visibly sharper. I put an expensive filter on it, as my equipment is asked a lot of in very harmful conditions, and I do notice the slightest big of distortion with a filter, even though it is a good B&W..... so when I can, I shoot the lens with no filter if I require extreme detail. The 35-350L is nowhere near the quality of this little 2.8... if it weren't for the difference in distance, this lens would be my one and only. Oh, and I love the IS. As it is my first IS Lens, I treasure is, but know I will not buy another distance lens without it</review_text>
You know, I researched this lens again and again. I put it on my Christmas list. A year and a half went by and I finally just bought it.My gosh, everything is true! This is one of the world's great lenses. What a piece of glass. With the image stabilization I can take candid shots in a candlelit restaurant using available light.The lens is magical. It captures the soul of its subjects. Nature photography is phenomenal. This is an incredible tool that will take you to a new level.Just do it! No regrets. Honest.</review_text>
I use this gem on my 20D along with my 24-105mm, and as far as I'm concerned it is one of the best optical lenses out there. My 24-105 isn't the ideal indoor/low light lens nor is it the ideal sports photography lens( although it is sharp, just not quite long enough) The 70-200 fills in that gap in my arsenal with IS to boot! The photos I've taken so far on the sidelines are all keepers. If you can afford it, do it, you won't regret i</review_text>
I spent alot of time evaluating this product.  Finally after reading the reviews I dug deep and spent the extra dollars to get this lense.  It has been a wounderful addition to my Canon Reble.  It is a very high quality product that is easy to use and delivers beautiful shot every time.</review_text>
Pros:  Superb Retention of Color, bokeh (background blur), sharpness. Fast silent and accurate autofocus. Great Build quality.Cons: Size, weight and price. Not your everyday walkaround lens. Expensive.</review_text>
I had read the reviews on this lens and no one had anything bad to say about it. It is fast, crisp, focuses fast, quiet, solid and a bit heavy. The weight is vastly compensated for by all ofthe positive features. I have used it on my 20D and was just amazed. I just purchased a 5D and cannot believe my eyes. Just a great great lens</review_text>
I got this lens with my 300D (Digital Rebel) kit and have enjoyed it ever since. Solid, durable, reliable, good in most light situations. Lots of success in wide-angle landscape photos. I'm typically using this at the 18mm end and it's produced beautiful images, especially at sunset and indoors with flash. Also very light and small, I just toss it in my bag and I'm set. Pretty decent for close-up stuff as well like flowers, etc. Overall it's a good starter lens if you're getting it with a kit, but you could probably grab it used for $60 I would guess if you're just looking for a good all-around lens</review_text>
I am a portrait professional photographer for over 40 years.  I needed a wide angle lens for weddings and wanted to know the quality of the kit lens.  I did a test using the Rebel XT kit lens and a Canon 16-35mm lens which costs somewhere around $1,500.  I set both cameras at 18mm focal length on a tripod.  I took shots outdoors and indoors.  The images were done exactly the same.  The outdoor shots show objects at infinity as well as 10' away. I made 8x10 prints and showed them to my fellow professional photographers.  Nobody could identify which lens took which.  This is a real world scenario</review_text>
This lens is great for those indoor regular nothing fancy shots.  I recently used mine indoors at a restaurant and the distance or close up range was perfect.</review_text>
First thing to do is to make sure which lens you are buying. The kit lens comes with Canon 20D, 30D, 300D, or XT is the lower version, non USM one. On the higher version USM ones, you will see the red color "USM" at the front of the lens.According to the reviews, compare with the non USM ones, optically they are the same. However, the USM motor does focus faster and much quieter.People complain about the build quality. Actually I feel that it is really not that bad, much better than the Canon 50mm f1.8 II. The USM auto focus performance is fast, never hunt, and much quieter than the 50mm f1.8 II. It fits nicely on the XT.Do not compare this hundred dollar lens to other lenses cost three times or more. We have to compare apple to apple. If you know the limitations on this lens and use it wisely, the images will come out nicely.1. This is not the lens for indoors low light conditions. If you need to take lots of indoor pictures and the flash is not allowed, go get a different lens. (For example, I use a Canon 50mm f1.4 for this kind of situation.)2. The distortion on 18mm is quite a bit. Avoid taking strait lines (like buildings) pictures on the edge while wide open. However, this can be easily corrected on computers.3. Step down the aperture to F8 or F11, the resolution will be improved a lot even at the corners.Overall, the performance is very good for a hundred dollar lens. It is very light weight and highly portable while traveling. This fits my needs as a cheap but fast with good image quality walk around lens.</review_text>
Many people think this is the kit lens.  It is not!The numbers do match, but the kit lens is not USM and worth about 1/2 the price.  Go to the Canon web site and take a look at the Lens Chart.  This lens is much faster and has better glass than the kit lens.</review_text>
Let's be honest...  a "kit lens" that adds approximately $70 to the overall price of a camera body is not supposed to be Canon L-series quality.  Sure, you can find a better quality lens, but not for $70 you can't!I plan to use this lens as a knock around lens that allows me to get more familiar with my camera and run off some shots.  Personally (and this is a personal preference), I find that I tend to want to be closer to subjects anyway - with the 1.6x factor on the Rebel XT, I'm in great shape with some of my other lenses.If you don't happen to already have a super wide lens in your arsenal, and you are getting a digital EOS with the 1.6x magnification factor, then buy this lens.Please don't let some of the other "lens snobs" sway you - a few of which are actually "posers" that snap less than 500 pix per year and spend more time looking at the technical aspects of the picture instead of its true artistic value.  I can hear them now.. "it isn't contrasty enough", "the barrel distortion is horrible at the wide end", "pin cushion is significant"...I say BAH!!Are these statements true... sure they are... to a degree.  But let's remember that not everyone can afford to be as picky.Buy the lens, load the camera with a fresh battery and a blank memory card and GET OUT THERE!!If you find yourself shooting at the wide end often, THEN sell/give this lens to a colleague and go in search of another (higher quality) lens... very little lost.Enjoy yourselves and take lots of pictures...  good luck</review_text>
This is the standard kit lens that comes with the Rebel and 20D. This lens is most definitely built to a budget. And does it ever show! Completely inexcusable is the lack of numbering of ANY kind on the focusing ring. This is VERY frustrating when it comes to taking pictures of distant objects, since you cannot simply set it to infinity. Also, because it goes into macro mode beyond infinity, you cannot simply crank it all the way to one side! Of course, you can always use the autofocus if you wish. But this doesn't work for night photography. In fact, you might as well forget about doing ANY night photography with this lens due to the inability to focus it based on estimation of distance (and the fact that the autofocus doesn't work in the dark).Besides this nagging problem, the lens just is not very sharp. When I first got my Rebel, I was VERY impressed with the pictures it took, since all I had to compare it to were pictures taken by point-and-shoots. But after taking several hundred pictures with it, I find that in most cases, the pictures are VERY much on the soft side. This is a particular problem with distant objects. Even when focused on those distant objects, they never appear really sharp, although objects of intermediate distance (~100ft) seem to be okay. Let's face it. This lens just doesn't have it. Unless you are REALLY hard up for cash, steer clear</review_text>
I chose to purchase this lens over the standard 18-55 that comes with the kit XT. It functions smoothly and seems to be worth the difference and is definitely an upgrade.</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
Compare to the Price of the product I highly recommend to any one who own Canon EOS camera...</review_text>
This lens is a must have for all beginner photographers. Excellent sharpness and a really fast lens.   I know I've heard many complain about the cheap feel of it but at less than $100 you can't beat it.  Yes it does have a plastic mount, yes the focus ring is small but the quality of it's pictures and price make it a definite winner until you decide to move up to the much higher priced L's.</review_text>
I purchased this lense for the novelty of having an inexpensive 1.8 lense. I use this in low light sport situations like basketball or volleyball - and especially gymnastics where flash is not allowed.I'm not a huge fan of being locked into a focal length, but for anything under 2.8 you don't have a choice.This is definitely not a primary lense for indoor sport shooting, but it's a fun companion when you need the speed of a 1.8 indoors</review_text>
This lens takes very sharp pics. Works great in low light. A true value for the price</review_text>
Awesome lens, especially for the price.  It's very fast and 50mm even at 1.6x mag of my Rebel XT is easily manageable</review_text>
This is a good prime lens, although not perfect for the Rebel XT. Sharp throughout most of the range, and good for low-light shots. Overall, a solid buy</review_text>
I had no investment in a DSLR but narrowed my choices to the Canon 30D and the Nikon D200. I had always wanted a Nikon. The D200 is definitely a joy to hold and it did take good pictures (I tried both at a camera store before I bought the 30D). I did a lot of research (more than I care to admit!) and there was no conclusive evidence that one camera had a clear edge over the other. Depending on your specific needs, one camera may be "slightly better" than the other.After trying out both cameras, I was convinced the 30D was as good a fit for my needs as the D200. For "value for money" the 30D was a clear winner over the D200 (I got mine when Canon had the Cash in with Canon promotion going). Also, as a beginner to SLR I found the 30D with its fully automatic and scene modes easy to start out with. I don't expect to use the scene modes or the full auto mode after a week or two. I expect to quickly graduate to the creative control zones. But to use as a family camera, the quick scene modes are very helpful. If you expect to use it more on a professional basis it'd probably not matter.Additionally, when I checked it out at the store, I noticed the Canon 30D focused sharply almost every time. The D200 did not at least a few times. I'd take this with a grain of salt though since it was a brief trial at a store. But I thought I'd share my experience. It may have just been an anomaly with the actual equipment I tried out.Do I still find the Nikon D200 to be a great camera? Absolutely! Do I regret having bought a Canon 30D? Absolutely not! The decision swinger in my case was really the "money factor". I was more than willing to spend up to $300 more for the Nikon D200. But when the difference became $550 it no longer became justifiable for my Christmas gift to myself:-)My purchases included the Canon 30D [...], Canon 17-85mm EF-S IS USM lens [...], and a SanDisk Extreme III 2GB compact flash card [...]I plan to add an external flash to this soon, and will consider eventual lenses after I determine that the camera is a long-term keeper.</review_text>
My 2 year old is really active and my point and shoot camera cannot keep up with him.  And I also don't like the washout look when I uses flash.  So I researched about which SLR will best meet my needs, mainly catching fast action, candid moments and low light photos without flash.  The Canon 30D comes up top on the list.  It has the best high ISO performance in its class (better than Nikon and Sony).  And when I combine the 30D with the fast zoom lens EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS, the result is amazing.  I can stop any action in daylight, capture every candid expression of my 2 yr old with the fast burst mode, and take indoor or night photos without using flash or tripod.  Portraits are also excellent with sharp image and beautifully blurred background (bokeh).  Even the dimly-lit decors of the Disneyland Haunted Mansion came out superb when we went there for the Halloween party at night, without flash or tripod.  This is really an important factor for me to buy this camera, as taking pictures with a tripod is not an option when your subject is an active 2 yr old.  But you will need a good lens to make this work well.  If you use a cheap kit lens, then it will probably not matter which camera you pick.  Remember that these 3 are all very good cameras and the small differences in image quality you see in reviews are apparent only when they use the best prime lens (not the kit lens)and crop the pictures to magnify the details.  The Sony is a very good choice if you are on a budget and don't need low light performance (use flash and save money).  The Nikon has more custom function than Canon, and it is really as good as Canon.  They both have their strength and weakness.  Canon just happens to have slightly better high ISO performance and that suits my need better than Nikon.  To be fair, I should mention that the Nikon D200 tops most reviews as the camera of the year, beating the Canon 30D overall.  But the D200 is a bit too advanced for an amateur like me, better suits someone more serious about photography.  The D80 is like a "mini" D200, but slower.  So it really boils down to what you really need and how much you want to spend.  Shooting in low light without flash will need good high ISO performance, a good fast lens (with wide aperture, usually expensive), and image stabilization.  If that's what you want, the Canon 30D with the EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS will not disappoint you</review_text>
I compared a number of pro-sumer cameras and became firmly convinced this was the best camera for the money. Although Nikon at one time was considered the premier camera for the professional, they now take second stage to Canon not only for engineering, but for the quality of the lens, innovative and user-friendly design, and overall quality. I have used the camera for approximately one month and have been delighted. Having talken pictures for over 35 years - including professional - and always using Minolta equipment for all of those years, I am truly enamored with this Canon camera</review_text>
I am so pleased with this camera! There's really nothing negative I can think to say about it! I also own the Cannon XT. I use both for wedding photography as well as family portraits and I am so impressed with the color quality of the D30! Well done CANNON</review_text>
This camera is incredible. I ordered it for my husbands birthday and he is just begining to figure it all out. There are so many great features. One of the best is how quickly you can take digital pictures. Our other digital cameras have a lag time between shots, but not this one. The pictures are crisp and it is easy for even a novice like me to use. I highly recommend this camera if you want to take digital photography to the next level. It is one of the best</review_text>
This can be a very easy to use camera. Simply by using the auto mode and composing your pictures properly you can get very good JPEG images. It also can be about as complicated as you want to make it. It has many advanced features on it. I have been shooting 35mm for about 32 years. My most recent before this one being an Elan II E about 7 years ago. It's still working also. The 30d is my first digital and I absolutely love the camera. I generally work in the aperture priority mode with a tripod at 100 ISO when shooting landscape. But, the camera is very capable in auto mode as well without the tripod. I like to shoot RAW so that I can tweek things a bit, but the JPEG images are very acceptable. It also works extremely well for portraits. It actually is better than the 35mm to me because it has very low noise even at higher ISOs. 1600 looks about like 800 film to me. This is a very good value for the money in my opinion</review_text>
For those who truly know digital cameras, having more than perhaps 8 megapixels is important only if you plan on blowing your images up to "poster size", or if you are a pro who knows how to use all those pixels. And truthfully, how many of you really plan to do that type of stuff? To say that the Rebel XTi is better than the 30D because it "has more megapixels" and is "smaller" is not the best advice. Any Canon DSLR is going to give you great images, if know how to use it.  For those of you who are trying to decide which camera to buy, you really need to go to a camera store and ask to handle each camera. While you're at it, ask yourself how it feels in your hands.  Is it too bulky?  Is it too small and hard to handle?  Does it have the features you want such as spot metering, which the Rebel XTi does not have? The 30D is a terrific DSLR. It has all the features 99% of us need. There is a reason why it costs more than the Rebel.  The 30D is a better camera overall.</review_text>
Good fit, works as advertised, stores on lens.  Helps keep night dew off the lens as well as unwanted light out during the day</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
I was really pleased with my item!  Amazon shipped in phenomenal packaging!  thanks...</review_text>
Excellent product works well.  Made for the Canon EF28-135mm Lense. Reasonable price</review_text>
It's a 72mm lens hood, no vigneting, works great. A must for using EF28-135 outdoors</review_text>
I bought this battery for a Canon 30D and can take around a thousand pic's on one charge.  Very happy with the battery's performance</review_text>
I bought a generic Chinese "equivalent" bp-511 battery that boasted a higher milliamperage rating and a cheaper price than the original Canon battery that came with my camera.  The battery worked fine for about 3 months and now only holds a charge for about 20 minutes.  I have had it fail at critical times.  Never ever buy some knock-off Chinese battery--read the reviews.  The Chinese push out their crappy knock-offs to unsuspecting consumers (like I was) just to make a quick buck.  Also, don't trust the glowing reviews from the generic sellers.  They are self-generated.  In my case, the seller is no longer selling under his original company name.  He has a new name with the requisite (sham) glowing reviews.  CHINESE PRODUCTS SUCK</review_text>
Last battery was good for almost 5 years. Easily rechargeable. Couldn't ask for more</review_text>
Okay, a lot can be said for saving money, however there can be problems with no-name or non-branded products. No matter what your "style" of photography, you will have a battery empty its charge at a critical moment. Having a back-up is essential. Having a quality back-up battery that will get you through is imperative. Knock-off brands do not hold the same charge as the branded battery meant for your camera; although their manufacture may claim it does.Get in the zone and get the shot!</review_text>
This is a replacement for an identical battery pack that I lost.  Works great, long life, no problems</review_text>
For some reason, Canon- branded batteries are better than those sold by actual battery manufacturers. Don't just look at the $$/mAh ratio, consider safety, reliability and longevity. In these categories, the Canons rock. I bought a G1 camera about five years ago, and the camera is toast, but the battery still works like a charm in my 20D. Others start out with 1400 or even 1700 mAh, but fail after six months - read the reviews here on Amazon.com</review_text>
There are many after market batteries for this camera and every review indicates they are not effective,This OEM battery by Sony delivers the goods, with extremely long lasting power to handle not only the digital picture taking but all the additional flash requirements</review_text>
I started looking for the earlier version of this flash and when I saw the upgrades on the 430EX I didn't hesitate to order it. It's what I've needed to take my photos to a higher level. I shoot for two magazines and now instead of taking my studio light into every shoot, I still carry it with me, I use this flash instead and it makes a world of difference</review_text>
I purchased this along with my new Canon 30D DSLR. I mainly use it for fills in outside sunny days, but it has been used to light up the situation. I'm personally still learning about how to best angle the light to get the best outcome, but I don't think it'll take long</review_text>
Excellent addition for Rebel XT.  Tried lower cost generic flash units.  My only regret is that I waited so long to get the 430EX</review_text>
I'm very pleased with this small unit that has a great deal of power. It's compact, not heavy, has an adjustable power output by simply spinning the wheel on the camera to the left or right. In addition to the light output, the head can be tilted so the light can be direct or bounced, an excellent feature. Getting up and running with this unit was a breeze because I am totally "brochure reading averse."Twenty years ago I was a photographer with big equipment, but had given up both.  I was surprised by the control one has with such a small and relatively inexpensive unit</review_text>
This is a very nice flash unit that integrates well with the PowerShot Pro1 camera.  I appreciate the zooming strobe tube to match the lens focal length as well as the ability to bounce the flash off the ceiling for softer effects.  I should have purchased this flash when I first got the Pro1 camera</review_text>
Does the job and the Canon E-TTL II is a nice feature but I wish they would provide a battery indicator like on the Canon DSLR cameras</review_text>
I am very pleased with this product...Shoots well in all types of different light conditions,even when it is pitch black the 430EX takes a decent shotat close range...430EX adds a deeper color and warmth to pictures inconditions where light is lacking...I am a graphic designer and need great photo'swhen I begin work and the 430EX helps with theprocess of a more clear and colorful photo when shootingwith my Rebel EOS XT Digital Camera...</review_text>
This is a great unit.  Works great for the purpose for which it was made.  I'm going to eventually get the 580 so I can use it as a slave unit (with the wireless option) for a wraparound lighting system.I would recommend a diffuser so that the light can be subdued especially when you wish to brighten the fleshtones of the people in the photo with golden light so they are presented in their best image.  Blue spectrum light does not present us in the best way</review_text>
An excellent flash to use with my Canon 20D at a fantastic price, the Canon 580ex was an expensive option, but should I buy one in the future ? the 430ex is perfect as a slave unit.Great product from Canon as always</review_text>
it works great, there are just two issues.  when you lock it on the hot shoe, it can be very, very difficult to unlock (you twist a wheel to tighten it on) and when the batteries in my camera are low, the camera and the flash start having computer problems and act very strange (i have a cannon digital rebel xt).  other than those towo issues, which in comparison seem very small to me, the flash is fantastic! lightweight and easy to use</review_text>
This great lens is a joy to use....Keep in mind the min on 1:6 sensors will be about 160mm so you are limited in that respect.Would be nice if you could see lens IS settings like focus range preset  in view finder.Don't like the fact that the lens hood does not have a mark to show where it can be installed quickly.. not bad using the logo as indicator for normal use, but always have problems putting it back on reversed to put away.  Other hoods have a small dot etc to help line it up.This lens with grip & double batteries will get your attention after a days shooting with it.  The GOOD news... when you take it off you feel you have a pocket camera weight.I posted some action/panning shots for this lens as there didn't seem to be any others.  A couple of aircraft and a couple of auto racin</review_text>
This lens is amazing. Nothing escapes it. It's like a black hole. Clearly the best lens I have ever owned. It's like the lidless Eye of Sauron from the Lord of the Rings. It is heavy and requires rethinking how you hold the camera. It comes with a beautiful case, a hood, and a tripod mount on the lens. Believe me you will need it. I took a few photos of my son from 250 feet away and they look great. I will now get to work reading the small manual. It has 2 focal settings and 2 stabilizing settings. Wow!</review_text>
I was using my new Canon lens during the 4th of july Rodeo in Redlodge Montana. Although I was pretty far from of the bull and horse riders gate,  all my photos were sharp and no blur at al</review_text>
If you use this lens on a 1.6X camera body such as the XT, 20D, or 30D you end up with a 160-640mm equivalent which is an impressive range by any standard.  You can also add the 1.4X TC for a 896mm upper limit or the 2X TC for an amazing 1280mm.  Of course this comes at a price, and I'm not just talking money.  You will have to use a tripod, cable release, and mirror lockup a lot of the time when using such long focal lengths.  Plus this thing is very heavy and very large and people will take notice.  So if stealth photography is your goal, go with something like the 70-300 DO.That being said, this is an amazing lens, admittedly a little slow near the long end, but to get down to f/4 would have most likely doubled or tripled the price and weight, so it seems like an acceptable trade-off.If you want sharp pictures, an amazing zoom range, and a good workout, but don't mind being the center of attention, this is the lens for you</review_text>
I agree with all the others comments about this lens.  It works great but it is big, heavy and attracts attention.  When I say it attracts attention, I am not kidding.  I was at an airshow taking pictures along with a lot of other amature photographers.  My 100-400mm lens, however, attracted the attention of a local newpaper reporter who interviewed me.  However, I bought it to use with my 20D at airshows and I can honestly say I am not disapointed.  It was well worth the money.I also bought a cheap Kenko 1.5x teleconverter for kicks.  While the converter isn't "L" grade, I am pleased with the results and the autofocus still works which I understand is not the case with the Canon TCs.For those looking for a big zoom lens and you want IS, you are ulitimately going to wind up buying this lens.</review_text>
I've only had this lens for a few days and I will say it has impressed me. It does have drawbacks, needs lots of light and is somewhat heavy. I would not like to carry all day,but for my need it isn't a problem.I have a couple of photos on display taken the first day I purchased the lens . It was a very overcast day and I think they turned out reasonable for the weather. My test at home when the sun popped out were outstanding. As for the push and pull adjustment I see no problem with it.I think with a little more experience it will be a very good purchase for my budget. I know there are higher quality lens but price becomes an issue,when you are a amature hobbiest like I am.I would recommend for any one who likes to take wildlife photos. The 5 star rating is for the money and quality it is a very good lens!</review_text>
This lens is super-sharp, colors come out vibrant, it has two IS modes, and is push/pull (some people don't like that, but your zooms are super-fast). This is probably the best Canon telephoto lens in terms of focal range. One bit of warning; it's not only fairly large and made of metal (not plastic), but it's kind of heavy -- while it doesn't weigh 50 pounds, be aware that it's NOT light. Carrying it around when attached to the camera, you carry the equipment by the lens, not the body</review_text>
I shoot with a Canon 20D and have used the Canon EF 75-300mm f/4.5-5.6 III USM lens. I've always noticed the limitations of this lens when shooting amateur softball. I reviewed the lens lineup at the Canon website and decided on the Canon EF 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L USM Lens. Even so, I was apprehensive about the push/pull zoom system. Since this lens seems so expensive, I wanted to try it before I bought it. After renting the lens and using it over a weekend at a softball tournament, I knew this was the right lens for me.This is a serious lens meant for serious photographers. Being an L lens, there is a lot more features and is manufactured with better materials. The construction is sturdy and consists of 17 elements in 14 groups. The fluorite and Super UD-glass elements largely eliminate the secondary spectrum. This lens is compatible with the extenders 1.4x II and 2x II. The Canon EF 100-400mm lens weighs in at about 3 lbs/1,380g, and accepts 77mm filters. Be sure to get a good quality UV haze filter.Being white, this lens looks a bit strange, but helps keep it cool when using in the sun. Some people are concerned that being white, it attracts attention to criminals. From my experience, my 20D attracts attention regardless of what lens I put on it. I personally doubt a thief looking for something to steal is taking the time to evaluate the cost of the item and are more concerned with the ease of taking something they can unload. I try to make things difficult for would be thieves and have insurance as a back up.The dual IS system has two modes. Mode 1 is for stationary subjects while mode two is for moving subjects. It is recommended that the IS function is not used on a tripod; however I have used it on my monopod with success. The IS helps to eliminate camera shake and helps stabilize the lens when shooting from a moving vehicle. While there are limitations to what the IS can do, it can give you a couple extra stops. Just keep in mind, the IS attempts to eliminate camera movement, not the movement of the subject being photographed.This lens permits for auto or manual focus depending on how the switch is set. There is also a switch to shift from a 1.8m/5.9ft to infinity or 6.5m/21.3ft to infinity.Zooming with this lens takes a little time to get used to if you have never used it before. Once it is gotten used to, it seems to be much faster than the typical twist zooming. A resistance ring is used to tighten or loosen the resistance to zooming. This allows for practically locking the zoom in place or providing no resistance at all. Zooming is as simple as pulling or pushing the lens as its name suggest.The push/pull system causes air to be noticeably pushed around. Because air is pushed into the camera, there is a myth that the lens causes dust to settle and accumulate on digital camera sensors. I mostly use this lens in one of the dirtiest environments I shoot in for amateur softball pictures. Even so, my experience does not support the myth. I have not seen any evidence to support the myth from any reputable source either.Included with this lens are the Tripod mount, lens hood, and storage case. The tripod mount is the best option to use when mounting to a tripod. This helps to balance the load. Mounting the camera instead creates an unbalanced set up that may topple over. The case is a zippered soft case (LZ1234) that can also be purchased separately. The lens hood (ET-83C) is used to reduce lens flare and can protect the front element in certain situations.The Canon EF 100-400mm is such an awesome lens, it almost fails to compare to the Canon EF 75-300mm. The clarity and sharpness is incredible. The auto-focus is quiet and quick. The features add creative versatility. The Canon EF 100-400mm comes at a price, but it is worth every bit of it. Now that I have both lenses, the Canon EF 75-300mm is no longer used.PROS:Incredible clarity and sharpnessQuiet and quick auto-focusFeatures add creative versatilityDual IS systemCONS:Heavy and bulky (This should be expected with these types of lenses</review_text>
Reviews of this lens on the web are mixed with some showing soft results, particularly at 400mm.  This is likely due to wide variations in sample lenses.  I decided to take a chance and seem to have gotten lucky.  My copy, just received from Amazon (Build date of Oct 2005) produces fantastically crisp and contrasty images on my 20D at ALL focal lengths from 100 to 400.  It's almost magical.   The images are much sharper using the same f-stops than those from a 70-200 f2.8IS lens at 100-150mm and virtually the same at 200mm.  Even wide-open at 400mm this lens is quite sharp.  At 400mm, I've compared to a very nice Canon 400mm f5.6L prime lens, with and without 1.4X teleconverter.  The images have virtually the same extreme sharpness and contrast if the zoom is stopped down just one one-third stop (e.g. zoom at 6.3, prime at 5.6).  With the 1.4X TC both lenses had to be manually focused but produced outstanding clarity with NO perceivable loss in quality.  The focus is swift and true and the IS on this lens really works (and does not hum like that on the 70-200 f2.8IS) allowing handheld shots at 1/100 sec at 400mm.   It may be that Canon has quietly improved this lens since recent reviews seem to be much more positive than those from a few years ago.   Some folks don't like the push-pull zoom but it works great for me and allows very fast composition of scenes.  The lens is about the same size as the 70-200 f2.8 IS but seems lighter and better balanced.   Given the razor sharpness of its images and 100-400mm range, this seems like the perfect single lens solution for nature and bird photography.  However, it is big and white so it may not be the best for candid people photography.</review_text>
I bought this lense recently. At first I thought it was heavy, but once I got used to it, I decided that it was heavy due to quality. It is a big lense, and the tripod mount is very useful, especially for balance.You can't but notice the quality of this lense. The IS function is very useful.Combine this lense with the 2x Extender, and you've effectively got a 800mm lense.For anyone looking for a zoom lense, this is one to seriously consider. For sport, the IS function is brilliant, for wildlife ... well, I can go on and on about how good this lense is. Bottom line - well worth buying</review_text>
I have been very happy with this camera bag. The slingshot design works well and makes unloading the equipment far less cumbersome than a traditional backpack. I also like the features of the bag. It has all the great Lowepro niceties like a protective sewn-in cloth to cover the sensitive camera viewer  before you zip it up, the waterproof covering for that unexpected downpour and compartments for the digital memory cards. It's a good buy</review_text>
I purchased the Lowepro Slingshot 200 to replace the Tamrac Adventure 7 backpack I recently returned to Amazon.  I spent quite a few hours researching bags to use for sightseeing/hiking and had initially purchased the Tamrac bag b/c of its similarity (in style) to a regular backpack.  A recent "L series" purchase has encouraged me to keep a low profile when transporting my gear.  While the Tamrac bag certainly looked the part, its functionality left something to be desired.  The Adventure 7 held my entire kit, which includes: Canon Digital Rebel XT, EF24-105mm "L", EF50mm & EF18-55mm "kit" lenses, EX580 flashgun and the various hoods/filter/etc for the above lenses.  Now the bad part, once strapped into its normal position, the only way to access your gear (in the Adven. 7 pack) is to fully remove the backpack, place it on the ground, unzip the zipper fully, then remove/replace the camera/gear you desire.  This proved VERY cumbersome while on the rocky terrain of the "Great Falls" national park in VA (near DC), in fact, there were times when I gave up on a few nice photo opportunities simply b/c getting to the camera would have been too difficult.  I do own a Lowepro holster, but by going that route, I would have limited my ability to bring alternate lenses/accessories.After some additional research, I decided to try the Slingshot 200.  Let's compare the tow on some key points:Gear Capacity:  Nearly identical for both bagsAdditional Capacity:  The Tamrac trumps the Lowepro, it has nearly double the useable storage capacity, great for bringing along a snack, your keys, etc.Styling: Again, the Tamrac is a winner, looks like a standard backpack, versus the strange look of the slingshotFunctionality:  As a backpack, the Tamrac is much more comfortable, has greater storage capacity and even offers a waist support strap for longer trips.  BUT, this comes at the cost of accessibility.  The Lowepro slides easily around to the front.  Simply unzip and your camera is right there. It also is a stable platform for lens changing/cleaning/etc.To summarize:For hiking/walking/etc where you need instant access to your camera and accessories, the Lowepro Slingshot 200 wins hands down.Pros: Instant access to your gear, includes all-weather cover (attached), nice attention to details (lens cleaning/protection cloth is a particularly nice touch), etc.Cons: Strange styling, not reversible (can only be worn on right shoulder), nearly impossible to carry hanging on one shoulder.</review_text>
I think I may have found the perfect camera bag.  This one is comfortable to wear all day, it holds my Alpha 100 with my kit lens, my 100-400 lens both with lens hoods.  My battery charger, manual, misc cables, wallet, phone, misc items such as a small rain jacket.It also has a little pocket for your memory cards.  The best part of this bag is that you can swing it around to the front and pull your camera out without having to sit it down or showing everything you have in the bag.  The bag is plain enough that most people wouldn't know that you have a camera and all of the equipment that goes with it.  Which is a big plus with a women traveling alone</review_text>
This bag is very spacious and stylish. It holds my Rebel XT and my three lenses very well.  I can even hold a 70-200mm f/4 in there, although it is a bit snug.  The best part of this bag is that it is completely customizable.  I have set it up in such a way that I can get to any one of my lenses just by slinging the bag around and unzipping only the top compartment.  This is very useful when you don't want to constantly set your bag on the floor to access your equipment.  I do have one complaint.  When wearing this bag as a sling, it will sit on your right shoulder.  I am more used to bags sitting on my left shoulder, so that does take some getting used to.  When I carry this in "non-sling" mode (i.e. not over my head), it can comfortably sit on my left shoulder.  However, the best and most unique feature of this bag is the ability for it to sling around and have access to the camera without taking the bag off, which is only possible if I wear it as a sling bag on my right shoulder.  It would have been nice if that portion of the bag is customizable as well</review_text>
This thing is perfect for carrying your stuff around in a not-so-fattening way.  I hvae an external flash, macro kit, 28-80 lens, 50mm lens, 18-55mm lens, DSLR w/batt grip and 75-300mm lens ATTACHED all fit into the main body of this thing.  Everything is seperated by the dividers making me feel confident and safe while walking, hiking, biking, etc.  The addon pouches seem to make it a bit more bulking that you'd want, but the bag all by itself is fantastic and I can't recommend it enough - get away from huge bulky shoulder bags!!  Lowepro did it again</review_text>
Great product. Compact, easy to use (took a couple of trys), feels good and was able to put two large digital cameras, four lenses and room for more.Love it</review_text>
If you are a believer in protecting your expensive lens purchase with a filter than you can do a lot worse than a Tiffen filter.  The glass quality is good and the price is reasonalbe.  The filter cuts down on the glare that can adversly effect some shots with out an uv filter as advertised. Not much else to say.</review_text>
works as advertised.  you screw it on the end of your lens, and there you go</review_text>
Great filter for the price-no reason to spend more. The filter threads are high quality, and it is possible to stack filters if you want-not recommended, though, if you are using it on a wide-angle, as I am.No vignetting, sturdy filter.</review_text>
A UV Filter is about as standard as filters get. Tiffen makes a good quality filter and this was just as expected. The price was equilivant to other vendors and as expected I had no problems; ordering was simple and the product came on time</review_text>
This is a fantastic lens.  It takes crisp, rich photos, has a large apperature that makes for impressive low-light photography, and includes USM technology for lightening-fast focusing.  Since I am only a serious hobbyist, I can't yet afford another quality Canon lens...but for 2 years I have been perfectly happy to leave this lens on the camera (a 10D).  Portraits, landscapes, indoor shots with no flash...it can do them all with ease, and the photos look great.This lens is a little heavy, and combined with my 10D the weight is certainly a consideration.  But to me it feels well-balanced on the camera, and I like the substantial feel that the lens-camera combination gives.  If you plan to use a flash, remember that this is a big lens and the built-in flash may not clear the barrel (especially on the 10D, before Canon redesigned the pop-up flash)...might want to think about an external flash head for the hot shoe.There's a lot of glass on the front of this lens, don't forget the UV filter for a little extra protection</review_text>
Exceptional images! I can shoot indoors with low light due to the large aperture. The lens is a bit heavy though!I had to choose between this lens and the 24-105 F4L IS lens. I went for the 24-70 F2.8L for the wider aperture. I have no regrets!I do miss the additional reach of the 24-105 F4L IS lens, but this was a compromise that I was willing to make.Once again, excellent lens</review_text>
There is very little doubt that this is one of the better Canon lenses available.However,  why buy from AMAZON when it did a price increase of $73 as soon as Canon starts the 2006 fall rebate program.  AMAZON has officially become the most expensive online retailer for this lens.</review_text>
I agree with all the positive reviews of this lens. It's a great lens, give's that certain silky smooth bokeh that the 24-105 lacks and gives a nice bright viewfinder.It does have a couple of quirks though--It's very heavy so be prepared for that. A lens of this quality and high speed will need a lot of glass in there.-When you zoom out to wide, it actually gets longer which is a bit strange. Sometimes when you are taking a group picture and you need to zoom out a bit to fit everyone in the shot, the subjects see the lens moving towards them and think you are going in for a closeup. This can be partially remedied by using the included hood which masks the lens a bit and is always extended.</review_text>
After using both lenses I think this is much better. Here are my reasons:1- f 2.8 makes the autofocus much faster and accurate.2- Bokeh is much better in this one.3- Macro is slightly better on this one.4- 105 mm does make a very little difference in image size.5- IS is not very crucial in 24-50 range.</review_text>
This is a great lens. The pictures I take are very sharp and alive with color, and the brokeh is excellent. I am a big fan of keeping a shallow depth of field when shooting people or animals, so the f/2.8 helps out. Also dim wedding receptions are no problem with even the weak built in flash on my Rebel XT. The autofocus is practically silent, accurate and very fast.If you don't think you need f/2.8, go for the 24-105mm f/4 L IS. It has an extra 35mm on the telephoto end, image stabilization, and is lighter and smaller</review_text>
I think it very well could be so I'm not going to differ with those who say it is.I bought this to use with a new 5D and itt's simply outstanding in every regard. So far, I've kept it on the 5D and can't bring myself to take it off.I considered a couple of lenses, including the IS 24-105 f/4 which has a lot of appeal and the price is about the same. But this was the lens I chose in part because I already have a the 70-300mm f/4.5-5.6 DO IS Lens and the overlap seemed a waste while the extra stop helps.  I have no regrets about it. sharp as a tack and quick.I note that this is not compact lens, especially with the hood on and it can stretch out a lot when you widen the field. It is also not light. This lens and the 5D will give your neck and back a pain, assuming you work with more than one camera. But the focal lengths covered are just about ideal and require none of the compromises that a longer zoom range require. For that, I've got an 18-200 on a 20D. The 70-300 DO, while not an L, specs out in that range and has the virtue of real compactness, but it' not a lightweight. These two lenses cover just about everything for me. And I can keep the 10-22mm on the 20D for the extra-wide shots.Since writing the initial review, I've since traveled for several weeks with this lens and it fully lived up to expectations. Given the difficulties of travel these days, I am concerned about the problem of not being able to carry it with me -- not a problem to date except for Britain. But always possible. And, despite the weight, I might favor the 70-200 F/2.8L IS USM as a second travel lens- I like the brightness of the focus.One suggestion. There's a temptation to use this lens wide open a lot of the time. It's very good and sometimes that's the best thing. But I've also found this lens makes beautiful images stopped down a good deal for short night time exposures on a tripod and a remote release. The effect with lights, etc. is considerably different along with the extended depth of field.</review_text>
You are buying quality not price. Im amazed with the quality of the pictures I get with my new lens. It seems I changed my camera to a new model... totaly diferent pictures. I have compared to my previous cameras and lenses and WOW... I cant believe I thought I had some great pictures in my collection. I dont want to use my other lenses anymore, I have a new standard in my pictures.I have to say that it was a "crazy" decision to buy this lens because of the price, but this is an investment that once you have it you will enjoy and will last for many years. If you love photography and really like to go to full detail you wont regret it</review_text>
This lens is worth every penny I paid for it. No matter what the settings are, wide-open or not, at the end of the zoom range or not, you will get a sharp and contrasty picture.However, do not expect it to beat a prime - even the cheap 50mm f1.8 (that I also own) has a (somewhat) better sharpness and contrast, visible only when enlarged though. What you pay big bucks for is convenience</review_text>
I bought this lens to replace an EF 100-300mm (USM) that we had from my wife's film shooting days (not a common lens to have, apparently; the 75-300mm seems to be more widespread).  That older lens produced some surprisingly good pictures (quite sharp), but handheld shots were hard to get right at long focal lengths.The image stabilization feature of this lens works remarkably well, but it's quite a bit noisier than that of the EF-S 17-85mm IS (my first IS lens; you hardly hear the IS gyrations at all on that one).  The sharpness is quite good (probably a tad better than that of the EF 100-300mm, although it's not a foremost strength of this lens in my opinion). I was surprised by how much faster I can acquire focus with this lens, even though reviews suggested that it still falls short of L-series lenses (see e.g. the "flying gull" shot I uploaded to the "customer images" set).If you want to shoot hand-held at 150mm+, I don't think this lens has much competition under $1000 for Canon EOS users</review_text>
Great company - delivered product on time. Tested out the lens in Mexico, Brazil, and Canada. When the automatic settings on camera (Canon 10D) were selected and pictures were taken outdoors with a lot of daylight, the background is overexposed. This results in things like clouds not being included in the picture. Manual settings and adjustments within the camera will remedy the problem. However, there is an expectation that lens from Canon should take quality pictures from the automatic setting. Otherwise the lens works great</review_text>
This is a terrific lens, my new favorite.  IS is an excellent feature; I wish all my lenses had it.  Even with a 2X Teleconverter on, it is rock steady viewing and shooting. My images are sharp as a tack with great contrast and color.  I'd have to pay three times this much to get any better telephoto images</review_text>
Have used this lens from the deer stand while hunting, at sporting events (indoor and outdoor) and at concerts.  Fast focusing and great image stabilization (IS does use quite a bit more power, though).  Have not had one problem with it. Solid build and has a little heft to it.  It is a bit pricey, but I chaulk that up to it being about the best on the market.  Would recommend it to anyone looking for a top shelf lens.</review_text>
The Canon EF 70-300mm f4-5.6 IS USM telephoto zoom lens replaces the first Image Stabilizer lens of its kind, the Canon 75-300mm f4-5.6 telephoto zoom lens. It offers now up to three - as opposed to two - apertures in image stabilizing mode, as well as slightly wider focal length. The current June 2006 Popular Photography issue has a fine test report on this lens, showing that it is capable of excellent contrast and resolution in the range from 70mm to 200mm; at 300mm, both contrast and resolution decline slightly to very good, but still an excellent result for a zoom lens in this class. It is also fully compatible with Canon's digital SLR cameras (112-480mm equivalent), with improved lens coatings optimised for digital sensors. Without question this is an excellent lens for the Canon photographer interested in excellent nature and landscape photography, without resorting to a sturdy tripod to hold both the camera and lens; thus it is also quite suitable for handhold panning shots at most outdoor sporting events held under good weather conditions</review_text>
This is a good zoo lens.  It is not as heavy or noticeable as something like the 100-400 L lens.  Also, with the 3 stop IS and smaller size and weight this makes a great backup lens to the 100-400 on trips or when I just don't feel like carrying around a 3+ pound lens all day.  So if you don't want to have to deal with the cost or size of an L series lens this is one of the next best options</review_text>
After debating between this and the 70-200 L series I decided to purchase this lens.  I have been pleasantly surprised by the results.  I also own the 17-85 and the 50mm 1.8 lenses and I have found that I have gotten the "most pleasing" results from this lens.  The pictures have been very sharp from my 20D - even in the 200mm - 300mm range.  I've also been happy with the quality of the bokeh.The primary drawback I see is that the AF tends to hunt a fair amount when confronted with low contrast images.  That being said, I used it for some flying bird shooting at the wildlife refuge and was surprised to see how many of the shots were in sharp focus.  However, it was a little bit of all or nothing.  Several shots were also wildly out of focus.  Since the lens is fairly slow to focus, you never know what you're gonna get with such a fast moving object against the distant sky.I had much more consistent results when shooting soccer, softball and football in the park.  The AF speed did not present an issue for any of these activities and the results were excellent.I wish the lens were a little less expensive but I the prints I have gotten from my 13 X 19 printer have been worth the extra money</review_text>
This Canon Lens upholds the tradition of fine products from the Canon line of photographic accessories. It takes very clear, sharp, hand held pictures with the Image Stabilizer capability activated. It negates the necessity of carrying a tripod every time one wants to take long telephoto shots. It should be a must for any serious photographer that wanders the countryside, taking candid pictures, and wants to lighten the load of equipment carried</review_text>
I have used the 1.4x II extender for over a year. It gives me amazing detail with my 70-200L f/4 lens on a 20D. I use it mostly for wildlife and butterflies. Contrast is good with colors that pop. When shooting on a sunny day the shutter speeds are still quick with the f/5.6 and the background is blurred beautifully. In shade areas and low light a tripod is a must! There hasn't been any sacrifice in subject detail. I can see individual hairs on butterfly bodies even when shooting wide open. This is a great way to get closer without paying a significant amount for a supertelephoto lens</review_text>
The 1.4X II teleconverter is a modest update to Canon's earlier 1.4X TC.  The mark II allows this extender to be stacked with another of Canon's extenders (either another 1.4X II or the 2X II) without having to separate the two with an extension tube (although the loss of sharpness from stacking extenders may not be acceptable to you).  Otherwise, the quality of the newer 1.4X II is supposed to be very similar to the older model, which I've never owned.The 1.4X II is a great way to extend the reach of compatible lenses.  Note that not every Canon lens is compatible with this extender.  The following is from Canon's Web site: "This tele extender can be used with fixed focal length lenses 135mm and longer (except the 135mm f/2.8 Softfocus lens), and the EF 70-200 f/2.8L, 70-200 f/2.8L IS, 70-200 f/4.0L, and 100-400 f/4.5-5.6L IS zoom lenses."I use it frequently with my Canon 70-200mm f/2.8L IS, which turns it into a 98-280mm zoom.  The extra reach it adds is not tremendous, but it's very welcome when I just need a little more than what the lens alone can give me.I've found no appreciable loss in sharpness from using the 1.4X.  Of course, any extender is going to reduce sharpness to some degree, but with normal examination, I can't distinguish photos taken with the 70-200mm that use the 1.4X from those that don't.  The fact that the 70-200mm f/2.8L is a very sharp lens to begin with helps in this department.Using the 1.4X decreases your lens' widest aperture 'capability' by one stop.  With some lenses, that can be more significant than it appears on the surface; when using a non-pro Canon body (such as my 20D) the lens must have a minimum wide-open aperture 'capability' of f/5.6 for autofocus to work.  The lens doesn't have to be set at f/5.6, it just has to be 'capable' of at least f/5.6 after adjusting for the one stop loss from the 1.4X.  That means with some camera/lens combinations, adding the 1.4X will force you to focus all of your shots manually.  (Note: There is a known 'fix' for this that restores autofocus.  I've never needed to try it, but it involves taping over some connector pins on the 1.4X to fool the camera body.  Proceed with caution if you try this, and do a Google search to learn how to do it right before attempting it.)The 1.4X also reduces focus speed very slightly.  I've only used it on my 70-200mm IS, which has Canon's USM and is a fast-focusing lens to begin with, but the decrease in speed is so slight I really don't notice it.  And it does not affect IS (Image Stabilization) at all.The 1.4X is built to the quality of Canon's L-series lenses, which means that it is weather sealed and will keep a Canon pro body and L-series lens weather sealed when used with them.If you're considering this extender, you're probably also considering Canon's 2X II teleconverter.  I do not own the 2X but did a lot of research on it before ultimately deciding to go with the 1.4X.  The 2X decreases your aperture by two stops, and is reported to have a noticable decrease in sharpness--more than some photographers are willing to live with.  On the other hand, I've never read a review that complained about the loss of sharpness from the 1.4X.If you've already invested a lot of money in telephoto lenses, the 1.4X II is a relatively inexpensive way to get even more reach (and value) out of your investment while adding only a modest amount of bulk to your camera bag.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Wonderful camera. Very flexiable, very versitile. Can be the most wonderful creation device in someone whom is capable. Def a good buy now that the 30D is out.I've had this camera for over a year and I STILL love it</review_text>
Excellent Camera with high end capabilities. Easy to use and intuitive system controls</review_text>
I am just a hobbyist.  This was a big purchase and a big step for me to get into this level of camera.  I still haven't mastered using it yet, and I've had it for a few months.It does a wonderful job of taking pictures.  If you have the right lenses, it can take some of the most beautiful pictures you've ever seen.  Again, I'm just a hobbyist/enthusiast.  I use it to take pictures for work, too.I highly recommend getting a couple of VERY good lenses to go with it.  Don't go with the cheap lenses that Canon, Tamron, Sigma, etc. make for this camera.  Do yourself a favor and get a nice zoom - spend some bucks.  You'll be happy you did.The camera itself is pretty easy to use if you leave it on auto, but that's like buying a race car and never shifting out of first gear.  The auto settings are great, and they do a wonderful job, but you can do so much more if you learn to use the camera in Manual, Av, Tv, or P mode.  It allows you so much more creativity that you'll be amazed at the difference.The 30D came out right before I bought the 20D, and I would probably buy it for the price now, but I'm very happy with my 20D</review_text>
This camera is really great.  I knew I liked it before, but I immediately began to appreciate this camera all the more when I ended up with a Rebel XT as a "loaner" while my 20d was in repair.Not that the XT is a bad camera, it just doesn't really compare to the 20d.The 20d has a nice feel to it; it is fairly large, which is great since I have somewhat large hands.  The features are great too.  And the image quality is awesome.  I don't really need to go into all of the details, as most of the other reviewers have done an excellent job.  Let me just say that it is a great camera and is worth the five stars.The only complaint I have about the camera is that it doesn't have spot metering.  The ability to do your light metering off of a single point of interest would be great - and they did add it to the 30d.</review_text>
Impressive feature list wih affordable price, for the serious ameteur. i've been using the 20D with 18-55, 50mm 1.8, 35-80, 80-200 and 500/1000mm lenses. i am not disappointed. i am planning to upgrade to the L series lenses but slowly.i do not mean to be over entusiastic about canon, but i am yet to see a Nikon camera with the same specs at the same or ever a near equal price. i've got the FM10 for film photography. i love both my cameras.Impressive features include:Mirror lockupISO 3200 with noise reduction18 custom functionsaccepts the entire series of canon lens.heavy metal body (no cheap plastic feel</review_text>
This is a great camera.  Plenty of resolution. Excellent shot speed.  Sturdy frame.  The kit lense doesn't do the camera justice.  Buy the body separate and add a better lense.On the bad side, I had a small glitch with the camera's firmware soon after purchase and had to return it for a fix.  It was two months before the camera was returned.  Sorry, Canon...  you lose a star for that</review_text>
This camera is amazing, I couldn't have asked for more. Just be warned that the manual is pretty terrible. It's best to just play around with the camera until you figure it out, rather than wasting time trying to decipher the manual</review_text>
My kids are in competitive Tae Kwon Do. I have now used the camera my wife gave me one year ago at several tournaments. It is able to stop action and take great shots even in low lighting. Now, we tried it when we went skiing and it also worked great in the glare conditions of the snow. I bought a monopod that worked real well to stabalize and I use software called PhotoFinale to crop and share the photos.One year into the usage I am still looking forward to each chance I get to play with this "toy".Next options: battery grip, flash diffuser, extra remote flash..</review_text>
I bought this camera about 2 months before my son was born.  I knew little about Digital SLRs, but after research I found that this was the one for me.  This camera is well constructed and durable.  The pictures are excellent.  I have blown a few of my pictures up to 11X17 without any problem.  Also, if you are going to be doing any editing of photos on your computer, this camera would be great.  I would recommend purchasing the newest version of Photoshop or Photoshop elements (when I bought mine it only came with Elements 2.0 and 3.0 was already on the market).  Also, if you want your pictures to turn out, you MUST purchase a larger flash.  The onboard flash is weak, will leave shadows and it does not allow you to do any type of "bounce" flash.  On the whole, this is the best camera I have ever had in my life and it would be great for anyone who has previous experience with SLR cameras.</review_text>
I have gone from the old 640x480 about nine years ago to a 3.1m for the last few years to the Canon 20d now, what a pleasure to shot. The battery life has not been an issue even with over 250 shots, which should be sufficient for most anybody. There is a small learning curve but you would expect this with any new camera.The lens choice was a great idea which came from an earlier review of the excellent walk around ability of this lens from the general shots to the closeups of those favorite flowers.For those individuals who are on the fence about this product I tout it to all I have spoken to. It turned a good photo experience on our west coast road trip into a real serious photo shoot, it also uses the commonly accessable compact flash.The built in flash works well have not had to explore the options at this time. The delivery of this item when promised was a nice bow on the package</review_text>
It does what it's supposed to do. Nothing more, nothing less. If it were a little cheaper, I would have given it 5 stars.</review_text>
I initially bought this switch to be able to take fireworks pictures with my 30D on a tripod.  It worked well for this application.  Got some GREAT shots of the fireworks.  Have since used it for some wildlife photos and it works well in this application also.  The cord from the camera to the switch is only about two feet long.  Sufficient for use on a tripod, but perhaps just a little short for any other application for the switch.I consider it "overpriced" for what it is, but if you need a manually operated remote switch, it performs this function well.  The release button has an option where you can lock-it "ON".  It's useful if you what to leave your camera's shutter open for a long exposure.I didn't research any other brands of remote switches for my Canon 30D.  There may be others, but I was in a hurry to have something before the 4th of July, and just ordered it, since I knew is was suppose to work with my camera.It performs it's intended design function.  It's overpriced, in my estimation, but if you need one, this one will perform the job.</review_text>
Aside form the fact that Canon charges an arm and a leg for a 1 dollar piece of plastic, the remote switch does work well.  It does not feel very sturdy and does not seem nearly as well built as the Canon cameras.  People with big hands may have a little trouble using this product.  Overall, a "must have" addition for anyone interested in long exposures, images with excellent sharpness and depth of field</review_text>
Typically fine original design by Canon. I have a "Chinese" copy - it really is - and it works but it's not the same as having the mfr's own.</review_text>
It is simple, handy and works well to prevent shaking your camera. But I am still doubt if this simple accessory really deserves 50 bucks... This wired release would be the choice only if you are not a Digital Rebel user who has a more reasonable price option for the additional shutter button.</review_text>
The RS-80N3 works as advertized. The cable could have been longer but other than that I am totally pleased</review_text>
Manufactured of a soft gray felt like material, a tough leather bottom, and draw string closure at the top, this lens pouch helps protect your lens from dust and the elements. I store my lenses in a camera bag, and these cases fit nicely around the lens taking up little precious space.This case is meant for use with the Canon 28 to 135mm f3.5-5.6 IS USM, and the 28 to 200mm f3.5-5.6 USM EF lenses. These lenses do not normally come with the case when sold new. Amazon often suggests purchasing one with your lens, and is worth considering depending on how you store your lenses.PROS:Protects your glass investmentCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
This lens pouch is very durable and is of a good quality. It compacts down and does not have unneccesary bulk. Might seem alittle pricey but is worth it in the long haul.</review_text>
Well, it's Canon, so there is no doubt about the quality. The only downside -- because it doesn't have a string the cap is very easy to misplace. Always put it in your pocket everytime you remove it from the camera to shoot pictures</review_text>
I have the lens, I have the cap....and its been so long since I bought both that I don't remember if the cap came with the lens or not.   SURELY it does !!!!!!!   I do love my add on lenses but I will have to say that now that I've added all these other toys (macro, wide angle, telephoto, filters) I now realize I shouldve gotten a SLR digital and held out for true lenses instead of the conversion option.   I love my S2IS but just think how nice a real camera would be !!!!!!   sigh...</review_text>
Good quality, and perfect attach, but no cord to avoid loose it.Incredible that Canon forget it!!!So... remember to put it inside your pocket when you use your camera</review_text>
Lost your old SLR lens cap?  This is what you are looking for.</review_text>
I got this lens cap when I ordered a close-up lens for my camera, a PowerShot S1 IS, because it was recommended as something people who ordered that part would also order.  I, therefore, assumed that it went with the same camera, or with the lens/adapter I was ordering.  However, it does not appear to fit either the camera itself or any of the attachments, so I now wish that I had done some more research to determine whether it would actually fit my equipment</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
It seems unfair to compare this camera to a 10D (or 20D or 30D), either favorably or unfavorably. These instruments are good in their own right, but hardly  are in the same league as the 1DS Mark II. I have used all three of the xxD's, and an original 1ds body as well. It occurs to me that the folks who are interested in shelling out over 5 grand for a camera already have an idea about what they want, and that some of them are asking if they should trade in their 1ds body for a mark ii. It is to them that I am adressing this review. The remarks, I think will help those who have less experience with the line. Bear with me for the technical jargon and the emphais on Mark I vs II comparison. I want to help the buyer to decide if there really is a reason to spend this kind of money.First, regarding resolution: you probably won't be able to tell the difference between Mark I and Mark II unless you are doing studio work. An 8x10 image is virtually indistinguishable. Most of us shoot in .jpg mode, and we don't mess with RAW. If you are doing a 17x20 wedding portrait and are working with uncompressed files, the Mark II is superior. I do outdoor work, so 11.6 megapixels is plenty. Finallyl, the quality of the glass makes a big difference (much more than the sensor resolution), so if you are a little strapped for cash, buy a 5D and spend the difference on "L" series lenses, or a used 1DS (Mark I).Second: Ergonomics. I like the histogram on the Mark II better than the older camera, and appreciate the improved burst performance, and storage times. Small but significant differences. The battery life is way better, and I like that. I can get 700 frames out of a charge in the Mark II and only 200 from the Mark II. Thank you, Canon. Maybe in the next iteration they will do something with the black brick of a charger. I can only hope.Third: Sensor noise. Most ofthe high-end cameras are CMOS now, and each time we look at a new generation of pictures we are wowed by the decrease in sensor noise at high ISO's. I remember that the we praised the Mark I for the low noise up to ASA 400. For the uninitiated, sensor noise is the random firing of a sensor due to quantum effects, and manifests as sparkle or random changes in pixel color. It is more prominent in low light and high ASA. The Mark I is great up to ASA 400, good up to 800 and needs some digital filtering at 1200. The Mark II is really good up to ASA 1600, and with a Photoshop filter is good to 3200. If you shoot in low light, the Mark II is for you.Fourth: Color balance. I always loved the warm, saturated pictures that the Mark I gives, so don't get me wrong - better color rendition is not a reason to sell it for a new model. The Mark II, though, improves on it and gives beautiful color saturation with some improvement in the range of highligts. Digital photo buffs will know what I mean: if you take a picture with broad highlights, like a sky, the foreground objecst will be underexposed. and the highlights clear. Set the exposrue to the foreground, and the sky will be a burnt-out white. The Mark II has improved this much, but it still needs some work by Canon. For now, it helps to have taken a large number of pictures to get an idea as to how to set the exposure.Fifth: Accuracy of the exposure. The Mark I had an annoying tendancy to overexpose by about a stop. I got used to turning down the exposure 1-2 stops, exposing on the highlights, and using Photoshop to correct the exposure. The Mark II is more accurate, and the Manual exposure is close to the metered exposure.Sixth: The FF/1.6 business. I really don't see any reason that a 30D is a better camera because a 50mm lens gives an image analagous an 85mm lens in a full frame camera. Be advised, though, that lens evaluations depend on this distinction. Edge performance and flair may be more obvious on a full frame instrument. Both the 1DS and the 1DS Mark II tend to challenge lenses more because they work the full range of the lens from side to side and through the apertures. My 35-135 IS Canon lens gave great pictures on the 10D, but looks washed out on both of the 1Ds's. Before giving the 1DS Mark II a bum rap for less than perfect pictures, ask what lens was used.Seventh: Price. Presently, a non-grey-market 1DS Mark II sells for around $6899 from reputable dealers. A used Mark I is around half that. I would take a half star away from Canon for the pounding my pocketbook is taking, but I understand that a Mark I was just about the same price when it was released. The price gradient presently would be tolerable for those shooting in low light, or for RAW studio work. Personally, I would buy a Mark I over a 5D for the improved construction.Finally, some general remarks. I would have liked to compare this fine camera to the comparable Nikon. Unfortunately, I cannot, because all my glass is Canon, and I have no money left for a mult-thousand buck purchase of a Nikon. Maybe someone else would write a review.My only beefs with Canon have to do with sensor dust, that seems to appear by spontaneous generation, and the steep learning curve that I had with my first use. (Plan on a night or two reading the manual) I guess I can forgive them for not putting a flash in it. Add a couple of hundred to the price for the purchase of a 580EX. Canon service has been terrific. If you have the bucks, quit complaining about the price and get one if you are a serious photographer. Look at the images in dpreview.com (and the long, thoughtful review there), and at fredmiranda.com - they will leave you breathless. This is a serious instrument for serious photographers and far be it from me to give it less than 5 stars for my petty complaints</review_text>
First, the Canon 1Ds Mark II is an awesome professional camera.This review is about the completely misleading Amazon offer of 42% off.  This is the biggest joke imaginable.  The Amazon website shows the list price as $11,999.99.  When Canon launched this camera the MSRP wasn't that high.  It was $7,999.  Methinks someone with a calculator got carried away.Anyway, after adding it to my cart to see the unbelievable low price it turns out its within about $100 of what every other reputable online shop is selling it for.I expected more from Amazon.  This behavior is reprehensible</review_text>
The Canon 1Ds Mark II does not list for $11,999. Body only it lists for around $7,500</review_text>
i think this is the BEST buy anyone can do, is superfast, flexible (50-3200 asa) interchangeble lenses, long last battery, all excellent, the only bad thing is the high price but it worth it, its like having a ferrari, almost you want to keep it at home in case that something bad happens like being stolen or damaged even do that some people say that the big size is an inconvinencie i personally would not like a tiny camera as a professional photographer it woud look ridicoulous, so the size is a good thing also, when people that even dont know the camera are impressed by the stuff it has</review_text>
I have been shooting digital for four years now mostly with the Kodak DCS cameras(660 through DCSPro). Being a life long Nikon guy it was a big decision to make the switch to Canon and the 1DS MK2. This camera is light years ahead of any Kodak digital slr. I use this camera for studio product, models, location, low light, you name it. The Canon has never produced anything but astounding images for me. All image parameters including sharpness are far superior to any of the old images I have from my Kodak days. Yes it is pricey but if you are working with this camera you will pay for easily long before it's useful days are over.</review_text>
I am a Pro Photographer who formerly used Medium Format. I wanted to get a digital SLR with better than film quality. The EOS 1Ds MK II is it!It is weather/dust resistant (to a point) when combined with Canon's "L" series lenses, and if you own this body, those lenses are a must-have. The controls are easier to master than I first thought. It is fast, no shutter lag and fast write to card. The colors and details in shadow/highlights are amazing! Truly a joy to hold!If you want the best, this is it</review_text>
This is a must have product for any Digital Rebel XT owner.  Always carry a spare fully charged battery.Amazon has a competitive pricing structure and very timely delivery</review_text>
I've been using these in the Rebel XT since about two weeks. On Friday I went to a show at a local bar and took about 600 shots in medium to low light conditions (just small stage lights lighting up the band) and finally killed the battery after about 2 1/2 hours/600 shots</review_text>
This item is a good companion to use as battery backup; I recommend this item to all people using a Digital Rebel XT. This battery has a long life after full charge, is very light and small piece you can accommodate into any pocket or bag, I'm very satisfied with this purchase</review_text>
I have a Canon ZR700 camera, it comes with one of this batteries. Since it was just giving me a little more than an Hour of recording, i felt i needed an extra battery. When i saw the options, because the high price on this product, i felt tempted to buy a OEM battery that's cost was 16.00 USD with shipping and it has good reviews from other customers. But them i found the Canon BP-2L14 here at Amazon, which gives twice the power for only 56.00 USD, just 13.00 USD to double the power and a original product (and double the size too, the only bad thing about it, but it is really not that much)</review_text>
I find Canon batteries work very well. I also do not mind not using AA - an extra NB-2LH is small and easy to carry around - easier than several AA (rechargable or not)</review_text>
Haven't used it yet (bought it for a trip next month), but it arrived as promised and was exactly as described.</review_text>
I bought this camera two years ago, the pictures were always perfect, even though from the sixth month it started getting stains everywhere, but then i found out that it was normal, not good but it usually happens to this cameras. But the worst of all is tha fact that it displays the Error 18 (E18), the lens gets stock and the camera won't work at all. I searched in google about it, because the user guide says nothing about this error, and then I read many reviews that said that there was nothing to do about it and many Canon cameras have the same defect... I am really mad and dissapointed on CANON, i will never buy a camera of this brand, and I wouldn't recommend it, unless you are willing to buy a camera for 2 years or LESS and then throw your money to the trash</review_text>
I honestly don't see why people would give this camera less than 4 stars. The moment I got it, I was delighted with the quality of the pictures (except in very dark places - which is why the review gets minus 1 star), and by its portability.I've dropped it, abused it, took it to countless parties, countries and it is now FULL of scratches and bumps (GET THE CAMERA CASE!), and guess what: it still works as perfectly as the first day I got it. This little piece of technology is amazing, so if you're looking for something affordable and with a great picture quality (for us amateurs, of course) just go for it. ACtually, I even took quite a few gorgeous pictures with it. I even love it and rely on it so much that I won't change it even now that it looks all messed up.Don't think twice. Just go for it</review_text>
This camera is pretty good, it's very fast, the photo quality is excellent, video recording mode is awesome, and is perfect to carry everywhere since it's pretty small, but after several months of normal use, the metal case begins to look pretty rusted, that's why i dont give this camera a 5 star rating.But check the flickr photos, you will see examples of the great photo quality of the camera</review_text>
SD110 NOT A GOOD DIGITAL CAMERA. BETTER YET FIND SOMETHING ELSE. I'VE HAD THIS CAMERA ALMOST A YEAR BUT I JUST SELDOM USE IT BECAUSE THE RESULT OF THE PICTURES ARE VERY DISAPPOINTING. IT IS JUST FINE DOWNLOADING THEM ON THE INTERNET BUT WHEN YOU HAVE IT PRINTED ON THE PAPER, THE PICTURES GET BLURRED. NOW,IM LOOKING FOR ANOTHER DIGICAM THAT WON'T DISAPPOINT ME</review_text>
I just finished a semester in Brisbane, Australia. I must say, in retrospect, the best thing I took with me on this trip was this camera. She is a champ, definitely an adventurous camera. The thing is cute as hell yet solid like a rock. I cannot remember the amount of times I dropped it in the sand, with no negative consequences whatsoever. I even dipped it in the ocean by mistake once (not encouraged) and the thing still works like a charm.It also has features like Sepia and a weird flash that makes lights do something funny, making the pictures wicked cool.The outer covering has shown wear, but it only helps to acknowledge that this camera can take rough handling. People even comment on this on a positive light, it has become a part of my travelling gear.It is also great for scenic shots, and has the panorama option.In retrospect, it was an amazing buy, and so affordable (I'm on a backpackers' budget)!Only because I have seen amazing skies and breathtaking scenery would I consider upgrading to a camera with better pixelage. But if you are staying in hole-in-the-wall hostels or sleeping on the beach, you don't want to have an expensive camera on you.This thing is great. The battery life is also great (for the sake of topping off the cake)</review_text>
This is a great product.  I have a rather large lens and it helps stabilize it so that I don't blur my pictures when I'm taking pictures of the kids playing soccer.  However, people think I'm a professional photographer from the local newspaper when I use it at the grandkids' games.</review_text>
Strong and rigid, easy to control on the head so that you can have it loose for free movement but tight enough that the camera doesn't flop over.  Opens and closes very easily.  It's kind of expensive for $50 but its probably worth the money</review_text>
Solid design, quick and easy to adj height. Great way to steady camera. Doubles as walking stick</review_text>
It works fine, but the Canon S2 IS digital camera sometimes feels a little heavy for the monopod.</review_text>
I was very pleased with Amazons quick delivery of my new Canon monopod.The monopod is very easy to adjust and use. It's the ideal ridgid support you would want for your camera.It even doubles as a great walking stick, sometime need, on those long treks you make to get a good photo</review_text>
This monopod is exactly what I expected at a good price.  It extends very smoothly, and the stops hold the leg firmly at the height I set. Easy to set up and adjust with one hand so I can change height with the camera attached</review_text>
I love this monopod! I'm a person who uses my camera nearly every day (Canon EOS Elan 7 35mm).  This item is one of my favorite accessories for the camera -- so much easier to travel with than a tripod! It's sturdy, but lightweight, easy to use and is very portable. I am mostly using the monopod to support my camera with an enormous, extremely heavy 500mm telephoto lens attached. I'm actually able to hold that huge lens steady with just the monopod -- not one blurry photo! I've dragged it all over the Bluegrass of Kentucky ... across fields of horse farms, and even to the racetrack.   I've taken it out into the wilderness to photograph elk. I had to keep closing it down and extending it out every time we got in and out of the vehicle, which was often. Also recently traveled all over Arizona with it to the Grand Canyon, Monument Valley, Canyon De Chelley, etc. I was constantly opening and closing it, taking literally hundreds of photos (about 14 rolls) with no problems at all.  I'm wondering if the other reviewer just got a defective one.  I wish I'd bought one of these years ago!  I highly recommend it</review_text>
If you're looking for a high-quality telephoto zoom lens that is fast enough to use indoors, you may have found what you're looking for.  The 70-200/2.8 lens produces beautiful results that are overall on par with the 135/2 prime lens (although not quite as sharp).The main downside to this lens is that it's big and heavy.  I don't mind carrying it around my neck on the camera so much, but when you go to use if you have to put extra effort into keeping the lens from shaking in your hands due to the weight.  And it's not exactly the sort of lens that I would want to toss into my backpack, just due to the immense size.If you don't mind spending an extra $500, consider also the 70-200/2.8 IS (image stabilization) version of this lens.  It weighs even more, but the built in IS unit should help compensate for shaky hands whilst using the lens</review_text>
...there are two things that you should know.  The first is that the f/2.8 version of this lens is big and heavy.  The second is that the f/2.8 version of this lens is the more versatile and, therefore, the more useful of the two choices.Why is the f/2.8 more useful?  It allows you to use Canon's outstanding extenders and still have a sharp and practical lens.  With the 1.4x, you will have a very, very good 98-280mm f/4 lens.  With the 2x, you will have a good 140-400mm f/5.6 lens.  In both cases the lens will autofocus--very well with the 1.4x and adequately with the 2x.  The use of the Canon extenders also allows the 70-200 to make a pretty nice close-up lens.  The original close focus of the lens is maintained with the extenders, giving you both 280mm and 400mm focal lengths that focus closer than most prime lenses of the same focal lengths.  While you can use the extenders on the f/4 version, it makes for some pretty slow lenses with limited applications.There's not much you can say about this lens that hasn't already been said.  It's one of the sharpest zooms around with a look that, while certainly subjective, is highly appealing.  I have a preference for prime lenses over zooms but I still rank this as one of my sharpest lenses.Is there any reason to choose the 70-200 f/4 lens over this one?  Cost aside, I can see a valid argument being made for the f/4.  Carrying around the f/2.8 in a full camera bag is no fun unless you're putting it to use.  Since I mostly use shorter focal length prime lenses, sometimes the f/2.8 is a pain in the neck for me--literally.  Unless I know I will need it, I have taken to leaving it behind in favor of a lighter, smaller and less sharp Canon 100-300.  So I can see the utility of the smaller 70-200.  Maybe I can talk myself into owning both.  Nah, that's a little too excessive.</review_text>
I forgot my wife's birthday and she subsequently hinted that she wanted a telephoto lens... I started by looking at the cheap ones, but decided, that I might as well do it right if I were going to do it at all.   When it arrived, my wife took it out of the box and we were both stunned by how massive this lense was.  It's heavier than you might think as well (which means that the mounting ring that come packaged with this lens is an absolute God-send).The first thing we did was go out and buy a Mono-pod for it.  Next we took it camping and then water-skiing and ended up with some of the most incredible, crystal clear shots we've ever seen.  The autofocus was incredibly fast - I was able to hold down the button and snap through multiple exposures while speeding across the waves.   Most of the time - the thing was right on.We then mounted it on a tri-pod and shot family portraits.  This was the first time we had all the kids and grandkids together in six years and once again - the lens didn't let us down and the photos were fantastic.I don't have any real training with a camera (I use the Cannon Rebel and auto-focus most of the time) but this lens was worth every dime. ...It also worked to get me out of the dog-house with my wife..</review_text>
I have a few 'L' lens, and this is by far my favorite. Reviews saying this is their favorite lens are not kidding. There are plenty of other reviews going over all the features, but I would like to add to the IS v Non-IS.I purchased the NON-IS version because I did not want to fork over the extra million-dollars for IS. If I knew I was to like this lens so much and it would become my favorite lens, I would have splurged for IS.Somewhere on the great-big-internet I read a comparison between the two versions. The IS version clearly shows less sharpness, but it was not clear if that is only when IS is on. And I'm not sure if it would be noticeable on Digital</review_text>
I don't personally subscribe to the notion that the big brand manufacturers always make the best lenses out there, but this is one instance where they really, honestly do. This thing is lightning fast, sharp as a tack, the bokeh is much better than Sigma's equivalent, and you'll have a hard time finding a use for your raw processor's chromatic aberration correcting sliders when coupled with a digital body (you CAN still get some purple fringing around backlit subjects, but genuine CA bad enough to show up in a print has so far proven non-existent for me at any focal length or aperture). The weight is a serious downside, but it's one I can live with.If you're a nature photographer who really has a problem holding still or if you plan on using extension tubes, the IS version might be worth the extra $700 to you, but if you're doing event photography where the subjects are the ones jumping around like rabbits, save your money and your battery power; ain't a thing wrong with this lesser model</review_text>
This is probably Canon's best value in a mid/long zoom.I got this the same day I purchased my 30D...along with the EF-S 10-22 and the EF 24-70 2.8L.  Talk about pleased!  No regrets whatsoever.This lens just screams quality.  Images just pop out at you.  If you're considering the f/4 model...take a hard look at this one.  Add a hood (cha-ching) and (yikes) the $100+ tripod ring and the value of this lens really shows.  It's a bit larger & heavier but look what you gain!  If you're one of those that considers the sweet spot of a lens to be stopped down a step or two just look at where that puts you on the f/4 compared to this one.  And the focus speed is nothing short of "holy mackerel that's fast!"Sure, you could spend a few more bucks and get the IS version...but frankly, to me at least, if it's that important I'll be using a tripod anyway.  Hmmm, just took the shakes out of the equation.All in all, a great lens at a decent price</review_text>
I keep it short and sweet.Very Sharp - quick autofocus.  I use it with my Canon 20D.</review_text>
This hood comes with the 70-200 lens and my local shop didn't stock it.  They said it was a special order part and that it would take a week for it to come in.  I ordered it on a friday, and received it on a Wednesday.  Not bad.  Thanks Amazon</review_text>
I mainly use this when taking landscape shots where I want to either make the clouds pop or liven the sky up some (remember it works best 90 degrees from the sun.)  I also put it on when shooting highly reflective vegetation or waterscapes that would otherwise cause blown-out highlights.  One other little secrete is to use this when shooting waterfalls since it will allow you to shoot at slower shutter speeds thus increasing the wispy waterfall look</review_text>
Other reviewers have complained about the plastic foot on the flash-bracket end cracking or breaking off. The solution is a metal "sacrificial foot" that screws into the 1/4"-20 threads on the bottom. Bogen/Manfrotto 3298 (BO3298) works perfectly. No Amazon vendor carries it as of this date, but you can find it at bhphotovideo.com. Their listing says it's for Nikon, but it works for the Canon Off Camera Shoe Cord 2 as well</review_text>
I got this cord mainly for Macro work so that I could use long Macro lenses along with my flash without having to deal with the lens shadow in the picture.  It is also very nice to be able to control the direction of the lighting by placing the flash above, below, or beside the subject.  Red eye can also be almost entirely reduced by moving the flash further away from the camera body, so this cord is helpful for portrait work.  It could be a little longer, but the longer it gets the more difficult it would be to pack it small spaces, so all-in-all I think they did a pretty good job.  It works fine, if you want all of your flash's functionally, but don't want it in the hotshoe, this is a good choice</review_text>
This camera cord shoe works well.  However, it  can break relatively easily so I suggest having two at any given time.  Also, the cord length can be too short at times and two long depending on your needs</review_text>
It gave me the option to change the angle of the light... this is a nice option to have I am sure</review_text>
There is not much to say about this, since there were no other alternatives for me. Simply stated, I went for the lowest price I could find.</review_text>
Had looked at this lens both at the camera shop and on line and finally decided after much comparison with other lenses to finally purchase it, have'nt regretted it one bit. This lens is clear with excellent color, saturation and sharpness without any or minimal post processing. Coupled with an external flash it's great indoors as well. Have been using it as my everyday walk around lens. Zoom range is excellent(Rebel XT/XTi 1.6 magnification). Though it's somewhat on the big side, it won't tire you out carrying it around your neck. Purchased the hood seperately which, for the money should have came with the lens.Anyway, this lens offers excellent value for the money and you won't regret the investment</review_text>
First off this is a very nice lens for the money. I have had mine now for about three months and love it. It is a great walk around lens the 28-135 is just right for most pictures of kids and landscape pictures. It has a fast focus and sharp clear pictures clear up to the 125 range gets a little soft at 135 but easily fixed with a little post editing. I have taken most of my pictures hand held and the IS works great. I even recommended it to a friend. I am using it on the 30D and it spends most of its time there. I am not sorry I purchased this lens and will be taking a lot more pictures with it in the future.</review_text>
I use this all the time at my son's soccer games and get great shots. It's a little on the bigger side, but isn't too heavy and image stabilization really helps out</review_text>
I have always used third party lenses before but after trying this Canon I have to say I am impressed with the quality, it feels like a solid piece of equipment rather than a hunk of lightweight plastic.I find my photos to be much sharper due to the IS and the lens itself. I have tremors in my hands and so was having a difficult time with a normal lens but the IS has helped tremendously for that.I like the range of zoom as it is pretty much all purpose for me( have used the kit lens only once since i got this lens when i needed a wider angle). I could occasionally/rarely use a little more distance but nothing is perfect.My only complaint is that the lens is heavy and pretty much doubles the weight of my camera( Rebel xt). You know it's around your neck after a few hours shooting.I haven't had any focus hunting problems,which i had constantly with the 3rd party lenses. and the lens is very quiet which is imo a good thing.For a reasonably priced lens it is well worth the money</review_text>
This can be a great 'only lens' for the day.  Good weight vs capability for handing most photo opportunities you'll come across.  Good price for the versatility the IS function provides</review_text>
This is a great lens that can be used for almost everything.  It is great if you only want to take one lens with you.  Pictures are very sharp and the color is good</review_text>
I originally purchased a 30D with the low-end kit lens - to me the pricing didn't really make sense to get either the body or the higher-end IS kit lens. I was looking for a good all-purpose zoom with full-size sensor covereage in case I move up the Canon ranks to a new pro-level model in the future.The 28-135 fits the bill nicely. Although it is fairly heavy, the difference in build and image quality between the 18-55 kit lens is incomparable. This lens takes beautiful pictures and operates flawlessly. I highly recommend it as a day-to-day lens, and the IS is a nice feature for extending the range down a few stops without moving up to the much more expensive faster lenses</review_text>
From all the reviews I read, I expected certain pros and cons from this lens.  I was not disappointed.pros:  very sharp lens with very good colorscons:  vignetting at wide open, and a little too contrastyFor myself, the pros outweighed the cons for the price.  It is ideal for the 1.6 multiplier cameras, where it becomes a 38mm lens</review_text>
This is a cheap lens - old design, very plastic - that can prove terribly useful for those on a budget who want a wider perspective, especially on 1.6x crop factor dSLRs.I learned about "cheap" with this lens - broke the focus ring the day after delivery.  But I blame myself too, and the replacement's given me no trouble, though I think my first one was a bit sharper than the second.By many standards, this lens will match or exceed zoom lens of comparable price (as a prime lens should).  Autofocus is a little buzzy, but the main time you'll notice is when it loses its bearing and suddenly lurches way off target.  Mostly, focuses quickly enough and well.  Some chromatic aberration in worst-case scenarios, but nothing awful or unexpected.  Vignetting, even on a 1.6x crop, can be noticeable, mainly in sky shots, but gradual rather than sudden.  (Might be unacceptably worse on a full-frame camera.)  Undue distortion seems minimal - haven't really checked but also haven't really noticed, if you see what I mean.  Flare seems average, perhaps better than one would expect from such wide glass.  Bokeh is nonchalant, not dreamy but never intrusive.But at the price, the positives make up for the negative and "average" tendencies.  It's vibrantly colorful and contrasty almost to a fault.  Hard light is a little more challenging with this lens, a little more tricky to balance exposure between highlights and shadows.  It's softish wide-open, but very unobjectionably - have yet to regret shooting at f/2.8.  My main lens is a 50mm f/1.4, and switching back and forth on the same aperture setting is perfectly functional in practice.  Lose a little crisp for taking in four times as much space, and that's a trade-off I can run with.  (Their filter threads match too.)  At f/4 and higher, I get "plenty sharp," though I've never seen "unreal sharp" from this glass (as I have from the 50mm)."Crop factor" over-simplifies the effect of mounting a wide-angle lens on a 1.6x camera.  Yes, the field of view will match 40mm on a full-frame, but the perspective will not, because you'll be closer to your subjects.  Shooting live subjects (like bands, models, or street life) will require a learning curve, so beware mission critical work before you've broken yourself in so you can anticipate its exagerations.That said, I bought this lens primarily for "head-to-toe" model shooting in my modest studio, and it's been a real asset.  Interestingly, it tends toward a very useful "slimming effect" that makes hippy girls look more slender and shorter girls more ambiguous in height (at least at the "head-to-toe" distance from them).  Disconcerting at first but terribly useful once you've gotten the hang of it.  (Beware chicken legs or the reverse from dramatic perspectives.)I read every review I could find before purchase, and this lens seemed to be a magic middle between the higher cost clarity of the 20mm and the cheaper lesser sharpness of the 28mm.  Near as I can tell, I nailed it.  This is not a spectacular lens, but a very very functional one if you need an affordable wider angle that generally won't let you down</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
Good quality product which actually measured slightly larger than indicated providing room for a good sized zoom lens. As usual Amazon shopping beat all others for pricing</review_text>
I bought this grip a year ago after shooting homecoming weekend at my school, Central Michigan University.The pain it saved my wrist being able to shoot sports vertically without having to hang my hand over the top of my camera was a HUGE relief.Recently though, after a year of solid use, I've been having problems with it. There will be days that my camera will suddenly say my batteries are dry - after charging them the day before. I've checked, and my grip is not part of the series that was recalled for a similar problem.I have to actually removed the grip, and the batteries, and restart the camera to correct the problem. --this is a big problem in the middle of a sports match--However, the grip is a great addition to the 20D/30D models. It's not the same feel as using a 1D, but it's as close are you're going to get. And for $150, you can't go wrong with the vertical shooting and doubled battery life. It also simply evens out the weight of the camera, especially with the heavier L-glass lenses on your camera</review_text>
This is my first time to purchase a battery grip for a digital SLR camera and it was a good investment. I don't have to worry about running out of battery power and at the same time it works as a vertical grip for my camera. It also  looks nice on my Canon 30D camera, coupled with an "L" series zoom lens</review_text>
I started with the battery grip initially wanting the double battery availability. Having used a 35mm with a hand strap and already realizing the value of the stability of such a strap, this was my second attraction for the purchase of the battery grip and last but not at all least, is the ability to use shoot from the grip itself, allowing full ease of rotation of the camera.  Though I have never used the battery magazine that allows for the use of AA batteries, having it offers a backup should the canon batteries need charging and I am in the heat of shooting. I always travel with my charge AND four AA batteries. I would recommend this grip as a standard accessory for the EOS-20D and EOS 30-D. One thought to consider once on the camera it increases the overall height creating challanges with some camera cases.</review_text>
I appreciate the difference in balance the battery grip provides for long lenses.  The E-1 hand strap that can be attached with this addition provides a very solid, secure grip.  Also, the BGE2 comes with a carrier for 6 AA cell batteries for those instant dead battery emergencies</review_text>
I just received the Canon BGE2 Battery Grip yesterday and already have it attached to my EOS 30D (nice).The unit fits very well and is very secure. I had no trouble aligning and tightening the Grip to the Camera Body.I also found the additional shutter release very handy. In addition, the shape of the unit allows a solid "grip" in the Vertical orientation as well.I too already had an extra battery pack, as TWO Batteries are required. Please note that the unit COMES WITH the Canon BGM-E2 Battery Holder, which allows you to use AA batteries. There is NO NEED to buy this as an accessory (unless you want a second AA battery magazine).One accessory that compliments the Battery Grip very well is the Canon Hand Strap E1. This Strap is designed to work with the neck strap yet provides added security and control with the Battery Grip (and well worth the $25-$30)</review_text>
I had the similar battery grip for my Dig Rebel, and I never took it off the camera.  So as soon as I bought the 30D, I immediately ordered this.  The dual batteries allow me to do an entire wedding (close to 1000 shots) without ever having to switch batteries.  Plus it really improves the grip of the camera with heavier/longer lenses. It has worked very well for me, and is a breeze to install</review_text>
I just attached my battery grip to my 300d for the first time today, and the difference was amazing. I already had an extra battery pack, so I charged them both up and slid them in right away.The added weight is a very nice addition to the 300d's small body, and I can already see an improvement in my ability to hold the camera still. It also makes the camera feel much sturdier.I have seen a few reviews that complain about the fitting. I have not had that problem. The connection is seemless for me, and there is no shimmy what-so-ever when I have a 70-300 lens attached with the camera on a tripod. So maybe this accessory was optimized for the XT?I love the extra shutter button as well, it makes taking picture in the portrait orientation EXTREMELY comfortable and easy. The buttom is almost exactly the same as the actual shutter on the camera as well, which makes it easy to go from button to button.After reading all the hype on this accessory, I forced myself to buy it, and I was not dissapointed! I recommend it to anyone using the XT. Buy it now or else</review_text>
Although people had problems with the first generation of this grip, I've been completely satisfied with mine. Recently, I've been shooting with a 300 2.8L, and it would be much more difficult without the extra length the grip ads to the body. Similarly, the second set of buttons for vertical shooting makes a big difference, too. (One note: when shooting vertical, it is hard to actuate the thumb wheel and impossible to use the joy stick--which  I do frequently to change focus points--without moving my right hand.) By holding two batteries, the grip also keeps me from worrying about running out of juice during high volume shooting sessions.The grip still has a little flex in it, but I've never had any of the power problems that I've read about here and elsewhere</review_text>
This camera looks amazing, not that I will ever have the money for it.I am impressed that this camera was the choice to shoot a feature film! It was used to shoot Tim Burton's Corpse Bride</review_text>
I just upgraded from a 20D, and the speed just blows the 20D out of the way!! Image quality runs about the same for both cameras since they're both 8.2MP, but how the camera gets you those images is simply amazing. Fastest shutter out there, low noise, consistent color, spot metering, multiple spot metering, weather sealing, the list goes on and on!! This camera demands the best glass, but you won't be sorry.If your serious about photography in any field, this camera won't disappoint!! A bit pricey, but believe me, it's worth every penny!!!!See some of my work at (...</review_text>
I'm a recreational photographer, and I love this camera. This is my 7th month with the beast -- since I pre-ordered it early from Amazon by MISTAKE. (Long story)Before buying the 1D Mii, you should know a few things:1. It's easy to overlook the spec that the camera's USB connection is 1.1 not 2.0. This is 40 times slower, and Canon clearly intended the Mark II to be connected via firewire. That said, I occasionally use it with my laptop on the road, which only has a USB connection. It's convenient that the port is there, but my 1GB CF card takes a good half hour to empty.2. By the time you've attached a solid L series or comparable lens to this camera, it weighs enough that lugging it around on your shoulder, even without a camera bag full of tricks, is quite a burden. Also, I was talking to a professional photographer who wouldn't buy the model just because cameras this heavy give her wrist trouble. If you've NEVER held a camera this size in your hand, I recommend borrowing one first or checking our your local camera store, even if you do ultimately buy from Amazon.3. The camera conveniently supports both SD and CF cards. Unfortunately there's no way to copy between the two cards using the camera. It's not a gigantic deal, but there were times I had to wait to get home from a trip to free up the SD card when I didn't have a camera cable, but just an external CF reader.Those are really the only 3 things I wish I'd known before I bought the camera...but would they have affected my purchase? Probably not! As I said, I bought the camera by mistake.  Has it been loads of fun? Definitely. I have prints almost as good as medium format - at 100 times the convenience.</review_text>
I cannot say enough about this camera!  From the moment you pick up the box, you know you have quality.  The construction and materials used is top notched.  Contents of the box can be found elsewhere, so I won't bother with the details.Charging of the battery to full takes 2hrs.  If you have memory on the battery from repeated charges without complete depletion, you can recondition the battery with the included charger.  It just takes 8hrs.  While many lament the fact that no Li-ion battery was included, Canon seems to have anticipated the needs of professionals in the field.One also has the option of being plugged into the AC outlet and not dependent on batteries.Reading the manual takes a bit of time.  The camera has endless customizable functions which can be overwhelming at times.  Not that it should deter you, but one will rarely need all those functions anyway.Using the camera did not seem too difficult.  Many functions need the use of two buttons, which may take some getting used to.  Navigating through the menu was confusing initally, but improved as time goes on.Autofocus speed is responsive and sharp.  Shooting at high ISO's (&#62;1000) had minimal noise.  Looking at some of my pictures taken with 1 fluorescent light in the room and an ISO of 1600, appeared as if a flash was used.  Photos of my black lab was incredible considering the ambient light and high ISO.The camera is always ready to go.  If you are in the manipulating within the depths of the menu heirarchy, and want to suddenly take a shot, just press on the shutter button, compose, focus, and shoot.  Its quick and responsive.  Incredible...!Some may be wondering the sizes of the pictures.  JPEG's have 4 sizes and range from 1 - 2.8 MB; RAW files are 8.4MB.One can take an average of 800 - 1200 shots on a full battery charge--assuming one has the capacity to hold it.Prints on my i9900 are outstanding.Cost is a pretty penny and then some.  Also consider that Amazon is an authorized Canon reseller.  Many of the rebates require that you purchase from an authorized reseller to be eligible for the rebates.  Also, some of the internet deals for the camera are not from authorized resellers.Overall, a very impressive camera.  The cost for many may be prohibitive for many.  The EOS 20D may be a more cost effective alternative, but I do NOT regret my decision one bit</review_text>
This tool transforms my DRebel XT's tiny little viewfinder into a usable one.At it's 1.25x setting it shows a clear picture with 100% coverage of what the viewfinder shows. At 2.5x, the coverage is much less but that setting is very handy for very critical manual focussing jobs.Remember to set your camera's diopter to it's default factory setting. Otherwise, flipping the angle finder between 1.25x and 2.5x magnification requires re-adjustment of the finder's diopter.Another big advantage of this little device is that it gives you the freedom to try exciting angles (hey, they don't call it the Angle Finder for nothing) without breaking your neck.The only minor downside is the initial learning curve in getting adjusted to the image shown by the finder.</review_text>
This is a great tool for those shots where you want to get down low.  Macro work and landscape/waterscape shots near the ground are so much easier with the angle finder on than without.  I have also used it when doing portrait work to get a more flattering angle without having to kneel or stoop over the whole time.Now for the negative.  It fogs up much easier than the normal eyepiece, which makes seeing anything a challenge under some conditions.  And the big one for me, especially with macro work, you loose some light when using the angle finder.  So if you are already working in a low-light situation, this only makes matters worse.But in well-lit conditions where fogging is not an issue and you want to shoot low, this is an amazing accessory, thus the 4 out of 5 stars</review_text>
Hi Canon lover,It is perfect and professional for users who love to capture excellent image. Do not wait longer buy as soon as you can and you will not lose anything.Keep it up and have a wonderful day with Canon products.Best wishes,Appreciation Canon Product</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.</review_text>
Just use this to protect the lens.  Good cheap alternative to a scratched lens</review_text>
I bought this filter for my 28-135 IS canon lens and so far it has worked out great.  Unlike some of the other tiffen filters I bought, this one fits just right on the lens.  All sides are even and it sits flush against the lens.  I haven't noticed any artifacts from pictures I've taken yet, but I haven't really had much of a chance to take many pictures with the lens.  The night shots I've take so far, I've been quite pleased with, however</review_text>
I'm very happy with the product and would recommend it to my friends.Your service is also excellent</review_text>
Recycle times fantastic.Batteries seem to last forever.Much less expensive than the alternatives</review_text>
Yes, it's overpriced, just like any specialty item. And yes, the screw attachment to the bottom of the camera is useless. But when you need fast recycle times or hundreds of flashes at a go, the CP-E3 is invaluable. You can strap the case to a light stand or flash bracket, and the coiled cord length is adequate for these uses. I use the elegantly compact Really Right Stuff flash bracket which has no place to attach the CP-E3, so the battery back without its case slips into my shirt or pants pocket. The case could also be strapped to your belt.The unit is a little weighty with 8 rechargeable AA batteries aboard, and I'd hate to see how many pieces this plastic gizmo would break into if I dropped it on a hard surface. On the top is a tunnel for a strap to hang it from something, and a strap should have been included. I made a loop from some hiking boot shoelaces (from which I also make zipper pulls) and I hang it from a knob on a light stand when shooting with a studio set-up.Without the short recycle times the CP-E3 allows, my 580EX flash would have gotten only one shot of my daughter bowing after playing her piece at a piano recital. Instead, I got three. Decide for yourself how important that kind of thing is</review_text>
Got this for my 580EX flashes for shooting weddings.  Works great and recycle times are excellent. It will last an entire event filled with 2500mAH batteries</review_text>
I'm using the CPE3 with my 20D and 580EZ.  I'm shooting over 500 wedding flash shots before I notice any slow down in the recyle time.  Recycle is about 3 seconds after a full discharge and hardley noticeable for anything less.  I am using "Digital" brand 2200 mAh NI-MH  batteries.  The Pack uses 8 batteries to recharge the flash capicitor while the 4 batteries in the flash are running the flash electronics.  I am very happy this combination.  By the way I'm using the Stroboframe Pro-RL flash bracket and it great.  The battery pack of the CPE3 straps right to the bracket</review_text>
I bought this because I needed top recycle speed from my 550EX flash unit without spending a huge bundle.  I shoot karate demos with my EOS Rebel digital, lots of fast action in a rather large space (meaning many full power flashes).  With the digital Rebel set to ISO800 mode and the flash set to +1 stop exposure I can adequately cover the action in a basketball court sized gymnasium.  Using this battery pack with 2000MaH AA sized batteries (about 6.50 for a set of 4 at walmart) I've taken over 400 pictures with no slow down in cycle speed.This particular pack uses 8 AA cells and is compatible with Lithium ion cells.  The older version of this unit used 6 cells I believe, and was not compatible with Lithium ion batteries.The unit is very simple.  A box with a light on it, a space for a strap (though none is included) a slide out battery tray with locking button and of course the connector with a coiled cord that hooks into the side of the flash unit.  I'm sure they do it for reasons of resistance, but the cord is kinda short, thus limiting you to where you can hang the battery package.  If your tripod socket is free they do include a screw designed to mount the battery package to the bottom of the camera (kinda useless if you ask me). The battery box comes with a fairly nice padded nylon case that includes a velcro strap, this is what I use to hang the battery package from a camera or bag strap and it works fine.  Eventually I'll get around to finding something I can use for a strap as that will worry me less (with 8 batteries in this thing it's a bit heavy to be trusted to velcro if you ask me).The unit works the way it's intended but I think the price is exhorbitant for a hunk of plastic, the price should be about half what it is.  If you can't go all-out and buy the top end with the rechargeable battery or a true professional (what they used to call 512) battery package then this is enough for most of us</review_text>
Can someone make sense of this for me please?  """The smaller the maximum aperture, the smaller and lighter the lens.""" WTF?Anyway... it's an affordable range for those of us in the real world to explore.  It gets 4 stars for price Vs usability for the Joe Soaps and the Jane Does like me out there</review_text>
So this is a great starter lens, it came with my canon body when I got my camera, and I've used it tons.  It is light, smooth, fast to focus, and cheap.  My only problem was the number of times I found myself stepping back because the 35mm end of the zoom wasn't wide enough.  I now carry a 22-55 instead and love that lens (come on Amazon - get it in stock).   If you're on a budget then this lens is great.  If you can afford the little extra go for the 28-80 instead</review_text>
I am not a professional photographer, but I wanted high quality lenses to go with my Canon 10D (which I may upgrade soon).  I researched for over a month before purchasing this lens, and I have not been disappointed.  I only wanted to carry around two lenses, so I purchased this one, and the Canon-EF 17-40mm f/4L USM Ultrawide Zoom Lens. I have found this combination works very well for me.  My uses include photographing landscapes, wildlife, sports events, and my family.  The speed and quietness of the autofocus is outstanding, and the zoom doesn't compromise the quality of the prints.  Even though the price is high, you really do get what you pay for in lenses.</review_text>
I love EF 70-200 f/4L USM Telephoto Zoom lens. The price is right, super quality of pictures in color and contrast. It is light weight about 1.5 pounds in comparing with its siblings, 70-200 f/2.8 with or without IS (about 3.5 pounds).I am think about to buy the new model 70-200 f/4L with IS. With IS, I can take pictures in lower light conditions, which I could not do it with my 70-200 f/4L.</review_text>
My first L lens.  Very sharp and solid build. With Canon DR and Amazon GC, you can get it in lower $400!!</review_text>
At first, I had a selection of third-party lenses. Nothing bad, just none that were spectacular. I was somewhat disappointed in the shots I got. Then I bought the 85/1.8 and saw the contrast and colors I was expecting. Since then, I've bought several Canon lenses and this one is my latest.Like the title says, WOW. My first shots were in the house and around it and at all apertures and zoom lengths, the shots are simply incredible. Just fantastic sharpness - no PS USM needed! The colors are real and vibrant and the contrast is sharp and clear.This (and my 24-105/4L) is what lenses SHOULD be. Well built, solid and great glass. Sure, you do pay more. And you could enhance your shots with PS. But to see the results from these lenses vs the cheaper alternatives, you'll see what you spent all that money for!I'm sold on Canon</review_text>
This is a great lens, amazingly sharp. Only thing I would say is if I had the money the 2.8 IS version would be even better and certainly something I'll consider as an upgrade in the future.Use a fast shutter speed or mono/tripod with this thing. Anything below 250/sec gets to be a problem at 200mm</review_text>
This is a great lens. I do not want to repeat all the good things other reviewers have written about this lens. It is not so heavy so I use tripod without using tripod collar (costs 119.99 in B & H). This is the best value I have ever got for a lens. Now I can't wait to get 17-40mm f4L too. You can get a very nice bokeh when wide open at f4 and f5.6, of course depending on the how far the background is from the subject.People complain how ugly the hood looks but that is subjective. I like it because it works great and you can attach it in a reversed position on the lens so that it will fit in your camera bag. I think the fit and finish of the lens is beautiful</review_text>
Like the Canon EF 17-40 f4L USM, this is it's sister and $100 cheaper to boot!Excellent images at f4!  Outstanding images at f9.  A lightweight combination with the Canon 5D.  An even lighter and more compact combination with the Canon Digital Rebel XT.The only gripe I have is having to purchase the optional and expensive tripod collar ring.  The ring does add a bit of noticeable weight.Since I am not a steady shooter, I will be upgrading to the Canon EF 70-200 f4L IS USM when it is available in November this year.  At least the tripod collar ring should fit on the newer weathersealed lens.</review_text>
I owned this lens for about a year before upgrading to the image stabilized f/2.8 version.  Overall I was very happy with the f/4 lens and miss having it available because of the significantly lower weight.  Sharpness is amazing and comparable for both lenses, and the f/4 can provide plenty of background blur.  If you are shooting mostly outdoors I would recommend the f/4.</review_text>
Like many people my decision on a telephoto zoom lens came down to buying the Canon 70-200mm f/4L or the Canon 70-300mm f/4-5.6 IS USM. The trade offs seemed clear at first. The former performs slightly better (see Canon website for MTF data), is better designed & built, is faster and has the "L" lens status. User comments and ratings (at more than one site) are slightly more favorable for the L lens. The 70-300mm has an improved IS and of course a longer focal length. Both cost about the same so money was not a factor in my decision.I eventually decided on the L lens and was initially disappointed. Photos ranged from wonderful to not very good at all. In fact, I almost returned the lens. Eventually I figured out the problem. My yard is heavily shaded so most of the initial photo's were taken in low light and I had selected shutter speeds that were too slow. To avoid camera shake you need to shoot at the reciprocal of the focal length or faster. Sounds simple but with the Digital Rebel XT (which I was using) you need to consider the camera's 1.6 multiplication factor. So at 200mm you need a shutter speed of 1/320 or faster not 1/200 like I initially thought. Once I made the speed adjustment things changed for the better.Still I have some mixed feelings about my decision. When the light is good this is a fantastic lens but with the IS feature offered on the 70-300mm I would probably get photos that I will miss with this lens.I can't fault the performance of this lens for its limitations and I have given it 5 stars. In other words it does what it is supposed to do very well but my message to other buyers is to consider where you are most likely to use the lens before buying. Remember IS becomes increasingly important as you extend the focal length. If your camera is already extending it by a factor of 1.6 you may find IS a very attractive feature.(Note the 70-300mm has a recall on certain model numbers because of problems when using the lens in a portrait position.) By the way, I purchased from Amazon and it was a flawless transaction</review_text>
What a difference, after using the "standart" ef-s 18-55 kit lens that came with my Rebel XT now with this lens I can finally see that this is a really excelent camera but only if you use it with an excellent lens like this 70-200 F4 L. Great sharpness, color, solidly buit, obviously heavy but for taking outdoors photos this one is among the best of the best</review_text>
This is the lens I use most often. It is unbeatable for portraits and low-light photos indoors etc. It is very sharp and relatively light and small. I have also found it useful for aerial photography. I used to have the 50 mm 1.8 but upgraded because I like the extra low-light power of the 1.4 (which I often use) and the one-touch USM manual focus with distance scale (which is just a nice-to-have). That said, the 1.8 is a great lens too</review_text>
What can you say, other than it's 4 times cheaper than the 50f1.2L.  Not an L, but a great bright fast quiet lens, small and optically superb.  On a crop camera it's a 80mm portrait lens.  Super</review_text>
After reading a number of on-line reviews, I bought this lens a few weeks ago straightly for its low-light photography capability.What I have gotten is a little more than I have bargained for.  The pictures it produces have made a casual hobbyist like myself look like a pro, at least in the admiring eyes of unsuspecting acquaintances.  Now only if I have the heart to mumble-jumble a few far-fetched jargons, I might have a new packing order firmly in place.  When paired with my Rebel XTi, the 80mm effective focal length and wide apertures make it an ideal portrait lens.  It is also compact, light-weigh and solidly built, has fast and acurate auto-focus, and most importantly, has superb optical qualities.  The best part is I have gotten these without breaking the bank nor does it break my neck hauling it around.However, despite its low-light capability, the very attributes that make this lens outstanding for portraits, i.e., narrow angle of view and shallow depth of field at wide apertures, make it an odd choice for in-door group photos.  Also if you are taking action shots, the 80mm focal length may not be long enough to provide a safe distance to avoid mishaps.  Instead of being a distal observer, I have found myself an unwilling participant in the middle of the action ducking the camera from the ever-curious tongues of my Golden Retriever and her playmates.  No wonder zoom lenses are so popular.What else is there not to like about this lens?  Not much unless you are a proud owner of one mammoth of an expensive L prime lens.  Well, it does come with a free hood and that wonderful soft leather pouch, doesn't it</review_text>
The lens is great!  I'm using it on my EOS 20D, and the shots are beautiful.  At the wide open setting (1.4), the depth of field is amazing and provides an absolutely outstanding boquet.  This lens is definitely worth the difference in price over the 1.8.  The boquet is much better. A little advice:  avoid using the auto focus on your camera when using this lens... its too easy to catch any little thing in front or behind what you are intending to focus on, and you WILL see a difference, with just a small difference in depth.  Manually, the lens will provide you with perfect shots every time!  And its well worth the extra few seconds to make sure the shot is composed correctly</review_text>
The latest 50 f/1.4 EF lens is the best performing chunk of glass that any photographer can buy for anywhere near the price. Granted, the 50 1.8 lens is awesome for it's dirt cheap price, but it is outclassed by the f/1.4 in all respects.Others have already raved about the virtues of this cheap (not really) lens, so I'll just agree with with the strong points, and lay out the broad picture on an open table.First, the 50 f/1.8 is usually a fine lens. It is dirt cheap, has better quality control than anything built by Sigma, and is super light weight. That being said, it does have issues with lens to lens quality, it is "only f/1.8", has a plastic lens mount, and is pretty slow in AF.The 50 f/1.4, on the other hand, can darn near allow you to see in the dark through the viewfinder, can focus in total darkness with the right shoe mount flash, records tack sharp images at most all apertures, has great contrast, is light in weight, small in size, has a metal lens mount, and is pretty cheap to buy.It is NOT an L lens in construction, yet it offers L lens optical quality. It does have a USM, but it is the "old style" USM, and is not as fast as the modern ring type USM lenses. Still, it is very fast, it beats the speed of the throw away f/1.8 lens to death, and is pretty darn quiet. Also, despite the majority plastic build, and lack of distance data for E-TTL II flashes (the f/1.8 also lacks this feature) the f/1.4 lens does offer a very responsive full time manual focus ring that works like a charm for manual focus, or just touch up in difficult auto focus situations.This lens is all that, and everyone should own it as their first lens. Zoom lenses included in body/lens kits are just plain junk (sorry), but this lens will stay in your camera kit for decades, no matter what camera body is in your future.People who are using 1.6 crop factor cameras like the 20D, 30D, and Rebel line should bear in mind that the 50 f/1.4 lens is effectively an 80 mm f/1.4 lens when mounted on their cameras. That makes the 50 f/1.4 an awesome portrait lens, and the aperture and diaphragm design of the f/1.4 make it unbeatable for capturing shallow depth of field shots with pleasingly blurred backgrounds.As fine a lens as the 50 mm f/1.8 really is, it cannot begin to compare to the 50 mm f/1.4 lens in terms of functionality. Buy this lens today, and it will be with you until the end, no matter what Canon body you use in the future. If you use a 1.6 crop factor camera today, this lens will become a favorite, and the best 80 mm portrait lens you have ever owned.As always, use it with the factory lens hood at all times (only about twenty five bucks), and use a UV filter that is multi coated on both surfaces at all times. Anyone who suggests that you use a cheap filter is steering you down the wrong path. No matter what lens you buy, always use a UV filter that is built at least as well as your lens. Cheap filters, and filters that are not multi coated on both surfaces are just plain garbage. The shame of it is that even Canon offers garbage filters for cheap, and many people who spend hundreds of Dollars on a lens claim that "If it's good enough for Canon, it's good enough for me". Nonsense. A cheap filter is just that. A good lens with a cheap filter might impress, but a good lens with a great filter WILL impress. Don't fall into the cheap trap</review_text>
When I worked as a photojournalist many years ago, 50mm was the "standard" lens in that it came closest to a real world perspective, especially for street photography. That is no longer always true because of the field-of-view crop of many cameras. Canon's popular digital Rebel and its successors, for example, have a 1.6X view that turns a 50mm lens into an 80mm lens. The 1D MARK II has a 1.3X view that makes it a 65mm lens.So, if you're looking for a standard lens today, 35mm probably is closer to the mark on those cameras. And Canon has a couple of options there - a 35 f/1.4 that is great and expensive and a 35 f/2 that is a good value at about $250.If you're still looking for a 50mm, however, there now are four options from Canon: 50/1.2, 50/1.4, 50/1.8 and 50/2.5. Here are the pros and cons of each:50/1.2 is the newest, fastest and the most expensive at about $1,600. It is an "L" lens, which means it is more durably constructed than any of the others. The image quality is a cut above all of the others, especially at wider apertures. If money is no object, you'll probably want this one. But most of the rest of us have to ask the question whether it's 5X better than the 1.4.50/1.4 is maligned by some for the softness of its images at f/1.4, but for me its a good, compact, low-light lens at a terrific price ($325). And the lens gets sharp quickly as you stop it down. It's sharp at f/2 and very sharp by f/2.8 with good contrast and colors.50/1.8 is a step down from the 1.4 in speed, image quality, build quality and the smoothness and noise of its autofocus. But it is a big step up in value - a decent lens for about $80. If you're just getting into digital photography, this is a great lens to learn on until you get a better feel for the lenses that you want/need.50/2.5 - this is a macro lens, although you can use it for general photography, too. I wouldn't recommend it. If you're doing macro photography, spend a little more for the 100/2.8, which is a sharper lens that gives you more subject distance. If you're looking for a standard lens, you'll appreciate the wider aperture of the 1.4.All that said, of the 50mm Canon lenses, I think the 50/1.4 still offers the best mix of image quality and value.</review_text>
This is an awesome lense, especially for the money. I would still purchase this one. There is nothing second rate about it.   However,   Canon has a new L series version on their website as does B & H photo.  It is a 50 mm NORMAL  EF  f/1.2 L USM   for   1599. 00. I heard of photographers who shoot whole weddings with this one 3 hundred dollar lens 50mm lens.</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This works just as described. As long as flash i-red beams see eachother it works fine... But radio controlled flash is much better</review_text>
I have a 580ex and it works great. I was hopeing that it would work for a studio light but nope so dont try it.  The only thing you have to be mindful of is the distince that the flash is from the subject</review_text>
My take on this lens is that it is an "L" quality optic in a fine, non "L" package. There is nothing else on the market to compete with it (nothing at all), and it produces supurb images. It isn't an f/2.8 lens, but it is close enough for most uses. The competition from Tamron is a full stop slower, not as sharp, and is awful in dim light compared to the Canon 10-22 lens (sorry, Tamron fans, but the Tamron lens isn't even playing in the same ballpark).I use this lens on a 30D body, and I always keep it on hand if I'm doing any indoor, or tight group photography. It is the perfect solution to the perennial problem of not having enough room to capture all the kids at a birthday party in one shot because your back is up against a wall. This lens will just about get your toes into the picture at the widest setting, yet delivers tack sharp, colorful, and contrasty images. The auto focus is spot on, silent, and fast. It is a must have lens for the active amateur, or any pro using a 1.6 crop factor camera. You simply can't beat this lens with anything available on the market today.That beng said, do not try to convince yourself that this will make a good "walkaround" lens. It isn't. Even at max length, it is far too short to live on your camera as a standard lens. You need this lens, even if you don't know it yet, but it should not be your first lens, as it will only be used 15 to 20 percent of the time. At those times, it's performance simply cannot be equaled by any other zoom lens on a 1.6 crop factor camera. You will be amazed by the quality of this lens. It rivals the performance of modern prime lenses, presents a bright viewfinder image, and delivers the goods in tight situations.This is not a casual assessment, nor a Canon "feel good" moment on my part. I developed my first B&W contact prints in 1964, in my own darkroom at the age of 9 (my parents were concerned:)), and have been an avid photographer ever since. Small, medium, and large format cameras and lenses have passed through my hands over the years, and Canon has become my favorite small format brand. Still, Canon builds some trash lenses that should be avoided. The 10-22 USM is not one of them :).Before you go out and buy this lens, you should already own the EF-S 17-55mm IS f/2.8 lens. That is the king of 1.6 crop factor standard lenses, and includes the awesome Canon IS feature. It will end up being mounted on your camera 80% of the time, and keep you smiling after every shoot. Get that lens first. Then, get the 10-22mm lens. Then, let your imagination run wild, and plan on serious telephoto lenses for the future. Trust me or not, the two lenses mentioned above will provide you with photographic tools that will astound you. Get them in your kit as soon as you can afford them.A little warning about either lens.... Some here will argue the point, but with either lens, get a GOOD quality UV filter that is multi-coated on both sides, and built extra thin to avoid vignetting at wide lens settings. A good filter will cost a little less than one hundred Dollars, and can cost up to one hundred forty Dollars. The minimum brand would be Hoya Pro 1 multi coated filters, and the ante goes up from there.Everything else is garbage, including the Canon "sharp cut" filter that costs less than fifty bucks. No kidding, no conjecture. If you use cheap filters, you will never see what your lens can really do. Ever. No doubt that many will respond with claims that their twenty Dollar filter works just fine, but they simply don't know any better, and have never used their expensive equipment to it's full potential. It's akin to a Chevy owner passing judgement on a Mercedes Benz. The Chevy might feel real good, but until you own the Mercedes, you just have no clue.Bottom line.... Make sure that the quality of your filters exceed the quality of your lenses. Yes, at a hundred bucks a pop for a 77mm filter, it hurts, but you will never regret it. Also, Amazon does not stock lens hoods for all non L Canon lenses. The price is stupid high for those hoods, but they make a night and day difference in in picture quality. Whenever you order a non L Canon lens, find a web seller who has the hood in stock, and get it right now. Again, you will never regret owning it.That's it for my review/rant. Buy this lens. Buy the 17-55 IS f/2,8 first. Buy the lens hoods for both. Toss any "kit" lenses that came with the camera in the trash bin (where they belong), and be very happy.</review_text>
I had a chance to compare it with a Tokina glass. Canon is better on a contrast and better on a distortion, same or even slightly worse on a sharpness, and complete looser on a build quality.If you are ok with 12mm - get Tokina</review_text>
Technical details on this lens can be found in abundance elsewhere, so I'll leave that to the experts and simply say: This is my favorite lens. I love this lens SO much. I have half a dozen other medium to high-end lenses, and this is the one I keep on the camera 90% of the time</review_text>
Up Front: If you're considering this lens, stop considering  - and buy it. I had occasion to try the Tamaron Zoom in this range and noticed plastic-y digital qualities in some of the Tamaron's highlighted-texture areas. None of that is a problem with this Canon beauty. I am using it as my normal lens. The contrast is razor-sharp enough to shave with. It's graphic in monochrome and colors are pure and leap off the monitor like a politician attracted by a TV camera. It's also light weight and plenty fast enough with practically no spherical Abs....Tiny problems include an understandable perspective bulging on subjects about the edges. And there is some blue fringing on very high contrast edges. Photoshop nails the latter dead'er than Britney Spears' career. I've had a need for reasonably large blow-ups, with most captures cropped, yet still enlarged up to prints that are minimally 13X20. At that size not only does this lens reproduce a subject's pores, but you can peer down and see the stuff inside the craters.</review_text>
The Canon EF-S 10-22mm f/3.5-4.5 USM SLR Lens for Canon EF-S SLRs (like the 20D and 30D) is a good all round lens though it can be soft at 10mm. It only works with EF-S compatable cameras which presently have 1.6x multipliers so the lens is effectively a 16mm to 35mm. If you need to shoot in cramped spaces, or you shoot lots of interiors and you need a wide angle, and have an EF-S SLR this lens is required equipment</review_text>
A exceptional portrait lens for both digital and film, the Nikkor 85mm f/1.8D is usably sharp wide open and tack sharp by the time you stop down even just a bit. Relatively small and very light, it feels just right in my hand. Steve McCurry is one of my favorite photographers and I was happy to discover that many of his great shots were taken with this lens.Also, if you shoot on a manual focus body like the F3, you'll like the solid but smooth feel of the focus ring.The 85mm comes with a metal, screw-on hood. My preference is the plastic bayonet mounts, but I find that I don't need the hood that often since this lens doesn't tend to flare.Two minor complaints about this lens: first, the bokeh is not exceptional. That's OK; I'm not a bokeh hound. But when I see the creamy out of focus specular highlights that the 85mm f/1.4 produces, sometimes I dream about spending the extra money.Second, I wish it were AF-S. But even without AF-S, it focuses faster than you'd expect.Finally, the construction is solid. I've used it heavily for two years in deserts, jungles, and glaciers (ok, and in less glamorous places like around the apartment) and it still looks brand new.In short, my favorite lens. Absolutely worth every penny</review_text>
I bought this lens when I purchased my Nikon D70s in February.  I have to admit I have not used it too much.  However, when I have used it, I am pleased with the results.  Mostly, as I have been walking around town practicing taking photos, I have little use for the 85mm, because it's not good for "point-and-shoot" scenes.When I have taken portrait shots, however, the 85mm is very clear and creates great depth of field, which I find important.I hope this was helpful</review_text>
I have a D200 and while all the hype is around the 18-200 and others, this is one awesome lens for portraits and other closer up type photos.  I read a few things that I had to research and thought I'd pass on my experience:- How is this with a D200?  (ans: great.  fast auto-focus.  no compatibility issues)- Do you really get crisp photos and cool bokeh? (ans: absolutely)- Is 1.8 ok or do you need 1.4?  (ans: I don't have a 1.4 but the 1.8 is so competent for the price and I get the crispness and shallow DOF I was looking for)- Is the shooting distance for an 85mm acceptable or do you need a 55mm so you can be closer to the subject?  (ans: I really like the shooting distance for the 85mm.  I really would not less distance between me and the subject)Enjoy</review_text>
It's very sharp lens.  You will be wised to use it extensively on little children, they have such clear faces.  Be careful when you use this lens with middle age women.  It could show imperfecton in thousand fold.  Again very sharp, very fast Af focusing on my Nikon F80.  Ecxelent portrature lens, but be careful-women will hate you for unflattering portrature.  My advise use black and white film-you will see less imperfection in prints with the same rasor sharp focus</review_text>
This is the same charger came with my digital rebel, however, I like to charge two batteries at a time. So, I bought a second charger and place them side by side on the power strip.The prongs for the outlet fold over and into the back of the charger making the charger very compact, flat and easy to take along with you. It's nice having a charger without long cords to fuss with.</review_text>
The battery charger is original equipment.  I have used it for Canon Batteries and two different no name batteries rated as NB2L.  All charged properly and were useable in my Canon ZR500.  The charger is small and easy to travel with making it unnecessary to cary large quantities of batteries</review_text>
Could not be any simpler to use.  Have used it a few times since it arrived and it works flawlessly.  +++  Recommended for all users.  Quicker and easier than the built in charger in the ZR700 camcorder</review_text>
I have been using this lens for about 2.5 years and it is an exceptional piece of equipment, especially for the price!I very rarely feel the need to get a closer image than I can achieve with this lens.It's very solidly built and I am sure it will continue to be a primary piece in my kit for years to come</review_text>
I am THRILLED with this lens's capabilities and the pictures it does.  I test shot a corner of a window to determine if it would be good for my insect shots that I like so well.Well, it did great as it came but I found that I wanted to have the 1/1 capability so I bought the add-on converter and am thrilled to have added both of these necessary items for my set-up.  I like nature photography the best and like to use my off summer days for hiking and finding photographs to take in perhaps well-known places but finding unique angles and subjects is what I like to specialize in.  This lens will greatly enhance your experience in that 'little world' we commonly trod over or weed-ate away.  I built a diffuser using a ping-pong ball over the flash so the lighting would work better.  (Works great, btw).As usual, it's great Canon glass that does the trick</review_text>
I purchased this lens to take photographs of vintage wristwatches.  I use an original Canon Digital Rebel and the shots are really very detailed.  It is easy to use in fact, I can hand hold the camera and capture the details in the hand-made craftsmanship of the watches.  Its F2.5 opening is a welcome change when you are use to shooting with a zoom lens and it is quite sharp edge to edge.  If you own a Canon digital SLR and want to pocket some extra coin then this is the lens for you.</review_text>
I really like this lens but my results are not consistent. I think though this is more of a function of my limited skill of photography. The focal range seems very narrow but when you hit it the results are outstanding. I occasionally get images that are out of focus but again I think this is my fault. I bought this for macro work but I use it as a prime lens most of the time</review_text>
First I do not have this lens yet but I am buying it. It is reportedly an excellent lens with very little distortion along the edges (which is why I'm buying it). I will update this review after I have the lens, however, I feel that people should be warned about a big error in another well received review because it will only lead to frustration.Do not listen to John Kwok's suggestion to buy the Canon 60mm macro lens UNLESS you you own the 20d, 300d, or 350d/Rebel XT. The lens is an EF-S lens and as of September, 2005 it will ONLY fit those cameras - it has NOT been optimized for all Canon DSLR's as he states. On the other hand, the 50mm macro here will fit all Canon 35mm film cameras and all digital SLR's.</review_text>
The Canon EF 50mm f2.5 macro lens is yet another example of Canon doing a fine job catching up with the likes of Nikon, Zeiss and Leica with respect to optical design; optically it may be the best 50mm macro lens currently available for 35mm SLR film photography. I am impressed that a lens as cheap as this counts at least one aspheric lens element and an apochromatic lens design; unfortunately it is not nearly as durable a lens as the celebrated L series lens line or the Canon EF 100mm macro lens. Unless you are constantly working out in the field taking close-up photography, then the durability of this lens's lens mount and barrel should not be an issue. More importantly for the user is the quality of its images, and having read some test reports on this lens, I have no doubt that it is a capable performer. Those interested in digital macro photography may choose to look instead at the new 60mm macro lens, which is optimized for use with Canon digital SLR cameras</review_text>
I never thought a $250 lens could be so good. I have been trying to buy lenses that are light-weight for my 20D, due to a neck injury problem, and this 50mm fits the bill.Great in low light, and agree also, the bokeh is sweet. I do alot of bee chasing and manage some great macros with bees in flight with this one. All hand held. Can also take great indoor shots without flash, with a steady hand.I chose it also because it was one of the least expensive high rated canon 50mm's.It goes well with another inexpensive canon lens, the 55-200mm ef f4.5-5.6 II, which also does well outdoors, including macro.I am very pleased with both, and wouldn't part with them</review_text>
I love this camera.  It's my second Canon and, at 7MP, the best value for the money I've seen.  I took it to France this summer and loved the fact that I could recharge the battery overnight while my friends were constantly changing their batteries (and searching for places to buy them!).  My favorite option is the "Scene" button.  I don't think I'll ever try the "underwater" option, but the "night shot" and "inside shot" work fantastically.  It also seems as though you can take movies until the card or battery fail - which is a huge improvement over my older Canon. Unlike a lot of newer cameras, this one has a viewfinder. A friend of mine has a Nikon that has no viewfinder and it was extremely hard to use in bright sunshine.  I carried my camera in my purse without a case a few days ago in New Orleans without a problem - it worked like a charm.  I would recommend this camera to anyone who wants an easy-to-use model that produces fabulous results.</review_text>
I'm by no means an expert!  This is the first digital I have owned.  It took me a long time because I was so used to my film camera.  But I searched long and hard to find what I thought I wanted.  And so far I am not disappointed.  At first the size threw me because everyone else had a bigger camera and I felt it would be hard to handle to take good pics.  But that's not the case.  I like the feel, the size...I like to be able to throw it in my purse...It takes great pictures to use for my e-bay, and sending to family and friends.  I haven't had any pictures printed from it yet, so I don't know how exactly they will come out, but I'm thinking they should be okay since my online pics have been great.  I haven't had a single blurry pic, both regular and close up. The video works well...it has lots of little options I don't use..like sounds for each function, but I can change those if I want. Overall I have no complaints</review_text>
I bought this camera in February, and it really did a great job in so many different situations.Unfortunately, I lost it this past September and have been kicking myself ever since.  I will be purchasing the exact same camera again.Excellent features include:easy to usesmallgood quality (as long as they aren't EXTREMELY close) picturesI like the software that came with the cameragood accessories, esp. the camera caseclear LCD screengreat options for picture takingGood features include:fast shutter speed, although not quite fast enough.  I'd like to take more pictures at a faster repetition but cannot with this cameraI recommended this camera to my best friend who is a lighting designer for retail spaces (Dolce & Gabbana, for instance) and he gives it an excellent  review as well, so I know it is good in all types of light and for professional purposes</review_text>
I LOVE THIS CAMERA!  I bought it to keep in my diaper bag so I always have a camera with me.  It's small, easy to use and takes great pictures. I recently sent a few in to have them developed and they came out great.  The only recommendation I have is to purchase a larger memory card - the one it comes with only hold a few pictures</review_text>
It is working well, and it is sturdy. I dropped on the ground when playing frisby, but nothing happened</review_text>
hi i am surendranadha reddyi purchaged a CANON SD500 7.1MP . It is verygood digital camara.previously i used pantex that is also good, but in this photos are very natural and realistic.One more the Amazon price also good.Thank yousurendr</review_text>
I like the picture quality and features of this camera at this price point so much, its the third one I've purchased. My family seems to be hard on cameras such that this model only seems to last for about a year or so. At that point its been banged around in my wifes purse or accidentally dropped by the kids that the telescoping mechanism for the lens stops working. In doing web research it seems to be a common problem. So if you're typically more gentle than me and my family seem to be, this is a great and easy picture taker</review_text>
I bought this camera for $249 new which marked down from the $499 retail. This was an older model as the new models had just come out.For the money this is a good camera, but I am very particular and was not blown away. The images are good, but I was expecting more vibrance. Colors are a bit weak. It will not take a focused shot indoors unless the flash is on, and the flash is way to bright for closer shots. The image is often over exposed, and I find myself placing a piece of paper over the flash to get more of a correct shot. I upgraded from a Canon A40 2 megapixel camera (AMAZING CAMERA!), and the images are very similar in quality, except the new SD500 captures them bigger, having the 7 megapixel chip, hence a little better detail.I do like the small size, and the battery lasts a long time between charges. Holds lots of pictures with the 1 gig card I purchased seperatly. The video quality is quite good for a still camera.</review_text>
I have used this charger & battery package for a while now in my digital SLR, battery performance is excellent! The downside is that the charger has issues: The top bay charges faster than the bottom bay and the batteries get VERY hot when charging, it has not seemed to affect the batteries in the year I have had them. If you are looking for exceptional batteries buy these, and the charger is okay, just beware that it does not charge all NiMH batteries but does do most</review_text>
First Amazon thanks for the great service in delivering our item.   It works fantastic.  We are very satisfied with it.</review_text>
I do not have take more than one bags. This bag is big enough for everything.</review_text>
Good quality and very configurable. Fits body plus 2-3 lenses easily. Even fits my camera with a telephoto lens attached and a second backup lens</review_text>
My kit includes a Canon D60 DSLR, Tamron 28-75mm f/2.8, Canon EF 100mm f/2.8 macro USM, Sigma 100-300mm f/4, 420 EX Speedlite flash, 4 assorted filters, AAA batteries, 2 extra batteries for the D60 & tripod collar.First few times I tried to fit everything in, my Sigma 100-300 did not find space.  I was about to return this bag, but tonight, decided to give it another try (10th attempt).And surprise, surprise... the best configuration just came to me all of a sudden.  With the Sigma lens on the bottom, stretched out to occupy the width of the bag, the 100mm and the flash fits perfectly on the remaining part of the bag's bottom.  Then, a divider on top, to prevent scratching, place the D60 and the Tamron lens attached on top, and the height of the bag makes it easily possible to fit everything in, and close the hood, without stretching the bag at all.  My 4 filters (jn their think cases go into the front pouch.  The generous side-pockets fit my tripod collar for the 100-300, 2 spare batteries, a new and a box of 12 AAA batteries .... this means my entire kit fits perfectly, without the bag being stretched uncomfortably.I'm glad I gave it this one try</review_text>
I don't have that much stuff, but fits all my DSLR gadgets plus my camcorder.Fits- my Canon Xti with my canon 50 mm attached.- my kit lens- my new canon 70-300 IS- my panasonic video cam- minor accessories (extra batteries, cables, memory cards, etc)There are separators with velcros inside, so you can configure the bag however you want it.The only issue I have with this bag is that I wan't able to configure it to store my Xti with my 70-300 attached</review_text>
I bought this bag to use with my Canon Elura 100 Camcorder.  Camcorder's these days are as small as camera, but I knew I'd need a lot of room for accessories and this bag fit the bill.  I have in this bag right now: Camcorder, 5 MiniDV Tapes, Extra Battery, Head Cleaner, Extra Wide Angle Lens, External Mic, L-Bracket for mounting Mic, Lens Cleaning Kit, Remote Control, All Wires, Lens Filters.  And I still have room for quite a bit more!What I love about this bag is that it's really a BIG bag that doesn't at all feel like a BIG bag - and that's a great thing to me!  The inside is super configurable which is great 'cause you can set it up the way that is best for the accessories you have so that everything fits, but doesn't move around.This same bag cost almost double at Best Buy and other retail stores so it's a steal here at Amazon!  I LOVE it</review_text>
This bag is great for your SLR digtial camera. It has space for your extra lens. Everything that came with you SLR camera fits in this bag. this bag is a great buy and its not that expensive</review_text>
This camera bag is just as I expected.  What was written as a description fits it perfectly.  Nice bag!  Great response time in delivery.  Thanks</review_text>
I have had this bag now for over 9 months and can honestly say it has more then surpassed my expectations. It stores everything I need when out with family or friends to catch all the action in one convenient place.In the center of the bag I have the following:1. Rebel XT body2. Canon 430EX Flash3. 17mm-85mm Lens4. 75mm-300mm Lens5. Sony Handycam Video Recorder6. Power plug for charging Video RecorderOn the sides I store the Battery Chargers and Batteries for Flash, Camera and Video Camera, plus Tapes for the Video Camera. The front holds all the manuals for everything and a few extra Memory Cards and lens covers. Even after this, there is still space in the bag for other things. The bag has held up very well and can see no signs of wear or tear after dragging this bag all over the place for the last 9 months.</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall. Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile.</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer.  Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare.  Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality.  A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light.  The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one.  This hood being a solid petal shaped one and three quarters inch long offers limited protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element.  When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects.  Being so shallow and petal shaped, even this type of protection is limited.  Even if the protection is limited, replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 24-105mm f/4.0L EF and normally comes included with the lens when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position.  This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch.  An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge.  This lens isn't unusually wide so the extra inch may not be a problem.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityReduces lens flare problemsOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the lensHigh price for a molded piece of plasti</review_text>
This is a good Teleconverter that added 1.5x to the camera's native zoom. It adds a great degree of stability to the camera for taking those critical shots. Of course when the digital zoom is used it is very sensitive to shake and movement. Overall a good addition especially for the birds and nature shots</review_text>
I enjoy that I can get a closer shot now. Its quality is good. I am happy with the purchas</review_text>
Jim K. made a great review.....I just wanted to let you know that I agree. This is great. It is very light weight. The only reason why I gave it 4 stars is that you need to zoom a bit or else you get a burnout effect (a circle where the corners are dark because it is getting the inside of the lens). That is annoying, and forces you to remove the extender when you want to take closer photos. At a distance though, it is great. Pictures come out great. I highly recommend this.....I would have given it 4.5 stars if it were an option</review_text>
Question: The Canon S2 has only 1 color - silver.  I believe this telephoto converter came in only black, doesn't it look silly to have a silver camera with a long black nose?I was going to get this adaptor but I am holding back because of it's color.   Instead, I am looking to find a adaptor and converter kit that comes in silver instead of black.Although I don't have this converter.  Assuming that I am satisfied with its quality and featuers, I would only give it only 4.5 stars because of it's color.Anyone has any ideas</review_text>
I was surprised at the heft of this tele converter when it arrived. It comes in a pullstring pouch that offers reasonable protection in a camera bag, purse, or other similar carying case and will hold the lens while attached to the required adapter. It also comes with a lens cap for each end. The converter has a high quality look and feel throughout, and as with the lens hood included in the inexpensive adapter kit (required), the mounting threads are cut accurately enough that the lettering on the lens and hood all line up perfectly at the top of the assembly. It looks as I would expect from Canon, which is to say, instrument quality.OK, looks don't make good pictures, so here is the rest of the story. The body is made of tough, lightweight materials (FRP?, polycarbonate?), so what you feel when you take the lens out of the case is the weight of several glass elements. The glass coating is well done, as pictures are nice and contrasty. Flare and distortion are minimal, and on par with a quality SLR offering. The base lens on the S2 is fairly fast, and doesn't suffer from defects at maximum telephoto, so this converter was built to complement that quality, and it does a fine job. As a matter of fact, the converter lens is optimized to supplement only the telephoto portion  of the main camera lens range, At less than moderate telephoto settings, you end up with a view of the back end of the converter lens, and not much else.Used as intended, it gives you the ability to use your 5 mp sensor to take spectacular 650 mm telephoto shots with incredible sharpness, color, and detail. There is no comparison to digital zoom at all. This lens alows you to "reach out and touch someone"  while using every pixel your sensor has available, and without adding eyeball noticable distortion at all. On top of that, the image stabilizer in the camera lets you shoot 650 mm telephoto pictures handheld in reasonable lighting conditions. Check out the price of a 600 mm image stabilized lens for an SLR and get back to me after you recover. Sure, having a $5,000 SLR body/lens combo will win the comparison at a lab bench, and might be a stop faster (only on the high end though), but the S2/teleconverter combo lets you take far better and more creative pics than the classic 35 mm with a mirror tele lens can ever offer. Further cropping the photos on your computer later will simply amaze you. For the price, it's a must have item. It also catches the action on the field in movie mode from the nosebleed seats at the stadium.It is a big lens, and will make your S2 look as though it must be an SLR, but the combination of S2 and teleconverter is light enough (compared to an SLR) to carry all day long in a desert without a problem. It offers the digicam prosumer quality glass reach that used to be reserved for higher end SLR's. For what it adds to your photographic range, it's cheap, too.One suggestion. The lens adapter/lens hood combo you need to mount any of the three converter lenses Canon offers is dirt cheap. The combo sells for around 26 bucks everywhere. The adapter attaches to the camera with a push button release bayonet mount, is quick to change, and feels very secure. The adapter also takes 58 mm filters of all kinds, and I like to keep a UV filter mounted on my camera for the improvement in contrast it offers, and to protect the camera lens from damage (I dropped my S2 this past weekend, and the Hoya UV filter took the fall. It dented, but didn't break). Anyway, because they are so cheap, I suggest getting one for the S2, and each converter lens you buy. That way, you can switch lenses in an instant, and keep the front of each lens protected with it's own UV filter and/or hood. Oh yes. A good circular polorizer filter really kills glare, and brings out contrast with any lens under many typical shooting conditions. The tele-converter lens does not have front threads to mount filters (most don't), but I made an adapter by mounting a 72 mm UV filter to a 7/16" long cardboard masking tape core with an inside diamerter that slipped snugly over the end of the tele-converter. Prior to gluing the UV filter to the tube section, I painted the tube flat black. Now, the circular polorizer (or any other 72 mm filter attaches to the adapter, looks like it belongs there, and works perfectly.I think you will enjoy this converter as much as I do. Good shooting.</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall. Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile.</review_text>
This hood does a more than adequate job at controlling flare on the EF 100mm f/2. Additionally, the hood can provide protection to those who 1) do not adorne their lenses with UV/SKY filters, or 2) do so adorne them! The lens is already a capable performer; it is moreso with the hood. The price is a bit steep, but that does not effect its performance. Thus, my rating stands</review_text>
It's easy to attach -- and detach -- and works well with most (but not all) of my 58mm lens. It does cut down on glare, and let's face it, the hood makes your lens look a bit more dynamic, while also protecting it from the elements</review_text>
I bought this hood for Canon's 85mmf1.8 lens, one incredible lens.Years ago I went to a lecture by Ernst Wilde, MR. Hasseblad himself, where he showed the difference that a lens hood would make on a Hasseblad lens.  Since then I have always used them faithfully on every lens I own.  The longer the lens, the more efective the lens hood can be if it is specifically designed for that lens.  This is the hood Canon has for their medium telephoto lenses, the 85f1.8, 100usm macro, and 135mmf2.8 lenses.  The hood will protect your lens from dust, scratches, damage, while at the same time preserving the maximum contrast your lens can deliver.  This differs from a filter, that will take away from the inherit lens sharpness and contrast.  A analogy is wearing a baseball cap which will improve your vision and protect your eyes from cataracts, while not distorting your vision like sunglasses will</review_text>
The Kodak PH160 Media Cartridge Kit is the best bargain around! You get 4 cartridges plus paper in each pack. I have used more paper than ink! Thank you Kodak for such a money saving kit</review_text>
Very convenient.  Easy to use.  Paper and cartridge matched up for quantities is a smart idea.  Sometimes the printer jams but easy to clear.I find the colors a bit dark and skin tones not balanced to be the most attractive.  If they can work on these items this would be a fantastic device and I would probably keep several for office, home, garage, travel...and use a lot of media cartridges too.I am one of those that takes 800-1000 pictures on a two week vacation so I really would use the heck out of these cartridges if the image quality were better.  I usually make 3 or 4 copies of each print to mail to friends that are in the pictures</review_text>
I find these PH160 packages of toner cartridges and photo paper to be the best deal for me.  I take a LOT of pictures and print them off to send as postcards to friends all over the USA.  This way I have plenty of the photo paper on hand and a good supply of the toner cartridges and don't have to constantly run to the store to buy a single toner cartridge and package of photo paper.  I do wish however that you could just buy the toner cartridges without the photo paper as I always have more paper than what I can use with the number of toner cartridges</review_text>
This product works really well, and the price was great.  I am always pleased with the quality of Kodak</review_text>
We love this product.Took me minutes to hook up. So easy to use. I understand total cost of printing is few Cents more than what you can get in Costco.But.its the ease of use AT HOME!Specially if U have guests at home....and you wanna give instant photos...hmm....Cosco/Walmart....going on a Christmas day.....I dont think so!!!!My guests love it....when we give them photos....right after the party!Everybody gets a kick out of it!Amazon.....GOOG SERVICE!ON TIME!!!N</review_text>
I can't believe how advanced things have become.  The quality of the pictures that are printed on the Kodak Easy share media cartridge.</review_text>
Kodak has made printing pictues as simple as 123.  The paper cartridge snaps in place quite easily.  It can be removed quickly and stored out of the way because the paper is protected in its own tray with convenient lid.  This is high quality paper and has a protective coating that is applied to the photo to give it many years of durability.  I thought the price was competative with other methods of printing with photo paper</review_text>
Purchased a printer dock and camera bundle, from a local office supply store for $100. It only came with a 10 picture sample cartridge, so I purchsed this from amazon. Amazon had the best price around on this item and free shipping. It works great. No complaints. The paper is not quite as shiny and or as thick as the epson photo glossy paper that I still use for some pictures, but works well for my classroom, to give to my students. The pictures do not run like some inkjet pictures do if you accidentally drip water on them</review_text>
I love this product, because I love the camera and the printing dock.  I have been using them for 2 years.  My daughter-in -law and son got theirs a little earlier because of the arrival of their first child.  I saw it and had to have one of these marvelous things that I could do by myself at home.  I think she discovered your site and that you sold the product.  We have both purchased from you a few times. Thanks for the reasonable film prices that have allowed me to take more pictures and copy for my friends and relatives</review_text>
Now, this isn't the fastest card on the market.  But it is a solid, reliable card.  The camera itself is the bottle kneck, and typically not this card.  However, if you are using a Canon DSLR of a recent flavor, I would check if it needs to be RMA'd.  A known quantity of these cards have proven to lose images.  scary.  However, I've not experienced the mysterious loss of images with my card or Rebel XT.  I've only ever pushed the cards speed limits with my PD70X, and definately not with my Rebel XT</review_text>
I also have the SB-600 and this product, the SB-800, is much better - and worth the extra $100. It is much easier to use since it has a simple menu structure and not the wierd button combo selections of the SB-600. The flash output is better, the recycle time is better and you can use the flash as a commander for other wireless flashes. Also the extra battery holder for a fifth battery reduces recycle time further and never comes off my unit. The diffusion head is also included so you don't have to buy a separate one from Stofen... works great</review_text>
I purchased this Speedlight for my D70s. It is easy to take out of the box and fire up. But it's capable of a lot more than your standard portraiture and vacation shots.I have been using this unit for in-store photography and it's worked wonders. The included filters help balance out the horrific fluorescent lighting found in most stores. While it's highly intuitive, I can also control it's output.This is an essential part of any Nikon package</review_text>
I would not be able to imagine shooting without the SB-800, it's just so integral to my photography. My only gripe is the TTL preflashes which can cause some people to blink of half-blink by the time the main flash goes off. But you can easily get around this by using FV lock.Fill flash is perhaps the most excellent function of the SB-800. I usually stop it down about by -1.3EV to -1.7EV to get imperceptable results</review_text>
Nikon designed this unit to exploit the possibilities of their latest digital SLRs while still being compatble with their oldest F-series cameras.  The SB-800 is more expensive than the SB-600, but it gives you more control and more light.  You may find more light to be critical if you want to use bounce flash to soften shadows.I would have given the SB-800 five stars if the user manual had been a little better.  Nikon obviously tried very hard to provide good documentation, and to make the user interface as intuitive as possible.  But, a unit with so many features and modes inevitably will require effort to learn, and will present cases where you are working against the built in automation.  Expect to make a large number of experimental shots if you really want to learn how to use this unit.My chief plea to Nikon would be for a more straight forward explanation that cameras like the D50 DO NOT HAVE TTL FLASH.  The so called i-TTL uses pre flashes and computation to set up a calculated flash rather than a real time measurement during the exposure to quench the flash.  One would normally expect the same result, but not if a slave flash is used.One of the beauties of the SB-800, however, is that it can be used as a slave unit using its own sensor to determine when the master unit is firing, even if (as in the case of a D50 using its built in flash) the camera and the SB-800 are not communicating i-TTL info via IR pulses</review_text>
Here is my point. When you buy a digital SLR, most likely in a couple years there will a newer model available with some better features for the same price. But lenses as well as flashes a not changing that fast and keep value much longer. So from a purely financial prospective, it's always better to invest more in the long lasting lenses and flashes and less in the DSLR body.Another point. Most people don't need all advanced feature of the modern flashes and can probably easily survive without them. But also almost everyone sooner or later finds him/herself in a situation, when the place is just too dark and too big. So it's more likely you'll need just more raw power then any of the advanced features.So the bottom line, since a general purpose flash is usually a long term investment, if you have a choice, try to get the most powerful one</review_text>
Bought it together with the D50, 6 month ago.Simply the best choice for digital Nikon SLR, superior compared to the high-end flashes for the analog Nikon cameras.Within a range of up to 60feet this flash will brighten very smooth, no red eyes, the press will focus perfectly.But you need the 5th battery, and you better spent the money for high-end batteries, don't use "consumer-type" rechargeable ones. They will last for a very short time only, not enough to fill a 1GB card!</review_text>
For those of you who have the D200 and are wondering if you need this flash consider this.That with the D200's  built in flash acting as commander you can use the SB800 off camera. Just set it up on it's included stand and coordinate the flash and the camera conrols and you now have the ability to capture portraits that look professional.  Set it up behind your subject, off to the side, angle bounce for anywhere.I am sure you get the idea.Just one more reason why the Nikon is a great value. Think about what it would cost you to have similiar capability with your Canon.This flash may seem high priced but it is the most sophisticated unit on the market in my opinion.Good luck!</review_text>
I do have to say, being a semi-pro photographer, this one item has made a vast difference in many of my shots.  It has allowed me to get studio like shots (to an extent) without having to use those giant studio flashes that cost thousands of dollars.  I was able to just set up a few hot lights and use the SB-800 off camera thanks to that amazingly wonderfull wireless feature and got great quality shots for what I needed to do.  Also, being a concert photographer, in low light areas this works great especially since most tour managers don't take to highly of Flash use, it allows me to be farther back and get a great shot since I know have a little more fill light to work with.  The SB-800 I do have to say is by far one of the few products that you won't regret paying a high price for. I had originally thought of getting the 600 and decided to go all out and get the 800 after reading all the featuers it has that the SB-600 doesnt.  This product, coupled with my D70 and DR-6 right angle viewfinder (another great investment you should all look into) give me so many great shots, I do have to say the only design flaw about the SB-800 is that I can't use the DR-6 while the flash is on the camera unless I buy a bracketing system. Most of the time though, When I am useing the DR-6 I am at an angle where the pop-up works just fine but there have been a few times that I wish I could use the 800 as well.  So for those who are unsure between this and the SB-600, go with this product.  Now all I have to do is find a better lens then my Sigma 28-300 and I am all set.  Anyone know where to find a good deal on the 18-200mm Nikor Lens? If so someone (if there is a way) please email or contact me I have a myspace search my companyHope this helps at least one personBradPremier Image</review_text>
Just bought my first SLR (D50) and my first external flash (SB-800 AF).  I didn't know what to expect, but I was amazed!  I could take the flash into a very dark (mostly candle lit) and large (40'x65') room and take a shot that looked like daylight.  As far as the speed, its amazing - I can shoot off 12 shots in continuous mode on my camera and the flash will keep up (sometimes it will miss a shot or two - still trying to figure that one out).  So far, I couldn't be more pleased</review_text>
Nice intermediate level flash, works great within its perameters</review_text>
I'm an amateur photographer, with mediocre skills. This flash makes all my photos look better vs the built-in, with little to no intervention on my part.I use it with a Digital Rebel. I like that the flash varies in intensity, depending on ambient.  Time between flashes is reasonably quick (particularly when ambient doesn't require a full flash).  To avoid washed out faces, I'd always gotten accustomed to bouncing the flash off walls/ceiling (on my old camera setup).  I've learned that I don't need to do that with the 420EX, and almost always keep it directly pointed at subjects (unless I'm trying to purposely create shadows across people's faces).I also seem to get much less redeye vs built in</review_text>
I bought this flash to use on my Canon Rebel XT. The first thing I noticed was that without even reading the instructions I was able to get much better results on pictures taken indoors. Being able to bounce the flash off the white ceilings provided much better color contrasts to the built in flash. Even when I set my camera to shoot quick pictures in succession the flash did not let me down. It did not need anytime to recharge at all.I recently just came back from vacation and took a lot of outdoor evening shots. Most of the pictures came back with great results. The only dissappointment I have is that when taking shots from further distance than I normally would, the pictures came back darker than I would've liked. So, to compensate for this I adjusted the flash exposure on my camera and although it was an improvement it was a hassle taking several test shots before getting it right.Another problem I have with the flash is the battery cover. It's flimsy and I find it awkward to open and close at times. I always feel like I'm gonna snap it off by accident.Overall I am happy. It's a good flash for the price you pay. The battery life is good. I still haven't even had to recharge the batteries and I've almost taken 200 shots with it. My low light picture have improved dramatically by investing in an external flash. Anyone with a decent camera should never use the built in flash. The difference is night and day</review_text>
All my life I have seen myself and especially babies for some reason be a victim of redeye.  I bought this right before my son was born and have taken nothing but beautiful pictures ever since and haven't had a single red eye no matter how light someone's eyes are.Another great benefit/feature is to be able to bounce the flash off of the ceiling or wall to avoid ghost face (to go along with the devil eye)  It takes BEAUTIFUL pictures even in dimly lit rooms without a smidge of graininess.  (see one of the two pictures of my son indoors in the customer images for this product)  We use this with the Canon digital Rebel XT</review_text>
This flash is working great for me. It has an amazing recycle time. I have been able to easily fire off multiple shots indoors in low light without missing a beat. I have also used it in a completely dark room, and all worked great. I don't like the locks on the bounce head, it is necessary to press the release on the side prior to tilting. Just a minor annoyance</review_text>
First off, this lens works wonderfully with Canon's 20D, 30D and 5D. The image stabilization gives the photographer a serious edge. In my experience, when the IS is active, I'm able to shoot at a much lower speed, without having any blurring. Throughout the range of the lens, image sharpness is excellent, although a little soft when you zoom near 300. Otherwise, from 75 to 280 aprox. image quality is astonishing. I have shot at weddings, sport events, low-light conditions and very in cold climate conditions and the lens performed flawlessly. The ability of focussing manually is a plus. Automatic focus is always accurate. Just a few times in more than 3000 shots has the lens slowed a bit when focusing, but I must say that the objets were moving. The weight of the lens is ok, not too heavy, construction seems according to Canon standards. When shooting in particular situations, the silent USM mechanism is really a welcome feature. Overall, a very nice lens for the serious and amateur photographer</review_text>
I get frustrated by all the negative reviews this lens gets on the web. Yes, the AF is slow and the IS is first generation. Yes, it's not totally sharp and it's slow at the long end. But what other $440 (inc shipping) 300mm lenses with IS is there?* The DO costs $1100 and is shorter but heavier and the optics are not much better.* The 100-400L costs $1400, is much larger and just as slow.* The 70-200/4L is 50% more expensive, only 200mm and lacks IS.* The new 70-300 IS that replaces this lens will probably be a better lens than this version but it costs 50% more and currently (Oct 05) is still not available in the US.The 75-300mm IS is my zoo lens so I don't use it nearly as much as my standard zoom for everyday photography. On my Digital Rebel with its 1.6x crop factor this lens is the equivalent of 120-480mm in 35mm terms, and with the image stabilization feature it makes for some exotic optics. Play to this lens' strengths (middle of the aperture range [don't be afraid of higher ISO settings to achieve this] and not the extreme long end) and your images will be able to be printed at 8x10 without an issue.You're not going to be able to easily track a speeding cheetah with this lens but that is not what this lens is for. It's also unfair to compare this lens to L series alternatives - if you can afford L series lenses then use them but don't cut those of us down without your disposable income just for enjoying this lens. If you own this lens and you want to improve the quality of your images remember to always use a lens hood. Also, the IS is amazing but there are limits; a monopod will improve image sharpness no end. But both these tips apply equally to most lenses both cheaper and more expensive.This lens has earned a permanent place in my camera bag. It's cheap enough and light enough to carry just in case you might need a strong telephoto. The IS really works and is really useful on a telephoto with this kind of zoom range. Don't be put off or intimidated by lens snobs and line counters. This lens also holds its value well; buy it, and use it, now while you're saving for your L dream telephoto and you will be able to sell it for not much less than you paid for it when the time comes to upgrade. When that time comes you just might decide that you want to keep the 75-300mm IS around as well. This lens is great value and very useable even if it is not a great lens.</review_text>
The camera handles very well - it's light and drives my Zoom lens and 18-55mm lens beautifully. I get professional photographs and can use it all day without suffering from heavy weight, which it does not have. The view finder is excellent and the readout on the back of the camera is extremely helpful, showing photos as they are taken - with zoom on the back screen, which immediately gives me the idea of the photo I want to use in my books. I say this is an outstanding lens and camera.</review_text>
Yes due to be released in Sept 05 is an updated NEW version of this lens. It will be a 70-300mm f/4-5.6 lens with a new IS set up which can be viewed at the Canon Website. The Canon item number is 0345B002. The MSRP of the NEW VERSION LENS is $649.99I have the older version 75-300mm III USM w/out IS and I have had nothing but good things to say about that lens! (I only paid $189.99 for it) Can't wait for this new version to come out</review_text>
For anyone considering this lens, according to Canon's site, there will be a newer model to supersede this one which will out perform it. Item # 0345B002 will be a 70-300mm f/4-5.6 IS USM lens available at sometime in 9/05</review_text>
This lens is outstanding. Speed and sharpness are top-notch. I use this lens for a wide array of situations and it has always delivered impressive results. Best lens in it's class at a reasonable price. It's well built, sturdy, and not so heavy so it's relatively easy to carry around. Canon really impressed me with this lens. I use it with my EOS system (traditional and digital cameras).</review_text>
Owned 2 weeks:The only thing to cause me to stop short of 5 stars is the weight of the lens. Stabilization is great and worth every dime. Don't even think about the other 75-300mm non-IS version, it is junk - I tried it.  You can hand hold this lens at 300 mm at 1/60!!  No kidding.  Focus is fast and accurate with my Digital Rebel - almost no hunting like on the other 75-300mm.  You *must* get a skylight filter to protect the front element.I'll update this review after a few months' use.</review_text>
Best camera I've ever owned.It has features found on larger SLR's such as shutter speed & red-eye reduction.The several shoot modes such as portrait allows for close ups as well as a scenery mode which allows for sharp vivid photos of foilage as well as sunsets.A marvelous little camera and the size being slightly bigger than a pack of cigarettes allows you to take this anywhere without the bulk of some of the SLR's and their required lens.Too many features to list here.Try one for yourself you'll be amazed</review_text>
I love this camera!  I did a lot of reading-up and price-checking before I bought this item, and I'm delighted with the quality of product and value for money.This was my first 'own camera' and I've had almost zero camera experience, so to find myself taking the most amazing photos and being able to edit/add text/e-mail them - well - WOW!  I've been stunned by the results this camera has given, all within about a month of purchase.The basic handbook had me taking quality 'normal' photo's within 24 hours and, using this handbook I've progressed into some fantastic close-up stuff, and some fun stuff too - get your spouse to dress up for the sepia shots and have a good laugh!!I've had enormouse fun learning with this camera - and I've got loads more to learn and I feel that some good camera work is now within my grasp.  This has required a modicom of concentration and diligence, but it's paid off, and is precisely what I had hoped for.I found the batteries that came with the camera were almost useless, but that your quality name-brand batteries give excellent life - also, if you plan on taking more than about 15 pics at a time, you will want a memory card.Oh Yeah! I'm an 'old bird' of 53 years, so if I can do this, ANYONE can :o</review_text>
I bought this camera as a gift for my 16 yr old daughter who takes lots of fun pictures of her friends.Her photos are great quality.  This is a dependable camera, and takes the abuse a teenager gives it.  I love it for all those reasons besides the great pics</review_text>
I just finished the first set of pics with this machine and was surprised at the amazing sharpness and the accuracy of the autofocus, not to mention the deapth of field when compared to our older Canon digital camera.Don't be fooled by the low price, however. The 16MB card is a joke, and the batteries are not rechargable. It is best to get a 1GB memory card along with a battery charger pack right away. The price is still very reasonable for such a high quality machine</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 10 year old daughter.  She is thrilled to have her own camera and has taken may vacation pics for the family.  I would reccommend for all beginning photographers.  Great price range with all the options.  Plus easy to use</review_text>
From a pure image quality standpoint, this lens will not please the pixel peepers.  On the wide end of the zoom, which I personally use more often than the telephoto end, this lens is not very sharp, and it suffers from fairly bad distortion.  Worse than that, for me, are the chromatic abberations; this lens is quite prone to significant CA when shot at the wide end, which can look a lot worse than a little bit of distortion or softness.  Given the price of this lens, one should expect a higher level of optical performance.The maximum aperture of this lens is not very large, being f/4 on the wide end, and f/5.6 on the telephoto end.  The image stabilization makes up for this some, as you can comfortably shoot at much slower shutter speeds than otherwise, but, let's be honest here; this lens is a poor performer if you want to shoot in low light with no tripod.  The small aperture makes for a dark viewfinder, which can be a very big problem if you are trying to compose a picture in the dark (using a tripod).Yet, I still gave this very imperfect lens four stars, and this is not without reason.First of all, the focal length range is quite handy.  It isn't a mega-zoom that does everything, however, it covers the most often used focal length ranges, and is an appropriate lens to use for the vast majority of situations.  The little bit of extra zoom on the telephoto end is handy on occasion, and it's also worth noting that the lens sharpens up quite a bit when you zoom in some - it might be soft on the wide end, but zoomed in, it's quite good.I have printed as large as 20x30" using this lens on a Digital Rebel, and have no qualms with the results.  Yes, there are sharper lenses out there, but you are a lot more likely to see the difference in sharpness on your computer monitor than in a print.This lens has ring USM, which enables it to focus very quietly, and very quickly, whereas the slightly cheaper (and F2.8) options from the 3rd parties have normal focusing motors that are slow and noisy by comparison.If you want to use this lens indoors, you are best off getting a flash to go with it, such as a 430EX.  The lens is usable in fantastic indoor lighting, or during the day, but won't give you good results in low light with no flash.If you will be shooting in lower light situations (people in particular), Tamron and Sigma have some good options in the 17-50mm range with F2.8 apertures, and I would recommend those lenses over this one.  If you'd prefer the extra telephoto range, the image stabilization so you can shoot with smaller aperture in poorer lighting situations for greater depth of field (instead of needing to shoot a landscape at f/4, for instance, without image stabilization, you could use f/11 on this lens, and get a sharp picture with better depth of field.  This is even more useful in the close focus range - while this isn't a true macro lens, if you take closeup photos without a tripod, you will want to stop the lens down for greater depth of field, and the IS helps with that quite a bit.Overall, I've been fairly pleased with the performance of this lens.  If you like to worry about splitting hairs, and zooming all the way in on pictures on your computer, this lens is likely to dissapoint you.  If, however, you are willing to sacrifice optical perfection to get a very well rounded, useful lens, then I'd recommend it, however, would also recommend that you consider the 3rd party options, as they are also great lenses, and do offer a somewhat better value</review_text>
At the time of this writing, there is something wrong with the product shot on the Amazon site: It makes the lens look much shorter than it is in reality.  It's not a large or heavy lens at all, but it's not _that_ short.I've had mine (part of a 20D kit) for about a year, during which I've taken maybe 4000 frames or so with that particular lens. The lens still appears as solid as it was on day 1, so no complaints in that department.The image stabilization (IS) feature works quite well and is surprisingly silent (far more so than the IS system on the EF 70-300mm IS).  That said, for a good fraction of the focal length range, IS is a relatively minor (but still useful) benefit of this lens.Autofocus (AF) speed is okay: Better than the kit lens that came with the original Digital Rebel I used to own, but not as fast as some other lenses I have (all non-L).  AF accuracy is fine on my copy.Optically, my concern is primarily sharpness. In that department, the lens seems only marginally better than the 18-55mm kit lens that came with the original Digital Rebel (and which can be bought for close to $100, I believe).  It's often worth turning off IS to improve things, ironically.  Still, it's not awful.I haven't found vignetting, distortion, flare, and aberrations to be significant hindrances.  In part, that probably due to a workflow that includes DxO Pro for the images I care about.Overall, I think this is still a pretty good choice for a lens to keep by default on a Canon EF-S camera (30D, 20D, or a Digital Rebel variant). The optical performance over the lower-end EF-S 18-55mm lens is not _that_ great, but the feature set may justify the premium.  The higher end EF-S 17-55/2.8 IS is another alternative if you're willing to double your investment and change lenses to get the longer focal range: Its imaging quality and the larger aperture are certainly desirable.  Tamron and Sigma have some offerings in this range too, but I'm not at all familiar with them</review_text>
i have had so much fun with this lense and managed to take some pretty incredible pics.  i use this lense for probably 95% of pics.  i have 10-22mm, 28-300mm, and 100-400mm, all of which take great pics but this 17-85mm works great for general use</review_text>
I got this lens with my 30D and have found it to be a useful walkaround lens, able to handle just about any situation I threw at it, other than very low-light situations.  Even in dim illumination it was able to function fairly well, thanks to the image stabilization, which let me shoot at shutter speeds as slow as 1/4 second hand-held.  I wasn't thrilled with the barrel distortion at the wide end of the zoom range, but I was able to fix this using Photoshop's Lens Correction adjustment with no problem.  It's simply an additional post processing step that's necessary</review_text>
If you are only going to buy one lens for your 10, 20 or 30D then buy this lens. I haven't seen a better general purpose lens out there.The EF-S 17-85mm takes great photos, especially in an action oriented situation where you need to run around a lot and get a variety of different shots at different distances.Some have complained that the lens is overpriced. I agree that for the price, it would have been nice to get a hood and carry bag thrown in, but I can say that Canon has impeccable warranty service. I got sand inside my lens and the autofocus quit while I was shooting photos of military helicopters landing in Iraq.I got the lens repaired and shipped back to me within 30 days - in Baghdad in the middle of a war. I was able to speak to a human tech fairly easily and they even replaced something I clearly broke through heavy use that wasn't covered under warranty. The repaired lens works perfectly.If you're looking for a reasonable alternative on a budget try this lens: Sigma Zoom Super Wide Angle AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC Macro Autofocus Lens for Canon Digital SLR CamerasBear in mind that if you have issues and you're using non-Canon lenses on a Canon body, the support you can get from Canon will be limited</review_text>
This lens is very versatile, offering good wide angle to a good head-and-shoulders portrait length.  It's internal focusing, which helps with speed and close-focusing performance, and has image stabilizer for better low-light performance.The IS can be of a particular benefit to those that shoot in darker open areas, like wedding photographers in churches.  The IS, combined with a flash, can allow use to get more background detail for indoor events.  No longer do we have to accept dark, dungeon like backgrounds!Ideally, the lens would be a little bit brighter (say, f4 at the top end), and a bit heavier built.  But then again, we could have that for $1,000 more</review_text>
I got this lens to replace the kit lens that came with my Canon EOS 30D.  This lens is definitely a more "substantial " lens than the kit lens.  Even though the outer housing is plastic, it has a metal mount and seems very durable and sturdy.  The IS really helps to improve the image quality induced by my unsteady hand.  The USM is very fast and quiet.  I have read accounts of this lens not being able to lock on, but I have not had any issues with it in varying (including low) lighting conditions.  I know the lens supports FTM focus, but I have not tried it yet.  I like the focal length range on this lens.  At 17mm even with the 1.6x multiplier, the angle is very wide.  The only drawback to this lens for me is at 17mm there is significant barrel distortion.  My test shots my next shot was at 24mm and the distortion was completely gone at this focal  length.   It's not a showstopper though since it is easily corrected in Photoshop.  Of all the lenses I plan to get, (Sigma 30mm 1.4, Canon EF 50mm 1.8 II, and the Canon EF 70-300mm IS USM), this will most likely be the lens I keep on the camera most of the time, using the others as opportunities warrant</review_text>
Got it two days ago, and can't say how much I love it. My camera fits perfectly, and I even put my video camera on. Although it doesn't have wheels, I can move the head around in any direction and make it stiff easily. I love the double extensions in the legs and then the neck extensions for the minor adjustments.</review_text>
I purchased this tripod from 47th Street Photo through Amazon.com.  The tripod appeared to arrive in good shape, except that the operating instructions were not included.  I immediately emailed 47th Stree Photo at the customer service address printed on the flyer they included with my shipment.  I asked them if they would be able to send me a copy of the operating instructions.  They did not respond to my email, so a few days later I emailed them again.  Once again, no response.  I then emailed Amazon.com, and informed them of the missing instructions and the non-responses from 47th Street Photo.  No response from Amazon either!  As far as the tripod goes, it appears to be a very good value for the money.  I gave it 4 rather than 5 stars because, due to the missing operating instructions, I cannot be certain I have properly checked out all of its features.  However, I am certain that both 47th Street Photo and Amazon.com rate zero stars for customer service.  I will use neither one again</review_text>
I bought 2 of these to carry a camera support to be suspended over a treadmill for filming from above.  I love the fact that they can extend to 70".  They are very sturdy and with the hook on the central post I could hang a sandbag for additional support.  Furthermore, the support beams from each leg to the central post are attached to a central ring that can tighten to change the size of the base of support as measured by the distance between legs of the tripod.  This is extremely helpful when you have limited floor space and tight or cramped corners.  With the addition of sandbags, this narrow base of support can still be quite stable.  The additional bubble levels on the stand are enormously helpful on rough terrain.  The locking mechanims on the legs are plastic, however and are thus not very good for outdoor, dusty conditions.  They are very much like the Samsonite 3751 with the same camera release mechanism, locking legs, bubble levels, extendable center post, changeable size of base of support--the differences are: cheaper, greater extension, hook on center post, and carrying case</review_text>
I am 6ft tall and this is such a perfect tripod for someone who is a beginning/novice photographer for occasional to moderate use (would be my guess). My fort is post-production, as I am a graphic designer and needed something to use with my new dig camera. I did a lot of research for tripods and this seemed to have what I needed for my usage. The plastic clips concern me somewhat with durability for the long haul, but I would love to be surprised and that is just my nerves and luck talking. How can you beat the price regardless?I am so happy with this tripod so far. I love how tall it is for me particularly and how easy it is to use. I did so much research online and found this 70" one and said "screw it" I am tired of looking and bought it. I knew I needed something that accomodated for my height and there isn't a whole lot out there for us tall folks that have decent ratings and is in the hundred and below dept. I didn't have the pesos to make another "hundred+" purchase and took a risk here when I rated the cost versus quality (in my head). I feel as though I have won this battle for now.I like the two "levels" (that i have noticed) to make sure I am squared up on this piece of equipment. Equipment has a smooth pan and I will be using it for my own photo work, video tours for my husband's realtor work and recreation/family photos. I am excited to use this more with my dig Rebel. Legs extend easily. Metal (light weight) body with plastic clips and pieces. Comes with a black bag to hold your tripod also. Easy snap-off piece to remove your digital camera and to attach. In fact I just leave it always on my camera as it expedites the process when I am in a hurry.Tripod feels quite sturdy with my Rebel attached. I think this is a really good-looking tripod. It is so SO light weight and portable. I love that it is NOT clunky and loud to assemble when pulling it straight out of the trunk/car for quickly assembly.I would've liked to seen a manual for recommended usage and ways of maximizing longevity of the product, but I am over it and the product is great so far.(revise 10-09-06) Still LOVE LOVE this tripod. I use it ALL the time. So easy to use and it is SO lightweight and I can just toss it in the trunk. So quick to set up too. Love it ... it ROCKS (from a tall gal).:</review_text>
I bought this tripod with the camera bag as a duo deal....When they say Professional, they mean professional.  It's a large tripod, easy to telescope out and back again, but heavier and longer, and thicker than other tripods I've used. It does appear to be well made and very sturdy.</review_text>
I needed this tripod to use with my 20X50 binoculars since the least movement with 20X magnification causes the subject to wind up outside the viewing field.This tripod works well for that use.  It is sturdy, has lots of features and is reasonably priced.However, if you wish to use the tripod for binoculars, a right angle adapter will be needed.  I found one on eBay for a few dollars.</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift for my brother-in-law.  He's over 6 ft tall and wanted a tripod that he didn't have to bend over to use.  I couldn't find one locally, and was very happy to find this one online.  He's very happy with his gift!Highly recommended</review_text>
I received the tripod ahead of the expected schedule. I've been looking at tripods in stores in and around the greater Boston area.You can't get a better tripod for the money. In fact, you can't get anything "decent" for under $40-50 and even then I'm not sure you will get something this good.I had it shipped to my job and a few guys in the office (which I didn't know) had purchased a tripod in the past and where really impressed when I told them I only paid $25 for it.Conclusion: is the tripod perfect, NO. The head looks a little like plastic. But it has nice rubber feet and rubber grip in addition to everything listed on the website. This tripod is perfect for the beginner to enthusiast photographer.</review_text>
I was a little hesitant to purchase this tripod because of the low price. The last cheap tripod I bought was lightweight and wobbly. I am very pleased with the performance of this tripod. I wasn't expecting Bogen type quality, but its good enough. It's lightweight, and surprisingly sturdy. I would recommend this tripod to a friend</review_text>
This grip is a great value for the price paid. The batteries alone  are worth the money spent. I've banged this around for a week out on the rugged Bruce Peninsula and had no problems with it.I would recommend this to anyone needing a grip. The money you save you can put towards your next lens</review_text>
I'm a loyal canon fan who only has 4 Canon branded lenses (though I had a great Sigma 70-300)..  That being said, I'm a huge fan of the Opteka grip.  The canon is just not worth the extra money. Excellent build quality on it, and the batteries that it came with work very well (more maH than the std battery). I had heard some complaints about how far you had to depress the shutter release on the grip -- it is further than the camera, but very usable, and since purchasing I've heard similar complaints from users of the canon grip.  Save the $ on the grip, get the opteka and get other accessories... You wont regret i</review_text>
This is the same as the Canon grip, made in the same factory.  I don't know how they can get away with it, but it's the consumer's gain here.  Through in 2 batteries and your over a hundred bucks ahead---to spend on all those lenses you'll end up getting for the XTi/400D.</review_text>
We traded up from the original Rebel to the XTi.  This was the first add-on we purchased and has been GREAT!The battery grip adds some balance and overall sturdy-feeling to the Rebel...especially, the slightly smaller XT and XTi bodies.Good stuff, no regrets</review_text>
I know it sounds too good to be true, I've read too many reviews where people say that "I never knew how I ever took pictures without this grip," but it's the truth. The first thing I noticed was the vertical handle, it's amazing. You can shoot vertical shots with one hand! All of the buttons you need are on the grip, the shutter button, wheel, and the two buttons on the top right of the XT.Installation, it's a joke, don't even read the manual. You have to charge the batteries, but in the mean time you can put in your regular Canon battery, or 6 AAs because this comes with a AA shell.Think of it this way, the XT is a baby...it's easy to hold if you have small hands; I don't, I knew the camera was small, and I decided to buy this really so I could have a better handle on it, the extra battery life was whipping on the cake.I really don't know how I could stand to hold the camera without this grip.  Don't spend extra money on Canon's model, this one is perfect</review_text>
I bought the Opteka Battery Pack Grip for my Canon EOS Digital Rebel XTi, and was a bit leary about the considerably lower price than the Canon brand battery pack grip. I am pleased to report that the Opteka grip has met my expectations.PROSThe grip fits extremely well on the Rebel XTi. It even comes with a convenient place to store the battery compartment lid (which must be removed to insert the grip into the camera. Removing the lid is an easy procedure).Attaching the grip is quick and easy, with a large, serrated wheel to tighten the grip against the camera bottom.The finish on the grip is different than that on the Canon-brand grip. The Opteka has a thin, rubbery, texturized non-slip insert layer over the front, bottom and back. The Canon grip's rubbery insert is smooth and looks more "finished."  My only concern about the Opteka insert is that it shows signs that it may not stay perfectly attached to the grip, and will likely need a touch of cement in the future. Not a big deal, though.The vertical shooting buttons on the grip (exposure bracket, A-E lock, Auto Focus point selection, selector wheel and shutter release) are, as far as I can tell, identically placed like those on the Canon grip. All work like they are supposed to.The grip comes with an "On-Off" slide so you can turn off the vertical shooting buttons when they are not needed. This prevents accidentally activating one of the buttons or taking a picture if they are inadvertently pressed while shooting horizontal.The battery compartment in the grip is very easy to remove and insert batteries. Although I haven't used it yet, the optional AA battery insert looks easy to use, and is good to have in emergencies.The two NB-2LH batteries that came with the grip seem to be OK, and charged up just fine. With the battery that came with the camera, I now have 3 batteries to use. More than enough for the number of pictures I take during a typical shoot.The grip certainly improves the handling and feel of the XTi, which comes with a too-small grip for many hands. Personally, I like the additional heft and mass the Opteka grip gives the camera, although some may object to the additional weight.CONSThis is a very minor point, but worth pointing out. The shutter release button on the Opteka grip is a bit "mushy." What I mean is that it is not always easy to tell when you have pressed the shutter releae halfway down to activate auto focus or metering. There is a noticable tactile difference between pressing the shutter release down on the camera, and the shutter release on the grip. It's as if the spring underneath the camera's shutter release button is a bit stiffer than the one for the grip. However, if you use the viewfinder to determine whether you have achieved focus or not, then the little bit of mush in the grip shutter release won't make no never mind.BOTTOM LINEWould I recommend this grip to a friend? Yes.Would I buy another one if the need arises? Yes</review_text>
it was shipd fast and is a verygood buy for the money look the same as the more expensive canon one plus the batterys are good brand i think but it realy up to you the buyer ihave a canon rebel and it fit verrysnug</review_text>
I read rave reviews about the Opteka battery grip being manufactured to the same specs as the Canon grip but at a fraction of the price, so I knew I couldn't go wrong with it.  It came with two 3rd party batteries as well for only $20 more, so what did I have to lose?Let me start off by saying I have experience with 3rd party batteries and they are usually a waste of money as they are horrible from a performance standpoint.  Not these however, I have taken a few hundred pictures with about 20% flash and the battery meter is still full. Great value overall.The grip really does balance out the small size of the Rebel XT and always stays on my camera.  It does add considerable weight to the camera however, but nothing overbearing</review_text>
I have both the Canon version of the grip and this version. They are identical. I have two Rebel XTs and they work great. I like them for the feel it gives holding the camera. The camera was small in my hands and this makes it perfect. If you are thinking of buying accessories for the Rebel XT, this should be one of them. The grip holds two batteries, which gives you way more shooting time. I highly recommend this</review_text>
My husband bought me this camera as an early Christmas gift. At first I wasn't in love with it. I was disappointed because I wanted a camera that had image stablization. This camera instead boasted about its ISO sensitivity settings and fast shutter speed. (They claimed it was similar to image stablization) When I first tried it out I was in a very low light setting and was experiencing some blur in my images which was exactly what I was trying to avoid in a new camera!I almost traded this one in for something different (A cheaper priced olympus with IS) but thankfully I gave the camera another chance first and decided to play around with all the manual settings. There are a lot of them in the menus so you can fine tune it like you wouldn't believe. This ability to change its setup is what made me stick with the Sony.However, I wouldn't say this camera is ideal for very low light situations. The two preset choices of shooting a low-light scene without flash won't give you crystal clear pictures especially if you experience a tiny bit of camera shake. But again, it goes back to the adjustments in the menus, you can make manual adjustments and get pretty decent pictures with minumal (or no) blur. But you have to take the time to find and set the right ISO and light settings. I highly suggest using the histogram that you can pop-up onto the screen for help. Unless you are willing to spend about $200 more on a camera, you won't find one that will perform great in very low light anyway. And like my husband said... "really... how often are you taking shots in the dark honey?" Hey, there's Halloween trick-or-treating and fouth of July fireworks and other night time events I retorted, but he's right. There really isn't a lot of real low-light pictures you take where you aren't using a flash.I know lots of people (me included) like to try and figure out all the menu options and settings on their own before reading a manual... but this one, if you really want super amazing shots, reading the manual will give you A LOT of insight on how powerful a camera it really is. For people that always read the manual this is probably a big "DUUUH"! But if you are like me and like to try and rush through and figure it out, you are missing out on a ton of nice options.Some great features:The camera doubles as a video camera and it is only limited to recording up to the amt of space available in your memory stick. Other cameras will only let you record a pre-set maximum number of minutes.I also like the Burst modes which allow you to take shots in fast succession. Great for action shots. But take note, when using a burst mode you cannot use the flash. (Again, watch out for low light!)I have a 3 year old daughter and the fast shutter speed (and burst) works great in a well lit situation. Just the other day I caught shots of her running around and jumping up and down that came out crystal clear. No blur at all. Every flying and bouncing hair on her head came out perfectly frozen in time. Quite neat!I gave this camera 4 stars because the camera performs wonderfully in every situation except very low light. But for the price, you can't do much better anyway. Its a great buy and I think just about anyone would be pleased to receive it as a gift.</review_text>
Just be sure to get a case along with it, because the large screen could get scratched</review_text>
I had previously owned a Kodak Easy share that died while I was on vacation.  I loved the easy to learn and use features on that camera so I wanted another camera that was easy for a non-professional to use.This little camera has been great!  I've had it for a few months now and LOVE THE PICTURES!  It is very easy to use and is super small which makes it easy to throw in my purse to take anywhere.  The pictures are crisp and clear and the battery lasts forever.  My old Kodak used to take real AA batteries and I thought a camera with its own little rechargeable battery might be strange but it's actually MUCH easier and lasts way longer than the AA's did in my old Kodak.  The LCD screen is huge and makes it very easy to review photos.  Just one little click to go to review and back to taking photos.Only two downfalls I've found so far are that the little setting dial moves easily on its own so you have to always check it before taking a picture or it might be on some strange setting or video.  The other thing is that I haven't been able to figure out if there is a way to delete all of the photos on the camera after you upload them - I've had to delete them one by one which is a slow process.  Other than those two little things this camera is WONDERFUL!  Highly recommended</review_text>
I am impressed with the quality of photos with this camera. Occaisionally when I turn it on the lense doiesn't slide out, which is a little disconcerting. However, if I tap it, or turn it off and turn it o n again, it comes out to the operational position. I enjoy using it, amd wouldn't hesitate to purchase another one</review_text>
I am very pleased with this item. The size is right, the resolution of the photos perfect. I am enjoying using the camera</review_text>
Excellent choice to make a great job.</review_text>
OK -- allow me to mention that the ONLY thing I dislike is that to charge this camera's battery, you have to remove the battery and put it in a small wall charger. The battery charge seems weak and I have to charge it a lot more than the old one. My last Sony digital camera (a recent one, too) has a plug that fit into the camera and you'd charge it while it sat downloading or just "parked"... I get a bit nervous about opening and closing a battery door constantly. That's what did in a Nikon CoolPix I had. :/Now that said, I gotta shout - I LOVE this camera. Slim to fit into my pocket or small purse, lens covers when it's off, screen I already have a plastic guard on, and the photos are quality. Hard to take a bad pic with this! I'd say "I'd buy it again!" but I already did -- a gift for my son! Two thumbs up for ease of use, quality pics, and, GREAT price</review_text>
I bought this camera two weeks ago, have taken about 100 pics, and my battery is still nearly fully charged. I thought I'd have to buy another battery when I decided to buy this camera, but I'm glad I held off, because it's not necessary (unless you're going on a two-week excursion in the bush with no access to electricity...) No problems with red-eye, no blurry pictures when taken inside with low light, and outstanding battery life. I am getting more than I expected when I purchased this camera. I would recommend it (and show it off!) to anyone</review_text>
This is a outstanding camera for it's size. Easy to use, easy to carry and produces great pictures. Would recommend to anyone who is ready to give up film and go digital</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
I love the new digital Canon. The only problem is it's not nearly as tough as it's film twin.  I had the camera less than a month when the pop-up flash quit working.  The Canon people have been great, and very helpful, but I'd rather not have had to send a brand new camera back to the factory.  The photos, however, are wonderful.  Film quality for the most part - printable and enlargable.  (It would probably be better to use the camera with a tripod when using the 300mm telephoto but I hike with it, so just remember to steady it before taking wildlife photos.</review_text>
When I bought this camera the sales people tried to get me to buy another battery.  They said the one that came with it would only be good for about 20 minutes.  Now I have bought alot of items in my lifetime, a 20 min battery on a camera just doesnt seem like a very good "business" choice.  So I said no.  So I got the camera, charged the battery until the light went green (which sucked because I wanted to play with it right when i got it) and started taking pictures (oh I also got a 2G CF) worked great....so I planned to go up a mountain and take soem scenery shots.  Keeping in mind what the sales person had told me I pocketed the charger just incase.  Well, 6000', 300 pictures, and 5 hours later the camera is still running strong, still have 200 shots left for the trip home, battery life indicator hasnt budged off of the full button.  So all in all, I think the battery life is great, now i can see if your taking say thousands of pictures all in a row you may need another but for just going on a trip and shooting a few pictures at every stop point, the original will work fine.  as for the quality of photos.....i love them</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
I already had a digital rebel and was able to sell it to a co-worker and use the proceeds for my new rebel xt. Faster, lighter, better. Simple review. It took everything that was great about my digital rebel and made it better. Some complain that it feels "too light"...OK...it that's your thing. To me, it's still solid and the pictures speak for themselves.Now, with the addition of the 10 MP rebel xt, I'll bet the original xt can be purchased for an even better price.No downsides that I can think of..</review_text>
I have had digital cameras for about 5 years and still own an Olympus 5 megapixel, and a Casio 7 megapixel. Seems like Megamixels alone just don't cut it for me.I read about the rebel XT in a magazine and looked up the user reviews here on Amazon.I decided to go and buy one and though I am really a novice, I am extremely impressed. I have never seen such stunning quality or realistic colors from a Point & Shoot. I started with the basic settings and love the results.I am slowly progressing to more advanced settings and am getting better everyday.Even a novice who just wants stunning photography will be amazed with this camera.I also bought a Tamron 75-300 Autofocus zoom lens (look for it here on Amazon.com) and after lots of practice, have been able to take some great pictures.I have a brother in the UK who is also into digital photography, and after seeing some (full reso) photos I sent him, he rushed out and bought the XTi (called the EOS 400D across the pond)and is amazed with it.I still have a lot to learn but really cannot fault this camera. The included software is also excellent.For the record, some reviews seem to think it is too small to hold, I have big hands and don't have any problems at all. I admit though this is the first SLR I have ever owned.I will still keep a point and shoot to keep in my travel bag for spontaneous photography but I am in love with my Rebel XT!!This camera costs quite chunk of change but I think it is well worth it and I do recommend it to everyone</review_text>
I'm not sure why "rkm001" had so many issues with this product. I have owned one for about two months now and use it very heavily. It cuts a straight line for me everytime and I have never had something "stick" to the cutting strip. I actually bought this one to replace a very worn (and more expensive trimmer/cutter) I had for years, and wish I had done it sooner</review_text>
It performs as you'd expect. The bar holds the paper in place, and the cutter cuts the paper. I also got the perforating and scoring blades, and those also work very well. Using the cutter and perforator, I've made several custom-size notebooks with tear-out pages</review_text>
Clearly "rkm001" has had some difficulty in using this equipment.  I have one that I used as part of my job.  I have probably cut over 1000 photos/labels/etc.  Other people in the office have cut more than 2000 photos.  It does exactly what it is supposed to do - it cuts a straight line along the edge of the guide.Where this problem arises is when the cutting surface, underneath the cutting wheel, becomes worn from use.  I grove will slowly develop and since the cutting surface is not fixed in position and can slide from side to side, the grove will not be straight nor will it be parallel to the cutting guide.To solve this problem, you should not use extreme force when cutting.  Gentle pressure is adequate for cutting a photo.  You can also remove the cutting surface and rotate it 90 or even flip it over.  This gives you four cutting surfaces to work with.  Ultimately you will need to replace it.  Carl makes those too.For $20, it works well and unless you plan to cut thousands of times a month, it is fine for home or light office use</review_text>
I've had my D70s for about a year now, haven't regretted it for a second.The controls are laid out logically, with everything to hand. The dual control wheels make adjustments fast and accurate. I personally love the optional grid overlay, I have no excuses for horizons that aren't horizontal. The wireless flash system is great, though you have to buy an SB-600 or SB-800 to get the full benefit. This camera is bigger and heavier than the D50 and D80, which in my opinion is a positive thing.</review_text>
I am a professional photographer, and I have owned this camera for nearly two years.  I also have a D70 for backup.  The batteries go forever, it is very quick to respond, the images are beautiful, and it has the typical Nikon durability and reliability.  If you are already a Nikon user, the controls will fall easily to hand.That having been said, the computer software with this camera is a joke.  For the best image quality shoot RAW files, color balance with a grey card, and render the images with software like Capture One LE.  The uselessness of the included software is the only reason that this camera gets four instead of five stars.  Come on, Nikon, be real!!!Shortly after I got my first D70, I shot a model for a small photo for a side bar in a catalog.  I got an ugly feeling in my gut when I was told that the designer had taken a shot that was 3/4 figure, cropped to the head and shoulders, and enlarged the image for the cover of the 8.5 x 11 in catalog.  By the time I found out, it was already at the printer.  As it turned out, I was pleasantly surprised: the cover shot looked great.  After that incident, I have trusted this camera and have always been pleased with the results.This camera is better than 35 mm in every way except response to the shutter button.  In resolution and color reproduction it is more comparable to a medium format film camera.  It is imperative to shoot RAW and process the files properly to get the most out of this camera.I can't wait to try the D80</review_text>
I do weddings, portrait, and outdoor photography and I don't see any reason why I'd ever switch from the D70 (other than the D80 :).  This camera is professional grade at the consumer price point.  Don't be scared by the 6.1 MP.  I print at 20x30 all the time w/ out any problems.  I'd recommend reading Thom Hogans manual</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
Excellent camera kit. Versatile. I have a lot to learn about the camera, though, as it is no simple point-and-shoot. However, in Auto mode, it takes great point-and-shoot pictures. I look forward to learning how to use it fully. Lenses came with warranty cards, but the camera itself did not. I bought the SB-600 flash as well and another battery and two 1 GB compact flash cards to round out the kit. Camera with lens attached is large, which I underestimated. $80 camera bag is too small for it all. Great camera, though. Price was the best I could find anywhere</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
I have to say that is an excellent purchase. I'm a fan of my P880 camera.Wide Angle Len, a feature included, allows to take great panoramic views, with no efforts. The manual optical zoom is great, gives you a control of the picture that i never had with a comercial digital camera.One of my favorites features is the zoom for reviewing the picture, is a 10X zoom and you can check detailed the picture in the LCD screen as in your PC.The 8 Megapixels, allows you to see with great precision minimal details that usually you don't see.Is a great experience, when you take a picture,return home, and the picture is better than your memory.I'm still learning about the other features, but rigth now i think that has a great performance-value relation, and most important, allow my to have photos with a professional touch,.From the South Of the WorldCarolina</review_text>
Great affordable camera, that takes very nice pictures.</review_text>
The Kodak P880 is a remarkable bargain that produces astonishing photos.  With its 8 megapixels and zoom lens it operates like more expensive SLR's.The quality of the photos, even at the highest zoom, is astounding.  For anyone interested in an easy to operate, high quality camera, this is the one</review_text>
I bought my camera a few months ago, so I have had a chance to figure out most of its features, not all lol, but I consider that a good thing (extra features means more messing around with it ^-^. Well anyways it is an excellent camera, it does all of the things I want it too, and its half the price of a Rebel. The video it takes is amazing and can record till there is no space  on the SD card. For me I have a SanDisk 1g SecureMemory SD Card and I can take about 27 minutes on it which is plenty. And about 38 secounds on the 38mb internal drive. I can take about 329 pictures on the 1g SD and about  10 on the internal. The battery is great on it, I have used it countless hours and havent gotten one bar to go down, so about 2-3 days of use will run it down. So I asume about 8-10 hours. I have never had it die on me, with out me intentually letting it (I guess its better to let the battery run out and then charge it) The focus and zoom feature is fun to play with on the camera and comes in really handy (for the extra zoom there is the zoom button on the top left of the camera, so you really dont need to buy one of those cameras with the 10x) What else? Well the manual features (the biggest reason I got the camera)so play with the ap., iso, and shutter speed they are so fun to mess with, even the hue of the photo which I didnt expect to like, I actually got off really good shots with. The auto features come in handy too, just click and shoot! Macro is a neat feature, get in close its amazing and your shots will be beautiful! Screen is good to, with a crowd around me most can still see the image on the screen (I take video's of my boyfriend and friends sparing)The Mic is on top, it does its job (when its windy you can actually block the wind without even knowing because your hand while on the "on,off-shoot" button covers it (good design)Uploads pic quickly on computer and deleting picutres is extremely quick and easy. The af (auto-focus), focus, and ae are easy to get to for quick fixs other then the focus on the front of the camera. And flash does good. Well I hope my long drawn out review was helpful. I hope you enjoy your camera. I will shortly be purchasing a smaller camera for v-logs possible a canon sd630. But YES DO BUY THE KODAK P880 the mega-pix are simply amazing</review_text>
I have taught photography at the college level, shoot 4x5 view camera work on occasion, and am very demanding about image quality.   I am quite satisfied with the image quality from my Kodak P880, particularly after I installed the newest firmware upgrade available from Kodak.I went through several 7MP to 8 MP cameras before finally getting the Kodak P880.  The P880 has better image quality than some high end Sonys and Olympus 7-8 MP cameras like the DSC-V3 or the SP350.  I tested the P880 against the even higher end 10.3 MP large sensor Sony R1 and the difference in image quality in a 13x19 print between the P880 and the R1 was barely perceptible after minor sharpening and noise reduction, which the P880 images accept particularly well.   The zoom lens has a very useful range and is generally pretty sharp throughout its range.   Balance, manual controls and features feel high end and adequate for most semi-professional needs.   The camera is a little slow processing and storing pictures in RAW format and exposure bracketing modes but that really doesn't bother me because I do mostly landscape and fine art photos.   RAW file format is directly supported by most versions of Adobe Photoshop and Photoshop Elements as well as most other RAW processing programs like Bibble Pro.  Unlike most sub-$500 cameras, the P880 uses regular screw in haze and polarizing filters, a real plus and it has a highly controllable hot shoe.   Manual focus is usable and manual exposure control works well.   The direct mechanical zoom is also nice.Overall, the P880 is a digital camera that can either be a high end point and shoot SLR-styled camera or one that can be used as fully manually as the most classic 35 mm film SLR.Although not small enough to slip in a pocket, the size is still reasonable and light</review_text>
Bought by P880 about a month ago. I am a sem-pro outdoor adventure photographer and I use Nikon 35mm film equipment for the most part. I shoot slide film on my F90s Nikon. I had a 5mp Kodak digital camera but wanted to upgrade to a better digital camera but I could not justify buying a Nikon D50 or D70s as they are only 6mp. And I didn't want to drop 2 grand on a D200. So I looked in the mid-range camera lines. After doing MUCH research, I decided to buy this camera. So far I am happy I did. I have taken it hiking several times, enough that I know its a good camera but of course its a toy compared to pro Nikon film cameras. But I knew that when I bought it. I wanted to have a good camera to take lots of "documentary", "fun" and "travel" shots. For the really powerful stuff I will still shoot slide film. But its too expensive to shoot with extensively!Here's my initial impressions based on the perspective of an outdoor photosgrapher:The Good:1) Fairly easy to hold as its tall and has an actual grip.2) Lightweight (but of course at the expense of impact resistance I'm sure...)3) Great set of manual controls! This is the best part. Autobracket is good as is the interval timer which is great for self-potraits. You can walk far away from the camera and get yourself in the shot (great for solo hikers).4) Large 2.5" LCD makes it easy to check out your photos5) Image quality seems pretty good (although not comparable to a high-res. scan of a slide).6) The manual zoom is great! Much better than power zooms in almost all other cameras.7) The 24mm focal length is simply amazing! Great for landscapes and outdoor adventure shots.8) The battery life is great. Shot 250 or so pics on a full charge and that included a lot of playing around with the menus, reviewing photos, etc. I just boughta second Kodak battery on Amazon for $16!9) Built in flash is pretty powerful and you can add a shoe mount unit as well.10) 8mp of resolution for the price of a 6mp camera.The not so good:1) Seems to write to the card pretty slowly. Definately not for action shots! Maybe this would improve if I bought a faster SD card.2) The "toggle" button on the back for navigating through the menues worries me. Seems like it could break someday. I am gentle with it. Wish they would create a more durable feeling toggle.3) The LCD viewfinder is hard to see on a bright sunny day. This is where a film camera is WAY better. Optical viewfinders cannot be beat.4) The in screen manual focus is no good at all. Better just focus with your eyes.5) Wish they would have made the handgrip a little grippier by adding a rubber stip or the like. Is a little slippery in the hands (always use a neck strap!)In all I highly recommend this camera. If they were to improve upon some of the items for which I have some critisism, I would easily give this camera a perfect review!!Good luck with your purchas</review_text>
This was the third 8 meg SD camera I tried - it was the only one that without using a tripod indoors gave me sharp, crisp pictures most of the time.  The zoom was smaller that the Fuji or the Panasonic, but the color saturation and sharpness were heads and shoulders above the others.  Excellent camera that shoots jpg, tiff and raw</review_text>
I bought this camera for my work.  I'm an architect and I was looking for a camera with a wide angle lens for interior photography with a budget that wasn't going to break the bank.  I had looked at the Kodak V570, which had a 23mm fixed lens and I was seriously considering it but was concerned about the durability and reliablilty (it seemed fragile).  Then I stumbled across the Kodak P880 (Kodak should really do a better job of advertising their cameras), which is comparably priced to the V570.  This camera is the next best thing to a digital SLR, and has many of the same features.  My wife has a Canon Rebel XT, which is a really great camera, and the P880 gives it a really good run for the money with regards to features and picture quality at about half the price.  I've had this camera about a week and have been putting it through its paces and so far I have been very happy with the results.  I would recommend this camera to anyone thinking of getting an digital SLR but is hesitant about the SLR price</review_text>
This filter works great.  I have used this filter on a Nikon 18-70mm lens and have produced excellent pictures.  I have yet to experience any flare with this polarizer.  Great polarizer for a great price</review_text>
The new Nikon EN-EL3e battery is a slight update for the Nikon EN-EL3 provided with earlier dSLR models such as the D70. It adds a contact that allows new cameras to determine how much charge is left in the battery. The battery is grey to distinguish it from the black EN-EL3.The EN-EL3e is backwards compatible with the EN-EL3: you can put it in your D70 or D50. The reverse is not true.The number of pictures that the battery gives you depends on a lot of factors, including shooting style, LCD usage, and of course, camera. (The 2.5" LCD on the D200 will use up the battery much quicker than the smaller D70.) It is sufficient for a day of shooting. Unless you are using a D200 in some professional capacity, in which case, you'll probably be investing in at least one backup battery</review_text>
This is the real thing. It seems to be impossible to get anywhere and I got it overnight from Amazon. Wow</review_text>
This review is from personal experience.  I recently picked up a D200 to replace my D70.  This past weekend I took the photos for my sister's wedding.  I shot with full functionality using LCD review for every shot and was using the Nikon 18-200 VR lens.  Over the course of the wedding and reception I took 295 photos in Fine JPEG mode and reviewed them while shooting.  At the end of the afternoon, I still had battery life left and very likely could have taken 100 more photos.  Given the features and capability of the D200, I have absolutely no issue with that many photos.  I will pick up a second battery for a back up as soon as someone has some in stock.And I could not agree more with the previous reviewer.  If you do not have personal experience with this product, there is no need to attempt to review it based on hearsay or something you might have read elsewhere</review_text>
I used my new Nikon D200 this past weekend at a Renaissance Faire in high heat, and the EL3e performed like a champ (as did the camera itself).  I couldn't believe that I got through three full days of picture-taking (using fill flash after five pm or so) on one battery charge.  I finally ran out of juice late on the third day, after approximately 500 exposures.(One caveat: I don't use auto-focus.  At all.  Ever.  So, you know, YMMV.</review_text>
This is my first and very expensive entry into digit SLR photography.I have used canon point and shoot digital camera previously.I was avoiding DSLR's because I used to rarely use my EOS film SLR.The convienience of a point and shoot from that experience was overwhelming.Unfortunately so are it's limitations.So back I came, and the only choice though expensive was the EOS 5d for it's full frame sensor! The pain was reduced by the double rebates.Wow! This is a revelation! Beautifull images, lot of control.I did notice that the AF was not as fast as my old Elan IIE.I was also disappointed that for the price there was a lack of weather sealing. I am not happy with canon for this, but I really appreciate them for making a full frame sensor in a difficult marketable slot as far as their line up was concerned.This camera also needs prime or L lenses, because the sensor will reveal the inadequacies of inferior lenses. This add's to the cost.This is an exceptional photographic tool that I hope to use to improve my skill as I explore all it's capabilities</review_text>
This camera is amazing. I have been a canon user for many years, upgrading as I go.  I can not think right now of a camera they could come out with to make me want to upgrade from the 5D.  This will certainly be my camera for some time to come</review_text>
This is an excellent camera.  I upgraded from the EOS 20D which was also a great camera.  I upgraded for a couple of reasons.  The first was the Full Frame sensor.  The EOS 20D has a 1.6X crop factor which effects your lenses overall focal length.  On the EOS 5D you get the true focal length of your attached lens.  Just like film SLR cameras.  Awesome!  The one problem I've noticed with the Full Frame sensor on the EOS 5D is it is huge.  When you are changing lenses this sensor picks up every little piece of dust, dirt and fibers like a vacuum. I'm constantly cleaning the sensor with a blower.  I also had to bring it to a Canon service center. Just to remove some of the dust off the sensor that my blower could not remove.  The Canon service center was very far from my home.  (Very annoying).  I never experienced this problem with the EOS 20D.  But, the images you get from the full frame sensor are far superior to the smaller sensor on the EOS 20D.The other reason I upgraded was the larger LCD.  The 2.5' LCD screen is a nice plus.  The images look bright and sharp.Overall I love this camera.  Build, features and image quality are excellent!!!</review_text>
After 3 decades as a Nikon 35mm film 'loyalist', a co-worker let me test drive his Canon 5D, Canon EF 16-35mm f2.8L USM and SanDisk Extreme III 2 GB card.Viewing the images on his LCD computer screen helped me decide to sell almost everything Nikon (I kept their SB-800 flash for wireless slave setups) and switch to the established DSLR leader, Canon.  Finally, no more heavy and bulky Nikon F5 and having to pay and wait for film processing!  No more scanning negatives for hours each night!I've owned the 5D, Canon EF 17-40mm f4L USM, Canon EF 70-200mm f4L USM with tripod collar and Canon Speedlite 580EX for about 3 months and have taken over a thousand RAW and large JPEG images in ISO's ranging from 50 to 3200.  (Note:  4 weeks ago, a backup Canon Digital Rebel XT black body was added for the 70-200.)The 5D's image quality stunned every person I have given 4" x 6" and 8.5" x11" colour and monochrome images to.  Credit must be given to Canon's Digital Photo Professional (DPP) RAW processing software, Canon's i9900 bubblejet printer, Canon paper and Canon ink.  I rarely have to use Adobe Photoshop CS2 anymore because of DPP's quick-to-use tools.The above 5D and any one of the lenses with flash fits nicely into a Tamrac Velocity 7 bag.  The larger Velocity 9 bag will fit the entire 2 body with lenses and flash kit.The only negative about the camera is the closed compact flash card gate moves slightly along it's hinge giving the body a less than solid feel.  The Digital Rebel XT does not have this issue and therefore feels more solid.A built-in flash would have been nice but not absolutely necessary.  Unlike the superb Nikon SB-800, Canon's 580EX is a bit chunky but does it's job wonderfully.The low noise images at ISO's above 800 can easily be removed with DPP or Photoshop.  Photoshop goes a step further by removing colour artefacts which lowers the saturation of the image.  Meaning saturation would have to be increased after noise removal.Bottom line:  If you believe that it costs Canon more to manufacturer a full-frame CMOS image sensor and don't mind spending several months salary on the 5D, go for it!  Also, choose your lenses carefully.  Canon L lenses go well with the 5D.</review_text>
If you've been considering a digital full frame camera (and who hasn't?) this is the one that doesn't cost an arm and a leg.  Now that Kodak is out of the picture, your choices are the EOS 5D or the 1DS Mark II, which costs more than twice as much.You do have to give up a few things, such as a super-fast frame rate for continuous shooting, but the 5D has the resolution you need for top-quality images, and the ability to get true wide angle perspectives from your EF lenses.  I happened to shoot this camera at a concert side-by-side with a vendor "N" camera, both under available light with 85mm f/1.8 lenses at a range of ISOs.  I found some shots I liked from the other camera, shot at ISO 400, and comparable shots from the 5D which, to my surprise, turned out to be exposed at ISO 3200.  The 5D absolutely lives up to its low noise reputation.  But don't take my word for it, try one out for yourself</review_text>
THE CON:I've own this now for 6 months, i shoot weddings & portraits. I did alot of tests, especially the picture modes.Well don't waste your time with these, their all bad, with theexception of the landscape. You'll just end up using the Standardmode for best all arround shooting. The venetting does accure arround the edges, mostly in low light.Worst of all is the color ballance or White ballance in Auto mode. For what ever reason it has a hard time. My D60 out performs it here big time, not sure why. So you may have to shoota grey card to get your White ballance more accurate.THE PROS:Quality of the pic is excellent, color saturation is awsome.Blow up of 2'x3' was excellent detail, no noise.I've found the focus of mine to be real good, no problems here.Ease of use after learning curve becomes easy, just read the manuel.CONCLUSION:I would buy again except for that AWB problem. Now i have owned both the D60 and the 10D and neither seemed to have this problem as bad. I use this mode when doing weddings because I'm always on the move and go from one differn't light sorce to another inbetween shots (Tungsten to Daylight).I still think Canon is the best and will alway buy their products</review_text>
While the 5D may be less expensive than the so-called professional grade, the camera is more oriented toward the Pro end than the 20D (or 30D) with fewer of dial settings but more capability.  Others have covered some other areas, so I'll try to avoid repetition.The full frame makes a great deal of difference to me. I like to print large images and I like to use L or other higher end Canon lenses (with a couple of knockoffs). There's no tradeoff in weight of consequence or compactness. The truth is that I prefer the recent glass that isn't computed for the smaller sensor.I liked the 20D, a lot, and most of my gear carries over to the 5D. I now have three cameras that take the same card and battery. The 5D if anything feels and looks more rugged that the 20D while being very compact.But the pictures? Great. The 20D was and is a first rate camera at 8.2 and its ability to use all Canon lenses, plus the EF-S for the smaller digital image.One person cited slowness over the 20D. I won't disagree with that, but it isn't a big deal to me. I typically use the drive for bracketing on the fly, but almost never for anything just to do a fast sequence, e.g. sports. I've owned motorr drives going back to my days as a pro in the 60s and 70s and they have their uses. Esssential sometimes.But they are like autofocus. On occasion, you need to be manual. Whenever  possible, I prefer to single shot or on occasion, a three shot burst. I find there's less chance of missing what I'm shooting.The "Decisive Moment" too often falls between the frames on motor driving.  But that's to everyone's taste. I really am impressed with the camera and having tried it, look forward to a trip with it, with the trusty 20D as the second.</review_text>
Just got the 5D..traded in my 20D...the 5D is a more solid camera with a full frame sensor...pictures are great and it is easy to use if you are familiar with the Canon system...a little pricey, but worth it!!  You'll use it for years</review_text>
I will use this lens as a standard on my Rebel XT rather than the the 18-55mm lens that came with the camera. It gives much greater flexibility in outdoor shoots when I'm capturing my grandsons in action on the soccer field.</review_text>
For the price, this is an excellent lens.  On an APS sized sensor it is equivalent to 480mm at the long end.  Some complain about it being a slow lense since the max aperture at full zoom is 5.6  That just means you can't use it in low light and expect great results.  If you want a fast lense at that length, however, be prepared to pay a lot of money.  With the USM it focuses very fast.  Works well for outdoor sports.  My rating is based on what you get for the money.  Of course it's not as good as L glass but it's way less money</review_text>
I bought a Canon EOS 20D digital SLR and the Canon EF 75-300mm zoom lens to take photographs of my children's various sporting events.  The magnification factor of this lens is perfect for a variety of sporting events including lacrosse, basketball, swimming and gymnastics.  The focusing speed is very good for capturing action shots.  I highly recommend this lens as an affordable general purpose zoom lens</review_text>
This lens was all I anticipated and more. The auto focus fast and accurate. I gat stunning action shots</review_text>
I have just begun my interest in photography and this was the first zoom lense I have ever bought.  The lense provided all that I could ever ask for.  I just got back from the zoo with the kids and the photographes are excellent</review_text>
We are by far professional photographers, but for the most part I liked the lens. We wanted something we could zoom a bit more than with what the Digital Rebel came with and it does great!My only problem is that if I want to take a close up pic I have to switch back to the original lens. There is probably a reason for this that I am unaware of. Minor inconvienience for great zoom capability.</review_text>
the monopod functions as i hoped and for the price was an excellent dea</review_text>
The Sima monopod is perfect if you're looking for something easy to carry and set up.  It exends quickly and has a quick release mount that can stay attached to the camera base.  Stability is good, but it does not have a sturdy feel.  If you want something with a solid feel, you will have to move up the food chain, but will sacrifice compactness and light weight of this product.</review_text>
There's no question that paying $100 or more will get you a better monopod. But for $16 the Sima SMP-1 is a tremendous value.I have a Sony DSC-W5 digital camera and have done everything I can think of to reduce camera-shake in low-light photos. This monopod has been great for adding stability and making my photos less blurry.The key is that it is small enough and light enough that I can take it almost wherever I go. And because it's so small, I can bring it in to places that would frown upon a tripod.A monopod is not a total replacement for a tripod. But this monopod is now the only addition to my camera that I take on trips</review_text>
I bought this monopod after reading reviews here.  It's really  light-weighted. I used it to take pictures for a dance performace where tripod was not possible. I was able to use slow shutter and got great images.Cons:I saw a pro ( I knew he runs a studio) using a similar monopod which was black. So my only complain is its non-black color. Well I am not a pro anyway.</review_text>
Great product for the price.However, Amazon did not specify how much it can handle. My experience is about 5 lb. Tried 8 lb on it, start to feel shaky. Still usable if you handle it carefully, but not solid for 8 lb of load</review_text>
I am very happy with the item I ordered. Shipment was fast and the price was cheaper than retai</review_text>
This product served its purpose; it is the same cord for hooking up the camera to a PC as the one that came with my camera</review_text>
my mom lost her USB cable for her digital camera and Amazon always has everything I need so I order it for her</review_text>
this cable was a very essential need for me to upload my photos to the computer. i was very fortunate to find it on amazon.co</review_text>
it works just like the one that comes with the camera.  Comes in a little plastic bag</review_text>
Item was just what I needed to hook my camera to my computer and start downloading photos.  Had it unpacked, plugged in and working in less then a minute</review_text>
This cable is a four-point USB connector that works with some Kodak digital cameras.  Be sure that your camera uses a four point connector before buying this one.  Many cameras use a five point connector.  These Kodak branded cables are high quality at a fair price</review_text>
This is an essential part of the digital picture taking. Can't download the pictures from your Kodak camera onto the computer without it.It should come standard with your camera purchase, but if you misplaced yours, this is the one to get.Arrived promptly as ordered and the value is great</review_text>
We received our USB cable promptly. As you know the Kodak USB cables are special in that they do not fit any other regular devices that uses a USB cable. These USB cables are for Kodak's only. The product itself turned out to be everything that it was represented as</review_text>
I got this stuff as a gift for a friend of mine. He seems to be happy using it. So I am giving this a 5 star</review_text>
The case is made of high quality material and fits my Canon powershot A700 perfectly. I would have given it 5 stars if the case had a seperate compartment for carrying an extra set of batteries. There is just enough room to carry the camera and an extra memory chip. No extra batteries.</review_text>
Why use another case when this one is built specifically for this camera?I like it, it's sleek and belt-mountable.Also has enough padding so you can throw it in a backpack, suitcase, etc</review_text>
The case is great!  It fits the camera perfectly and is exactly what I expected to receive when ordering.  The price was right but the shipping was a little higher than I expected</review_text>
I purchased this case for my Canon A530 camera. I find that it does a great job of being light,durable,and compact. It keeps the camera clean and scratch free. However I wish the case had a better carrying capacity. I would have liked a bit more space for spare batteries and chips. I use different ones for different pictures or video. Batteries do tend to give out after a long day shooting and convient extras would be handy.The case has beltloops but not a good shoulder strap for times when a belt is not worn. That can be a bit akward. Otherwise this case is a good protector of my camera and fits it well.</review_text>
After reviewing my options to purchase for my new Canon A540 we chose this case and I'm glad I did!  Nice snug fit for the camera, extra compartments for a memory card & batteries, no need for a strap, you are already provided one with the camera.</review_text>
IT GIVES THE PROTECCION AND THE HANDLING YOU ARE LOOKING FOR.BUY IT ALONG WITH THE CAMERA NO REGRETS</review_text>
Great case. Small, soft, and compact, with extra space for batteries. HOWEVER, the hole for the camera strap is in the center, which means that if your camera strap attaches anywhere OTHER than the middle of the camera, it doesn't line up with this case. Minor detail. For example, the strap of the A530 is near the top of the camera, so the strap goes out the side of the case, unless you pull it sideways to go through the case hole.</review_text>
I bought this camera when i was a sophmore in college.  And now, 2 years out of college, a handfull of beautiful days, a half-dozen life changing moments, and umpteen vacations later it's still goes with me everywhere and snaps photographs.  all the sticker labels on it have since been knocked off but it doesn't matter because i know what they all do.  This puppy is built to last.  When I eventually pass this one down in the family and buy a new one, I'll be getting another canon for sure.If you're looking for a high-value digital camera that thinks it's a tank, get the Canon s100.</review_text>
I've had this camera for three years.  I bought it new, when it was cutting edge and very expensive.  I put a 128MB CF card in it.First, I have to say that I have NEVER had the slightest problem with this camera or the software.  I've probably taken upwards of 5000 pictures with it, it's been all over the country.  The software has been installed on Windows 95, 98, 2000 and XP and I haven't had any problems with it.  The camera is solid, performs well, takes good pictures, and the battery lasts pretty long if you disable the LCD viewfinder. If battery life were that big a deal, one could purchase a second battery and rotate.All that said, I am a little disappointed with the quality of the pictures from the camera.  They are razor sharp, the color balance is perfect, and the focus is great.  When taking pictures of people, however, it shows EVERY flaw in the subject's skin.  Scratches, oil, freckles are magnified and come out looking horrific.  It requires extensive Photoshopping to fix the flaws.  Other cameras taking pics of the same subjects turn out looking much better.I will also say that it takes a very long moment for the camera to do its digital image processing between the time you press the button and when the camera actually takes the picture. By the time the shot's taken, something (especially a squirmy child or a sports play) has invariably moved and it's not the exact picture you wanted.I'm going to buy a real Single-Lens Reflex (SLR) to take baby pictures, but I'll keep this as a travel camera</review_text>
I originally gave this camera 5 stars. When I had Windows 98 it was wonderful but I got a new computer last November with XP the usb software is Sooo... not compatible with XP I have found however that you can just buy a card reader to solve this problem. The new drivers on cannon's site do not help at all but try them if you want they have made me have to use the backup software. The Adobe software also was wonderful in 98 but it will not let you print correctly with XP so you are forced to create your document then either print it from Windows or export it to another application. But it takes gorgeous pictures for a 2.1 MP camera</review_text>
Works as designed, performs well with intended lens, construction is plastic though</review_text>
This is also the correct lens hood for the new EF 70-300mm F4-5.6 IS USM lens.4 stars because it's $40 for a piece of plastic that should have been included with both of its intended lenses.Shame on your cheap ways, Canon</review_text>
I got these gloves to use when taking outdoor photos in the winter.  They work very well, the little rubber grips help you better control the camera without having to expose your hands to the elements.  They are not really warm enough for really cold weather (below 20), but work well for 20-50 degrees</review_text>
If you're a professional photographer, you can probably ignore this review. But then you probably won't be thinking about buying this lens anyway, as you'll be off to purchase a nice L series.However, if - like me - you just happen to have a nice Canon Digital Rebel camera (or equivalent) and enjoy taking decent pictures, this lens will probably work out very well for you. I've taken well over 1000 pictures with it in a couple of weeks, and it has performed very much as expected. For the price, it's perfect for a go-everywhere lens.A few main points. Okay, it's not the best image quality. Even on low/medium ISO it seems a little grainy and its not as sharp as some of the more expensive Canon lenses. It struggles indoors unless you have a good flash unit, but for well-lit outdoor shoots it's works  very well.Of course, it would be nice to have a nice L series with IS, but if you can't afford that then this is a very good value lens. Not for the real professionals, but great if you don't take things too seriously and just want a bit more zoom - and, let's face it, who doesn't want a but more zoom</review_text>
What a wonderful lens!!  I'm purely a hobby shooter, but I do like to take nice shots.  I took this to the zoo the other day and was able to take fantastic closeups of the polar bears, even through glass, and pick out the details on the butterfly wings.  The lens is not as heavy as I had feared, and unlike some zooms it does not telescope out under its own weight, so it was comfortable enough to keep carrying all day.  I'm using it on a Canon D60 and am nothing but pleased with the performance so far</review_text>
I purchased this lens for my Canon EOS 20D digital camera and so far I really like it.  It focuses fast and produces very sharp, clear images.  As with any longer lens you do have to be careful about camera shake; I've had a few images come out blurry but these are usually interior shots.  I really like the 28-200mm focal length range and find the lens to be very versatile for framing wide shots of buildings or landscapes to zoomed in shots for portraits or close detail shots.  The lens feels solid and appears to be well constructed, which is typical for Canon products.  For the price range, this is an excellent lens.  You can only do better by spending considerable more money on an IS lens</review_text>
I am a railfan, and having a very large range of zoom is important.  Shooting on the fly from a distant bridge shot to a closeup coming around the bend.  Focuses quickly too.  I have a Canon 10D and I HATE changing lenses because it gets dust inside the camera.  This 28-200mm is very practical for my hobby, and gets used on Waterfall and other outdoor scenery too.One note of interest, it is hard to get super-sharp background details with this lens, compared to any of the IS lenses or the L Series lenses, (a buddy and I shot the same closeup shot with an ore dock way in the background and the dock details looked a LOT sharper on his 28-135 IS lens).  Same Camera, same settings.  Closeup Focused object looked great on both, just when looking at the out-of-focus objects, the IS lenses seemed to do better.This lens is worth the price in my opinion, and superb for amateurs and hobby-photographers like myself.  But those looking for a touch more in distant details out of the focused field, the 28-135 IS USM lens by Canon seems to be a little step ahead of this.  The L series lenses, of course, are in a league of their own</review_text>
I am generally pleased with this lense, and if I could only carry one lense with my digital rebel, this is the one I would take</review_text>
We use it with a Canon 300D.  It gives good picture quality and are quick to focus.  Become a 44-320 on the 300D.  A good buy</review_text>
From portraits to sporting events, this is wonderful multi-purpose lens.  Prior to purchasing the lens, I asked a buddy of mine (photographer for the Philadelphia Flyers, NHL Hockey Team and long time Canon user) if this was a quality lens.  He told me to go for it as it is the best buy for the money and that distortion and spherical abberation are extremely minimal with this lens.  Truth be told, I've never seen an EF lens I didn't like</review_text>
I found this lens resonable as an all around lens, although when it comes to portaits or close-ups I would recomend the Canon 100mm f/2.8 macro. If your looking for a camera to use it on I would highly recomend the Canon 10D WOW</review_text>
I needed more reach than 400mm gave on my EOS 1D, so I purchased Canon's 500mm f/4L IS three years ago. It's incredibly sharp out to the corners at f/4. With bird and mammal portraits, you see every feather, every hair.The lens is light enough to use on a Wimberley Sidekick. Some claim to be able to handhold it, but I think its eight-plus pound weight is a bit much for that. I carry mine in a long lens case with backpack harness from Kinesis Gear.This lens' image stabilization works very well. I've used it on a tripod with one-second shutter speeds and good telephoto technique, and gotten sharp, publishable images.With an EOS 1D or 1Ds, lens and camera are rain-proof in mild storms.I also got mine through Adorama, and had no problem with delivery or post-sale advertising.If you buy one expensive long lens for wildlife, choose this one.</review_text>
Let's face it.  This is a great lens.But, I want to warn you about Adorama.I highly recommend that you choose a better vendor.Adorama is SLOW.They don't respond to emails.They took a week to ship my lens when they said it was in stock.Their customer service is non-existent.Their prices are no better than anyone else.Almost every time I've ordered from them they have contacted me to try and sell me more stuff. (Which further delays shipping)A totally unprofessional organization.I for one will never order from them again.Good luck if you do</review_text>
After noting the captions of exceptional photographs that appeared in nature and photography magazines were often shot with this lens, I began to read the reviews.  Based on the uniformly excellent reviews, I bought this lens and spent two weeks this January in the Florida Everglades taking pictures of birds.  Based upon my experience with the lens, I would rate this as second in sharpness and contrast only to the 300 mm f2.8 Canon L series lens.  The lens is handholdable for short periods to shoot birds in flight, but it is best suited for use on a solid tripod with a Wimberley tripod head to allow tracking of birds in flight</review_text>
Good advice from the other reviewer about the picture.That having been said I have three of these and really wouldn't want to do without them.These clean my camera's screen and the glass on my lenses without a scratch every time.In my opinion almost a must have in your bag!Good luck</review_text>
Amazon states;Product Dimensions: 13.0 x 10.0 x 7.0 inchesThere was no photo (until I uploaded one) so I thought this was the size stated, but turned out to be one of the little keychain bags with about a 5x5 cloth inside.Works fine, just not what I thought it was, and didn't want someone else to think it was large also.  See my photo for actual size next to some keys.Update 4/8/2006I see they added a photo of what I THOUGHT I was getting when I ordered..  see my uploaded photo in "customer" photos to see what they sent.Not sure WHICH you would get at this point..Edit 07/29/2006I see now and then the price I paid jumps from about $5 to $20 for some strange reason.. I have to add that it's a good product @ $5 but not for $20</review_text>
I use it for my s70..It works over 10meters (thats right!) and from the back too, so I am very happy with it..I bought it today so maybe it is improved now..</review_text>
Great for using with a tripod, now you can be in the pictures too</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
I am 67 years old and started out in photography as a kid with a contact printer and a box camera. I have had all types of cameras over the years, mostly 35mm film Canon slr's. I too bought all sorts of these 5-7 MP point and shoot digital cameras before returning to my true love, SLR's. I have had my digital Canon Rebel XT about a month now and I can't keep my hands off of it. It lacks nothing. Although the kit lense is good, I bought a 28-135 Canon zoom lense with image stabilizion and have produced stunning photo's with it. I love the way you can use the 7 points to focus, I mainly use only the center point with focus lock and never get an out of focus picture. I guess the nicest thing for me is that I now don't have the urge to buy every point and shoot camera that is paraded out on QVC or HSN that has a "wonderful" new feature like "low light or non-shake." This Canon has every good feature in the known universe and you can't outgrow it. Its a camera that will let you be as good as you can be, it won't hold you back. The battery life is great, the built in flash is good but I bought a 430EX and that's even better. I never figure I'm wasting money buying accessories for this camera as it will be my main squeeze for many years to come. I always missed my 35mm Canon slr's and now feel that I have an old friend back again, only much much better. Believe me, you can't go wrong getting this camea, its beyond description...</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
I already had a digital rebel and was able to sell it to a co-worker and use the proceeds for my new rebel xt. Faster, lighter, better. Simple review. It took everything that was great about my digital rebel and made it better. Some complain that it feels "too light"...OK...it that's your thing. To me, it's still solid and the pictures speak for themselves.Now, with the addition of the 10 MP rebel xt, I'll bet the original xt can be purchased for an even better price.No downsides that I can think of..</review_text>
I have had digital cameras for about 5 years and still own an Olympus 5 megapixel, and a Casio 7 megapixel. Seems like Megamixels alone just don't cut it for me.I read about the rebel XT in a magazine and looked up the user reviews here on Amazon.I decided to go and buy one and though I am really a novice, I am extremely impressed. I have never seen such stunning quality or realistic colors from a Point & Shoot. I started with the basic settings and love the results.I am slowly progressing to more advanced settings and am getting better everyday.Even a novice who just wants stunning photography will be amazed with this camera.I also bought a Tamron 75-300 Autofocus zoom lens (look for it here on Amazon.com) and after lots of practice, have been able to take some great pictures.I have a brother in the UK who is also into digital photography, and after seeing some (full reso) photos I sent him, he rushed out and bought the XTi (called the EOS 400D across the pond)and is amazed with it.I still have a lot to learn but really cannot fault this camera. The included software is also excellent.For the record, some reviews seem to think it is too small to hold, I have big hands and don't have any problems at all. I admit though this is the first SLR I have ever owned.I will still keep a point and shoot to keep in my travel bag for spontaneous photography but I am in love with my Rebel XT!!This camera costs quite chunk of change but I think it is well worth it and I do recommend it to everyone</review_text>
I LOVE,LOVE,LOVE this camera. If you have teens in the house watchout!, they'll definitely want this camera. It is easy to use and well worth the money.  When my camera arrived, I was amazed at how small and compact it was.  I let my son check it out first and within no time we were both using it. I really love the movie feature.  You can record anywhere and everywhere and the sound is excellent.  My last camera only recorded, but didn't have any sound. It was nothing compared to this Sony.  The 8.1 mega pixels makes the pictures come out great.  My sons and I love it.  They record all the time and take numerous pictures.  I also like that it has internal memory, so if you don't have a memory stick yet, you can still take pictures. The 2.5 inch screen is perfect.  It makes it so easy to get a good shot all the time.  I have had no problems with this purchase at all.  The only thing I would recommend to Sony is to make something that would protect the 2.5 inch screen from getting scratches, just like they do with the optical lens. It is always closed and covered when its not in use. But besides that small detail there, the Sony is a GREAT investment.  I will definitely buy Sony again, especially when I decide to update or if I'm looking for a gift to give.</review_text>
Best camera I have ever owned. Easy to use even with all the features. Don't be afraid to buy this one</review_text>
The DSCW100 8.1 was a great shirt pocket point and shoot with easy menu directions to the added features built in</review_text>
I bought this camera several weeks ago and have test-driven it in the forest preserves of Chicago and in Upper Michigan.  It does a terrific job.  I am an artist who studied film in school and yet never used a digital camera.  I wanted something that was kind of between a point and shoot and an SLR.  I wanted some manual functions to fool around with, and yet I also wanted the easy shot for family photos and such.  I didn't want to start my digital experience on an expensive SLR, so this proved to be a great buy for me.  It's very small and compact and yet very powerful.</review_text>
If you are looking for a digital camera with many high level functions and features, the Sony  Cybershot 8.1 mp is a great buy.  It is highly affordable and takes photos with excellent precision, day or night.  The camera is very user friendly and the ease of use is a plus.  The memory stick is sold separately and is a must purchase accessory if you plan to take many photos.  I am happy with the clarity of the photos and the video functionality that you may want to have handy.  The camera is an excellent buy!!!</review_text>
I bought this little camera recently from Amazon. Thanks for tremendous service and speedy delivery, Amazon.The Sony DSC-W100 is terrific. It is very simple to operate. The menu system is well-organized and easy to understand. Inserting the battery and memory card is a snap. The Zeiss lens system yields incredibly sharp photos even at the automatic setting. The flash is pretty powerful,too! I took some shots in a rather dark restaurant, and the pictures came out really nice and clear. The macro function is superb with crisp, well-defined details at very close range.The powerup time on this camera is fast as well as time between shots. There is very little shutter lag, and you usually get the picture you intended to get. Autofocus can be a little slower until it "finds" the target perfectly in certain situations. But this is no big deal compared to older digicams.I like being able to switch quickly from viewing the pictures in replay mode back to camera mode by simply tapping the shutter release button lightly. You are quickly ready for another picture.The camera is not miniature and weighs nearly six ounces, which is not extremely light--but is comfortable to carry or place in purse or pocket.I also have a Canon Digital Rebel XT, and this little camera does take sharper pictures. Of course, you do not have the versatility of the SLR, but it is a great everyday camera to take along with you for all the shots you would otherwise miss. I highly recommend this camera and recommend purchase from Amazon.Update: I have now used this camera in the video mode. WOW. It produces incredibly sharp videos with a fast frame rate that looks terrific on our television. A multi-purpose cable is supplied with the camera that allows USB 2.0 and audio/video hookup. You must decide what zoom level before you start shooting your video because once you start, you cannot zoom in and out. If you have a 1 Gb memory stick Pro Duo you can take about 12 minutes of video. I want to get the 2 Gb Pro Duo stick which allows almost 25 minutes of video. This would be ideal to take along when you want to switch between still and video shots and keep your video shots consistent and consecutive in order. You must use the PRO Duo stick for the high quality (fine) video mode</review_text>
Photography afficionados have long had two choices when it comes to buying a digital camera: a tiny everything-automatic portable camera that takes decent pictures or a brick-sized everything-manual professional camera that takes fantastic pictures. Almost a decade after the introduction of the consumer digital camera, Sony has finally taken a swing at combining the best qualities of both worlds into one package, and the DSC-W100 is a solid first effort.Sony has had the tiny part down for some time - dimensionally, the W100 is on par with other recent Cybershot models and competitor brands' offerings, and features the now-common 2.5" bright LCD display with a minimum of buttons on the back. Aside from the attractive mini-diamondplate face and chrome trim, visually there's little to set this camera apart among the others at your local electronics counter.Initial toying with the camera doesn't dispel any first impressions. All the prerequisite automatic features are there, the buttons are smartly arranged so all the most common functions are right at hand, it's obviously a point-and-shoot camera. But it's when you begin to delve into the features that you realize that the W100 is something entirely different.The usual mode knob is there on the back with the Auto mode and Scenes modes, but now there's Program and Manual modes - something standard issue on professional cameras but radically new for a point-and-shoot. This means you can use any combination of auto or manual settings on all functions to get a shot. For example, shooting in a dimly lit room, you can use a slow shutter flash to even out lightning, or turn off the flash with a slower shutter for richer colors, or raise the ISO so you can get a steady shot with a higher shutter speed, or just put it in auto and shoot, etc. All the different possibilities previously reserved just for professional cameras are now at your disposal. The camera is as simple or as involved as you want, and it still fits in your pocket.I've owned several other digital cameras, both portable and pro, and they've all had somewhat manual features, but the W100 takes it to a new level. Mounting the W100 on a tripod, I attempted to get a long exposure shot of the night sky, something all the other digital cameras have done adequately. Manually setting the shutter speed, the camera displayed the overall exposure value as I adjusted - the camera was telling me before even touching the shutter button if the resulting picture would be dark, bright, or even. I set the shutter as slow as it could go and using the two-second timer, fired away. The picture was amazing; though only a few stars were visible to the eye, the W100 caught the light of well over a hundred. I noticed a bit of radial blur on the stars around the border of the image, only to realize later that the camera was pointed North - the shutter speed was so slow that I was actually *capturing the rotation of the Earth*. Now THAT'S manual.Also of special note is the W100's digital "Smart Zoom". As a general rule with digital cameras, you should disable the digital zoom feature, as zooming in beyond the optical range produces a cropped and therefore lower-quality image. But here again Sony has a trick up it's sleeve, by cropping from an 8.1 megapixel capture regardless of where you have the image size set. If you shoot a 5 megapixel-size picture that utilizes the digital zoom, the image is actually captured at a full 8.1 Mps and then your 5Mp picture is cropped from that. The result is an optically-zoomed clear picture. This also means that at the lowest image size, you can get a full 15x zoom (the equivalent of a 500+ mm telephoto - in a pocket camera!). It's an absolutely brilliant technique that you'll probably see on all future digital cameras.Sony still has a bit more work to do on the pocket SLR idea. Included with your purchase is an accessories catalog featuring an array of lenses and filters, none of which are compatible with the W100. It's typical of Sony to have a bizarre distribution of features in any given product lineup, but it would seem obvious that the most SLR-like camera should have SLR-like accessories. And W100 owners should disable the Auto Focus Illumination light when shooting people; the blazing red light is great for focusing on inanimate subjects, but could probably be used as a tactical light to blind assailants in a pinch.Overall, the W100 is a remarkable newcomer that truly raises the bar for what you can expect from a point and shoot pocket camera. Novices are accommodated with full automation, and can learn gradually by trying out individual manual functions while other settings remain automatic. And experienced photogs will be right at home with the Manual mode and wide range of settings. Five stars for what is hopefully Sony's work in progress</review_text>
Unlike some of the other reviewers, I've had no problems with this battery...and I've had it over a year.  I'm a pro photographer, so it has been recharged over and over and over and still holds a charge.  Maybe it is better because I tend to totally drain my batteries before recharging?  I also use this battery in the Dual Battery Grip alongside the Canon and other off brand batteries</review_text>
I bought this battery as a replacement for an old Canon BP511A.  It lasted about a couple of months before it started not taking a charge.  Complete waste of money</review_text>
Ive had it for a couple months now. I notice no difference between it and my canon bp511. My only gripe with it is its cheazy silver plastic color, but hey, who looks at your batteries</review_text>
Bought one of these a year ago.  Works about the same as the Canon battery I got with the camera. I alternate between the Canon and the Lenmar batteries and haven't noticed any difference</review_text>
I didn't think it would be, but this lens winds up on my Rebel XT most of the time.  The lens is compact and performs well indoors in low light - best to use autofocus set to center point only. 35mm focal length is a nice general purpose focal length on a 1.6 crop DSLR.This lens is sharp at f2.0 and really sharp by f2.5-f2.8. I have a lot of experience and test my lenses with tripod/mirror lockup, I'm not just saying sharp at f2.0 - it IS sharp. I considered the 24mm f2.8, but f2.8 is a pretty slow prime at wider focal lengths - loses a lot of the low light advantage.I am impressed with the colors I have been getting from this lens, wasn't really expecting the colors to be so good at such a low price point - doesn't have the L lens coatings, but Canon did  the colors right.The autofocus speed is pretty good - not as fast as ring USM lenses - and it is a little noisy/buzzy.I currently own 7 Canon lenses (2 Ls) including 4 primes - this 35mm is definitely a top bang-for-the-buck lens. (another is the 28-105 f3.5-4.5 USM zoom - and I don't even like zooms)Looking for a low-light prime? For 240 bucks at Amazon - just do it</review_text>
Super lightweight, sharp wide open, short minimum focus distance, fast AF. Decent bokeh. Ability to take pictures in very low light , Super cheap when compared to it's 35mm f1.4 L $1000+ brother and at 1.6 on digital its a normal lenssee some shots:  http://www.pbase.com/2bruce/gillin</review_text>
Bought this lens as a 'standard' prime lens for my Digital Rebel XT.  What I found was that it was a fast, sharp, and lightweight lens that made the camera great for long walks.  This would be the perfect lens to take to an amusement park, hiking, or biking where size and weight are a concern.I've also used this lens for macro photography and portraits where it shines.  The F2 Bokeh is wonderful and center sharpness is superb even at F2, much better at F4 which is what I use most of the time.On the negative side, autofocus is noisy.  To compare, it's like a drug-crazed wasp trapped in a matchbox.  Maybe a mosquito buzzing close to your ear.  It's not louder than the shutter, though.  If this were a film camera and I was trying to take candid shots, I'd complain more, but it's a 56mm equivelant lens.Another negative is build quality.  They really should make the body of this lens out of thicker plastic.  No reason to skimp there as the 'feel' of the lens certainly gives you much more confidence for very little weight penalty.  Make it feel solid.I've got a 52-55mm step-up ring on it as I've got a slew of 55mm filters.  This also helps in that the lens cap is further from the body of the lens and easier to remove and replace.If Canon had made a faster lens in 28mm at the same price point, I would have gone that way.  For my tastes, it would have been preferable to have that extra field of view assuming the quality was as good</review_text>
silver,light,sturdy..carries camera securely from the neck or on a belt</review_text>
This was delivered so fast that it was unbelievable.  They sent exactly what was pictured and it works perfectly</review_text>
Was extremely pleased with the prompt service as well as the pric</review_text>
The battery pack arrived quite quickly, and we were delighted to be paying far less for it than the manufacturer was charging for a product that works just fine</review_text>
nothing wrong with this battery.  personally i would prefer my camera to use AA but battery life for lithium ion batteries is pretty good.  no complaints here except for the price.  but necessity made me purchase a second one, not because my other one died, just cuz sometimes i need a spare</review_text>
Exceptional perfomance and long life makes this battery a great deal.Always good to have a back -up and this battery comes in handy</review_text>
I received in a short amount of time and  was just what I needed. This way I am able to have my camera turned on for almost a full day using this as a backup Nothing is worse than needing that little more time to be able to get the enire family reunion and unable to add the last family into the scrapbook but this cured it all</review_text>
Battery works great, shipping from amazon took too long. I purchased other items the same day from other retailers and they were delivered 5 days sooner than the amazon item</review_text>
We bought this as a second battery for the Sony W50 digital camera. These batteries, in this camera, last a LONG time. Having a spare allows us to keep one in the external charger and swap quickly when needed. It is an original Sony product so fits and works perfectly</review_text>
The NP-BG1 type G lith pack had good picture life , but I'd carry a spare if your going to use your cameras movie feature</review_text>
I bought this for my Nikon D70 Digital SLR with 18-70mm Nikkor lens.  It works great except that the lens cap does not work with the polarizer filter on.  It works with the other three filters: ND4, ND8, and UV.  The price still beats buying four filters individually.  I like the case also</review_text>
Sure beats the price of buying a Polarizer, UV and 2 ND filters individually</review_text>
Have had this bag for a year now & love it. This is what I carry in the main compartment:Nikon D50 with 18-200mm lens attached.Wide angle 10-20mm lensDepending on where I'm going - either the D50 charger, the speedlight and other little accessories OR my Canon SD550 elph with its charger.The top compartment holds extra batteries, cleaning supplies & filters.The small zipper compartment on the flap is a little bit tight for anything other than a cleaning cloth, extra memory, ID's/Credit Cards.CONS:Being a woman... the strap isnt all that flattering going diagonally across the front, but I usually carry it in a sort of "1/2 slung" position or fully around in front anyway (unless I'm hiking).It could be a little snug inside if you are trying to carry alot of accessory items.Would have liked to see the padded portion of the main strap a little longer so padding is still on shoulder when bag is in the front slung position (since I carry it that way alot).PROS:Compact yet perfect fit for my camera body, 2 lens, & accessories.Very snug & secure on the back - easily hike, ride a bike or even a horse without fear.Had no trouble getting used to "slinging" it around front. Actually can use bag as a kind of shelf for stabilizing elbows while composing shot.Superior Lowepro design - great quality, sturdy zippers, love the rain cover.Note: I did try the slingshot 200 version 1st and found that it was just too big for my needs so exchanged it for this smaller version - no regrets, cant imagine I'll ever need another bag.</review_text>
I compared a lot of bags for use with my new Nikon D50.   I wanted a bag that was versatile and could be carried on hikes.   The Lowepro Slingshot is definitely the bag for my camera!   Plenty of room for a couple of lens, the battery charger, and other small items.</review_text>
Just got the Slingshot 100 for my Nikon D50 with kit lens. Previously, I bought a Nikon bag but as this was just a bag to fit the camera and nothing else, I found this unpractical. The D50 fits perfectly in the slingshot 100, though I had to readjust the velcro camera compartment dividers first. This was quite disappointing as I have almost no free space in my camera compartment anymore!I guess the Canon 350D, which has a smaller body, will fit in this bag better. Anyway I have no other lenses yet (the 18-200 still on order) so that all my gear (battery, memory cards etc.) finds a place in this bag. The bag fits very well, is comfortable and is well-made. Before buying though, do check if your camera and lens will fit</review_text>
This is my first review on Amazon because I've bought products and never really felt like they deserved a review.  I would say I did a thorough search for a bag that would fit me.  I have a Nikon D50 with the 18-55mm lens and a 70-300mm zoom lens.  I originally had a large Nikon bag that was a pain to carry around.  It was inconvenient to carry and to access my camera.So when searching for a bag I wanted something that was compact, easy to carry, could hold my gear neatly and securely, and have my camera easily accessible for those moments when you want to take a quick shot and put it right back.  I went to camera stores and tried on bags, looked all over the internet for reviews and finally came across the Lowepro Slingshot 100AW.  It had everything that I was looking for plus more.Besides being able to hold my camera gear, it was able to hold my battery charger, cleaning supplies, extra batteries, filters, and has a built in all weather cover.  Even with all of that packed I still have space for my wallet, cellphone and keys, thus freeing up my pants pockets.  The great thing about the bag is that it is able to give me that extra stability when taking photos when bag is slung around to the front of me.The bag is so well designed that there's no worry about having the bag opening up and having all your expense gear fall out.  The opening where you remove the camera has straps that prevent it from opening all the way by accident.All in all I am very satisfied with the bag.  I would recommend it to anyone but if you have more than a couple of lenses to your photography arsenal I would upgrade to the Slingshot 200AW.</review_text>
This fit my Olympus E500 great.  I recently took an overseas trip and this bag was great for traveling and on the go trips. And the weatherproof cover really came in handy a few time when it started to rain unexpectly.  The only thing that was a bit odd is the strap that you can wear around your body.  It comes up the chest at an odd angle, my husband didn't have a problem with it but I did.  So maybe thats just a girl thing....  :)Most times I didn't use the extra strap, just threw it over one shoulder and went.  The bag held 2 lenses, extra battery, charger, and I had room for keys, wallet and a few little personal odds and ends.  My friend was so impressed with it, he is buying one today.Some one asked if they can attach a tripod to the bag.  There aren't really any extra loops on the outside of bag.  A stadard tripod won't fit insidde.  You would have to rig something up on the outside yourself.  IMO I don't that that it would work very well but you can try.</review_text>
This bag is very sturdy and padded.  The description is pretty scanty, but I took a chance and bought it.  Glad I did.  The bag holds my JVC GR-DVL805U mini DV camcorder, the strap, battery, AC adaptor cord, 4 tapes, the remote, and all connector cables.  It's kind of a tight squeeze with all those accesories, but the bag is compact, comfortable, and easy to carry, with the camcorder still being protected.  The bag also comes with a lifetime guarantee against defect.  The only thing that could be improved is that it's awkward to get the camcorder in or out of the bag while carrying it with the strap over the shoulder; the zipper is hard to reach and goes all the way around the top. That's the only thing that could be improved, and could be considered a safety feature, because the camcorder certainly won't come out unexpectedly.  The bag is also very durable and nice looking. I recommend it</review_text>
Bought this Remote about a month ago. It does what it says. You can even use it from behind. Great little device for the price</review_text>
No need to run and guess whether the self-timer has already fired when I want to have a picture together with my girlfriend. Extremely useful when taking shots in low light conditions with long exposure, too. Works perfectly with my D50</review_text>
I love this remote. I find it very convenient to take self portraits and night time long exposure shots. Unfortunately I lost the remote during my trip to smokies and still have no clue how and where - might have slipped from my pocket in a hurry. I have ordered a second one now. It is so tiny that you do not feel the weight or volume in your pocket or camera bag. I wish it had a strap/thread or hole so that it can be attached to key chain or camera or etc.</review_text>
I love using it, long exposure, great for bulb. Cheap and cool.</review_text>
Works as advertised. I use it extensively for environmental work where I want to remain a short distance from my camera. It's great for portraits where I am near and concentrating on my subject and can shoot remotely without losing contact with model. The remote also came in handy for several self-promotions where I seated seating myself in an office atmosphere.</review_text>
I use it with my Nikon d50 and it works as promised.  I took some long exposure shots with it last night and they came out crisp.  I am also a parent and I find that using a remote is much easier than setting the timer and rangling a toddler in place within the limited window of time.  I recommend this device to anyone and I find it quite affordable.Like most reviewers, I think it would have been great if it was an included accessory</review_text>
this is a wonderful filter.clean your front element, place this filter on it, and now you never have to think about it again.  the thread fit is very good on both ends of it.the canon 67mm cap fits on the front of this filter perfectly.  there's even a slight raised metal lip so that the cap doesn't sit against the filter glass.well engineered, and worth the money</review_text>
15 years of photography experience here... The Sigma 15mm fisheye has been extensively reviewed and compared by other websites (go ahead and search) and this is a very good product. The canon has a tighter focus and a *touch* faster in focusing, but with the massive depth of field with this lens, it's not a problem at all.Be aware that if you use this on a 1.6 crop factor digital SLR that has APS sensors like my 20D or digital rebel, then the fisheye effect is not as pronounced on film or 1.3 or full frame digital SLRs.Watch lens flare should direct sunlight hit it also...but that happens to any lens that has protruding or bulbous lenses.This is a much better bang for the buck lens than the canon equivalent which costs significantly more. If you search around, you can find much lower prices on this lens</review_text>
i am a fisheye lens addict.  i have had this lens for a few months now, and i use it for almost everything.  the lens was worth every bit i payed for it.  and the sigma customer service was so fast and easy.  the lens takes clear sharp pictures everytime.  this lens takes the best skateboarding and band pictures!  if you are considering this lens, i would definately reccomend it.  i love how the pictures can either be circular or full frame.  its a great investment......</review_text>
This is my first review on here.Bought the marine pack for a houseboat trip for my Sony DSC-N1 camera.  It is very solid and feels great.Somehow I mistakenly thought before obtaining it that the touchscreen could still be used when the camera was installed.  Though that's not accurate, a good number of other functionality is retained (you can switch between movie/camera/review modes, zoom, etc.).It worked very well for the trip, and it took fantastic photos.  We even took several movies going down water slides and diving into the water (which isn't suggested in the manuals) but still everything turned out perfectly.All in all, I'd easily recommend this unit</review_text>
The marine pack for the DSC-N1 is good enough to get the job done.  The camera has a special housing setting to change the functionality of the camera so that it can be used in the case.  Unfortunately, this means losing the ability to use manual settings.  Luckily, the camera does fine figuring out its own settings, though occasionally to get the picture just right you need to do it yourself.  I have taken the case to 130 feet several times and have never experienced a leak</review_text>
I did a lot of research in picking out a camera and wish I had known about this camera before purchasing a Nikon P3 (with WiFi). I happened to receive a refurbished SD700 right before our honeymoon and took both to test them out. What better place than Kauai to take some great shots...So, after about the first day of shooting I came to the conclusion that the Canon was a better camera hands down!!! As a matter of fact it is the best camera I've owned and I'll never get another brand again. There were several things that set this camera apart from others:1. Picture quality on scene modes (beautiful beach and floral mode)2. Picture quality on auto (true sign of a good camera)3. 4X zoom (unbelievable - best feature...took pictures of a lighthouse from a mile away and looked like I was right in front taking it. I also used camera as binoculars to see a mountain goat in Wimea Canyon and picture was unbelievably clear)4. Battery life5. User controls and softwareI really can't find anything bad to say about this camera. I didn't get a chance to even read the manual before our trip and figured out all the "bells and whistles" fairly easily. As a point and shoot camera, this Canon delivers a professional quality like no other! Definitely a great purchase</review_text>
With 2 toddlers, I'm the type of person who likes to have a camera with me to capture those unexpected moments on film. The ELPH cameras are ideal for this because they're small and lightweight. I used a 3.2MP Canon ELPH before this one, and I thought the 3.2 was good until I started using this new one. The clarity and stability control on the SD700 is great! And downloading the photos to my computer takes only seconds. I highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I am not much of a photographer. I found this camera easy to use and my pix are just great. Believe me, it's the camera.  The stabilizer thing works to give clear focus almost every time. I can even put the pix up on the computer and send them easily.  I'm thrilled. You do need to upgrade to a 1 mgb. memory card when you buy the camera.</review_text>
I gave this camera to my husband for his birthday.  It is the first digital camera we have owned though my college age son is on his third one - all have been Canon digital Elphs.  This is such a great little gadget - it is smaller than a pack of cigarettes, has a big screen on which to view your photo(s), is easy to learn to use, and great for taking on trips - as long as you remember to keep the wrist strap on your wrist while you are using it so it doesn't drop and break.I also purchased a small Canon digital printer which is great for us to take to our aging parents, take photos, print them immediately and leave them with our parents to enjoy immediately.  Every Canon product we own has not disappointed us and this little camera is no exception!</review_text>
I love this camera.  It does everything you'd want a compact point and shoot camera to do.  Perfect for taking pictures of my toddler.  Fits in your pocket and starts up in a split second.  Never miss another "Kodak moment".</review_text>
Worth the money in every way.  Sturdy, compact, great pictures, easy to use, easy to upload images</review_text>
It is a great compact camera with a good zoom.  I can now leave a larger lens on my Nikon DX 70 and use this for closer shots.  YOu do need to try different settings to make sure you get the color you want. I really like it for most general quick shots, carry it wth me most of the time</review_text>
No blurry pics!!!!  it's wonderful.  I love the different options, it's easy to use, and it's sleek and small.  I do have a problem with red eye - even red eye reduction doesn't work... but it's a great little camera</review_text>
I mainly use this when taking landscape shots where I want to either make the clouds pop or liven the sky up some (remember it works best 90 degrees from the sun.) I also put it on when shooting highly reflective vegetation or waterscapes that would otherwise cause blown-out highlights. One other little secrete is to use this when shooting waterfalls since it will allow you to shoot at slower shutter speeds thus increasing the wispy waterfall look.</review_text>
Polarizing filters are used to eliminate glare on non-metallic surfaces like glass or water. They can also be used to increase the contrast and color saturation of your image. I use my polarizer not only to eliminate glare, but also to make skies a nice shade of blue or to get some "pop" out of clouds.There are so many options to consider when purchasing the Polarizing filter for your needs. For instance, linear vs. circular, film or digital versions, or quality vs. price.If you are making use of a TTL or auto-focusing system, Circular Polarizers are designed to work with those features. Linear Polarizers has their uses, but they are manufactured differently and may not work. Unless you are certain, just get a Circular Polarizing filter.There are some digital circular polarizers on the market. I am not sure what makes a cir-pl lens better for digital as opposed to film. I use a Canon 20D Digital SLR and see no problems caused by using a supposed non-digital filter on a digital camera.Most of the time, when it comes to filters; you get what you pay for. Does that mean you need an expensive polarizer? Of course not, just be sure to get the right filter for your needs. What ever polarizing filter you get, make sure it is color neutral to prevent unwanted tinting. Spending more on a color balanced filter will save time in post. If you need multiple filter sizes, consider saving money by using step down rings.Currently I use the Hoya Pro1 filters, as the Canon polarizing filters I previously owned were without question bulkier and heavier. The weight might not seem like much, but when you stick all your items in a backpack all the extra bits of weight add up quickly. I can spend a good amount of time with my equipment on my back so this is a big concern for me. When it came down to the images, at times I would see a browning tint on my photos. The tint is easy to clean up in Photoshop CS2, but I don't see that problem with the Hoya Pro1 filter.Overall, I would recommend against the Canon polarizing filters. I originally thought, "it is Canon, it must be quality." Since then I have replaced all my Canon filters. This filter works, but comes at a cost of disadvantages to other similarly priced filters.PROS:Can be used for film or digital camerasEliminates internal reflections and ghostingCONS:Bulky and heavyNot neutral color balance</review_text>
Obviously, I am enamored with the Nikon D80.  As one who has extensively used the D100, D70s, and D200, I was curious as to how the D80 would "shake out" in comparison with these fine cameras.  The answer is that it does very well indeed.The most obvious improvement in D80 over the D70s and D100 is the upgrade from 6.1 to 10.2 Megapixels--the same as its "Big Brother," the D200  This is not a major issue for many users, as a 6.1 MP image (uncropped) looks essentially exactly the same as a 10.2 MP image.  However, if the user intends to crop images in post-processing, the larger amount of resolution becomes important--the more megapixels the more detail when images are cropped.  Shooters of wildlife, for example, will appreciate the additional resolution of the D80, as it is often necessary to photograph wildlife at a distance and then crop the image to cause the subject to dominate the frame.The other very obvious D80 improvements are the larger viewfinder and larger rear-LCD.  These are very welcome improvements, also borrowed from the D200.  The viewfinder is wide, bright, and a literal joy to use.  Combined with the 11-point autofocus system (basically the same as that of the D200 although with some differences in options) the viewfinder makes the D80 a powerhouse camera for moving subjects, or for framing the subject in places other than the center of the image.The autofocus is fast and sure.  I literally never use manual focus with the D80--the autofocus is just too good not to use for almost every conceivable situation.The 2.5 inch rear LCD is bright and vivid--a joy to use.  This too, as mentioned above, is borrowed from the D200.  The menu selections in the D80 closely track those of the D200 and are largely pretty intuitive for anyone who is somewhat familiar with the Nikon system.A few nits.  First of all, the D80 does not have a selection for focus-priority continuous focus mode.  This is unfortunate, as such an option (present on the D200) allows fast action shots using continuous-focus with surety that the subject is, in fact, in focus.  Happily, this absence (which I predict and hope Nikon will correct in a later firmware revision) is not a huge loss.  I have shot hundreds of images of fast-flying birds using continuous focus with the D80 and the images are almost all perfectly focused.  The user can trust the D80 in continuous focus mode, focus priority or no.Nikon chose to equip the D80 with SD cards rather than CF cards.  Why Nikon did this is a mystery to many of us as the D80 clearly is an upgrade to the wonderful D70s, which uses CF cards.  Further, the D80 is a fantastic backup camera for D200 users, and the D200, of course, also uses CF cards rather than SD cards.  CF cards would have been a more logical choice in my opinion for the D80.  Fortunately, the cost of these media is dropping so fast that this is less of an issue than it would have been a few years ago.The D80 sucks up power a lot faster than the D70s.  That 2.5 inch LCD entails higher power use as a price.  Most users will want to own a spare battery.As to ergonomics, the D80 is terrific!  I have just finished an 8 day stay on Maui, Hawaii, during which my D80 was literally always with me.  The weight of the camera is low, and its bulk, reasonable.  There is no digital SLR I would rather carry for an extended period than the compact D80.  The placement of the various controls is excellent, and pretty intuitive.  The quality of the D80 body construction is standard Nikon-Prosumer grade, which is to say, excellent albeit not as heavy-duty as the metal-body D200.Overall, the D80 is destined to become one of the great Nikon cameras that will find a place with users all over the world</review_text>
It doesn't get any better at this price point. Excellent build quality, very easy to use, and intuitive. The optics are simply brilliant for a kit lense (135MM).Went from a Canon Rebel film SLR which I loved, but when I tried to move into the XTi, there was just no comparison between the XTi and the D80. You could immediately feel the difference in quality and functionality. And the auto-clean feature is absolute marketing crap from Canon. THe CMOS shakes off the dust, but then where does the dust go? Bologna feature, not to mention the Flash nearly knocks your eye out when it pops up on the Canon XTi.The D80 blows it away, and for it's price there is nothing out there better. If your in the market at this price point, or relatively close, just go for it. You WILL NOT regret this purchase.</review_text>
You are reading a non technical review from your average fun photographer. So don't expect a lot of technical stuff. I finally stepped up from a Fuji S9000. I have loved my Fuji cameras ease of use and the colors they produce. I was a little reluctant to spend the kind of money it takes to get into the D80. I am thrilled I did. I finally have a digital camera that when the kids do something I catch it as opposed to the camera taking the shot after they have left the room. Super fast. A few Saturdays ago I was outside in our wooded back yard taking pictures of the changing colors in the trees.When I went to take a shot the flash popped up. I said this isn't right the sun in filtering though the trees but I took the shot anyway. Wow the camera new what to do. Unbelievable photos. Easy to handle even with the pistolgrip MB D80. I also sprung for the SB600 flash and a great two dvd training program on Ebay. So don't be afraid to spend a couple of grand for the D80 and accesories. You will be glad you did. Happy in Alabam</review_text>
I recently test drove a D200 and was impressed with the useabiity of the camera. It is almost perfect. When buying I opted for the D80 because it has a very similar feature-set for less cash. Which meant additional money for lenses. OK, it doesn't shoot 5fps or have the alloy body with weather seals, but it does have the sensor and useability. It is light, quick and a joy to use. Changing settings such as ISO, WB and flash is almost as easy as the D200. This is a fine camera. And it uses SD cards - much more preferable than CF in my opinion. Worth every penny</review_text>
I just purchased this camera and lens (with another lens in a different set) and it has blown me away so far.  The pictures have been just incredible.  The focus, metering, exposure, flash, color balance...  Everything is perfect so far.I have mainly used the camera in full automatic mode and it really shines.  Its as simple as a point and shoot in this mode.  I have used the camera in difficult lighting situations and the photos have been incredible.  There is no noticeable shutter lag, which is very important to me.  I have a 6 yo son who goes from smiling one moment to looking away the next.  I have missed so many photos in the past due to shutter lag, but that is not a problem with this camera.  Another feature that helps is the continuous mode.  I can take 3 pics a second for up to 100 pics and then select the best.  Generally I find I can get a good pic in like 10-15 photos.I used to be a serious photo hobbist during the days of film, but always had problems finding a darkroom to develop my film.  The darkroom issue and the shear cost of film and paying for processing made me abandon the hobby.  But this camera is really bringing back the excitement of this hobby again without the trials and expense of the darkroom.The only downside in this camera is the price, but in this instance, you get what you pay for.  You might be able to save a buck or two with another camera, but I wouldn't even try.  I can't imagine a camera taking a better picture.By the way, I love this lens.  The 18 to 55 mm focal length is a nice every day lens.  Its much wider angle then you find on the point and shoot cameras, yet you can still get close.  I have a 55-200 mm lens as well, but I find I use the 18-55 lens more.  The shorter lens is great in confined spaces, where you can't easily back away from the subject, and its always better to move closer to your subject than use a long lens (unless you can't for safety reasons).My only regret is waiting so long to get a DSLR camera of this quality.  It has really opened up a old hobby for me.</review_text>
This camera is awesome! I upgraded from my D50 for the better sensor and more MP. Wow - am I amazed at the increase in quality. Say goodbye to that digital look. The extras are a lot of fun and I've only begun to play. B/W with various filters to name one. Very worth the money</review_text>
I've been looking at Digital SLRs ever since Canon came out with its 10D. Since then, there have been so many by so many companies. I've always been a Canon user. I have had 2 EOS bodies-the Elan IIE and the 7E. And also the Canon IX, its APS camera which I still have (its small viewfinder was a major disappointment).Anyhow the 30D came along, and its viewfinder was small too. The camera was still too large for me, and I just wasn't sold. Now the Nikon D80. It is narrower than the Canon 30D, and what is breathtaking is the panoramically big viewfinder. Such a delight to use. The 2.5" LCD seems to fit perfectly in the back: nothing bigger or smaller would be right.The pictures are fabulous. I bought a 2 GB Sandisk Ultra II card, which I thought would be fast. It takes about a half second for the picture to come on the LCD, but I'm not complaining. 2 GB is a big card. It can hold 500 photos using the Normal JPEG, large image. I'm sure the 1 GB would be faster. On the Canons, the onboard flashes never would use the advanced metering that the external flashes provided, but with the Nikon D80, I see such perfectly illuminated photos with the onboard flash.The 18-135 lens is something I jumped for. 28-200 in 35 mm size is quite a huge range, and yet the lens is not massive. I thought hard about the Image stablization you could get with the Canon 18-85 IS lens, but naaah, the 30D just does not measure up so I dropped that idea. There are always such things called tripods!! The entire camera, lens and battery feel just right, and not too heavy. The lens is excellent. The kit fits nicely into a relatively small Lowepro bag.This truly has been a camera worth waiting years for. 12 or 14 MP models are sure to come along in a couple of years, but I doubt that they can make the bodies any more compact; the file size is large enough as it is with 10 mega-pixel. The D80 is so perfect in shape I doubt Nikon can do much better. This is one fantastic digital SLR.Raj</review_text>
I was in the market to buy a new camera last year and walked into BestBuy alone just browsing.  I have an older EOS Canon Rebel 35mm Camera from 1992, and I loved that camera too.So this was my second camera purchase, and was not sure what I wanted, but I knew what I wanted to take pictures of.   I take this camera everywhere, vacations, visiting friends and family, take pictures of scenery, sporting events, and people.There are a lot of options on this camera that I don't know how to use, but can't wait to learn them too.  I upgraded my memory card to 1 GB so I can take a lot of pictures and not have to worry about running out of room.When I travel or go to a sporting event, I take anywhere from 75 to 200 piictures.  I get a lot of compliments on the camera and the photos it takes are great</review_text>
This camera has been called a "pro-sumer" model and you should really take that title seriously. The quality of the pictures that it takes are just as good as a professional digital camera of the same resolution. The trade off is that it is really not happy being thrown in a bag (or big pocket, if it fits). Why? Because Canon have given it a really annoying power-on switch that is guaranteed to turn the camera on 90% of the time when you're moving it to or from a bag. To compound this problem, the lens extends (in your bag), pushing off the lens cap and leaving it open for possible damage. So, if you think of this as a professional camera, to be kept in a real camera-case, you'll probably be okay. If you're somebody, like me, who likes to throw his camera in a bag or pocket, you're going to be annoyed by the power switch. That said, I do LOVE the quality of the pictures and all control that the camera gives you over every aspect of taking them.CONS: stupid power-on switch that always catches and turns camera on; lens cap is kind of loose and falls off easily; widest angle is maybe a little too telephoto still (around 35mm?)PROS: awesome pictures; tons of controls all over the outside of the camera allowing you to control a lot without having to resort to menus; professional features including flash hot-shoe and replaceable lens; great battery life; awesome picture</review_text>
The Canon G6 is a great camera.  I upgraded from a Canon Powershot A80 to the G6.  The A80 showed me that Canon makes a good camera, but was lacking a few features I really wanted.To me, this camera is a perfect collection of compromises.  I want a small camera for family snapshots, that's easy to use.  I want a large, capable camera for art work like portraits and landscape, and action shots like sports and recreation.When I'm on vacation, and want some snaps of the kids goofing around or of dinner or something, I don't need a camera that makes me jump through hoops to get a decent shot, I just want to point and shoot.  In full auto, or aperature priority, or shutter speed priority, the pictures are usually sharp and crisp.  Set the image size to one of the medium or small settings and you can use the high speed multi-shot feature to get a series of action shots that guarantee that you'll get at least a few good ones.I have no qualms about setting this camera to auto, handing this camera to a person with little or no photgraphic experience, and letting them click away.  It's easy enough to learn that most folks can be taking nice pictures in less than an hour, and pros can be taking great pictures in no time at all.On the other hand, a lot of the work I do is very artistic, and involves using manual settings.  When going for the perfect picture, it is often necessary to adjust the focus, aperature, and shutter speed to get the exact picture you want.  This camera has manual focus, a feature I sorely missed on my older Powershot A80.Another thing that bothers me on most other cameras, is that you have to wade through a bewilderingly large collection of menu options to make the smallest changes.  While I can understand using a layer or two of menus for things like basic settings (time, format a CF card) I can't see it for something as basic as film speed or white balance.Which is why I love this camera.  The following items are one button away:FlashFlash Output LevelMulti-imageTime delay photoAutofocus areaMacro modeManual FocusWhite BalanceZoom in / outFilm Speed (50 to 400)Picture mode (auto, Manual, Manual preset 1 and 2, Av, Tv, Portratit, Landscape, Backlit, Panorama, movie)My favorite things about this camera:Battery life is excellent.  I bought a spare battery, but I've never actually use the one that came with it in less than a day.  It charges fast too.Picture quality:  The larger lens allows for better pictures in low light conditions, and it is very clear.  The large CCD allows you to get pictures in a large enough resolution to print out fairly large copies and have them look very good.Ergonomic.  This is a very comfortable camera to hold for a long time.  It's not quite in the same range as some much more expensive units, but I've never gotten tired from holding it.  Plus, all the buttons you need to hit while running it are right there under your fingertips.  The scroll wheel under your right index finger is very intuitive to operate.  Push it to change modes, roll it to change the settings.  The fold out screen allows you to take pictures from odd angles without ever having to lay down on your back for a picture.  Plus, the fold out screen feels very solidly built, not like it'll snap off in your hands.  I was always worried about my Powershot A80, as it didn't feel very solid.It works well with my computer, which runs Linux.  I use gtkam, a great camera programIt has an infrared remote that can be used to take pictures without worrying about camera shake.  This is very useful for group pictures you'd like to be in yourself.User savable white balance settings.Real flash shoe.  This camera takes a standard Canon flash unit.Manual focus mode puts a close up of the center of the screen right in the middle of the picture for you to check the focus with. This would be really bothsome for composing pictures, except that when you half depress the shutter button, the small zoomed square in the center disappears and leaves you with the whole picture.The rapid fire photo option is very useful for action shots, and some candid stuff, like subway pictures.The mechanical view finder is more than just an adornment on this camera.  It's quite good, and it changes its field of view according to the current zoom setting.  It also has a focus adjustment on it.  This is very nice if you wear glasses, as it lets you adjust the view finder to your eye, and you can get your eye right up to it, and not keep bumping your glasses into the back of the camera.Very wide open Fstop of 2.0 to very closed off 8.0.And lastly, it remembers virtually everything you setup the last time it was on or in a certain mode, and reverts to those settings the next time you turn it on or switch modes.  This includes things like white balance, settings that were NOT remembered by my Powershot A80.Now for the negatives:The door that covers the USB port / DC input, and AV output is very easy to catch in the swivelling / revolving fold out screen, and as the screen takes a fare bit of effort to revolve, it's quite likely you'll have snapped the door in half before you notice it's gone and gotten itself caught in the spinning LCD screen that's passing by.  If it's gotten a little bent, it will get caught every time by the fold out screen until you snap it off or bend it back in place.The flash is way too close to the lens, which makes for some pretty obvious shadows in the bottom right hand corner of some photos.  Luckily, I'm not much for flash usage, and if I was, I'd probably spring for a real flash that sat in the hot shoe.  Still, if you're looking for a great built in flash, this is NOT the camera for you.Slow focus, and the autofocus can become confused by objects within a few yards, and never really focus.   Plus, focusing is pretty slow.  If you are looking for a camera with a very fast, nearly perfect autofocus, you might do better with another camera.Movies are limited to 3 minutes maximum, which seems rather arbitrary.  Even 5 minutes would be a big step up, as it would allow me to catch the average musical performance in one step.Final Word:This is a great compromise camera for someone who really wants two separate cameras but can't afford them.  It's a good snap shot camera, and a good big lense, big body, big CCD machine capable of creating art.It's not the best at either of those categories when compared to other cameras, but for one that does both, it represents a a perfect compromise at a pretty reasonable price</review_text>
Incredible quality and zoom!  Low power consumption.  Buy the 1GB SanDisk compact flash card.  It gives you plenty of room for a 2-3 week vacation</review_text>
A camera more for the advanced photographer with a very detailed instruction booklet. Takes excellent photos in auto mode. Memory chip included is not near big enough</review_text>
This is my third digital camera, but it's been a few years since the second and it was definitely obsolete. I was tempted to go top of the line, because I've two excellent SLRs (Nikon and Minolta) with all the trimmings, but the prices made that unfeasible right now.I'm very satisfied with the features of the Canon G6 however; I've taken about 400 shots so far, plus one movie, tried out all the software for stitching panoramas together, etc. I still mainly use PhotoShop, but the Canon software is quite good.The photo quality is excellent, including color and the opticalzoom and wideangle range is good for most purposes. The macro setting also does a nice job.The controls are easy to use for the most part for anyone at all familiar with full featured SLRs, and better than most. I've made very few mistakes in the field as a result of control confusion.What I'm less thrilled about (nitpicking):Like most electronics these days, even if you've got very small hands like me, it is hard to keep from getting a finger in the wrong place, just about every square inch is covered with a control. I would have liked to have an insert (like Nikon supplies) to cover the flash hotshoe contacts. And every time I remove the battery or memory card, I have to watch out to grab the camera by the few areas that don't have a control on them. Also, the cable input has a typical tiny plastic door that would be all too easy to break off, and the neck strap attachment is too close to the memory card door, and tends to interfere with it opening all the way.Also, in preview mode it tells you how many shots you have taken but not how many left, and in shooting mode, vice versa. It is annoying to have to switch to shooting mode to see how many left, especially if you are using the lens cover, because then the lens deploys out, and you have to remember to take the lens cover off first (deploying the lens with the cover on is a no-no.)I also got the camera case designed for the G6. Again like all too many "cases" it is a tight fit, only has a single inside pocket that you can only get an extra card in and still get the camera in too. And the case would not really be good dust protection and it zips up the sides but the top opening is just covered by a flap. And because of the tight and awkward fit, it is easy to accidentally turn the camera on, deploying the lens, while putting the camera into the case. The case comes with a belt loop, but you have to supply your own belt, and it has no other strap or handle except a tiny loop located at the top end of on side zipper, where it just gets in the way. Not a good design.I also checked out some of the accessories available, like additional lens and flash, but they're very expensive, like the macro lights are more than the camera! So I don't know if I'll get any of the add-ons later on.But overall, the G6 is already my next favorite camera to my Nikon SLR, powerful yet easy to use, and even fun! Definitely 5 stars for the camera, 1 star for the case</review_text>
I received the lenses and they were all good quality. The case that comes with them is also very nice. I was worried about the polarizing lens not working after reading the other reviews,but mine worked fine.</review_text>
Great kit! I haven't used any filters before but I can tell that I'll be using these quite a bit</review_text>
This was an outstanding value.  The kit includes three often needed filters as well as an excellent filter wallet.  The wallet itself, along with the included Tiffen Booklet is an added extra value.  I found it to be a great value for the money.  You get all three for less than the price of one filter and the filter wallet is an added bonus.</review_text>
These are great filters and especially for the price!  I was looking for just one UV filter, and after stumbling upon this set which was not much more than the price of one filter, I bought it.  These are great lenses.  I especially like the polarizing filter, but all 3 are great.definitely a worthy buy</review_text>
After getting the SD600 as a gift, I knew I had to get a case for it. I really didn't like any of the cases at the store and wanted something that has a custom fit.  This case is completely solid and the camera fits snugly in it. I have no problem taking the camera in or out but it does not have any wiggle room while it is in the case. Also the case has a magnetic button close for added security. Overall, a great buy</review_text>
This camera case is exactly what I was looking for. It fits my Canon SD600 perfectly. It fits like a glove- not too big, not too snug, and it does not scratch the LCD screen. It's really cute and is a nice punch of color in contrast to the basic black that is every other camera case out there. I've gotten a lot of compliments on how cute it is. I definitely recommend this product!</review_text>
This case is perfect for carrying and protecting my camera.  Can't imagine not having it</review_text>
Just what I expected, since this is the second one I have purchased.  I have one, and bought a camera and this case for my daughter.  The case protects the camera lcd screen, but is still small enough to fit in a pocket or easily in a purse</review_text>
love it, it fits my SD450 perfectly.  it's snug and durable and fits great in my purse when i bring it with me.  i definitely recommend this!!</review_text>
I love this product! The case is slim enough to carry around in a purse without taking up all the room. The red color is fun, too!</review_text>
this case is freaking awesome. i was completely turned off by the 8 dollars shipping i had to pay, but it was definetly worth it. this case looks so nice, so sleek, so beautiful and it just feels good in your hands. u will love this case. i did. borrow a dollar from 8 ppl if u have to just for shipping</review_text>
I like the color.It fits the camera perfectly.It's really cute and not bulky.It's not just the ordinary black camera case that everyone else has.It's classy</review_text>
after searching on the internet i found amazon to be the place where this item had the lowest price. fast delivery, great product. fits great with my panasonic 6 megapixels camera. fine leather. could not be any happier with the product</review_text>
Need to clean your Digital SLR's sensor? This is the besy way to do it -- in conjunction wtih Sensor Swabs -- as canned compressed air can add "junk" which can make your sensor worse</review_text>
Great Kit, and I use it a lot.First, here's what's inside.SMALL rocket blower - great little thing, tends to whistle through the red plastic tip though.  so, it's not great in quiet places.Retractable brush - great little thing, tends to shed hairs, but not terribly.Cleaning Solution - i did notice it lifted some color off of a multicoated lens.  oddly, it only did that on one lens, and only once.  the lens looks fine, and still takes sharp pictures without any flare.  jury's out, but i still use it w/o fear.Cotton Swabs - never used em, but they look nice.Microfiber cloth - nice full sized cloth.  very soft, and great when buffing out the spots</review_text>
Don't buy this camera really.  I had it for a month and was taking good care of it.  I was initially thrilled.  The LCD screen got damaged -- no I didn't drop it.  The treatment from customer service was so poor and disturbing that I was shocked. The customer service representative actually questioned my integrity and proceed to talk to me as if I were an idiot.  A $181 repair bill for a $300 camera is not feasible.  It was a great camera at first, but I demand better treatment and respect from the company.  Look for a better camera, look on the web for comments on their customer service and don't buy this camera.  I had read very negative things about Sony but didn't think they applied -- they really are true.  I don't like being called a liar by anyone especially when I am the customer.  The camera is a month old and it is now garbage.  While I understand policies are policies in terms of a warranty, I will not accept such poor treatment and customer service.  I teach photography and will tell my students the same thing -- if customer service and respect matter to you, then do not buy this camera.</review_text>
i have another camera w/ 12x optical & tons of features but i wanted something compact & ready to take quick snaps. this fits the bill. on my recent vacation i was impressed with how quickly it booted up and focused in to get those unplanned shots. the x-large screen makes it really easy to see if you got a good one and the image stabilisation seems to work better than on my previous camera (canon A80)...either that or my hand is steadier. last but not least - the battery life was impeccable. I took a nearly 200 photos, plus spent a lot of time reviewing and showing off pics to friends with no need to recharge. the battery is a 'custom' one which concerned me but the charger is VERY compact and travels well. it has integrated prongs that fold flat when not in use - no cables :)</review_text>
This little camera may be small (great feature) but it is loaded this goodies. This is my first adventure into digital photography and I would recomend this one to any first time user. Very easy and lots of fun to use.</review_text>
I absolutely love this camera. I've told everyone I know to buy it. The picture quality is amazing. There are so many options with this tiny little camera! You can edit pictures before you even print them. Zoom in on a picture already taken and save it that way, and so much more. I take pictures of everything!I charged the battery when I got the camera, which was about three weeks ago, and it's still going. I have 7/8th of battery life left. I haven't had to charge it again.I am so happy with my purchase! I hope this helps you</review_text>
This camera is very slim like the Canon Elphs but costs much less.  It has very high resolution and is easy to use.  The battery lasts a long time and the 2.5" LCD screen is very clear and big.  It has a lot of different shooting modes, including a custom mode where you can set specific parameters like infinity lock or ISO speed.  For convenience, every time you switch modes, the screen tells you what the mode should be used for, so you don't need to carry around a manual to figure out how to shoot your pictures.</review_text>
I wanted to buy a compact slim d-camera. Those with larger zoom are quite bulky, you can't carry around all the time. I think a slim camera is a better choice. I slip into my pocket while wondering around and come across something nice and take a picture of it. You can't do it with a huge camera.After I made up mind about a slim camera, my choices were either Casio Exilim or Sony DSCW series. Casio Exilims are very sexy. They have a lot of mode scenes. They also function as voice recorder. You can take pictures of book pages etc. They have anti-shake capability which is said to reduce blurred images. I was almost buying a Casio Exilim. Being a diligent person I wanted to search more and more.I found out that the so-called anti-shake feature is a bogus. Many people found it useless. That was a good reason to choose Casio. Then I found the picture quality of Exilim is not really good.I found some pictures taken with Exilim. They were soft, not crisp colors. Search the web reviews made by photo professionals. Casio Exilim is rated significantly less than Sony in picture quality. With ISO 200 noise was still detectable in most reviews . Those same reviewers however found Sony DSCW doing a better job . There was no noise with ISO 400 which means even in lower light condition Sony did a better job (less granularity in pictures with low light). Big difference!.One feature of Sony that made it very attractive was its strong macro. It is 0.74 inch which means you can bring your camera 0.74 inch (2 mm) close to an object (say a bug) and still take a brilliant picture of it.Now comparison of Exilim and Sony to summarize:Casio ExilimAnti-shake (it's a bogus)SlimLower macro (2.5 inches)Lower picture quality (detectable noise at ISO 200)A lot of scene modesQuick shutterSony DSCW SeriesSlim (in fact it is slimmer)Higher macro (0.74 inches)Higher picture quality (No noise in ISO 400)Not a lot of scene modesQuick shutterSo.....I purchased a Sony DSCW 7 Mp. I took lots of pictures.They are all brilliant, detailed and crisp, true colors.I tried macro and took pictures of bugs. You can see the hairs on the legs of bugs. Absolutely no noise whatsoever, no blurry.It's a marvel of technology. I took pictures of fireworks in July 4th using high ISO setting. They came out brialliantly like professional pictures.It also uses a different kind of battery that you can't buy at your grocery which can leave you vulnerable. So you may wanna buy a spare one (about 40 bucks). But you can always recharge it. And it lasts much much longer than AAA or Nimh batteries.It was a perfect choice. I highly recommend it.</review_text>
PROS:- The picture quality is very good, but a 7.2 megapixel picture is about 3mb wich is pretty big and thats a reason you might want to buy a bigger memory card.- Big 2.5" LCD that can get you some attention from bystanders around you.- The video mode in High Quality is very good! This feature impressed me, and i use it the most ( depening on the occasion ). This camera has better resolution than my brothers sony camera recorder. For some reason my baterry seems to drain a little faster than taking pictures.( I own a 2GB Memory Stick Pro Duo, wich is enough to record and take pictures for a day, but i don't think the battery will hang in)CONS:- There isn't that many cons for me, becuase i was looking for a point and shot camera with a 2.5" LCD or 3"- The only thing i didn't like about video mode is that you can't zoom while recording, other than that this camera is a nice and great pocket camera.- Pictures come out blury at times when you are really shaky but sony does a pretty good at image stabilization.(This is also a great sport camera wich you can capture pitures of a fast moving object.</review_text>
I originally had the Sony DCS W50 but returned it to get the W70.Pros7.2 MegapixelSmall and LightHigh Quality VGA Video Recording with sound3X Optical ZoomOptical Viewfinder, you'd be surprised how many companies are doing away with the optical viewfinderGreat Battery LifeBig LCD DisplayConsNon-Standard USB port on the cameraPro-Duo Memory Card, come on Sony! SD Cards own the marketNo QVGA Video mode.  VGA (640x480) is really nice, the low quality mode 160x112 is also a good feature to have but why not QVGA (320x240), it would of been a nice to have that extra feature.Sony I am very impressed  The negatives of the camera are negligible in the long run, sure I would of liked an SD card slot, but Pro Duo cards are coming down in price.  The quality of the photos are incredible.  The camera is small and sleek.  This camera also offers several different photosizes.  7 MP, 3:2 (6 MP), 5 MP, 3 MP, 2 MP, VGA, 16:9 (2 MP).  All the standard features, Macro (which is incredible), red-eye reduction, low light, etc.  There are three other camera's in Sonys W Line.  The DSC W30 and W50 which are both 6 MP cameras, and the W100 which is an 8 MP Camera.  As I stated before I originally had the Sony W50, the 6 megapixel version, but decided that I should of spend the extra $50 for the 7 MP one.  The LCD is prone to fingerprints, but they are easily wiped off.  For the price and the quality this camera is a steal all other 7 MP cameras are currently much more expensive</review_text>
We really like this camera!  It's a WHOLE lot better than our previous one, which ran off 4 AA batteries, and ran THROUGH so many AA batteries so quickly that we can't even guess how many $$ that wasted.  This Optio camera uses very nice rechargable batteries that cost $5 each through Ebay (don't buy them here on Amazon... ouch!)  We've got 3 batteries and are getting two more so that we never even have to worry about power while on a long trip.  (The really handy travel charger is also awesome... get it on Ebay for just a few bucks.)The startup time and shutter speed are very fast, so catching quick pictures is finally possible for us.  (My wife no longer threatens to go back to film after using this camera!)  Our last camera would take so long to focus that we never got the candid shots we wanted.The one and only thing that's even a slight problem with this camera is the power button being next to the shutter button.  (What clueless engineer thought THAT would be good??)  However, now that we've used it a lot, we never hit the button by accident.All other features of the camera are great.  With a 1 GB memory card, we've never ever run out of memory space, even with taking lots of short videos and many many pictures on medium quality.Great camera, worth every cent.  Buy the accessories on Ebay and you'll find that getting everything you need is not very expensive at all.  (Actually, we bought the camera on Ebay too, but these reviews are great here on Amazon.  Thanks, Amazon!</review_text>
this is a great camera for traveling, it is small enough to fit into your top pocket, so it can go anywhere. the only problem that i have is that there is no underwater housing for it, if there was i would have given it a 5*</review_text>
I have been through 6 cameras in the past 3 years, of all different kinds of brands and price. I have changed so many times because they get stolen or broken...this little pentax optio was surprising though! 3 months after having it around, i brought it to the desert and it got some sand in it, but I had it fixed. THis same camera also fell three floors down and nothing was damaged; neither the screen, the lens, nor the flash. it just got cracked a bit and twisted, and the battery/memory card  cover is completely damaged, but it still works like it should!</review_text>
I have had this camera a year now and am VERY impressed.  I have used Nikon 35mm SLR's all my life so I was a little hesitant going into digital.  Lugging around equipment became too much of a issue so I started looking.  Picture quality is great even at full optical zoom.  I very rarely use the digital zoom.  Most impressive...the camera has taken 2 direct hits on the concrete and (8 months ago) and still works perfectly!</review_text>
I hear a lot of grumbling about the camera not being "perfect."  But guess what ... in this size and form factor one should not be expecting SLR-like performance.  I just purchased this camera last week and have been busy testing it out in a variety of situations.  The "Full Auto" mode does a pretty decent job of figuring out the right settings for most situations.  If you want you can take total control and set most controls manually.  There are even a bunch of pre-programmed setting for different lighting situations and the couple that I tested worked great.  All in all, great camera for the size.  I like the fact that I can put this in my shirt pocket and forget about it and then when I suddenly need to take a picture I always have the camera handy.  I have a normal speed SD Memory card and writing out the images to the card can be painfully slow.  This is especially true when trying to take a number of quick shots in rapid succession.  The wait for the camera to become ready to take the next shot is annoying. I would highly recommend that you purchase one of the high speed SD cards (often advertised as "Ultra II" or "32X" or "High Speed."  All in all a great camera and if you are realistic with your expectations you will be very happy.  Good luck</review_text>
I bought this camera a couple months ago because I wanted a small digital camera that would be easy to carry with me. Since then, I've found the S5i to be a wonderful camera that takes clear colorful pictures and can easily fit in your pocket.Here are some praises for the S5i:1. This camera is TINY. It is smaller than my cellphone. This makes it extremely easy to bring with when going on a trip or just out for the day. I have it in my pocket at all times, ready to capture any moment. I brought it with on a recent trip and everybody thought it was great. At the end of the day we hooked it up to the TV in the hotel and watched a slide show of the day. Everyone loved it.2. The battery life in incredible. I have had this thing for a couple months and I have only charged it like 4 times. Even with extended use of the flash and screen, the battery still keeps kicking. Very different from my cellphone!3. The super macro focus setting creates beautiful photos. This was something I didn't realize the camera had until after I bought it. You can get right up to things and take these really colorful and crisp images. Flowers and plants look incredible.4. The red-eye reduction is the best I've ever seen. With the red-eye flash mode, the camera flashes once and then about a second later flashes again and takes the picture. None of my pictures suffer from red-eye anymore. The flash is also very powerful.5. It has many manual settings for more artistic pictures. I still haven't even gotten to check out all the little features this camera comes with. It has a lot of different "scene" presets and also allows you to do manual mode (with focus & exposure).Overall, this camera met and exceeded all the expectations I had. I would definitely recommend the Pentax S5i to a family member or friend.</review_text>
I just got this camera a month ago and I am satisfied with it. It has a lot of features despite its size. And for point and shoot I can say it's a great buy, comparable to other power packed cameras, it even takes better pictures sometimes.But I just had to give it a 4 because I thought I could do more with it. But you can't do much with the settings since it has it's own default settings for certain conditions. But over all it's a great camera. If you're just after taking normal pictures and you want something sleek, this is definitely a good buy.</review_text>
I've had this camera since just before Christmas 04.  I purchased from www.bhphotovideo.com for about $350.  I should have waited until after the holidays, because the price has come down.  It is great to finally have a small camera.  I often forget that I even have it with me (which I guess can be bad!).  Over all the pictures are good.  The focus is sometimes soft.  It doesn't take good night photos, but takes great daytime pics</review_text>
A very good accessory to have, protects the lens, and helps in taking very good pictures in some special situations</review_text>
I'll keep this short,as I assume most of the tec stuff has been covered.I sold a 350D to get the 400D(XTi).The 400D focuses better,has better ergonomics,is the same size/weight,and takes GREAT photos.I tried a Nikon D80,but it loses way too much detail at iso 400 and up.Plus the Canon line of lenses fits my needs better,are cheaper,and are available.The Nikon costs $300 more (with the Canon being discounted),and the Nikon Raw converter adds another $150.So the true cost difference is $400-450.I'd buy the Canon over the Nikon at the same price due to image quality,especially if you shoot jpeg.BTW,if you can afford Canon L lenses(the 25-105L and the 70-200L-any of the 4) are amazing.One caveat,as with ANY dslr,these cameras are not p/s and do best with some post processing and with knowledge of how a camera meters/exposes,etc.I can't emphasize this enough</review_text>
I had the Rebel XT and about 8 lenses and was thinking of getting an upgraded second camera body.  So when it came out the 30D was a logical choice, but it was not really much of an upgrade from the 20D, which I resisted, so I was not really sure what to do.  Then I had all but decided to just take the plunge and get the 30D when I heard the first rumblings about the XTi.Then I started to learn the details about the XTi, more mega pixels, same auto focus, same screen, picture styles, dust cleaning!  The only areas that the 30D won in my opinion were build quality, spot meter, and estimated shutter life.  Those 3 categories were not enough to convince me that the 30D was worth $300-$400 more than the XTi especially since the XTi had won or tied in most categories.  The way I look at it is that the camera bodies are not nearly as important as the lenses, they change so fast that it is not worth it to me to spend more for longevity when it will be outdated in a year anyway.  Spend $1,500 on a lens, use it for a lifetime, spend $1,500 on a camera body, regret it in a year.  I fully expect the upgrade to the 30D to be released within a year, and now that I have saved by getting the XTi I will have all that much more to put towards it when it comes out.So basically what I am saying is that, in my opinion, the XTi is just as good, if not better than the semi-pro 30D, so why pay more?  Switching from the XT to the XTi was very simple, I can use them both now without any problems.  The batteries, battery grips, remote shutter release, and most of the other accessories are also compatible with both, which is nice to keep the amount of gear you need to carry to a minimum.Unless you want to move up to a full frame sensor, I can't see any reasons why you would not want to go with this camera.  If you read books on photography from just 1 or 2 years ago you will realize that this "entry level" camera has features that were not even available on top of the line ($5,000+) camera bodies.  With the speed that camera bodies advance you might as well buy the entry level body every year instead of making a huge investment in the pro level bodies and then being shown up by something 10% of that price in a year or two.  Not that there are not reasons to buy one of those bodies, I just don't seem have any of them</review_text>
With emphasis on portability, Canon's Digital Rebel XTi is designed for first-time DSLR photographers and travel enthusiasts. Measuring 5.0" by 3.7" by 2.6" and weighing 1.1 lbs., it is about as large as the largest point & shoot cameras and one of the smallest DSLR camera bodies on the market. Its size is the source of both popularity and criticisms. If you have large hands or a heavier lens, it may feel too small. An optional battery grip can help, but some will want something more substantial. Visit a store nearby to find out for yourself.The package includes camera body with a lens cap, battery, charger, manual, catalogs, neck strap, USB and composite video cables, and CD-ROMs. You will need a lens and CompactFlash memory card. There may be some static energy in the packaging, so remove the lens cap in a dust-free environment such as the bathroom to prevent dust entering the sensor. Much promoted sensor cleaning system helps, but it's best not to get any in the first place.Canon sells 4 versions of XTi: black or silver finish and with or without EF-S 18-55mm f/3.5-5.6 lens. Black or silver is largely a personal preference, but most lenses, most accessories, and all but low-end DSLR camera bodies are black. As for the kit lens, it can be an affordable introduction to DSLR and capable if used exclusively at f/8 or f/11 apertures (soft at other apertures). In other words, the lens is not ideal for shooting under low light. If you don't have to get a zoom lens now, start with Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II. It is famous for top-notch performance at very low price. Due to XTi's APS-C image sensor (compositions are multiplied by 1.6x), this lens becomes 35mm-equivalent of 80mm.If you have the budget for a good zoom lens, at over 100 lenses, Canon has you covered. Some of Canon's popular zoom lenses include EF 28-135mm f/3.5-5.6 IS USM, EF 17-40mm f/4L USM, EF-S 17-55mm f/2.8 IS USM, and EF 24-105mm f/4L IS USM. If these are too pricey, third party vendors such as Sigma and Tamron make Canon-compatible lenses for less. Their focus is not as nice as Canon's USM but they generally outperform Canon's lower-end lenses.Tamron's SP AF 17-50mm f/2.8 Di II LD Aspherical (IF) and Sigma's 18-50mm f/2.8 EX DC and AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC macro are popular among budget-minded photographers.With 10.1 megapixels image sensor, the XTi can benefit from sharper lenses. Although increasing the resolution over same image sensor area can increase noise, Canon has improved the sensor technology to maintain low noise floor and high dynamic range. Performance wise, there's very little to criticize. Great example of Canon's trademark smooth, high contrast, saturated, and low noise. Noise remains low even at ISO 800. It is said that shooting RAW is equivalent to getting an extra exposure (1.0 EV) and it can help you maintain usable details with acceptable noise at ISO 1600. Low noise gives XTi a bit of an excuse for missing in-body image stabilizer. According to Canon, lens is more effective location for image stabilizer, especially telephoto. That's true but I think the feature would've been nice to have. As a consolation, the XTi has mirror lockup that reduces vibration caused by the mirror movement. My sole performance criticism is the metering mode. It includes only partial and not spot metering mode (very useful when shooting high contrast scenes such as candlelit birthday cake). Perhaps more problematic is the evaluative metering mode, which occasionally underexposes images by 2/3 EV or so.Some have criticized XTi for "plasticky" build. Except for the metal lens mount, the exterior is largely made of high quality engineering plastic with rubbery paint. If you drop it, it will probably crack or break, but it's sturdy and well made. Flipping on the power lever, it starts up almost immediately ready for use. Much promoted auto sensor cleaning kicks in when powering up and down. As with most DSLRs, there's virtually no shutter lag and it focuses in a split second (especially when using a USM lens). In continuous shooting mode with a fast memory card, it can take 10 RAWs or 27 JPEGs at 3 frames per second. RAW images are 10 MB each, so get a speed 2 GB or larger memory card, such as SanDisk's Ultra II series.Replacing both 1.8" LCD and info display is 2.5" high resolution LCD with LED backlighting. It displays current camera settings, photos in memory, and menu. Thanks to greater real estate and more refined user interface, XTi is very intuitive and pleasure to use. The minus is 10% lower battery life, which was merely adequate to begin with. XTi has 95% crop 0.8x optical viewfinder that displays 9 auto focus points, shutter speed, aperture, and more, but misses ISO speed, white balance, and metering mode. Overall, XTi's viewfinder is more than adequate but pales to Nikon D80's larger and more comprehensive one.Highlights of software package are ImageBrowser (Mac OS X Universal Binary), ZoomBrowser (Windows), and Digital Photo Professional (Mac OS X Universal Binary and Windows). ImageBrowser and ZoomBrowser are easy-to-weight lightweight applications for managing JPEG and RAW. Digital Photo Professional is considerably more powerful and lets you use XTi's dust delete data feature for removing dust its sensor cleaning hardware couldn't remove</review_text>
I've considered other, higher priced digital SLRs, such as the Nikon D80 and Canon 30D.  However, I decided that I probably won't be using some of the more advanced features offered by those cameras, and would rather spend the money saved on a better lens.  In terms of picture quality, all these SLRs are capable of equivalent quality.Currently I have 3 lenses, the kit 18-55mm, the 50mm f/1.8, and the 85mm f/1.8.  I don't use the kit zoom lens anymore because I favor the faster, prime lenses.  I mostly take pictures of my children, and the 85mm f/1.8 is an excellent portrait lens.  It is sharp, fast, and produces beautiful background blur.  Zoom lenses unfortunately are not as sharp or fast, unless you're willing to pay much more than the cost of the camera body.I think all novice SLR owners should buy the cheap Canon 50mm f/1.8, to discover what a fast lens can do when you set the aperture to 1.8, and take some portraits.  You too can have professional-looking results</review_text>
I took pictures with this camera with artificial light, natural light, and when it was almost dark and all of my images came out sharp.  I'm only using the cheap 18-55mm lens, which does not have image stabilization.  As long as I use a tripod, or brace against something to hold the camera still, the images are perfect.  I shot landscapes, portraits, animals, moving traffic, the sky, the moon, and everything I could think of and it all came out right.I was going to buy a 5D, but so far I'm satisfied with this camera and the price is way lower.  Now I wonder what my pictures would be like with an IS lens... hmmmm :</review_text>
I had this camera for about a week now. I bought an EF 28-105mm lens seperatly. I don't know why, but the auto focus did not work right away.It took some fiddling around before I was able to use the feature. I get gorgeous pictures with this camera. My one complaint is it feels small in the right hand. After 1/2 hour of shooting pictures my hand got a cramp. I have small hands and it still felt small to me. If you are considering this camera I'd go to a store see how it feels. I can't imaging being able to use it for a long time if you have a big hands.I'm still learning how to use it. But so far its meeting all my expectations.</review_text>
First of all I must say that this camera CAN take some wonderful, even incredible looking pictures. But since everyone else is proclaiming its virtues, I will write mainly about its negatives. There aren't too many, but it does have a few drawbacks; a couple of which I just don't understand.This camera is now the fourth digital camera I have bought. The first was the Nikon Coolpix 995 for my wife. The second was the Sony F707 for me. The third was the Canon SD400 for my wife. And lastly the XTi for me. So I have had a little experience with cameras at or near "prosumer" level. This is why I find it hard to believe how the XTi can get some of these things wrong.First of all is the white balance. Of my 4 cameras, this camera has, by far, the worst indoors Auto White Balance. I am using compact fluorescent light bulbs and daylight lights in the house and the XTi makes everything look yellow. And none of the other white balance options is close either. The one saving grace is the Custom White Balance option. You perform this Custom White Balance by taking a picture of something gray (preferably a large gray piece of paper or a card made just for this, and have it centered in the picture) and then selecting this picture as the Custom White Balance reference. After doing this the White Balance is nothing short of superb. I even had it work just by zooming in on something white and then selecting it as the reference picture. (I guess white works just as well as gray.)But my disappointment is, "Why does this have to be done at all?" All three other cameras of mine handle this lighting much better than the XTi. But what's really the saddest is that the Canon Elph handles it better than the XTi.It's nice that, after some hassle, it does have good white balance. But I shouldn't have to carry around a gray card everywhere I go or touch up every photo I take to get the right white balance. Especially when a 1  year old Canon does it better, for half the price.My next gripe is the lack of spot metering.  It wouldn't bother me so much if:1)	The other metering options were more consistent.2)	Every other camera I own didn't have it.3)	Canon Tech Support hadn't told me that they reserve Spot Metering for their higher end cameras.....Especially when their own [...] has it!! How is a $500 camera higher end than the XTi?Usually I can select partial metering and then turn up the exposure about 1/3 to 2/3 of a stop and get decent exposure. But it would be much more consistent to just have a spot metering option; especially with backlit subjects, or with a lot of harsh, low sun and shade in the picture.My last gripe is about the included software, especially with RAW pictures. Don't even try loading this software on anything but a dual-core or 4 GHz PC. The software is ssslllooowww!!! For one thing, both the Zoombrowser EX and Digital Photo Professional start scanning the hard drive for pictures as soon as the software loads, and there doesn't seem to be any way to stop it. If you have a lot of pictures on your computer, it will take a long, long time before the software lets you do anything. Make sure you have coffee ready! The other thing is that the software is just a memory hog and runs excruciatingly slow; especially when trying to edit RAW or .cr2 files. Speaking of which, why does Canon have to use such a non-standard file? I would be glad to use some other software for editing my RAW's, but Canon's proprietary files can't be opened by other "normal" programs. So for now I'll just stick to .jpg's.Then there's the other complaints, which are true. The kit lens isn't very good. The form-factor could use work. ( I am constantly hitting the FEL button on accident) and the view finder is kind of smallish; among others.Overall I am pleased with the camera. I have some wonderful pictures already on the wall. But I've also had a few real stinkers due to the lack of spot metering and the occasional terrible white balance. If it weren't for these two (rather huge for me) issues, than I would give the XTi 5 stars. But until Canon fixes these glaring issues it won't be given my highest rating. And it also won't be recommended by me to anyone who's serious into photography.</review_text>
I can't help but give the lens cap 5 stars, what can I say, it fits, it covers the lens and keeps the dust out. The bad part about purchasing from this place was paying as much in postage as for the cap itself but it was hard to find elsewhere. I also could not have it delivered here on Fort Wainwright Alaska because I'm only allowed a PO Box so I had to have it shipped to my home in New York and then had them send it on to me-go figger</review_text>
I'm very happy with this lens. It offer's an ample variety of options, high image quality and it is light</review_text>
While this lens is a great improvement over the kit lenses the focus is often soft in raw modes and overal just not always tight. Color accuracy is very good, not perfect but very good. Of course color accuracy is more often a result of your paper (yes really - it is) than your lens after you get to a certain point. After using this lens for 2 months and shooting perhaps 20,000 shots with it I wished I had saved my money for the inevitable l series lens. If color accuracy is your main issue, be sure to look at your photo paper too. Hp, Kodak, and even low end papers from inkpress all do strang things to color and blur your images. Try someone like MOAB paper. You will be AMAZED at how much of a difference it will make in your color accuracy and detail. I just switched to Kokapelli from MOAB for commercial prints and am amazed by the results.As is usually the case focus is softest at f3.5 though it does produce a surprisingly decent bokeh</review_text>
I bought this lens to replace the kit lens on the Rebel XT. I find this lens to be a very good value, a very good value. I also have the canon 28-135 3.5 ... And find the 28-105 lens to be a very stong lens for the price. It might even be just a notch clearer then the 28-135 but at half the price. It's size is nice and light weight and fits nice on the Rebel since it is a smaller DSLR.All in all, a great lens at a budet price but it dosn't act like it. Fast focus, fair range, nice size, easy to lug around. I would sugest this lens to any one and first on my list to someone who is not wanting to go crazy on lenses and extras for their camera, and just want to simply get some nice pics without spending all their lunch money. Also the lens takes the same size  filters as the kit lens, so if you have spent a few dollers on a few filters for the kit lens your in luck. I know I was happy to still use the 3 filters I've already got.</review_text>
This lens is truly a 'must have' if you don't have lots of cash to spend. Simply put, it is an excellent performer for the money. I recently got this lens for my Rebel XT, and noticed a HUGE improvement over the 18-55mm kit lens. Sharpness has improved considerably. The 18-55mm has some SERIOUS issues in that area. First of all, sharpness was REALLY bad at large apertures. But smaller apertures were not really much better. The 28-105mm still is not the best performer at large apertures. But it is MUCH better than the 18-55mm. However, at around f8 or higher, the 28-105mm is tack sharp. In addition, this lens does not suffer from the problem of having a clear foreground and soft background that my 18-55mm suffers from.Color accuracy has also GREATLY improved with the 28-105mm. Colors look MUCH more natural with this lens than with the 18-55mm lens. This is particularly true of lighter colors, especially when you go to increase saturation with Photoshop (or other software). Increasing saturation to improve the appearance of dark colors on a picture taken with the 18-55mm would typically make lighter colored objects look VERY unnatural. This sort of problem is MUCH reduced with the 28-105mm. I should also say that this lens appears to overexpose somewhat compared with the 18-55mm. This is more good than bad, however, as it has the effect of making the lens faster.Of course, this lens is not without its drawbacks. I mentioned the slight softness at large apertures, for instance. Also, it is not the fastest lens out there. But then again, what do you expect for the price? And finally, 28mm is not exactly wide angle on a cropped sensor digital SLR like the Rebels or the 20D. But despite these drawbacks, this lens really performs like a champ. And when used in its element (ie higher f-numbers), it works quite well. Also, since it is not an EF-S lens, it will not become a paperweight should you decide to upgrade to a 5D.</review_text>
THE BOTTOM LINE:I needed to replace the lens on my Canon Rebel XT D-SLR.  The EF-S on first glance seemed like the perfect replacement since Canon produced the EF-S series specifically for the compressed sensor D-SLR line.  After weighing the pros and cons of the two, I chose this EF lens largely on the basis of price.  It was the right choice, and I haven't found any loss of features or quality.Multiplying the range by 1.6 for a 35mm equivalence (if you have a Rebel XT, 20D or 30D), this model is really just a slightly wide angle to stronger telephoto zoom. (about 45mm-170mm if it was a 35mm film camera)  If this range suits you, then this lens is an excellent value over a EF-S wide-angle/telephoto zoom.  You'll keep all of the features, save money and have a faster lens.The EF series meshes well with the current line of Canon digital SLRs.  In addition, unlike the EF-S series, they are compatible with all of the Canon EOS products including higher-end cameras like the Mark II.SPECIFIC OBSERVATIONS FROM WEEKS OF USE:My first concern before purchasing this lens was the MINIMUM FOCUS DISTANCE of 0.5 meters, or approximately 18 inches.  I do a lot of macro work transferring images into digital, so I was a tad worried.  However, after getting the lens and zooming in, I realized that the focusing distance wasn't really an issue after all.  In most cases, I could manage to stand six or so inches further away and still get a highly magnified shot.  So that you can see that the macro function works well, I've uploaded an image of a small hamster photographed at 102mm. (The aperature is pretty big -- after all, a hamster IS a moving target)My second concern was lens QUALITY AND SHARPNESS, particularly in the wide-angle setting near the edges of the photo.  This lens exceeded my expectations.  So that you can see the quality of this lens, I've uploaded an uncropped picture of the SF Bay Bridge taken at the 28mm wide-angle setting.  You'll see that the photo is sharp all the way through the edges of the frame. (it is a web-sized jpeg, so you should take that into consideration and use it mainly to see the sharpness of the photo, particularly near the outside edges)I did get an unexpected bonus with this lens.  The MANUAL FOCUS ring is in the front.  I love it.  Disabling the auto-focus is a snap, and the position and feel of the manual focus is perfect for sports or social activities where the subject is often not the closest object.  The ring itself is ridged and made of rubber, making handling a breeze.While I hadn't expected to replace my stock lens so soon, I think it ended up for the best.  This lens is actually superior to the one that came with the XT.  I lost some wide-angle function but gained much more telephoto.  The price is excellent and the quality of the lens is high.</review_text>
For the price and quality I rated this lenses with 5 stars.If you really want to see how good this lens are see the photos I took in Europe.  I too around 5000 photos. I posted a few on the web (See link below).For the price I recommend this lens as walk around lens. The zoom is pretty usefull They are very realiable and (almost) very sharp. Get this lens instead of the kit lens (18-55 mm) until you are ready to spend more.Here are some of my pictures taken in Europe with this lens (Images have been compressed):http://www.laplazita.net/europa/</review_text>
I was given this lens after my Sigma 28-135mm lens broke.  While that lens has been fixed, I haven't used it since attatching the Canon lens on my camera.  The Canon 28-105mm may have a smaller zoom range, but other than that is clearly a superior lens in every respect.  It's sturdy, fast-focusing, sharp, and has good color.  In short, it's what you hope to find when purchasing a consumer grade lens.  There are other cheaper lenses on the market, like Sigma's lens or Canon's f/4-5.6, but this lens is worth the extra $100 for its reliability, sharpness and overall usability</review_text>
Ok to start off I've heard different opinions about camera sensor blowers..some say it works like magic some say it can make it worse. So I gambled and bought this Giotto blower.I didn't want to buy all the cleaning swabs, liquid ect and rub it off...seemed like a annoying project. So I gave this blower a try.I never had that much dust on my sensor but when made my aperture smaller f/22 to be exact and did a picture of the blue sky I noticed a few blobs or dust spots. I wanted them off...now heres where the blower comes in. I used it a total of 3 times and it removed 98% of the dust off my sensor..thats really really good in my book for a $9 device. Now I have like 2 tiny dust spots on my sensor and I can easily live with that..or I could try to use it a few more times to completely get it off...In the meantime I'm very happy with the dust I got off it.Buy this blower....its a no brainer.</review_text>
I had some dust spots on my lenses, and on the mirrors inside. I was afraid to use the brush or cloth kits, since they could easily scratch. One of my photography books suggested I use this exact air blower, so I thought I'd give it a try. It's a simple tool, but it emits a strong amount of air and I was able to clean everything off. Even works well for keyboards or other dusty spots</review_text>
It works great - and no touching the sensor with a brush.  Great produc</review_text>
I was surprised at just how big this rubber blower is. For it's size, it doesn't blow much air out - maybe a little bit more than a rubber squeeze toy for dogs. Speaking of dog toys, this item squeaks everytime I squeeze the bulb.The bottom line is this item actually works and helps remove dust from your sensor. Because of that, it's a solid pick-up..</review_text>
I was quite annoyed when I found my D70 had come out of the box with dust on the lens. The place I bought it would only send it away to Nikon for cleaning, but a friend with the same camera advised me to get a dust blower and showed me how I should be able to blow the dust off myself.the first blower I tried didn't have enough power and the dust remained. I had almost decided to take the camera to get it cleaned when I read a review that suggested this one. I took a chance, and after about 15 minutes of trying, checking, and trying again, I finally have a dust free sensor!this is the most valuable piece of equipment that I have purchased for my camera, and I recommend this to anyone with a similar problem</review_text>
I had originally bought another brand of blower to clean my digital camera, but after using it once I ended up introducing more dirt and/or rubber bits than I care to remember.  Long story short I don't use that for my camera anymore and it took me a long time to get all of that crud out of my camera.  But then I decided to give another brand a try since so many people seemed to be able to use blower bulbs without any problems.  When I got my new blower my sensor was already fairly clean, but after using it it was a little cleaner.  You will still sometimes have those stuck on particles (I use sterile pec pads and eclipse solution to get rid of those with pretty good results, but do this at your own risk since it voids most camera manufacturers warranties.)  I also keep my blower in the original packaging to keep it as clean as possible, I guess I am a little gun shy after my first experience</review_text>
I have owned the Giottos Rocket Air Blaster for 2 weeks now and love it. I use it for blowing dust of everything: Camera lenses, computer screens and out of computer keyboards. It is made of a nice soft material that allows it to be stored flat and out of the way. Additionally, it creates sufficient pressure to force away most dust particles and of course requires no canned air, as it works as you pump it. I'll never by a can of forced air again</review_text>
I bought this gizmo to clear the CMOS detector in my digital SLR camera.  It seemed like a good alternative to using a specialized, expensive sensor wipes, and it would not invalidate the camera's warranty.The results with my camera were good but not perfect.  Many large particles of dust were blown off the detector.  However, some medium-sized particles were merely pushed to the edges.  Nonetheless, I really like having the air blaster just for my camera.Aside from my camera, I have used this on a number of other devices around my home and office.  It works particularly well at clearing dust out of the vents in my laptop and underneath the keys on my laptop's keyboard.  However, it works poorly in clearing out the dust and grime in my desktop keyboard.In summary, I would say that this is a good device for owners of digital SLR cameras, although it is not a perfect substitute for sensor wipes.  For owners of electronic equipment in general, this is a clever device that works reasonably well at cleaning dust out of some places</review_text>
One of the problems with owning a digital camera is that you'll occasionally have to clean dust off of the image sensor.  You can't use compressed air because it will freeze and destroy your sensor.  You don't really want to blow either because the moisture in your breath will damage your sensor... and make you pass out.You need "dry", relatively-high pressure air and this is what the Rocket Air is outstanding for.  Simple to use.  1-Remove your lens (on SLR), 2-put into cleaning mode, 3-hang the camera upside down (presumably, to allow dust to fall out), and 4-squeeze the Rocket Air thereby cleaning the camera.At this point, I swear by it. I'm constantly changing lenses and this helps remove spects and ghost images.  It's a must have in your Camera Kit</review_text>
The best feature of this flash is the wireless E-TTL feature.  With two 550ex's one will work as a master and one as a slave and with the ST-E2 both flashes can be off camera and fired E-TTL.  The draw backs are: price, no manual control in slave mode for greater light control, and size (this thing is big).  The plus side weighs out the negatives.  It is a great flash</review_text>
I am very happy of having gotten this flash.. it works pretty well, and I like its performance</review_text>
This is an absolute do-everything flash, with master/slave operation, wireless control of multiple channels for slave flashes, A:B:C lighting ratio control (better than the ST-E2's mere A:B ratio), full manual or automatic operation, strobe effects at selectable Herz rates and power, and even a small panel that serves either to widen its flash coverage to 17mm or simply provide a catchlight in a model's eyes when using bounce flash.  Range is excellent, battery life is very good and can be compounded with one of the battery packs.  The light itself provides excellent color, and a red lamp near the base adds a much more accurate and less harsh focus assist lamp than most of Canon's cameras provide.If you have an SLR, you'll almost certainly want an external flash.  You can provide fill flash to reduce shadows in subjects eyes etc. during harsh daylight shots, take the flash off the camera to eliminate nasty shadows, and avoid the shadows caused by larger lenses and onboard flashes.Minor quibbles: most DSLRs have crop ratios of 1.3x or 1.6x, but don't pass this information on to the 550EX, which wouldn't care anyway.  This means the flash thinks you want greater coverage than you really need (i.e. it will give you a 50mm's angle of flash coverage, when you only need an 80mm's), so you waste a lot of flash power and don't get optimum recycling times.  Also, the interface is a little non-intuitive.If you want a slave- or onboard-only flash and don't need all the extra features, the considerably cheaper 420EX is for you.  That said, if you do want all the extra features, the 550EX is still not for you.  You want the 580EX, slated for October 2004 release, which fixes the minor issues with the 550</review_text>
Top of the line.  Works as advertised.  TTL, E-TTL.  4 double AA batteries.   Tilt, Rotate head, soft lens built in.  Can control slave flash</review_text>
This camera is a steal. The reviews on amazon helped me decide on this camera and sure it is worth it.</review_text>
This camera is the first digital for me, and the only camera I have ever enjoyed having.  The macro setting gives amazing closeups of bugs, flowers, etc.  With the purchase of a charger and some batteries, I've kept it going for almost nothing.  Better get a big memory card, too.  The silly settings like "color swap" and "fireworks" are fun to play with.  My only complaint is it is slow to recover between shots, so you miss some action of kids, etc.  For the price, it can't be beat.gramma t</review_text>
The camera is the perfect solution for someone who does not want exchangable lensesand some items for more professional results.  Combined with a direct photo printer it is easy and fun with plenty of photo options on the dial.My only problem is that I did not receive with the camera the software to alllow me to download to the computer from the from the Memory chip itself.    Is there any way to get this software</review_text>
After hearing that Consumer Reports gave the Canon A520 a BEST BUY rating, I decided this must be a good family of cameras. It has been a joy to own and use.  Easy to take pictures, easy to work and yes, it takes great pictures.  It has more bells on it than I will ever use.  I have been very satisfied with 4 and 5 MP cameras and have not wanted to spend a fortune for more.  I just need to take pictures, review them and easily download to my computer.  This does that and much, much more</review_text>
Very quick delivery. Product was exactly as advertised. Very happy with the whole process and the product</review_text>
I am  very happy with the product, it is very very good, the only thing was that it does not bring the multiple pictures leaving the button pressed, but the image quality is outstanding!</review_text>
I got this as much for safety as anything. If I should drop my lens, a solid lens hood will help. Plastic construction will absorb some of the impact without transmitting all of it, as a metal hood would. Hopefully it will eliminate occurances of flair, although with the Canon 50mm f1.4 lens, that's not a big issue to begin with. It also can keep dust and debris off the lens surface if you're shooting in a less-than-ideal environment.It twists on and off the lens easily. When it's on, it's very snug and secure. Kind of pricy for a piece of plastic, but Canon's in business to make money.</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I bought this camera 12/2005 for Christmas on the recommendation of Wolf Camera.  I am not a photographer or techno advanced; just a mom with 4 kids.  I love this camera.  It's great and hasn't failed me yet.  The salesman told me about the oversaturation and I adjusted it.  The battery life is amazing as I am always on the go.  It is so small I just throw it in my purse.  I have not had any problems with the lens sticking or turning on unless I turn it on.  Sounds like some of the other reviewers should go with a digital SLR.  This is an awesome point and shoot camera and I would recommend it to anyone</review_text>
PLEASE BE AWARE OF THIS CAMERA'S SHOCK SENSITIVITYI was pretty happy with this all-in-one compact camera until it had to be repaired for the SECOND time. It's sensitivity to vibration or a slight bump while the lens is out is way too sensitive for the real world. The result is it loses it's ability to focus and zoom. It didn't help that it commonly powered on while in a pocket, with the lens protruding, thereby causing unintentional harm to the lens assembly.The first time it happened Casio repaired it under warranty. The second time it was outside of warranty and the repair center wanted $137 to repair it - that's more than 1/3 the original purchase price. I won't reinvest in a weak product. I'd rather put that money into a new camera altogether</review_text>
The EXZ750 is simply a fantastic compact camera. It takes great pictures, even greater if you bother to use one of the many picture presets (scenery, portrait, macro, etc.).The pros:- picture quality is great; if you want anything better you'll probably be lugging around a DSLR- picture presets are extremely easy to use, even if you are not a techie and / or you've never handled a camera in your life (is there such a person?).- it will fit into your pocket and you'll forget it is there. This is a major advantage as the best camera is the camera you actually have with you - this one you will.- common settings (picture size, ISO, etc.) are one or two clicks away - very convenientThe cons:- the camera does take videos (at more than decent resolution) but they come out shaky even if you have pretty steady hands. Without some image stabilization in it, it is definitely not a replacement for a video camera- although the camera has ISO settings of 200 and 400 you should probably avoid them due to noiseOverall, a very positive and pleasing experience. Even having a digital SLR, I'm never giving this little puppy up</review_text>
Very small size (fits in my baggy jean pocket), fast startup, fast response when shooting picture. Much easier to carry around than my Canon G3.Does not do well indoors when flash is needed. Lots of red eye, much more than my Canon G3</review_text>
I spent a weekend researching digital cameras, exhausting and confusing, so many to choose from,  and when I was in a store looking at various cameras, a customer just started telling me how much he loved this camera he had just bought, which was this one; I assumed it was 'a sign'. And it was. Small size is fantastic, put in your shirt pocket or purse, almost weightless. Quick shutter takes the best pictures of new  baby grandchild of any camera anyone in the family has used. (others had Sony and Canon digital cameras) The movies are excellent.  The quality and color of images are perfect, not too over-digitized as some have said. Everyone in the family thinks I'm a wonderful photographer, but it's not me, it's this camera.  The battery life is really long, and it can take good pictures in multiple types of poor visibility situations. In the first month, I dropped it a few  times, once on the sidewalk and it survived which was impressive. Having a viewfinder is a big advantage in bright sunlight.After using and loving it for 9 months, the telephoto froze.  I sent it back to Casio, and they fixed it; it took 3-4 weeks, which is a little long, but did not charge me for the repair.The baby pictures are fantastic, especially because it takes the picture so fast, and the scenery pics all look like National Geographic.</review_text>
This lens is my favorite as I keep it on my Rebel XT at all times. I enjoy taking macro close-ups and portrait-type shots, which makes this a great lens for everyday use.  It is light-weight and not bulky.  My last SLR camera (years ago) was a Minolta with 50mm f/1.8 lens, and various other lenses that I rarely used.  I usually don't use a zoom lens due to the extra length and weight.  Also, most non-professional zoom lenses are much slower at the closest tele-position due to the higher f/stop.  With a fixed focal length of 60mm, I don't mind moving myself toward or away from the subject (not a big deal).  The pictures always appear to be sharp with good contrast and color saturation.My opinion on this lens is: "buy it ... you'll like it".I did ... and I love it.Good Luck</review_text>
the optics are the best i've ever seen. the clarity is great. the abillity to focus on small objects only 2" away allows great macro pictures. however the auto focus is much slower than most canon lenses, but i can focus manually. this is my favotite lens ever</review_text>
This lens is top notch. The quality of the photographs is the best I have ever experienced with a camera.</review_text>
If you would like a list of sites with reviews emailgumby at dontquotemeonthat dot comPros:  Very sharp, bright (fast), versatile, excellent build quality.Cons:  AF tends to be dicy in low-light conditions.Pros:  SHARP, SHARP, SHARP. No distortion, no CA, optically superb and betterCons:  EF-S mount. Had to sell it when I upgraded to the 5D.Pros:  Very solid build, Internal focusing is fantastic, Produces wonderfully saturated photos and high in contrast, Bokeh is lovely and very smooth, Auto Focus is typical ring-USM with Full Time Manual focus being excellent and smooth. f2.8 Aperture, 52mm Filter SizeCons:  I do feel Canon could reduce the price, however for this quality I don't mind paying for it.if your a newbie here's some infoA lens is "fast" when it has a low f-stop... ok so when you have a smaller number the apature is bigger which allows more light through, so this means you can up the shutter speed. and still have enough light reach the sensor.ok so lets say you have an out door shot if you have say an f/4 lens the shutter speed could be 1/250 of a second and you would get a good exposer. Now this lens can only go f/4but if you in the same outdoor setting, had an f/2.8 lens you could jump to 1/500 of a second and get the same exposer. and freeze the action mmore effectivly, this i believe is why it's a "fast" lens.ok have fun and get it done</review_text>
4 starts because otherwise 5 stars is inevitable:1) Slow autofocus (hunt at times) but is to be expected of a macro lens.2) built quality not as solid as expected at this price range.I bought this lens instead for two purpose: Macro and Portrait! I was thinking of buying the 100mm macro plus 85mm f1.8 but this lens saves me buying two lenses! I have been very happy with it as what it is. I don't do flying insects very much so it is not a problem but that said I was able to get 1:1 shot of a fly, see sample here:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_54.htmlThere are other samples in this gallery here:http://www.theteh.com/html/my_3rd_350d_xt.htmlThe large aperture (F2.8) means that one could have shallow DOF and great for low light such as this pic:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_49.htmlFor portrait, I accidentally took this photo during the London Bombing of a women 'Shocked' by the incident unfolding in the public TV display. It was a coincident that her background inmage was the winning Reuter's photo of Tsunami tragedy and the matching colour of their dresses! I was quite far away so was able to capture her from head to toe:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_25.htmlThis illustrate the capability of both macro and normal photography using this lens. You will not regret it unless your primary aim is to shoot flying insets where longer 100mm or 150mm macro lenses may be needed in this case.</review_text>
I only wish that I had bought this lens earlier so I could have been using it longer.  I am especially pleased with the short minimum focus distance - about 3 inches.  This allows you to get very close to a small subject and to still fill the frame with the subject.I have had no problems with this lens and I love it</review_text>
The new Canon EF-S 60mm f2.8 Macro USM Digital SLR lens is designed to cover the entire field of the digital imaging sensors in Canon's digital SLR line, most notably the Canon EOS 20D. This corresponds in film to a normal lens perspective of approximately a 50mm lens. Furthermore it benefits from having Canon's USM autofocusing technology, allowing the photograher to have rapid, almost silent, autofocus, which is important when working in the field (You don't want to distract the animal you are photographing with the sound of the lens being focused.). Although this lens is not a L Series lens, the quality of its construction comes close to Canon's premium L Series professional line of lenses. Indeed, I have read elsewhere an excellent test report (I believe at Erwin Puts's website) on this lens praising its optical performance. Any Canon user of digital SLRs such as the EOS 20D who is interested in macro photography will regard this lens as absolutely essential for making great macro images</review_text>
This lens is well worth the price. The first thing you will notice is the quality when you handle the lens. It has a very solid construction. But once you mount the lens is where it REALLY shines. The clarity of focus is the best I've seen and the focus is super fast. The macro functionality is just awesome. I highly recommend this lens</review_text>
Love this battery.  Long lasting and just as good as the name brand</review_text>
Works as great as orignal battery. You will never know the difference except that is a lot cheaper!</review_text>
This battery works in my Canon SD550 interchangeably withthe Canon NB3L that came with it.  I get about as many shots on either one.</review_text>
I've had this battery for 3 months. So I don't have long term experience. But so far it's been excellent. No better or worse then the original canon battery. I would reccomend it to anyone.</review_text>
I have a Canon SD-550.  This battery is works perfect with it.  I've noticed no difference in charge time and usage when compare with the original manufacterer one.  Except the price is a lot lower</review_text>
What can I say? It fits in place of the overpriced Canon NB3L battery for my SD500 and lasts longer than the OEM battery. The quality of the battery on the external is very good. No sloppy glued edges or ill-fitting parts. The battery works very well in the camera and lasts longer by one hundred or so shots. I use a gig card so I tend to shot alot at once. Even with the flash the battery life is comparable to the Canon or even longer. I bought two instead of a single Canon battery and I have not been dissappointed</review_text>
I bought this battery as an extra battery for my camera.  It is a lot lower in price than the Canon battery.  I have not used either my original or this extra battery enough to fully compare them, but they seem to work equally well so far</review_text>
The product was great! You should get it. Usually, I'm skeptical abour getting generic brands, but this works perfectly</review_text>
This replacement battery is half the cost of Canon's yet offers longer life.  I bought it when I first got my SD10.  When one battery runs out, the spare goes in.  The Lenmar still works great while the Canon is near end life!  I am buying two more since they are so cheap!DO NOT buy no name batteries on ebay.  They do not last worth a darn and are basically a waste of money!  Don't do it..</review_text>
I purchased my 300D in May 2005, when the XT was released and this 6.3 MP model's price began falling. I'd have to really pick this camera apart to tell you the downsides of it; disregard reviews by those who think this camera is not up to par -- of course it's not comparable to the EOS 1-Series or a 5D, so don't expect the same features or capabilities. The right user, however, can get similar results.That said, unless you are a professional photographer, I cannot imagine how the Digital Rebel could be inadequate for any amateur or semi-pro shooter. It's speed and megapixels have since been passed by, but it's still, especially now, a great buy.The kit lens will perform for you just fine, although most of my shots with the kit lens are at 18mm, landscape or just wide-angle shots. The flash works very well in most situations, even in extremely dark rooms. One guy complained his AF hunted in low light situations, even with flash...of course, what do you expect in a dark room? Use manual focus and grow up.Quality is great from ISO 100-400, although 800 can be somewhat ugly at times, and 1600 is basically unusable, especially if you're not shooting at f/2.8 or bigger.My main complaints: slow start-up time compared to the newer models (XT, 20D, etc) ... camera seems to be out of breath after continuous shooting; take 8 shots quickly and you may notice the camera needs to process info before it can shoot again. 2.5 frames/second is not very fast if you're shooting any sports.Overall, this camera has been incredibly reliable for me; it's gotten me front page shots on newspapers, magazine covers, calendars and websites. I used it so much that I blew out the shutter in 10 months; Canon fixed it at no charge and it works fine since. One minor problem: very rarely, it won't turn on unless I remove the battery and re-insert it.I've found the battery life to be fantastic. I can use it all day, even with flash, and still have some life at the end of the day. A backup battery in your bag should give you more than enough insurance for a day.I've printed at 11x17 with excellent results.With some practice, it's very easy to navigate. Menus and options are simple; changing the ISO or aperture is very easy despite what some have complained about. It's very reliable in fully-auto mode as well, especially if you're shooting with flash. A memory card reader is a must when uploading images.Overall: it's old news in the world of digital SLRs, but right now, a new or used model at such a good price is really is great value</review_text>
I have had this camera a little over a year and I still can't put it down. It is wonderful. I have two little boys on the move and this camera takes their picture with hardly any delay. Just snap and go. I bought my dad the XP in March and he loves it too.</review_text>
An incredible piece of equipment at an almost give away price.  I have no complaints and this camera surpasses what I expected</review_text>
I had an Olympus 5MP point-n-shoot Camedia camera I was pretty happy with for portraits. I was annoyed w/ the fixed lens that prevented me from taking good photos of wildlife. I have hummingbird feeders in my backyard and unless you've had the opportunity to work with hummingbird families for years, the sweet, tiny animals are skittish and don't often pose for you when you get too close. When my point-n-shoot stopped focusing, I took advantage of this situation by rationalizing this bigger purchase.What a joy it has been to use this camera. The 6.3MP is a significant improvement over 5 and the ability to take photos in manual mode cannot be understated. With the fixed point-n-shoot, the camera refused to shoot if it didn't "feel" that it was in focus... so it was impossible to shoot sunsets, lightning or other natural beauties in the "infinity" range of the focal length.The Rebel makes use of Compact Flash - the oldest, yet still the best technology for taking fast, high-quality photos in digital cameras.My less than perfect rating is due to the small memory buffer. You can take up to 3fps very easily, but if you click-click-click the shutter, it doesn't matter if Bigfoot, the Loch Ness Monster and Elvis start doing a little soft-shoe right in front of you, by the time the Rebel finishes writing the recent 3 quick shots to the CF card, the shot of the century has already slithered back into the swamp by the time the camera is ready to be used again.If you're taking portraits, not a problem. A click here and there and you'll never notice the lack of memory buffer... but if you're shooting at a ball game or other quick moving objects, you're going to get frustrated very quickly.The flash is decent, but you really need a good flash like the 580 in the hot-shoe if you want a better even spread and avoidance of red-eye. A lot of folks shrug about red-eye since most affordable or free programs like iPhoto or Photoshop Elements have built-in correction for red-eye - but red-eye correction by one click is only available for humans. If you're shooting wildlife, forget about any software that has a one-click (or a million clicks!) solution for blue-eye in dogs, yellow-eye in cats, flaming-demon eye in bunnies or the variety of odd reflections you will get bouncing off retinas of various species. The best way to circumvent this problem is to avoid bouncing flash directly into the retinas of your subjects from the get-go. No more glare or odd reflections when you use a better flash.The ability to upgrade to better lenses is the crux of SLR ownership. The sky is the limit. Get a good wide-angle and a good, fast telephoto and you've got yourself set for some great shots.  This camera isn't going to take advantage of CF cards faster than 40x, so you can save money by buying the slightly slower CF cards, but I invested in the 80x cards so I can use them when I upgrade cameras.This Rebel has gotten me back into photography after a decade-long hiatus. The camera automatically detects vertical shots and turns them 90 degrees for you in the LCD window. It is quick and easy to adjust the ISO to "push" the film (so to speak) to take advantage of low-light situations, but you get the same grainy effects as you do when you push real film.With an ISO of 100 and using a 512MB CF card, you have 157 photos at your disposal - if you push it all the way to 1600, 104 shots on the same card. At 400, your shots are already compromized regarding print quality... but if Sasquatch comes-a-knockin' in the wee hours, you'll still get decent proof if you shoot at 1600.Having a background in film photography spanning 2 decades, I didn't even have to consult the manual for this camera to use it fresh out of the box. It handles in many ways like a professional film SLR, and unlike the point-n-shoots, there aren't cryptic settings that have no film parallel.For sunny days and outdoor shots, this camera is a sheer joy to use</review_text>
I have owned a Canon EOS Digital Rebel 6.3mp for several weeks now and love it. Fantastic pictures & features. I worked with SLR's for many years. Figured it was time to "move up" to the digital SLR and glad I did. This camera has plenty of features available, or you can just set it for "auto" and that works fine, too. Though an optional flash is not needed for most photography I wanted one for far shots and such. Canon makes several models dedicated to this camera, but I find them weak (220EX) or costly.  Shop carefully in trying to find a compatible flash. It needs to be "dedicated" to the digital Rebels. One that will work with AF (auto focus) or the SLR (film) Rebel may not work right.  I also received conflicting information from Ritz Camera, both on-line and in the stores. Bottom line, if you need a flash, shop carefully and ask all the right questions. Personally I have held off buying one hoping more models at a lower price come out. The camera does already have a small pop-up flash. BTW, the Tamron AF 70-300 Macro 1:2 zoom is a nice lens to buy with it, and priced nicely at Beach Camera</review_text>
This review will be really two parts: one for the amateur who has been using point and shoots, or has experience with film based SLRs; the other one for the prosumer or advanced amateur who is either going to digital from film Canon EOS bodies or is getting into pro-level digital shooting on the low end. For the former, the camera is pretty much all you need; for the latter, it is lacking key functionality, but IS workable.I'm in the latter category. I've done freelance photo work in the past, but not since the digital age began to take off in the late '90s. I've been shooting EOS cameras since the early '90s, and added medium format in the late '90s for wedding and portrait work. I'll be honest: I didn't like the idea of digital at first. Sure, the workflow improvements over film sounded great, but I wasn't seeing the quality of digital vs. film. I still am very much a believer that, at least for prints, especially big prints, film delivers a better overall picture quality. But the quality of digital SLRs since the release of the Digital Rebel is so good, the workflow advantages trump film in all but rare situations. I'll still use my medium format equipment for landscape and outdoor pics I'll print large and frame, but other than a pocket 35mm, I can't see using film much at all in that category, after seeing what I can do with the DReb.If you are primarily an amateur who is either used to using a Point and Shoot (film or digital) or who has used a consumer film SLR, you'll find this camera easy to operate and use to the extent you used your other cameras. I bought this without the lens, as I have other lenses and the packaged one didn't offer me anything, but for those without Canon glass, you get a surprisingly good lens with the kit. Remember, though, that the lens will only fit on the Digital Rebel, its successors, and possibly the 10/20D line of Canon EOS bodies.Shooting is pretty simple. Charge the battery, which is easy -- the charger blinks depending upon its charge. You can look at the charger with the battery on there and see where you are, charge wise. It doesn't take very long to charge the battery fully. Once you have the battery in the camera, you'll need a Compact Flash card. I recommend SanDisk Ultra II cards. You won't experience any write time problems over an above this camera's natural limitations. Then, set the ISO value (100-1600), set either the pre-programed mode on one side of the dial, or the traditional Program/Shutter Priority/Apeture Priority settings on the other side, and you are ready to rock. Remember that unlike many digital cameras, the LED on the back of the camers DOES NOT function as a viewfinder. Aside from displaying various camera options, it shows what you shot after shooting.If you want to use this as an advanced amateur/pro setup, you can, but know its limitations. I bought this in March and have been shooting all sports with it. I'm using a Canon L USM lens, and have gotten some terrific shots. But I've also missed some that have led me to decide to sell this camera and pick up a 20D. The problem I get into is focusing speed and zones. The 2.5 fps with only a 4 frame burst isn't as big a problem as it sounds. I can still get good action in the burst mode, but admittedly 5 fps with 22 or 25 (20D) bursts is much better. If you want to use this to shoot something like concerts or indoor events, you won't have the same focusing issues. You will have to deal with any flash limitations, but for that information, you will have to read another review. I'm not a camera flash guy under any definition.The only real problem I've had with this camera is that my shots are consistently underexposed by about .5-.7 of a stop. I shoot exclusively RAW mode (never shot JPG on this one other than first dozen or so shots) and it has been correctable when I convert the images. This is more of a minor irritation, and may not be noticable in JPEG shots. I've seen others using this camera complain of it as well.This camera is as good of a consumer camera as you will find. If a pro, or semi-pro, can make something function for his or her needs, you know the consumer can get everything they need out of this. I've been shooting since I was 8 or so, have owned umpteen cameras, and this one fills its market niche as good as any of them</review_text>
I have had 5 digital point and shoot cameras all a little bigger and better than the last. This is my first SLR and I am not in the least disappointed. This camera meets or exceeded everything I expected from it. Very easy to learn, read the manual and use the web site tuturial and when the battery is charged your ready to go take pictures. I highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I purchased a D-30 from Amazon last year and I previously had been using a Digital Nikon. The improvement was monumental in all aspects. I subsequently drowned my camera, and I am getting ready to repurchase another D30. They are not ready for water yet? I have taken approximately 5000 pictures and saved them all in the most usable format and I will continue to do the same. The Photoshop software that comes with the camera is very user friendly, I am sure there are many features yet to learn, but I have been extremely happy with what I have already used. I hesitate to say mastered</review_text>
I recently moved into the prosumer level of digital.  The Canon D30 has proven to be an awesome camera.  There maybe better (D60), but if you are serious about digital, the D30 has to be one of the best cameras for the price.  There is a slight lag between shots, but if you are not photographing speeding bullets and express trains, the time between shots is hardly a distraction</review_text>
I've owned one of these cameras for about four years now, and I have been very pleased with it. It is light, small and easy to carry. It takes beautiful pictures--very sharp, and with good colors. The pictures look good even when you blow them up so big you can see the individual pixels.It was actually my second camera like this. The first had a problem with the USB port on the side of the camera, and I took it back to the store and traded it for a new one. This camera also had a problem too, after about two years, the button on the back that is needed for making settings stopped working properly.But still, considering the cost of the camera and the quality of the pictures, I will be buying another one. It's worth it.</review_text>
This camera is great for photographing artwork. It's the only camera I could find that doesn't bow the edges of paintings or watercolors (I think a lot of cameras have a lens that distors things, but you can't tell until you photograph something that is supposed to be rectangular).The color reproduction is also good.If you want a camera that takes good pictures of distant objects, or one with higher than 2mp resolution, look for another camera.</review_text>
This camera is designed to be an entry-level snapshot camera and it is very good at being just that.  It takes decent photos and is very easy to use.  As other reviewers have indicated, it does tend to chew through the batteries, but I just buy AAs cheap at Sam's and don't worry about it.  It works especially well in outdoor situtions.  It performs less well in low light.  Due to this limitation, it is just about useless as a webcam.  Even with all the lights on in the room, the webcam image is almost totally black.  The flash and the lens are less than an inch apart, so this camera is very prone to redeye.  There is a redeye reduction mode to the flash that works okay, but doesn't totally fix the problem.  All-in-all, for an entry-level camera, the A200 is quite usable.  Just be aware of what it is and don't expect it to do more.</review_text>
I had and tried several digit-cams and can say that you cannot find a better camera for this price.Pros:+ Great value, low price+ Easy handling+ Portability, light weight+ Great Fuji colours, good auto white balance+ Fast shutter response, close to film cameras+ Control over exposure, flash and pre-programmed white balance+ It uses AA's, great battery life+ Changig between images in playback mode doesn't take hours+ Excellent prints from the photosCons:- Images noisier than competition (but they are more expensive also)- Images too much compressed, therefore less detail, no control over jpeg compression (but this is the same with most Fuji models unfortunately)- No control over ISO- Low resolution LCD, too dark in low-light- No optical zoom (but at this price it's ok)- The camera has a cheap feel to it (but again, at this price it's ok)- Weak flash for outdoor night shots, but enough for smaller room shots- Flash recharge time takes a few seconds, camera freezes (but this is the same with most Fuji models unfortunately)- It uses expensive XD-cards- Sluggish zooming and panning in playback mode- No sound in videoI highly recommend this camera for beginners or to those who doesn't want to spend more on a digital camera.I've read many negative reviews due to it's bad photo indoors. Okay, it's not a Canon G3. At first I thought the same, but then set the controls to manual, set the exposure up to the highest value and then shot the picture. The end result was much better than in full auto mode. So my advice is indoors and in low-light set the exposure manually, you'll be glad you did I promise.The colours are well balanced, and the prints come out great, no matter how noisy the images are, you won't notice that on the photo paper.This model is now out of sale, but if you can find a second-hand one at a good price don't be afraid to buy it, it's an excellent buy</review_text>
Wow is all there is to say no problems with it perfect for a casual picture take</review_text>
This is a very nice starter camera that is easy to use.  The batteries run out kind of fast, but once I bought rechargeable batteries it solved that problem! Surprising good quality for the small amount of money I paid for it</review_text>
Pros: Excellent picture quality, great zoom, nice panoramic feature, SD card, great video and sound quality for a picture camera, the best that you can by for this money and the LCD can rotate in any angle.Cons: Flash does not pop up automatically; just 16mb SD card in the box.PD: this camera size is not a pocket one but the size is good enough to shoot with one hand.Advice: use rechargeable batteries and a large SD card (2 or 4 Gb) cause the video is so good that you will love shooting. Also, must of the times you will need the flash indoor other way you will have bad pics; with flash results will amazed you.</review_text>
I initially had a canon S1IS (just 3MP, 10x optical, CF card) and needed an upgrade for the same as I was visiting Disney, LA.  The S3IS (6 MP, SD card) delivered with gusto with its image stabilization and higher ISO modes. I have a full video and reasonably good snaps of the Disney parade during the evening darkness (switch to highest ISO with the dedicated ISO button) with:1. Amazingly low jerkiness due to the image stabilization. The IS here is of course better than the S1IS.2. The snaps came allright even with the maximum zoom - if there are slight blurs, you can maybe use software like coral to adjust.  As others have said here, yes, a tripod is the best, but who has the time or the patience to set it up.3. Even many of the disney fireworks snaps came out ok in the night mode with the maximum ISO setting - though of course a tripod would have helped in the darkness here, for sure :)4. Best value for price.  In Nov 2006, a nice deal would be getting this camera within 350$ as in Amazon.Two things here:1. I would not be buying a videocam as I had planned earlier, the S3IS vidoes suffice for most situations - sending videos to AFV for instance.2. For the last point, I would recommend waiting for 3-4 months till the 4GB SD cards come into the 50$ range.  But as others have mentioned before, please have at least a 2GB card.  Look in Amazon or in Fry's as I did for 35-40$ deals on 2+ GB cards</review_text>
My search for a semi pro Digicam made me do a lot of research and after I shortlisted a few models I had to find the best deal. Amazon helped me get that deal and today when I look at the performance of the camera so far.. I am amazed... The camera was bound  to be good but a special thanks to Amazon.com for helping me get one at a gr8 price</review_text>
Great camera, easy to use after reading the manual.Light, easy to handle. Unfortunately a little pricey</review_text>
This is my second Canon. There is a lot of whistles and bells on this camera that will take time for the novice to figure out. My biggest complaint is trying to remember to take off the lense cap before turning it on. My other cameras did not have the cap. All in all it takes excellent quality photos, so you will not be disappointed</review_text>
Works great as point-and-shoot in auto mode. Camera has just enough advanced features to keep the novice photographer happy for a long time. Battery life is great if you purchase top quality rechargables. A large, at least 1G SD card, should be used. Image stabilization works well. Tripod is necessary if using camera at full zoom</review_text>
This is a great camera for those who need more than a point and shoot but do not want to carry a bag full of lenses.  Also, with a large SD card (1 to 4 GB) this camera will replace your video camera.  One thing to note, when you take pictures while recording video, it stops recording a second or two while it processes your picture.  This is very obvious when watching your video</review_text>
Over the last 50 years, I have purchased four film cameras and five digital cameras. By far, the Canon S3 IS is the best camera I have owned. And most of the cameras I have bought cost more that the S3. I returned recently from a three-week trip to Scandinavia and St. Petersburg, Russia. During the trip, I took almost 2500 photos with the S3. The photo quality was excellent, the camera controls were easy to use, and the camera performance was outstanding. I expect to use the S3 for many years.</review_text>
I bought one when it first came on the market back in May. Half a year and 5,000 pictures later, here are some of my comments:- It is a GREAT digital camera in its own class. By "class" I mean one should not compare it with a dSLR because the S3 is not one. So do not expect it to overcome "shutter lag" easily, although among other DC (digital camera) I have used, shutter lag on S3 is greatly improved--to a degree that I feel comfortable taking photos in very fast pace, e.g., catching flying birds. (However, only good dSLR can completely eliminate shutter lag and S3 is not a dSLR.) One also should not compare the S3 with the "small" point-'n-shoot DCs. S3 is not as small as those--it won't easily slide into your pocket, unless your pocket is relatively big and loose (like mine). But the slightly larger body brings great features none of the small DC can offer.- Big optical zoom (12X) and IS. 12X is GREAT and combined with Canon's Imagine Stabilization, S3 turns into a powerful large zoom camera with superb imagine quality. My recent trips included shooting (with cameras in case you wonder) wild wolf at Yellowstone National Park. And this little S3 came out as the only one that can capture the animals at great distance, along with other "big guns" the professionals carry. The IS feature eliminates hand shake with great effect and I could shoot at 12X with low light and still get quality photos. I also highly recommend the "TC-DC58B Tele Converter Lens" for the S3 (or S2) which gives you another 1.5 zoom that effectively make S3 18X zoom (equivalent to a 600mm lens). Check how much those big telephoto lens cost (close to 10K) ...- Excellent video shooting. Again a feaure one almost never finds on any other DC or dSLR. The S3 takes DVD quality video in stereo sound, not just video clips that most DC can do. This little (almost) pocket-size camera now forces our digital videocam into an early retirement.- Many other great features. However those are more or less standard and one can always try to argue some other DC may have similar or better features. I won't comment on those.In summary, the S3 is a great small-size DC. Its superb lens offers big 12X zoom and IS, two technology of Canon's pride. It also offers DVD video shoot with stereo sound--this feature alone can save you a digital vidoecam.One suggestion--do get a big SD card if you want to shoot video too. I have a 4G SD card and I think 2G is a must. Also battery life is excellent. It uses 4 AA-battery, which seems a lot odd at the beginning. But it comes in handy because as long as you can get AA battery you never worry about power. With typical dSLR, if the battery is out you are done for the day unless you find a power outlet to recharge (and have your charger with you).I do have one small complain. The Menu button at the back of the camera is at the location where my palm presses the body. Sometimes I raise the S3 and I see the menu in viewfinder because my palm has pressed it strong enough to trigger it. Another press is needed and I lost several shots because of this.I have other dSLR with quality lens. But I always take the S3 with me on any trip</review_text>
Fairly decent.  Produces pictures with optical blur on the edges if you use zoom.  Leaves black semicircle on pictures taken with a flash about 1/5 the way up from the bottom on the picture because the flash isn't tall enough to miss the wide lens.  Other than that.. it does capture a few more degrees.  If you are going to pick this or the telephoto attachment, get this.</review_text>
Though I am not qualified to write about the quality of the filters, they seem to be doing the job pretty well. The finish is good and they fit well with the 58 mm Canon lense for my Rebel XT. The lense cap goes right over it so it is doubly protected. The small pouch to hold the three filters is also of big help to keep them safe and easily accessable</review_text>
These are the second set of filters I have purchased and I am absolutely love it.  I have to buy a new set because my other lense is 62mm and these are for 58mm.  It produced outstanding colors and great quality filters.  I would recommend it, and for the price, that's how much you would have to pay for the polarizer filter alone</review_text>
I purchased the filter kit for my Sony Camera. The price is considerably cheaper than Sony's and the quality is great! I'm looking into other items offered at a good price from Opteka</review_text>
This camera has lot of modes that you can use. It has very good resolution and optical zoom. With 12x optical zoom you can click awesome pictures, specially in live performances and sightseeing trips. 5 MP resolution is more than enough, otherwise the pics become just too big to fit in one screenshot. You can also panoramic pictures with it. The only two complaints are - flash recycling time should have been lesser, and the SD card that comes with it is only 16 MB, which is hardly enough for 7-8 pics. You will have to buy a 512 MB or 1 GB SD card separately. Also, the batteries that come with it are not rechargeable, so you will have to buy charger and batteries as well, which are not so expensive. But these drawbacks are there in S3IS also. Overall, this camera gives very clear pictures and is worth buying if you happen to get it at a decent price.</review_text>
This is a great camera, easy to use, love the quality and even best, got this quick as can be with Amazon PRime.  HIghly recommen</review_text>
When I first got the camera I was nervous about whether or not I'd be able to use & understand it well since I usually buy point & shoot type camera. I was pleasantly surprised on how easy it is to use & all the functions it really has.The pictures are really high quality & the video is crystal clear.The camera's lightweight & perfect to grab on the go or to capture any occasion. I like the design of it & I love the fact that I can get professional looking pictures time & time again...</review_text>
I had viewed concert photos taken with the S2 from a number of different photographers and they absolutely took my breath away. Saw the output of other cameras in comparison and they didn't even come close.I was using the Canon A80 prior and while I was happy with it, my first round of photos with the S2 proved to be most impressive. While you can use this as a point and shoot, this is a camera that you should spend some time learning so that you can get the most from it. And although the S3 is the latest version of the camera, I'm not sure you get that much more for the money</review_text>
I got this Canon camera back in May for my birthday from my husband. Once I got it home it was very easy to learn and use. I have actually not even used all the features yet...because there are so many. This is my 3rd digital camera and 1st canon...I have to say that I will stick with canon for now on...I use to always like Kodak but canon is much better. I print off the pictures using my Kodak printer and everything still looks great!I love canon so much that I just bought a Canon Camcorder ...and I hope that it is just as nice as their digital cameras.I highly recommend this camera for families...I have used it in live action and after you get the hang of the image stabilizer everything turns out well.....I feel that I will use this camera for a while and when it's time to upgrade to another camera I will stick w/ Canon..</review_text>
I bought the Canon PowerShot S2 IS about a year ago, and have taken about 2,500 photos and about 15 video clips with it. Overall, I am very happy with it, and if I were buying a new camera today, I probably would get the S2 or S3.Things I like about the S2:* Extended zoom (12x). I use it often.* Image stabilization. Particularly helpful when using a high zoom factor, or when shooting in low light with a low ISO setting. It makes handheld shots at slow shutter speeds possible.* Electronic viewfinder means "what you see is what you get", just like an SLR. While not as sharp as an optical viewfinder, the ability to frame the picture without worrying about parallax more than makes up for it. In fact, one advantage over an SLR is that there is no mirror for it to move out of the way, therefore there is no mirror noise when taking a picture; if you turn off the electronic sound effects, it is very quiet indeed (although not completely silent).* The screen moves and rotates. I like that it can be closed (turned in toward the camera) and thus protected from scratches. I have used it folded out and rotated forward in order to see myself in a self-timer photo. I have used it to take "clandestine" pictures--holding the camera down near my waist, I can still see the screen if I rotate it towards me. I have also used it to take pictures while holding the camera above my head--above a crowd, for instance, or over a wall.* Multiple-picture mode. Similar to a motor drive in film cameras, this allows me to take several pictures in quick succession by holding down the shutter release button--about 2 pictures per second. And unlike some cameras, the only limit to the number of pictures is the amount of available memory.* It can be used in all-automatic mode, all-manual mode, or just about any combination in between. Even in near-automatic mode, several exposure settings can be adjusted.* Very good movie mode. It will shoot a VGA-quality picture (640x480) at 30fps. While the results are not as good as my 3-CCD DV video camera, I am much more likely to have this camera with me than the video camera, and I really like the option of taking a reasonably high quality video. I have used it several times.* Stereo microphones. Decent sound for video. Can also be used for adding a sound memo to a still picture (e.g. "this is at such-and-such a place, blah blah blah"), or just for recording sounds unrelated to any picture. I have used this a couple of times to record a "sound memory" of a place; one was at a botanical garden at a spot where the scenery wasn't especially pretty, but the sounds the frogs made were like nothing we had heard before!* Separate buttons for still pictures and movies. Easy to remember which is which.* Manual pop-up flash. Some people don't like that the flash doesn't pop up automatically when needed. I actually like this feature, because often I want to shoot without a flash when the camera thinks I need to use the flash. And of course I can force the flash to fire even in bright daylight when the camera thinks it is not necessary--although for a while I kept forgetting how to turn on that feature on, even though it's pretty obvious (there's a button right next to the flash!).Things I don't like about it:* Poor low-light performance. More precisely, poor performance at high ISO settings. The camera will do fine in low light if you leave the shutter open long enough, or use a flash. But if you kick up the ISO to 200 or 400 (equivalent to a "fast" film) so that you can take indoor shots without a flash, you end up with very noticeable graininess in the pictures. This is my number one disappointment with the camera. However, I don't know of a comparable camera that does better (and from the sample pictures I have seen, the S3 isn't any better; I don't know why they bothered to add an ISO 800 setting--it seems completely useless to me). I know there are cameras that do, but they cost a lot more. I saw pictures taken indoors with a Canon 20D SLR that were phenomenal. But besides the added expense, a camera like that is also bigger and heavier, and therefore less convenient.* The camera is too big for a pocket. I would love to have a camera as capable as this that would fit in my shirt pocket, or at least my coat pocket or a smallish holster. I would take it more places if it wasn't so big.* And yet, at the same time, it's a little too small for my hand. The grip just doesn't feel right. The grip on the 20D felt GREAT! However, it's just about right for a woman's hand--my wife likes it fine.* No filter threads in the standard configuration. A big lens like that is practically begging for fingerprints or scratches. I solved that by adding the conversion lens adapter, which does have filter threads (more about this below).* Lens cap is held on by friction. This is both a pro and a con. It's good because the lens extends when the camera is turned on; if the lens cap is attached the lens will simply push it off. It's bad because the cap could come off when you don't want it to. This is a moot point with the conversion lens adapter, as the standard lens cap will no longer fit.* The default exposure is too bright. Not every review mentions this, but apparently it is fairly common for Canon cameras. Fortunately, this is easily fixed by setting the exposure adjustment (I set mine to -2/3 stop). I haven't figured out how to adjust the exposure for movies, though. I need to look in the manual to see if it's possible!If you buy the S2 (or S3), I'd suggest also considering:* Canon LAH-DC20 Lens Adapter and Hood Set. As I mentioned above, this allows you to add a filter to protect the lens. Currently $37.10 at Amazon.* A 58mm skylight or UV filter to screw on to the lens adapter.* A 58mm lens cap to cover the adapter/filter. Canon's 58mm Snap-On Lens Cap is currently $9.99 at Amazon.* A high-speed SD card, at least 512MB, but 1GB or 2GB would give more space for movies. (I use a SanDisk Ultra II Plus, which has the added benefit of being able to directly plug into a standard USB port without an adapter.)* Rechargeable NiMH batteries. I don't have any yet, but this is the next thing on my list. I've gone through way too many AA batteries!A nice option available for this camera is the TC-DC58B Tele Converter Lens. This gives you a maximum zoom equivalent to 648mm on a 35mm camera. Amazing! I have not purchased it yet because so far the built-in zoom has been sufficient for my needs. There is also the WC-DC58A Wide Converter Lens for taking extra-wide-angle pictures.After you get the camera, you'll probably want a case of some type for it. There are *lots* of cases to choose from. After trying a few and looking at a lot more, I finally settled on the Tamrac Velocity 4. It may or may not be what you need in a case, but there it is FYI</review_text>
Are accessories like the lens converters, the wide angle and long angle lenses, and the filters that I purchased for the Canon Powershot S1 IS compatible with the Canon Powershot S2 IS or the Canon Powershot S3 IS?  I am looking to updgrade, and I want to know what costs I will have other than the camera itself and the memory (since the S1 IS used Compact Flash memory).  Thanks</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I mainly bought this to go on the end of the lens adapter for the S2 IS.  It does well to protect the lens, but you can't put a lens cap over it.  It ends up being easier to use without the lens cap...and quicker when taking pictures.The pictures are very good through it</review_text>
Works well on a normal cameraTried it with adapter on S3 IS and adapter does not fit robustly.Filter is O</review_text>
I was concerned when I ordered this filter about the previous problems reported here.  But, I was in a hurry and needed two of these for vacation.   There was absolutely no problem with the product.  Both filters were sealed and in perfect condition.  Could have been packed a little better in the shipping box, but arrived in good condition.  No problems with photos taken with this product</review_text>
I took a few identical photos with and without this filter, and saw no difference in sharpness nor contrast. So, if you're looking to save damage to your lense, this is the way to go. I like being able  to clean this filter quickly. Otherwize I would spend 10-20 minutes cleaning the lense being so very carefull not to scratch it. Also, it can minimize UV haze... but I havn't compared with/without for that type of situation. (PLEASE COMMENT IF YOU HAVE A DIFFERENT OPINION ... (BRAND)</review_text>
Ordered one in March and its came in fine (not used or abused like others have mentioned).Amazon.com was the retailer.I use it mostly for the lens protection aspect and it works great, in fact I'm ordering another right now</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I was looking for a medium range zoom for my D-70s that was reasonably fast and sharp throughout the zoom range. This lens is a first class winner in all areas. It is my first VR lens (vibration resistance) and that alone makes it worth the cost. No more tripods! It is smooth in operation and feels very solid (if not a little heavy) to use. The f/2.8 speed coupled with 8 aperture leaves gives a velvety smooth bokeh (desirable soft blurred background) that makes your subject snap right out of the shot. The len is razor sharp from 70mm to 200mm. If there is any distortion, I haven't seen it. With a lens this long, ghosting might show up if you shoot almost directly into the sun. The huge HB-29 lens hood helps a lot. Again, I have not seen any ghosting yet. This is definately a pro/pro-sumer len and its price tag alone re-enforces that fact. If you can afford it, remember the golden rule...it is the lens that makes the picture not the camera. All the pixels in the world can't make up for a poor lens. If you are ready to play with the big boys, then this belongs in your bag</review_text>
This lens is superb.  It feels like a high quality pro lens (not surprisingly).  The shots are just stunning; fantastic color, razor sharp, beautiful bokeh etc etc.  I initially considered the 18-200(VR) until I saw comments about this lens.  Look into it, from what I can tell there is very little (real) comparison between the two.  I believe you will forget how much you paid as soon as you see the results.  Did I mention this lens is superb....?</review_text>
This lens has so many uses.  Anytime I can position myself where my subject is more than five feet away, this is my lens of choice.  I have the kit 18-70mm that came with the D70 and a 50mm prime (I have the 18-200 VR is on order, and if Nikon can ever get around to catching up with demand, that lens might surpass this one, due to the smaller weight - plus it is a lot cheaper).I took every lens I own with the D70 to the British Museum in London. Shooting handheld in available light (I never used the flash) with many of the Egyptian and Greek artifacts over fifty feet away, I got outstanding results with this lens. The VR technology is amazing.  Having a constant 2.8 aperture was also a major advantage.  I'll grant you my arm felt like a rubber hose after four hours of site seeing, but it was worth it!  I have had similar satisfaction using the lens outdoors for wildlife photography. I have even used the TC-20EII teleconverter with the lens, to shoot hummingbirds at great distance. I would have no reservations about recommending the lens, until Nikon announced the 18-200 VR. This new lens has a much broader focal length on the low end, and focuses much closer (around a foot, compared to five feet for 70-200).  The 18-200 does not provide a constant 2.8 aperture across it's focal length, so the 70-200 would be better at long distances in low light.  But at less than half the price, and I think less than half the size, this new lens clearly will have a premier spot in my bag.  Will it totally replace the 70-200VR?  I'll update my review when I finally get to try the lens on the block. Until then, the 70-200mm VR is the champ</review_text>
This is it.  I upgraded from the Sigma EX f2.8 80-200.  I should have spent the money for the Nikon the first time.  The Sigma is a very nice lens for less, and a good alternative, but if you want it all, go for the Nikon.  Leave your tripod at home when you get this glass.  I don't know how this compares, but I'm shooting hand held with 1/30s shutter at full zoom (35mm equivalent of 300mm).  The VR is phenomenal, the wide aperature delivers beautiful blur, and the overall fit and construction is flawless.  Tack sharp images too</review_text>
I have used this lens for over 6 months now and have over 1k shots through it.  It is as fantastic as others note herein.  The 2.8 through the focus range is really great.  Superb.  The VR function is really a neat trick.  It is super fun to play with.The drawbacks are size and weight.  After a 1/2 hour of shooting, your arms will get tired.  Remember to be careful and hold the lens and not the camera.  This lens is definately heavy enough to bend/warp the camera body</review_text>
I love this lens. This is an excellent complement to my Nikon 28-70 2.8. It is well balanced on D200 and F100 (with MB Grip). Just last weekend used in a Family Wedding. It is really not a lens for casual photography. If you are not willing to tolerate heavy equipment, sincerely, you will take much better pictures with PS digital cameras, as I sometimes do. After all taking pictures is about capturing moments and if this lens will get into your way, it has no use.I personally only prefer fixed 2.8 apertures across the zoom range. This is very important for me since I like to use mostly Aperture Priority especially taking people's pictures. That is why I love this lens. This is a very expensive lens. If VR is not important to you, go with more reasonably priced with almost identical optical qualities Nikon 80-200 2.8. To me VR is very important since I cannot afford to use Tripods when I am moving around and taking pictures of my kids or friends.If you could afford it, it is a great lens that you will never regret. If you cannot afford it just you are thinking on purchasin expensive Camera Body, don't waste your time on camera specs, D70 vs D200 vs D2Xs etc. Buy cheaper camera, but still buy this lens as long as you are willing to carry heavy equipment around and comitted to take pictures with such heavy equipment.Bokeh is amazing, rich contrast, creamy blurring behind a subject with 2.8 is simply delicate and delicious</review_text>
This lens has only two "faults."  First, it is big and heavy--quality construction often yields a heavy lens.  Second, once the photographer has seen the results that this lens can produce, there is a likelihood that he or she will be unhappy with the other lenses in the camera bag.Results first: the images are razor sharp with this zoom mounted on my Nikon D70s.  I can get shots that I never could get before because this lens is so crisp that subjects taken at a distance nevertheless can be cropped to produce an acceptable close-up image. Subjects taken at more normal distances are breathtakingly sharp--as if shot with an excellent prime lens. This is a fast lens (F/2.8 throughout its entire zoom range).  Almost more importantly, this lens has the best "Bokeh" that I have ever experienced in a lens.  "Bokeh," to the extent that I understand the concept (it is a Japanese word meaning roughly "unfocused"), is a word describing whether the out-of-focus portion of an image (i.e. a blurred background in a photo in which only the subject is in focus) has a pleasing look to it.  This lens produces wonderful, creamy Bokeh.  The sharpness and Bokeh, combined with the excellent bright color rendition of this lens, makes this one a true classic.I have occasionally experienced minor ghosting on this lens when shooting into a very bright subject, i.e. the sun reflecting off of the ocean.  This is a normal shortfall of a zoom lens comprised of a multitude of elements, and I have sometimes experienced this.  But such occasions are rare.The autofocusing action of this lens is very good.  Even birds at very long distances usually produce a quick, snappy autofocus lock on my Nikon D70s.  Very seldom does it "hunt" for an AF lock, and these occasions are likely due to operator error rather than the lens.  This lens also features Vibration Reduction (VR) which enables it to produce acceptable images below what an F/2.8 lens would otherwise be suitable for.  The VR really works, too, although it is by no means a panacea for dim lighting.This is one of Nikon's professional lenses, and the quality of construction is excellent.  The critical mount is metal, and the entire lens is built like a tank.  The lens comes with a nice squeeze-style lens cap, and a very good lens hood that can be easily reversed for storage.The reader can see that I am extremely enamored with this lens.  The reason is that, notwithstanding its bulk and weight, this lens produces the best nature shots that I have ever managed to take, by far.</review_text>
Yes, this lens is already legend, and no, it's not just a bunch of people trying to justify spending a whole lot of cash on a lens. Make no mistake, this lens is BIG and expensive. It's not fitting into your travel bag nor is it at home at a friend's party. For that bring the 18-70mm, 28-200G or just bring a cheaper P&S type camera in case you spill beer on it!The 70-200 VR is a pro level lens that gets almost everything right. It's size is the byproduct of an optical design that really makes few, if any compromises. This lens is SHARP...as sharp as my 50mm prime and sharper wide open that you might believe or expect. On a D70 the focus is lightening fast and quite exact. Color rendition is the best I've seen. I do much less post processing when this baby is on the D70.On the problematic side, this lens is BIG. It's heavy and in the way, though reasonably easy to grasp. I added a Harbortronics portrait grip and the handling/balance is improved. It needs a big bag and focuses down to a bit under 5 feet. While it's a fantastic portrait lens, you need room to get the most out of it. My first shots with this lens put my more experienced lenses to shame. The bokeh, or quality of out-of-focus areas were creamy and pleasing. Subjects had a 3D quality to them.The VR system is exactly what you'd expect. I sat on my couch, framed the text on my DVD player about 8 feet away and shot at F/2.8 ISO 200 for a 1/2 second exposure. At 200mm (300mm on the D70) the image was sharp. Without VR I got a big blur.The real question is: Do you need a 1700 dollar lens?Answer: Only if you want it. The quality is all there at a level that has people talking about this lens like it's magic. I have friends who shoot pro with Canon and Nikon. Even the Canon users say the 70-200VR is the best of it's kind. Sell a kidney and buy one</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well.  The build is solid (metal construction).  The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation.  The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens.</review_text>
Filter works good for general use and protects against some of the light relection. I would purchase it again</review_text>
I buy this UV filter to protect my kit lens(18-55mm), so far so good. I am using a canon rebel xd. If you just want to get a cheap UV to protect your lens, buy this one</review_text>
Puts a protective glass over your expensive gla$$ without distortion.</review_text>
It is better to save the camera's real lens which can be replaced with this filter being broken than the expensive lens behind it.  This is a real "lens saver"</review_text>
I get at least a UV filter for all my lenses. That's the cheapest insurance you can get for you lense. Protect it from possible scratches and banging against objects. Haven't really seen a major difference between the brand filter and the Tiffen filter. I would just go with the cheapest filter to be found for you lens</review_text>
After overpaying at a fancy camera store, I was happy to purchase an identical filter from amazon for a fraction of the price. These filters give you piece of mind, protection from sand, fingerprints and baby spittle</review_text>
This gadget is a must-have for gadget lovers.....and picture lovers.  It is compact, solid and fits any small pocket or clutch bag.  The images are crisp if you get it set appropriately.  If you love attention get this product and if you don't .....not to worry the camera gets all of it.</review_text>
I am only giving 4 stars, because i just receive it through mail a couple days ago. So i still haven't get a chance to fully try out everything. But I can tell you this camera is very handy, it's very small that i can throw it in my small purse (my purse usually don't have much room, b/c i would already had so much stuff in it, like my PDA, i-pod, cell phone, wallet, keys, a pack of tissue and et.c) and take it with me to anywhere. I love the design of this camera, it's very cool. Pictures are pretty clear, even the one taking during the nights. Another thing that i love about this camera is that it's not noisy, and it's very quick (i have no patience, so it's good for me that i can snap pictures crazy quickly). Overall, I find this camera pretty good.</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera and it is very easy to use and takes nice pictures.  I bought a case to put it in so I could keep the screen from getting scratched.  Go out and find a generic camera bag that will fit it.  They are so much cheaper than Canon's camera bags.  The only thing about this camera that I would like to change is that I wish it had a battery life indicator.</review_text>
After waiting months for an order to be filled and then getting screwed by customer service/returns, I decided never to buy from Amazon again.  Go to an electronics or camera store, you'll get better service and the fresh air will do you good</review_text>
This camera fits easily in my pocket and takes fantastic pictures for an ultra compact. It is easy to use and I have had no problems with it</review_text>
I like Canon's digital camera because it is everything an average person may want. It is light, with great design, works incredibly good and I can make hundreds of pictures. Isn't is a dream come true? Highest recommendation</review_text>
This camera is easy to take anywhere, easy to operate and best of all takes great pictures of my 2 boys.  Highly recommended.</review_text>
I've upgraded from an older Canon A series to this SD600.  Price I payed was just under $250.  Purchase a spare battery - they are small and worth the small investment to carry an extra, and get a bigger memory card, 6 mp take up more room so you need more space.2.5" screen takes is a great size and good clarity.  Except in extreme brightness (outside direct sun) have no problem reviewing my pictures.Like with previous Canon's this camera is user friendly and easy to use.  Automatic settings adjust light and settings to take the best picture and it cuts out the guess work of doing it in manual.Downloading is a snap.  The computer interface is easy to navigate and pretty self-explanitory.  6 mp is all I need.  I take a lot of pictures for work, and often have to zoom in on the picture to see details - this resolution is just perfect.  Good balanace between picture quality and jpg size.  Any bigger, the files become a pain to email (especially with size limits) and deal with.Look for a snazzy red case for this camera - this fit is snug and the case is rigid so it gives the camera and screen extra protection without a lot of extra room.  I just slip it into my purse or pocket - it's really small without sacrificing functionality and ease of use.</review_text>
I have a Nikon D50, and when attaching the camera, the tilting base of the tripod needs a little compensation for the camera weight. Hence, I haven't found any use for the libelle on the tripod. I have to look through the wiev finder to see if my set-up is level or not.Overall though, it's not a big problem, and hey, with the price of the tripod, I'll live with it</review_text>
I have a very small camera (a Canon SD450) and find this tripod to be a perfect match.  It is light and small and easy to carry with the included canvas case. It has a few nice features that I didn't expect (even though I read the text!) like the bubble level on the platform.This product is an excellent value.  However, the shipping cost as much as the tripod.  Of course, that is not the tripod's fault.</review_text>
I really looked hard at the various light (sub-3 lb) tripod options to use with my Canon Powershot S2 IS.  Lighter the better, but I also really wanted a 3-way pan head and all of the little nice extras that I could get: bubble level, quick set-up/tear-down, fits inside of carry-on luggage, good build quality, comes with a bag, good hand crank, etc.It definitely fit the bill perfectly, and was ONLY 2 lbs!  Of course you don't get super strong wind-proof stability at that weight, but I was really quite happy with the overall stability on my recent vacation.  When there was a strong wind, I leaned a bag, backpack, or beach towel around one of the legs and that gave me more piece of mind... but I think it probably would have been fine... especially when not fully extended to max height.Before buying it, the max height was actually my only real concern -- would it be tall enough to take good people pictures/outdoor portraits while I was on my vacation?  My experience says -- Yes, great people shots (and so much better than the typical shot you get by asking a passing by stranger to take a photo for you)!Don't hesitate, just buy this one!</review_text>
I received this tripod for Christmas and I am totally delighted with it!  It comes with a case and is small and light enough for me to carry.  In just a few days use, it has made a difference on my low light level and non-flash photos</review_text>
This stuff worth for your small money, useful for your precious cameras</review_text>
This cleaning pen is just as advertised.  I have used it on a daily basis since I got it, and it has never failed to do a great job.  I use this with the VisibleDust Huricane blower, and the combo is unbeatable.  Great value for the price</review_text>
Practical and essential for SLR photography.Specially usefull to carry with your equipment</review_text>
Lens pens don't do a perfect job, but they do a better job than anything thing else I have found.  It is a "must have" product for anyone with a camera!  And the Nikon lens pen has worked well for me</review_text>
I was skeptical when I ordered the pen because I wasn't too sure how clean it would really keep my lens.Last week I traveled through out Mexico and visited some beautiful places, along with seeing a lot of family members. With all these family members around, a few accidently touched my lenses. I decided it would be a perfect time to test my new pen. End Result? PERFECTION! The lenses looked like thru were brand new!I used to carry little paper whipes designed for lenses, but now I use the Nikon Lens Pen and I don't need to worry about carrying whipes and throwing them away</review_text>
I bought this for the convience of keeping my lenses clean durring fast & furious wedding shoots.  It has worked beautifully.  It works great for taking off fingerprints and wiping away dust.</review_text>
I bought this pen for my boyfriend for his new Canon Digital Rebel SLR, but you could use it for almost anything with a lens.  It's got a small brush on one end to swipe away big stuff, and a round felt tip on the other for cleaning smudges.  He finds it very useful and it fits right in hiw camera bag</review_text>
When it comes to cleaning my digital camera lenses, i'm very afraid of damaging something, so this little and cheap product takes away all the fear, and all the dust from my lenses.---Cuando se trata de limpiar los lentes de mi camara, me da mucho miedo que se dae, entonces con este pequeo y barato producto, fuera miedo y fuera polvo</review_text>
This handy little tool is a must have for not just Nikon owners, but all camera owners.  A genius of design and function, I would whole-heartedly urge every person with a camera to buy one, or many, asap</review_text>
Only problem is I live in Holland and have to have things sent to my daughter in the US and then forwarded since you don't ship overseas. Any hope that may change in the future</review_text>
The Canon 250D and 500D are doublet type close-up lenses which are corrected for chromatic abberation ("achromat"). They offer better performance than the less expensive singlet type lens. I have been happy with the performance of these lenses used on an EF 100mm/2.0, even when used stacked together for higher power (which Canon does not recommend)</review_text>
I'm surprised to see that a lot of people only give 1* to this camera! I've had it for 2 years now and i just love it! Thanks to it, I discovered I had a real passion for photography... It's very easy to use and my pictures are great! When I show them, people usually tell me " you must have an expensive camera"... and i just show them my little Canon S500 and they are surprised with the result!I'm just loving it</review_text>
Over 90% of pictures I took by this Canon are blurry. No way can you fix it. I really got fed up with it. Waist your money. Waist your time. More important, waist your precious moments!</review_text>
This was my first digital camera that I have ever bought, and I am completely satisfied with it. Talk abt the resolution or the camera's feature. All of it is packed into one small sleek camera. I recommend this digital camera to everybody. And I would say if I would decided later in future to get another one. I would alwayz go for Canon. They are the best in making Digital Cameras</review_text>
I needed to replace a lost S4oo we had for about a year. Looked at the SD series and thought them too small for comfort. There is such a thing as too thin to handle comfortably. The S500 is, like the S400, just right in size. Big area on back for thumb so you an even one-hand hold it. Try that with any SD. Pictures are excellent for a hand-held. Not Nikon N70 film SLR good, but plenty good enough for any snapshot purpose. Bought one of last new S500's available at NewEgg abd very, very happy with it</review_text>
Don't buy this camera!!!  Prone to "Memory Error" & E18 errors after warranty is up.  Cost min $150 plus shipping to fix.This camera was great until 23 months went by then I started mysteriously losing pictures due to file format errors.  I switched memory cards and it happened again.  Then the "memory error" displayed after a month or so of losing pictures.  Now it doesn't work at all.  I called canon to see what type of service could be provided and if they would fix what appears to be a factory defect since so many people have reported this problem.  Minimum cost is $150 or I could upgrade to a refurb S500 for $199 w/6 month warranty.  They have to be kidding, $250 get me a new one.  For what appears to be common problem I was expecting more from canon.  Guess I won't be buying another canon.Google this "Canon "Memory Error" E18" and see for yourself that Canon cameras have problems.</review_text>
This pouch is a Godsend so I bought 2. I use them for my EFS 60-mm and EFS 85-mm Lenses. The base feels firm so the lens sitting inside is protected and won't go anywhere and is made out of a strong naugahide. The pouch itself is thick felt and the rope pulls are made of heavy nylon twine that feels silky in your hand. The whole pouch is well built to protect but can be handled roughly and still protect the contents, your precious lenses</review_text>
I used this SB-600 on my Fuji S3 digital camera for a friend's wedding.  I found that you do need a diffuser (such as an omni bounce), otherwise you get shadows.  And it works great bouncing off the ceiling to fill the whole room. This flash is easy to use, reliable and the batteries didn't die until picture #637. I had no instances of it not going off when I took a picture ever</review_text>
This flash preforms with excellence ! All Nikon products I have are of pro grade. This flash recycles fast and is ready when I need the extra light for fill and main light. I purchased the SB-600 for the D-200 and am very happy with it. I have used it for the last six weddings this year and for shooting action shots of skate boarding compitions.         R.Wolf, Atl.GA</review_text>
I purchased my SB-600 a day before my granddaughter's birthday party at our local skating rink.  With very little time to test the unit prior to the party, I dove right in.  I was amazed at the exposures from very close shots to, believe it or not, the entire length of the skating rink.  The auto-zoom is a really cool feature that changes to match your lense setting from wide to telephoto.  I made about a 150 shots the first time out using NiMH batteries with no significant drain.  At this time, I have found absolutely no negative points.  I may even purchase a couple more and replace my portable Photogenic studio lights</review_text>
This flash is unbelievable, most the time I use the built-in filter because it is so powerful, great value for the money. Just takes some practice getting it adjusted correctly as I said before it really throws the light out there. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED</review_text>
I love this flash.  I just recently purchased it and have used it for 2 big events and it worked perfectly.  I still don't know everything that it is capable of doing but am still able to work it just fine without even reading the manual.I would definitely recommend this flash.</review_text>
I've been quite satisfied with my Nikon D50 and I've been using the built-in flash occasionally to get evenly lit images and balanced exposed shots.  But the built-in flash just doesn't cut it.  I made the huge mistake of taking pics at my cousin's wedding reception in a huge hall thinking that a tripod, high ISO settings, and the built-in flash will suffice.  I was wrong.  I borrowed a fellow photographer's spare speedlight (SB-600) and when I downloaded the pics to my computer for some fine tuning, I noticed the HUGE difference between the built-in flash.  The speedlight gave me more area to be covered by the flash.  For roughly under $200+, this is quite the bargain.  I'd recommend rechargeable AA batteries.  The recycle time for the flash is FAST.</review_text>
Well priced and works beautifully. No complaints - does exactly what it said on the tin.</review_text>
Finally was able to put some money aside and get a new flash for my D50. I looked at the less expensive Sigma flashes, but in the end I decided to go with the Nikon. I figured I spend the money on the camera, I'm going to get the better flash.Used it the other day and took some great portraits of my daughter. The flash worked like a charm. It is better than the on camera pop-up flash. The pop-up flash comes in handy if you can't or forget to bring the main flash, but it is really nice to have the extra power of the SB-600. If you think your going to do a lot of indoor photography (birthdays, holidays, etc..) this is a great flash.If you have children, the best bet for portrait photos,,, the Nikon D50, Nikkor 50mm 1.8 and the SB-600 flash. Great combination for a very good price.  We haven't had to take the kids to have their pictures taken at a studio. With this set-up, you can take great portraits of your kids in their own environment at a more convenient time that you and the kids decide. And no traveling in nice cloths to worry about</review_text>
I bought this flash for use on my Nikon D200 and it works better than I had hoped. You can fine tune it for your own personal liking and it has more options than I am currently smart enough to use. But don't worry, you don't have to be a super camera geek to get great results right off the bat. This thing has great "reach" as it actually zooms right along with your lens to pinpoint your subject. It's just audible enough to let you know it's doing that. I'm definitely glad I bought this thing. MUCH better than the small pop-up flash</review_text>
This what i discovered when i've used my brand new 1D markIINWell, I have to say that I am truly impressed with this camera. A friend of mine got his about a month ago, so I have played with it a little bit, but since I got mine on thursday, I have really gotten to explore the many features and performance differences beween this camera and the 20D that I upgraded from.Having used a few original 1D cameras, a 1D mark II, the 20D with battery grip and a 5D, the size and weight of this camera really doesnt bother me (I have heard so many people complain about the size and weight before...) I actually really like the feel of the 1D mark II N. There is only a slight difference between the original 1D Mark II's feel and the N, but if you hold them side by side you notice it.The autofocus is absolutely stunning. Having used a 20D for a year and a half, I had forgotten how nice it is to have those 45 highly sensitive autofocus points! As soon as you pick up this camera and hold that shutter button half way down, you realize why this is the #1 choice of many of the best photojournalists.The body construction is the highest quality I have ever seen in a camera, but of course is very similar, if not identical to the other 1D series cameras. Compared to the 20D and 5D though, this thing just feels solid.Another stunning feature is, of course, the speed at which the 1D Mark II N can capture images... 8.5 frames per second! Just as the 1D and 1D Mark II have done for the past few years, this camera holds its own to all other cameras in its class, with 22 frame raw bursts at 8.5 frames per second. I hardly ever shoot jpeg, but i did test it and found the 48 frame buffer to be quite impressive. Packing two 2 gig Sandisk Ultra II cards (a CF and an SD) I have the capacity for about 450 total shots.The screen, of course, is fantastic, and blows any Nikon camera's menu and image review quality out of the water.The 1.3x crop factor is certainly an improvement over the 20D's 1.6x, and the bigger sensor definitely yields better image quality in low light due to the lower signal-to-noise ratio. Overall, color reproduction, metering, exposure and sharpness are all much better than the 20D.since i love wildlife photography I have been able to get 75% more caption information than I ever did with my pervious camerasThe camera performs great in the studio, and images are beautiful, as would be expected. I have yet to make any photographic prints from this camera, but I'm sure they will look stunning.</review_text>
This camera is simply amazing!  I started out with a Canon G2, and then a Canon G6, and then a Canon 20D, and now this Canon 1D Mark II N.  I debated and researched for 3 months between the 1DS Mark II, 5D, and 30D.  My decision was primarily narrowed down to the 5D and this 1D Mark II N.  Yes, I wish this camera was a full-frame and also shared the 12.8 MP like the 5D, but you know what?  It practically killed me trying to weigh the pros and cons and finally I made my decision to go with this one and I'm 110% glad that I did.For me, this camera is definitely THE ONE to get because the 45 point Focusing, 8.5 fps, and the 1D Pro Body/Interface/Menu/Layout, etc is what really makes this camera worth it and the deciding factor.  Trust me, if you don't know how seriously fast the 8.5 fps really is, you need to go out to your camera store and try it out before you decide.  Because of this 8.5fps alone, I'm actually able to capture a lot of shots that I normally get lucky getting with my 20D.  And with a 5D at 3fps, I just said forget it...No way.  I'm not even a professional taking pictures for a living.  This is just purely a fun hobby for me and stepping up from a 20D to this camera is out of this world.  With the phenomenal auto focusing, additional metering, it's like I'm now playing with a Bentley (with the 1D MK2 N) coming from a Mercedes C230 Hatchback (The cheapest Mercedes that people buy just because it's a Mercedes name and they don't want to spend any more money on a real Mercedes).  This camera and the photos truly almost help me take pictures like a pro.Also, I don't shoot action pictures all the time, and I do love portrait photography, and landscapes and printing and blowing up large sized pictures.  But even with the 1.3 crop factor, there is still a HUGE improved difference going from a 1.6 crop and you won't have vignetting problems with some lenses that you'll have on a 5D.  With this 1D MK2 N, you can still take wonderful wedding photography, landscapes, etc.  As much as I'd like to have 12.8MP like the 5D, 8MP is really all that we need these days unless you're going to blow up and print photos that are larger than 8X10's or around there.  Unless you're printing extremely large posters and whatnot, you can pretty much do everything with this camera that the 5D can.  The resolution and MP is definitely enough.  Plus, it's also invaluable to know that you have the 8.5 fps available and ready to use if you need to and you can also tone it down and use a slower fps if you need to.  The extra bonuses with this camera which I look at as a secondary positive, are the weather seals, pro-build high quality construction body, easy to use and navigate menu system, you can see the iso information in the viewfinder as well as the lcd screen at all times, dual memory card capability, you can shoot on 2 memory cards at the same time as one for backup or use 2 separate cards independently, built-in battery grip (you don't have to shell out extra for this), longer battery life than the other cameras, best customization and most options that you can set to your liking, more than the 5D or the 20D or 30D.  I could go on and on but definitely get this camera if you can afford it.  Otherwise, the 5D is also a great choice too if you need to save the money, and all you do is take landscape pictures all day long, or never will have a use for fast action or have a need to capture quick moments, and don't want the fast and most accurate focusing system that's great for ai servo.</review_text>
This is an excellent camera!  I purchased mine in Feb. '06 and have used it continually for 2+ months before I decided to write this review.  First, I am an avid amateur photographer, and I wondered if this camera would be worth the expense, for a non-pro.  I've found that I do not regret this purchase in any way.  I researched it for several months and even bought the Digital Rebel XT first, thinking I'd rather not spend so much for a camera (I like the Rebel XT and it is a fun back up camera)....and I was confused as to which camera to choose.  Most official reviewers either did not review it, because there was not "much" difference btw. it and the ID Mark II or simply said that if you wanted to shoot sports or fast action, then the 1D Mark II N was the way to go.  I don't shoot those...I'm a wedding/portrait person.  However, I do also shoot landscapes and fast moving animals as well and wanted the weather proofing and speed that comes with the Mark II N.  So choosing between the 5 D, the (at the time) upcoming 30D and the 1D Mark II N was very difficult.One pro review site said that the Mark II N was a needless upgrade to the Mark II.  I found that an odd remark because Canon changed almost everything that they didn't like in the Mark II.  You can record both in RAW and JPEG at the same time, on different cards.  A 2.5" LCD that can be magnified from any point, to check the sharpness, there is a definite absence of noise in shadowed areas and you do not have to pair this with an L lense to get excellent photos.  Aside from my L lenses, I use the 50mm 1.4, the 70-300 DO and the 85mm 1.8 with excellent image quality across the board.I am a small woman and found that the camera's weight takes some time to get used to.  However, the camera itself is so fast that it compensated any camera shake I might have had, due to the weight, by it's speed.  And, now that I am used to it, I hardly notice it.The multitude of control buttons can be confusing, but if you are used to the 1D Mark II, it's not a difficult switch.  If you are used to the Rebel XT, keep the manual handy for your first few times out.Whether you shoot in JPEG or RAW, the photos manipulate well in photoshop and you don't lose any quality (in my opinion) for not having the 12 megapixels of the 5D (which was 1 of only 2 reasons why I considered the 5D).  Large enlargments (16x20) print up quite excellently and again, you have the speed to NEVER miss a shot.  I've found that in shooting portraits with difficult to shoot subjects (children, pets, someone who DOESN'T want to sit for a portrait but his wife is making him...), SPEED does matter and often it's saved me from a failed shoot!The 1.3x FOV crop factor (vs. the full frame 5D) is definitely a factor to be weighed.  Frankly, I use the 17-40L and get excellent landscape photos.  As wide (at 22mm) as I could ever wish, and not get "fish-eye".  So, I don't find the crop factor to be a personal issue but it was something I had to take into consideration in my choice.  While it limits my 24-70L and my 24-105L to only 31.2mm at wide angle, it gives my 70-300 DO IS that "just enough" extra zoom boost (to 390mm) that I don't have to buy yet another expensive lens.I've been trying to think of the negatives of this camera, in order to give a balanced review.  As I said, initially the weight was an issue as well as learning the controls.  Both were quickly overcome.  The cost is definitely a factor, but especially for anyone who does this for a living, it is definitely worth the $.  I like everything about this camera (and I've gone through several others to get here).  When I don't have it with me, and find myself with my A620 (my "in the purse" emergency camera) I get so frustrated that the A620 won't do anything even close to what I've now come to expect as the standard for all cameras.  So I guess that's the one downside, because it's a large SLR, I don't carry it absolutely (though almost!) everywhere.  However, overall, unless you want to pay close to $7K for the Ds and the extra megapixels, I don't believe there's a better camera on the market.  I realize that while this review doesn't cover all the technical specs (you can get that on either cnet.com or the-digital-picture.com) I hope it helps someone like me who had a really difficult time making the ultimate decision</review_text>
The Canon 1D Mk IIN is the bomb. I opted for this camera over the cheaper and higher megapixel camera, the 5D. It is rare that you need more than 8M pixels and the sharpness and speed of this camera is nothing short of amazing especially when comparing to my other digital slr, the Canon 20D. This is a camera that I will enjoy for many year</review_text>
Very solid camera, but a bit heavy.  Good battery life.  It is a very professional camera</review_text>
With a wicked 8.5 frames per second, this is a sports/action/photojournalists dream camera. If you need the speed this is the one. Aimed squarely at sports shooters and photojournalists, Canon has done it. If you are looking for more of a portrait/art/wedding camera get the Canon 5D</review_text>
This was my first digital camera. I received it as an anniversary present; My Fiance thankfully has *Great* taste.Anyhow, This particular camera took by far the best photos I have ever seen! The pictures were EXTREMELY crisp.I thought the camera was very user friendly and a lot of fun to use. I used it for 13 months without a single problem. Until it was stolen. :(So now I have decided to upgrade to the Canon SD700. By the way, I have tried out all of my friend's and family's digital cameras just to compare theirs to my canon and not a single one of theirs could compare to the pictures that my canon A520 took...So try it out, you won't be disappointed!!!</review_text>
The Powershot A520 On Switch stopped working right after I started using the camera</review_text>
the cover over the lense broke/small lcd screen/ pictures are pritty good/battery life is pritty good/some images can come out a bit blurry if theres no flash and your hands arnt that steady/takes nice portaits/ easy to use/ has a veiw-finder</review_text>
I have developed a dimple in my right retina that places a blur in the center of my field of view.  I am right handed so my right eye is my "sighting eye".  this device gives me the clearance to use my left eye to focus and compose my shots.  I love it</review_text>
I purchased this extender so that I could be more comfortable looking through the viewfinder. 5/8ths of an inch doesn't seem like a big difference, but it is enough to put some space between your face and the camera.Having your face pressed against the camera is a good thing, as it helps to stabilize the camera reducing camera shake.  However I find the 20D very uncomfortable without the extender.  My discomfort comes more from how the eyepiece cushion rests on the eye and not so much from a smashed nose.  The extender doesn't prevent the camera from pressing against my nose, although it clearly doesn't press as much.  My face still is in contact with the back of the camera.  The eyepiece cushion feels more comfortable pressed against the eye with the extender in place.To install, you remove the eyepiece cushion from the camera, slip on the extender and then reattach the eyepiece cushion to the extender.The extender does reduce the magnification in the viewfinder, but not enough to be an issue for me.  The extenders can be purchased with your eye glass prescription strength in mind so one doesn't need to wear their glasses when using the camera. This particular extender does not correct vision.This extender stays on my camera at all times.PROS:Gives your nose some breathing room.Adds comfortCONS:Reduces magnification in the viewfinder</review_text>
As an eyeglass wearer, I suffered needlessly for years</review_text>
When digital cameras first came out, I, like many people swore I'd always be loyal to film. Digital could never take the place of film. I'm not convinced that it has replaced film completely. There's still something I love about putting a roll of film in the camera, shooting away, sending the film to be processed, and seeing the results. I also know it's a bit expensive. I know that the argument about quality has always been paramount in the discussion, but digital cameras are improving in this regard, and most manufacturers are assuring users that while the technology will always be improving, we are at a point where a good investment can be made in a digital SLR and it will not be outdated as soon as the buyer purchases the camera. So I figured now is the time to get a digital SLR.I have been a loyal Nikon user for nearly ten years, and have owned the Nikon N60, N70, and N80. My first love was, and still is the N70 (I've been told by the person who sold me the camera he thought I was the only person who loved the N70).  I purchased the N80 only after my N70 cost too much to repair, but I've enjoyed the way my various Nikon cameras have handled all sorts of situations and the fact that they can be as simple to use as a point and shoot if I don't have the time to use specific controls, but it also has options for more creative and artistic purposes. My Nikon cameras have allowed me to capture family moments with ease and majestic landscapes, wildlife shots and all sorts of other things I can't resist to capture forever.I decided to purchase the D70 since it was close to what I've already experienced with Nikon. In many ways it works in a similar way to the N70 and 80, except it's a digital rather than film version. Like the film versions of the midrange Nikon SLR's, it has a dial that allows an automatic setting,  portrait, landscape, sports, close-up, nightscape, and night portrait modes, the ability to select aperture, shutter speed or manual controls. The camera has auto and manual focus abilities. Photos can be as easy or technical as the photographer desires. The controls are easy to use, though it takes practice to be comfortable. On a personal level, the camera has passed the Halloween test, niece's birthday test, and fall foliage in New England test and favorite scenic spots test. The only real difficulty I've had with the camera is trying to capture stained glass windows in a dark setting. Auto focus has not worked at all and I'm not thrilled with the manual focus of these shots, but at this point I'm sure it's the photographer and not the camera.I do have one suggestion for anyone who purchases this camera. The manual is very confusing. It uses all sorts of symbols and can be more of a distraction than anything else. I've had luck with the "Magic Lantern Guides" with my other cameras, but have not as of yet used it for this camera. I did purchase the NIKON D70 FIELD GUIDE (David Busch, Wiley Publishing) which has been helpful. It can be a quick reference for anyone already familiar with Nikon and photography in general but it also provides and introduction for the novice to photography.</review_text>
I've had my D70s for about a year now, haven't regretted it for a second.The controls are laid out logically, with everything to hand. The dual control wheels make adjustments fast and accurate. I personally love the optional grid overlay, I have no excuses for horizons that aren't horizontal. The wireless flash system is great, though you have to buy an SB-600 or SB-800 to get the full benefit. This camera is bigger and heavier than the D50 and D80, which in my opinion is a positive thing.</review_text>
I am a professional photographer, and I have owned this camera for nearly two years.  I also have a D70 for backup.  The batteries go forever, it is very quick to respond, the images are beautiful, and it has the typical Nikon durability and reliability.  If you are already a Nikon user, the controls will fall easily to hand.That having been said, the computer software with this camera is a joke.  For the best image quality shoot RAW files, color balance with a grey card, and render the images with software like Capture One LE.  The uselessness of the included software is the only reason that this camera gets four instead of five stars.  Come on, Nikon, be real!!!Shortly after I got my first D70, I shot a model for a small photo for a side bar in a catalog.  I got an ugly feeling in my gut when I was told that the designer had taken a shot that was 3/4 figure, cropped to the head and shoulders, and enlarged the image for the cover of the 8.5 x 11 in catalog.  By the time I found out, it was already at the printer.  As it turned out, I was pleasantly surprised: the cover shot looked great.  After that incident, I have trusted this camera and have always been pleased with the results.This camera is better than 35 mm in every way except response to the shutter button.  In resolution and color reproduction it is more comparable to a medium format film camera.  It is imperative to shoot RAW and process the files properly to get the most out of this camera.I can't wait to try the D80</review_text>
I do weddings, portrait, and outdoor photography and I don't see any reason why I'd ever switch from the D70 (other than the D80 :).  This camera is professional grade at the consumer price point.  Don't be scared by the 6.1 MP.  I print at 20x30 all the time w/ out any problems.  I'd recommend reading Thom Hogans manual</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
Excellent camera kit. Versatile. I have a lot to learn about the camera, though, as it is no simple point-and-shoot. However, in Auto mode, it takes great point-and-shoot pictures. I look forward to learning how to use it fully. Lenses came with warranty cards, but the camera itself did not. I bought the SB-600 flash as well and another battery and two 1 GB compact flash cards to round out the kit. Camera with lens attached is large, which I underestimated. $80 camera bag is too small for it all. Great camera, though. Price was the best I could find anywhere</review_text>
Im not from USA. My brother bought me the camara in a trip three months ago and it is not working!! It has serious conection problems in the body that I cant fix in my country. I lost 1000 US</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
I have owned this camera for about two months now and have taken about 100 photographs (keepers) to date.  Because I have been involved in photography for almost 35 years, I have developed certain prejudices. In particular, I have never been comfortable with auto exposure and even less comfortable with auto focus. In fact, the last auto focus camera I owned was a Nikon N8008s that I ultimately sold at auction because I could not adapt to using the various auto settings.However, I like this camera. Why? The D70s is a very easy camera to use and I have only had to refer to the manual to check on a couple of settings and look up some features. Honestly, set up takes only a few minutes and handling is not terribly different from a film camera. I should point out that this camera is really designed for auto focus lenses and if you choose to use your manual focus lot, you will disable many of the camera's features.Because I am both stubborn and cheap (but mostly only when it comes to spending money on myself) I am using my manual focus lenses on this camera. It is true that I do not get any internal exposure meter readings and must rely on a handheld Gossen or the sunny 16 rule (quite effective, really) for exposure determination. The LCD preview screen thus is critical for determining or adjusting exposure. I should also point out that the depth of field preview feature is also lost when using manual focus lenses. I was stunned when I could not stop my lens down and burrowed through the manual to find out what I was doing wrong--which was nothing except that I was using the wrong type of lens. While I really miss this feature, I am not sure how big a loss it really is because of the viewfinder. Others have made mention of the low magnification and tunnel like views through the finder and I can attest to this fact. I compared finder views to my trusty old FM and was just stunned by how poorly the D70 compared.Ultimately the best camera is the camera you use and the D70 has become my camera of choice. Even though I am using this camera like a vintage M series Leica--i.e., handheld meter and presetting exposure in anticipation of a photograph--I find that I can live with this level of usability. At some point I will probably buy an auto focus lens (maybe the 35 f2) and make full use of the feature set.  But for now I content on using the camera the old fashioned way</review_text>
This is a quality piece and can take good close-up pictures of still objects.  I was looking for something to capture moving/flying insects, this is not what I needed.  My fault not the lense.</review_text>
I'm looking for a closeup lens for my Canon EOS Rebel XT.  But before buying I wish I can see some pictures taken using this lens</review_text>
This is an excellent add-on close-up lens, not to be confused with the relatively inexpensive 1-2-4 sets sold as aftermarket accessories.  This is a double-element achromatic (color-corrected) lens made by Canon and recommended for lenses in the range of 50-135mm focal length.  It is very sharp and clear with no color fringing.  The "250" indicates the maximum distance to the subject is about 250mm with the main lens focussed at infinity.  The actual lens power is about 4.0 diopters (+4).  It has a 58mm outer thread so you can add a clear filter (UV or Skylight) to protect the lens surface.  I am using it with a Canon A620 and the required adapter, and it produces outstanding pictures with excellent detail and sharpness.</review_text>
Don't be disappointed because this isn't a lithium ion battery. This battery kicks butt!! It lasted me 3 days of non stop shooting. I started to think that the battery was never going to die! Of course reality set in and had to eventually charge it, but it lasted forever!! The only drawback is that it takes about 2 hours to charge:( Other than that, it will lasts you all day and night</review_text>
I got this lens to go wider on a 20D. I wanted to go wider so I got a 5D. Started shooting events with this lens and I learned that the 580ex couldn't give me enough light in the dark. Used the lens during the day. Terrible problems with lensflare. The hood showed up on the edges of pictures (wide). Went back to the 24-70L as my primary lens. When this lens works and circumstances are right, the results are stunning. I'm trying to use two flashes to get the power to use it at night, again terrible flare problems. Whenever it matters I have to go back to the 24-70L. I just don't have all these problems with it.The problems with the 16-35 lens appear at the wide end. At 35 the lens operates well but that's not what I bought the lens for.I love the lens but it's the lens that gives me the most frustration and worry. Wish it had cost less but what can you do</review_text>
I got this lens because I didn't really own anything close to this range except for the kit lens (good but not great and not f/2.8).  I do own a 15mm Canon Fisheye but it does distort quite a bit even on the 20D and I don't like to have to correct in Photoshop each time and I wanted a wide lens.  I wanted something wider, that could capture lots of light (I do allot of ambient and low light photowork) and I wanted something versatile (on a 20D this is really a 24mm to 56mm --- great working range).Pros:1) With the 1.6x crop factor of my 20D this is really a 24 to 56mm lens.  This makes it quite a bit less of a wide angle and more of a midrange lens.  Consequently, it stays on my camera all the time and covers most of my daily needs.  I bought this lens fully expecting it to be 24 to 56 as I wanted it to be multi purpose and at 24mm its still pretty wide.2) I try to avoid flash as much as possible given the type of photography I do and at f/2.8 I can take some great ambient light pictures that I would not be able to do otherwise3) At f/2.8, I can also blow the backgrounds and foregrounds out of focus.  The out of focus areas are gorgeously buttery and the blokeh is very nice given the 7 blades of the shutter.4) The color saturation is like nothing I've ever seen before except with my 70-200mm Canon "L".  I was literally floored at some baby pictures I took where the colors were in two words "mind blowing".  I knew the color would be great but "WOW!" With Photoshop CS2 I can "fake" saturation but its just not quite the same as the color that came out of this lens straight out of the box.  Zero photoshop touchup needed.5) Its sharp!  This lens takes some amazingly sharp pictures into what I would classify as amazing.  I've received numerous positive comments on the sharpness of this lens.  I've tried looking at the edges to see if there's any CA or less sharpness and couldn't really find any.  Maybe on a full size sensor you can tell more but I couldn't really on a 20D.  I do notice that the plane of focus at f/2.8 is narrow (which is good) and I have to make sure that everything I want in focus is.  The blokeh is very buttery at f/2.8.  I like it quite a bit.6) Its built like a tank.  Black metal shell.  Metal EF mount.  Smooth manual focusing.  Sturdy recessed switches.  The red stripe catches the eye of photographers who know....easy to strike up conversations and learn.7) It was surprisingly smaller and lighter than I thought it would be.  About half the size of my 70-200mm Canon "L".  I was expecting it to be bigger and am much happier that it wasn't.  Its on my camera all the time and not a chore to carry around at all.  Unless you're a very petite person.8) Internal focusing.  So the lens size doesn't change in size or turn when focusing.  This is very useful when you put filters on or when you're focusing in close.9) USM Motor.  Its whisper quiet and it focuses super fast.  Faster than my 70-200mm....something I'd expect but wow its fast and silent.10) It focuses pretty close 12 inches or so.  You can get close to your subject.  Its not a macro lens but you can get some dramatic wide angle shots with its close focusing.11) Its TTL2 so works very nice with my 580EX flash.12) EF mount will grow with you.  If you upgrade your camera body to a full frame camera with an EF mount, this lens will fit your new camera and you can continue to enjoy your lens investment.Cons:1) On a 1.6x frame size, it doesn't get into "amazing" wide category but that's not the fault of the lens.  I'm marking this down as a Con but you can take it several ways.  If you want to get ultra-wide on a small frame camera, you won't with this lens (although 24mm is pretty darn wide) and about your only Canon options are the 15mm fisheye which I own and think is a great specialty lens, the 10-22mm EFS Canon, and the 14mm L. The 10-22 I hear is very good but its EFS (and won't fit the full frame cameras - less upgradable I think) and its not an L lens although for a non-L the 10-22 I hear is exceptional.  The 14mm EF L will run you almost as much as this 16-35mm zoom.  The 15mm EF Fisheye is wonderful but it is designed to distort and the distortion is visible on the 20D and even more so on full frame cameras and you need Photoshop to fix. On this 16-35mm L, if you want the f/2.8 and are ok with something like 24-56, then you won't find better for small-sensor cameras.  I'm very glad I got it and, if you already have a full frame camera or upgrade at some point, you can enjoy 16mm "WOW" wide.  I can only imagine the coverage I'd get on a full frame camera.2) The hood is massive...wide but not very deep...so its a shallow hood (It has to be with the wide angle I guess).  I never take it off -- it keeps stray light out and is a secondary protection for the lens.  I have had zero problems with lens flare.3) The front lens element does sink in and out inside the tube (exposed  but the lens case doesn't change in size).  There is no protective filter to protect that front element.  I bought a UV/Haze filter ($26 from Amazon) and I highly recommend you do as well to protect your investment.  With the UV/Haze filter, the lens is very self contained.4) Oh the cost....my oh my.  Expensive as heck.  Cost as much as my camera body --- worth every penny.  If its any consolation, these lenses are very hard to make and they keep their value.  Your camera body might drop in value as new technology arrives but this lens will hold its value if you take care of it.Differences, Notes, Things I've heard:1) I have no experience with non canon lenses so I can't compare but this 16-35 is amazing.2) Compared to other "L" lenses, it holds up and the quality is amazing when it comes to color, performance, lens construction.3) I hear there is some Chromatic Aberation at the edges of these wide lenses (well more than the 70-200mm) but that's to be expected when you're gathering light from such wide angles and focusing it....that's got to be hard.  Wide angles exhibit more CA than long telephotos. On my 16-35mm it wasn't visible to me.  I imagine a Pro's pro might notice care.  Anybody with less stringent requirements than a Pro's pro or extremely saavy person, couldn't even notice or care.  Besides, CA on this lens is orders of magnitude less than almost any other lens.4) I bought directly from Amazon.  Ordered on a Monday got the lens the next day on Tuesday.  Amazing service.  Great store.</review_text>
I shoot with a Canon 20D and have used the Canon EF 28-135mm f/3.5-5.6 IS USM lens as my wide angle option. When preparing for an extended stay in Budapest, I decided it was time to invest in a faster, better quality WA lens. I reviewed the lens lineup at the Canon website and decided on the Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L. As an L lens owner, I was confident this lens would be a great addition to my lens lineup.Being an L lens, this is a serious lens meant for serious photographers. The sturdy construction consists of three aspherical elements and Canon's UD glass which largely eliminate the secondary spectrum. Weather-resistant construction at lens mount, zoom & focus rings and switch panel helps protect the lens from the elements. This lens is not compatible with the 1.4x II and 2x II extenders. The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L lens weighs in at about 1.3 lbs/600g, and accepts 77mm filters or holds gel filters. Be sure to get a good quality UV haze filter to protect the front lens element. Not only do I see this as a good practice, Canon recommends doing so on their site as well.The focus type is the standard twist zoom, and permits for auto or manual focus depending on how the switch is set. In addition, the lens has a USM drive mechanism for optimum AF performance.Included with this lens are the front and rear lens caps, lens hood, soft storage case, and a US one year warranty. The case is a pull string soft case (LZ1319) that can also be purchased separately. The lens hood (EW-83E) is used to reduce lens flare and can protect the front element in certain situations.I have to admit I was disappointed by this lens while in Budapest. I found that for wide angle scenes with the focused subject at a distance, the images were soft. This is precisely the type of images I wanted to use this lens for. Just because this is a fast lens, it doesn't mean I shoot everything at f/2.8 either as some may claim. I have a good understanding of exposure and know how to use the aperture setting to my advantage. It didn't matter what aperture I used, distant subjects were soft in my eyes.I wondered if the lens needed adjusting or calibrating after hearing all the great things people say. I lent the lens to a friend who loved the quality and sharpness while taking close up shots. I then began to wonder if I was doing something wrong. After testing the lens, I've concluded that this is not the lens for distant wide angle shots like suggested on the Canon website. When the subject matter is much closer, like the other side of a room or several feet away, this is an awesomely sharp lens.The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L lens is too different to compare to the Canon EF 28-135mm. The clarity and sharpness is incredible on close-up shots, and the auto-focus is quiet and quick. Even though this lens didn't fit my original purpose, it has found a place in my lens collection. I don't foresee this lens being one of my most used options though. The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L comes at a price, but it is worth every penny when used for its strengths.PROS:Incredible clarity and sharpness on close-up shotsQuiet and quick auto-focusCONS:Heavy and bulky (This should be expected with these types of lenses)Distant subjects come out soft</review_text>
Having received some Christmas cash, I put it to good use with the purchase of this lens.  It works great with my Digital Rebel and certainly is a fine choice for any of the EOS Canons.  Sure, it is pricey and a little heavy, but if you want a fast, wide-angle zoom lens, there is little else that is equivalent.  The zoom range takes you from wide scenics to excellent indoor flash shots at 35mm (with a Canon Speedlite EX accessory).  The USM focusing motor is quiet and very quick.  Comes with a Canon lens hood.  Don't forget to add a 77mm UV filter to protect the optics full time!</review_text>
We dedicated a thumb drive to use with the digital photo frame that we download our digital pictures to from a computer. Then we simply plug the thumb drive into the USB port of the digital photo frame and follow the menu instructions to select the USB port thumb drive by pushing a couple of buttons on the digital photo frame.  The slide show of the pictures we view from approximately ten feet away have very good resolution.  It's great for family gatherings and have received many positive comments from our guests.</review_text>
This item shows all of your digital photos in bright, vivid colors. Set up a slide show and play directly from a memory card. The frame is light, portable and easy to use. A great companion for your digital camera and is an excellent way to show off your pictures to friends and family. Just pop in the memory card from your digital camera and your ready to show off all of your precious memories.Features* Bright 5.6" Active Color Screen* Auto Start Slide show function* Supports Photos up to 12M pixels* Includes AC Adapter and Quick Start Guide* No Computer Required, plays directly from memory cards* Brilliant Color Display with adjustable contrast and brightness* Automatic Slide show, Full-Screen Browse, and Thumbnail Browse Display modes* Compatible with major memory cards (CF/SD/MD/MMC and MemoryStick</review_text>
Excellent product. Easy to get it started. Great features, clear pictures.  Everyone that sees it wants it</review_text>
A great idea poorly executed.  The construction is cheap.  The screen is marginal at best.  But worst of all, it refuses to recognize any of the 3 digital cameras I have on hand or a USB card reader.A piece of junk that I am now returnin</review_text>
The Digital Photo Frame was easy to use and the software was excellent. I gave the item as a 50th birthday gift and set it up at a very large party. The frame showed a slide show of about 65 pictures and became a focal point for the guests. Everyone spent time looking at the pictures of the family from throughout the 50 years. Many asked where to get the frame. It was a hit and it worked as described</review_text>
The picture quality is better than I expected.  You still can't see the picture from the sides, but straight on it's good.  The interface to load my pictures was very simple.  I would like to have a few more options available, but for simplicity purposes, it works great</review_text>
I purchased the 8 X 10 Photo Frame as a way to display photos at my wedding reception and planned to use it in my home thereafter.  I was able to get the product running and to load a 'test' set of pictures, but the product then 'froze' at the startup screen.  I checked the Pacific Digital support website, which provided steps (basically, a sequence of buttons to hold down) to 'unfreeze' and reinitialize the unit.  I tried this sequence several times, to no avail, and then called Pacific Digital customer service.  After repeated messages left on a voice mail system ("we're sorry we missed your call - we'll get back to you") at all times of the day and night, I was unable to contact anyone at the company and no calls were ever returned.  Long story short - our wedding came and went, the problem was never (and will apparently never be) resolved, and the Digital Photo Frame is now a $390 paperweight.  Absolutely useless.  My recommendation: DO NOT PURCHASE A PACIFIC DIGITAL PRODUCT.  This is clearly a fly-by-night outfit</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
I am 67 years old and started out in photography as a kid with a contact printer and a box camera. I have had all types of cameras over the years, mostly 35mm film Canon slr's. I too bought all sorts of these 5-7 MP point and shoot digital cameras before returning to my true love, SLR's. I have had my digital Canon Rebel XT about a month now and I can't keep my hands off of it. It lacks nothing. Although the kit lense is good, I bought a 28-135 Canon zoom lense with image stabilizion and have produced stunning photo's with it. I love the way you can use the 7 points to focus, I mainly use only the center point with focus lock and never get an out of focus picture. I guess the nicest thing for me is that I now don't have the urge to buy every point and shoot camera that is paraded out on QVC or HSN that has a "wonderful" new feature like "low light or non-shake." This Canon has every good feature in the known universe and you can't outgrow it. Its a camera that will let you be as good as you can be, it won't hold you back. The battery life is great, the built in flash is good but I bought a 430EX and that's even better. I never figure I'm wasting money buying accessories for this camera as it will be my main squeeze for many years to come. I always missed my 35mm Canon slr's and now feel that I have an old friend back again, only much much better. Believe me, you can't go wrong getting this camea, its beyond description...</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
I already had a digital rebel and was able to sell it to a co-worker and use the proceeds for my new rebel xt. Faster, lighter, better. Simple review. It took everything that was great about my digital rebel and made it better. Some complain that it feels "too light"...OK...it that's your thing. To me, it's still solid and the pictures speak for themselves.Now, with the addition of the 10 MP rebel xt, I'll bet the original xt can be purchased for an even better price.No downsides that I can think of..</review_text>
I have had digital cameras for about 5 years and still own an Olympus 5 megapixel, and a Casio 7 megapixel. Seems like Megamixels alone just don't cut it for me.I read about the rebel XT in a magazine and looked up the user reviews here on Amazon.I decided to go and buy one and though I am really a novice, I am extremely impressed. I have never seen such stunning quality or realistic colors from a Point & Shoot. I started with the basic settings and love the results.I am slowly progressing to more advanced settings and am getting better everyday.Even a novice who just wants stunning photography will be amazed with this camera.I also bought a Tamron 75-300 Autofocus zoom lens (look for it here on Amazon.com) and after lots of practice, have been able to take some great pictures.I have a brother in the UK who is also into digital photography, and after seeing some (full reso) photos I sent him, he rushed out and bought the XTi (called the EOS 400D across the pond)and is amazed with it.I still have a lot to learn but really cannot fault this camera. The included software is also excellent.For the record, some reviews seem to think it is too small to hold, I have big hands and don't have any problems at all. I admit though this is the first SLR I have ever owned.I will still keep a point and shoot to keep in my travel bag for spontaneous photography but I am in love with my Rebel XT!!This camera costs quite chunk of change but I think it is well worth it and I do recommend it to everyone</review_text>
I'm really impressed, I bought the SD-110 a year ago as a quick small digital for trips. I was never planning to take it diving. The housing is really impressive, I've done 4 dives in the month I have had the waterproof case (WP-DC10) and it works great.I was so excited to try it out I went in the water with a full memory card. I got down to about 35ft and took my first picture and "Memory card full". It was easy to navigate all the buttons and I was able to delete while following my buddy. Taking pictures of fast moving fish doesn't work out and the range of the flash is 1-3ft.  My deepest dive so far was 109ft off the Monterey coast, and I worked as if it were in 10ft of water</review_text>
Canon makes a great underwater housing for a reasonable price.  I purchased this for a recent trip to Grand Cayman and Cozumel.  I didn't go Scuba diving on this trip, but I did take the camera snorkeling (diving to depths ~20ft).  It worked flawlessly and I got some pictures I was very happy with!  One thing I did not anticipate was the use the camera got out of the water.  Going from AC to the hot humid outdoors, my EOS rebel fogged up (condensation) and even after 30 minutes I couldn't take good pictures.  With the SD110 in the UW housing, I just wipped the housing's glass portal with a lens tissue after it had warmed up a couple of minutes and I was able to take clear pictures.The instructions are pretty good, but it took me a while to figure out how to take out the O-ring seal for cleaning/lubing.  Once I figured it out, it wasn't so hard.The SD110 may be getting a little old, but it still takes decent pictures and even with the housing I don't have so much money tied up in the system that I would be devestated if it was lost or stolen.  I will probably upgrade to the SD550 or SD500 (they both use the same batteries as the SD110) with the WP-DC80 or WP-DC70 housing at some time in the near future, but I will definitely keep the SD110 and WP-DC10 as backups</review_text>
If you swim in the ocean, lake, or just like to be around water and want to take pictures, this is the thing to have, it's worth every penny!! The only thing you can't do when it is in the case is upload pictures to your computer, change out memory cards and charge the battery. It is truly amazing. I've had my eye on this for a very long time and with a cruise coming up I knew I had to get it. I'm a snorkeling enthusist and this is definatly the thing to have. Instead of those silly disposable cameras that limit you to only 27 pictures, and you haven't got a clue of exactly what you've taken a picture of, you can take as many as your memory card will allow you. There is also a filter for the flash you can slide into place to help dispurse the light to get that ideal picture underwater!</review_text>
I bought the SD110 camera, and since I live in Hawaii, I HAD to have the underwater housing for it.  This housing is great, because it allows you to use all the function buttons while the camera is protected in the housing.You can power up the camera, shoot, zoom, change modes and do everything but change the battery, change the memory card and upload your pics onto a computer while the camera is sealed up.I was able to take lots and lots of underwater and surf pictures and movies with this camera.  And I was very happy with the results.I treat my gear pretty rough, I was in the water almost every day, not cleaning it all the time and although the housing did get scratched and a little banged up, it still worked great, and it didn't affect the quality of my photos.Then one day while rescuing a swimmer in distress, the camera was knocked off my kayak into the ocean.  I went back a few minutes later to search for it.  But was unable to find it....I was really bummed.Four months later, a friend of a friend is diving in the same area that I lost the camera, and saw something wedged in the reef, encrusted with coral and alge.  He pulled it out and took it back up on the boat-it was a digital camera in the housing.  When he opened up the housing and took out the camera.....it powered right up !!!!So he took a few shots on the boat and then took the camera home.  He showed it to his friend, and they flipped through the pictures as he told him the story of finding it.  One of the pictures that I had taken on the day I lost it, was an underwater self portrait.  When my friend saw that: he knew who's camera it was !!!So he calls me...and tells me the story.  I was amazed.  We figured that the camera and housing had been lying on the bottom for four months in over twenty feet of water, and there had been a few storms that had produced some very large surf in that area, so it had likely taken a beating.  But it still maintained its water tight integrity.  We were all very amazed at how durable it turned out to be !!I had already replaced the camera with the Canon S500 and it's dedicated housing (mostly so I could get higher resolution photos).  After uploading the photos onto my computer, I let the guy who found it keep it.  He has cleaned up the housing, and it stays still water tight, the only thing wrong with it (besides a little surface crud on the exterior of the casing), is that a few of the buttons are jammed and so they do not work (the zoom, shutter and power buttons are fine).  But not bad at all for a camera that had been on the bottom of the ocean for several months</review_text>
Having recently picked up the hobby of digital photography I was not aware of the nuances and the importance of some of the accessories.  Back in "the day" when shooting 35mm film I could barely afford the cost of processing - let alone what I thought were fancy accessories.  Well - some reading and a trip to Alaska with my Canon Digital Rebel XT - I learned, and appreciate, the importance of a lens hood.  I bought a rubber lens hood (not lens specific) at a local camera store that was totally unacceptable - then bought the lens hood for my Canon lens from Amazon.  It works great - no flare - no vignetting - and it makes the lens look pretty cool too! I would suggest having a hood for all your lenses and never shooting without - along with the obvious - it saves the front of the lens from bumping damage which is important with longer lenses or tight quarters like shooting on a photo excursion boat full of other people all jockeying for a shot!  Amazon service and prices - as usual - were fantastic and although I HATE to wait for things - I am usually happy I do when I order from here.  Happy snapping!!</review_text>
The lens hood performs as it should by limiting stray light but it is a little sloppy and comes off easily if bumped. It is easy to attach and reverses quickly for easy storage. Pretty much a no brainer but for the money I'd like a little better fit</review_text>
This small and cheep hood can save you realy a lot of money. It's doeing it job wonderful keeps you pictures brigth and clear, but also the hood protect you lens from a lot of things which trying to   hit you lens</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
Nice hood. It's designed for the Canon EF-S 17-85mm lens and therefore does what it's supposed to.</review_text>
Nice Quality, but overpriced.  Does a nice job of protecting the front of the lens, and reducing glare in some situations</review_text>
when the hood is reversed on the lens, it blocks the zoom ring tremendously when at 17mm's.  it's not the end of the world, but you're probably better off storing this in a bag, and not on the lens itself when not in use</review_text>
I had this camera for years before it was stolen and I replaced it with a digital Canon SLR.  I am still amazed at the abuse I put my Rebel 2000 through.  It has a nice light body, a great auto feature, and easy-enough to use manual functions.  And because of the popularity (and rightly so) of digital these days, you can pick one up for a fantastic price, even brand spanking new</review_text>
I have had this camera for about 4 yrs now - I take it on all my business travels.Whenever I get a chance to go out on on the weekends, I take this camera and my Sony camcorder in my backpack, roam the streets of the new city and shoot pictures.  The pictures that I shoot from this camera are just awesome - no matter whatever experiment I do with it.Most useful features:1. Aperture control with Depth of field preview- Lets to focus the foreground and blur the background2. Shutter speed control upto infinity- Lets you control the amount of time for which the shutter can be kept open3. It is pretty rugged, dont try dropping it :) I have used it to shoot pics from 'Maid of the mist' in Niagara falls and I almost thought that I was going to lose it.  But it worked liked a charmNegatives- Bulky, but you will get used to it, it always gets attention- Cost of developing film - What I do these days is to just get the photos on a CD, then develop only those photographs that are good.Why is this camera better than a Digital Camera ?- If you are spending $200 on a Digital Camera, I feel that the SLR is way far too ahead of any Digital camera in that price range- If you are spending $1000 on a Digital Camera, a Digital SLRs are very mature today - worth buying.Ideally, I would buy this SLR, take this whenever I really want to take good photographs, then I would also want to have a $100 Kodak Digital Camera for casual shots.  This would mean an ideal combination.If you are buying this SLR, you can also consider buying a Film/Photo scanners (available for less than $150 now) - which lets you scan the negatives/positives without even going for a cheap CD print.  From the reviews what I read on amazon, these scanners must be amazing</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife for Christmas 04' I thought I ordered it too late for it to arrive on time for Christmas, but these people are great! they got it to me on time and we love this camera we use it all the time - we have several accs. item for it and the quality of the picture are wonderful . Thanks Mark Christian</review_text>
I started off with a fully manual camera that I used for my photography classes a few years ago.  Once I was ready to upgrade, I came across this camera and fell in love with it.  There are enough manual settings to keep me challenged, but the easy automatic settings make this camera perfect for all of my everyday shots.I have taken wonderful, professional quality shots without even changing the settings, and my 14 year old sister found the camera easy to use even though she has almost no knowledge of cameras.  This camera is great for photographers in all stages and learning levels, because the pictures turn out great every time and it has enough range to get a great shot no matter what mode you use it in.I really don't think I could ever say enough about this camera to acurately describe it, so my best advice is GO OUT AND GET ONE!  You will not regret it</review_text>
I am a ameture photographer and I love my new camera, I also enjoy my low price Amazon Your the Best! Im so happy that I finally found a price I can Afford!! Thank You!</review_text>
Item was exactly as described. Works perfectly and helped make some great shots at Yosemite</review_text>
ive used this product about twice and dont really have any major complaints. my pictures came out great. i used it at a drag strip and needed it for taking pictures of the cars flying by at nighttime and i was able to capture them nicely due to no camera shake (using a tripod of course as well). the only thing i dont particularly like is that it goes into the lock position quite easily taking extra pictures that arent needed, and also the small hole for the wire to be inserted in for packing doesnt really hold it that well and the wire just kinda unravels, but i would recommend it to anyone who has a need for it</review_text>
I don't know how I ever did without this little item. Its indispensable for taking pictures with a tripod. It works easily and efficiently exactly as describe</review_text>
Worked well while I took pictures of fireworks over Lake Tahoe on the 4th of July.  Only wish camera accessories with Canon logo weren't so expensive.</review_text>
Using photoshop, and being a big fan of bulb exposures the RS60 E3 is a must have accesory.  You can use it just as you would the shutter button on the Digital rebel, as well as lock the shutter open, which is very good for painting with a small flashlight, etc.My only qualm with the switch is the shortness of the cord, but if you're trying to take a self portrait with the remote, then you need to get the Infrared remote.  The two of those combined makes for a perfect pair of tools for any remote picture taking needs</review_text>
It does what it says it'll do, and while it's pricey for a couple of contact switches in a plastic handle, considering the cost of parts and my time to make something similar, it's a bargain.  I would have liked more heavy duty construction, and the contacts to have more definite tactile feedback for the focus vs shoot position, but it works just fine, and it lets me take pictures while talking more easily to the subject, in addition to the obvious vibration reduction</review_text>
I purchased this Canon Remote Switch about 4 months ago and I use it almost constantly. This is one of the most useful camera accessories that I have purchased. Every photographer should have one in his/her toolbox.A remote switch is essential if you do photos in low light or macro photography. The slightest movement of your camera when you press the shutter release could cause your photo to be ruined.  This switch eliminates "camera shake."Before I purchased this switch, I had to use the self-timer feature on my camera and the time delay was very inconvenient.There have been a few reviews saying that the Canon Remote Switch is over-priced and cheaply made. I don't think that is true at all!  I would definitely buy this accessory again.</review_text>
The Canon EF 85mm f1.2L lens has earned ample praise from photographers and critics alike as one of the finest portrait (medium telephoto) lenses available. It is the only one currently produced with a maxium aperture of f1.2 (About a decade ago Carl Zeiss introduced a special, limited edition 85mm f1.2 Planar for its Contax manual focus 35mm SLR system; this lens is alleged to be optically superior to Canon's.). This new improved version of the 85mm f1.2 can autofocus 1.8x faster than its predecessor, via a USM motor for relatively whisper-quiet operation. A fine optic for working under low-light conditions, the lens is now better due to its improved optical design and faster autofocusing. Without question it has been one of the finest L series Canon lenses available; these new improvements will only enhance its reputation. If I owned Canon equipment and had to choose between the Canon EF 85mm f1.2L II USM lens or its illustrious predecessor, then without question I would be willing to acquire this fine new lens</review_text>
I bought this lens as I was walking out to Africa for a month and a half safari.  I didn't own a true wide angle lens and I had just spent most of my budget on a 70-200mm USM "L" lens and a 1.4x extension.I wanted to get the widest lens I could get but I didn't have the big bucks to get the 16-35L or the 14mm L so I got this lens figuring I could correct in Photoshop CS2 later.This is what I found:1) I have a 20D and it doesn't barrel distort anywhere near as bad as I had thought it would....I imagine it distorts quite a bit more on a 5D or other full frame sensor but on the 20D, 10D, 30D, or Rebel it is not that bad.2) It does distort enough even on the 20D that its noticable on every single inside shot and on many panoramic shots....to the experienced professional, you'd notice it even in panoramas.3) For the computer person:  I find it very easy to correct the barrel distortion in Photoshop CS2 very easily....I use a plugin (there are several on the web)4) I tend to like the barrel distortion look on some of my pictures.Pros1) Image Quality is superb.  For not being an L lens, this lens has some amazing color, sharpness, and saturation.  They spared very little in grinding this lens.  Some of my best African pictures, daytime and nightime were taken with this lens and they were fabulous.2) Build pretty well, metal mount, metal integrated hood...but not up to L standards by any means....to its credit, it survived 14 days by vibration ridden truck treking across the Kalahari desert with all its dust, mokoro canoeing in the okavango delta for over a week, hiking, elephant riding, and the five diamond resort at victoria falls (the last one was easy for the fisheye)...3) It is a Fisheye lens and if used properly, it can create some amazing pictures and views...for example In Botswana in the Okavango, I knelt down next to a Gigantic Baobab tree and pointed it up towards the sky, The fisheye captured not only Rex the guide standing next to the tree but the entire massive trunk of the Baobab AND ALL of the canopy of the tree way above.  Everything!  I know of few lenses that would let me do that.  It was an amazing shot only possible with a Fisheye.4) It focuses to about 12inches.5) f/2.8 makes it very good in low light situation.6) The integrated hood comes complete with a nice metal cover.Cons1) Its not built like an L:a) no USM motor so you can hear the whir as it tries to focusb) no moisture seals etcc) It does have a metal mount2) It is a fisheye lens -- I found out after a month and a half what this meant....it doesn't stay on my camera much.  I take it out when I need a certain effect or when I plan to retouch in Photoshop.  It distorts visibly on a 20D and I imagine quite a bit more on a full frame.3) Integrated Hood...can't put screw on filters...but it does have a gel filter holder.4) No bag.My veredict:1) I've purchased a 16-35mm Canon "L" and that lens stays in camera most of the time when I want wide-angle but when I need a special look or I really want to capture everything, I bring out my 15mm Fisheye.  I won't sell it, I don't regret buying it.  I learned what a specialty Fisheye lens is and its staying in my arsenal for those special shots.2) I can't compare against non-canon lenses but I can say that Canon quality here is extraordinary.  I would knock them on the construction but the lens is built well enough and the "glass" itself is spectacular so 5 stars.3) I ordered from Amazon 3 days before my trip --- it arrived the next day.  Great Service.  Thx Amazon.</review_text>
For anyone who wants to make their photos different, this is the lens!  With 180 degree capacity and fabulous auto focus capability, this lens takes an ordinary photo and turns it into something extraoridinary.  I shoot for magazines and many of the photos that are selected for publication are taken with the lens.  It's an expensive toy, but worth the money when you see the results.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
Let me first start off by saying - long time canon user. I own 6 or 7 lenses, including three L series lenses, and this is by far one of my favorites - if not my absolute favorite.I shoot mostly glamour and erotica type work on a 20D. So right there, this lens is not a true 15mm for me - but 1.6x15mm.It's sharp as a tack. It's light weight. It's very short (I call it the nub lens). And it's autofocus is amazing.Very little barrel distortion...and highly recommended. This lens is probably as sharp (if not sharper) than my 24-70 2.8L or my 17-40 4.0L lens.</review_text>
First, let me cover the most important point: Does it work? Yes.The praise that most users express for this item is well merited. I purchased this because, like everyone else, normal batteries just did not last. Ten or fifteen photos in, especially if you used flash, and they'd be ready for a change; even the so-called "Heavy Duty" or those marketed as "Digital Camera" didn't make a difference.Well, both of those terms should be reserved for these power cells; they really are less like a battery and more like a power pack. On my first charge up, which took only 3 hours and 6 minutes - I timed it - I wanted to actually test how many photos one could get.On my smaller camera, a 3MP Fujifilm Finepix S3100, I got 52 photos, some with flash, most without. Not random snaps to see how many it could record, but actually taking the time to frame them, select composition, etc.The camera stayed on the entire time using the full LCD rather than viewfinder, took all photos on highest-resolution setting, transferred between auto, manual, and situational modes, charged full flash about 8 times, and went into preview mode. Three hours, 47 minutes later, I got a "low battery" warning - not depleted - low. I stopped then, sure that I had not overpaid.**Note: These power cells will likely last much longer than 3h47m. Lower resolution may result in more photos. These numbers simply represent an unscientific but strenuous personal test to see what the product would do.Other notes about the product:- All parts except for door are made of hard, impact resistant plastic.- Fold away plug in back makes charger easier to store.- Red and Green LEDs are very bright, no mistake between charge and full mode.- Has two "channels", A and B. Seems to charge sets of batteries best; this may have been an issue with another reviewer who reported issues with using one battery at a time.- Black (body back), silver (body front) and blue (door) looks nice.I have one complaint, though perhaps it's only one founded in pure puzzlement. The door flips open...to the right. When holding the unit in your hand, with the Monster logo at the top and the LED at the bottom, the door flips open to the right. My guess is that this decision was made so that the door didn't close on your hand when loading, because most people will tilt it in their left hand so that it's facing away from them at about 45 degrees; I know I do.My final review: 5 out of 5</review_text>
Monster is a little pricey, as everyone knows, but it's good stuff.  This unit is attractive, works well and is nicely designed.  Only one very small drawback: unless you have small pointy fingers, the first battery is a little hard to remove.  I use a little plastic relay tool to lever it out, which I store right in the charger.  But I stayed with 5 stars for this one</review_text>
The charger unit or the batteries (or both) don't work right: I use the batteries one at a time, in rotation to power my Zen MP3 player. Sometimes I put discharged batteries in the charger, plug it in, the light blinks red, then goes off.  Only supposed to show either red (discharged, charging) or green (fully charged.)  This morning 3 batteries show fully charged, I take one out, it is discharged. All these problems happened with a first unit, I returned it to Monster and after they took their sweet time, got a replacement which works just as erratically. Monster's stuff looks good, but it is the last time I am going to buy their brand</review_text>
After reading the reviews, just bought the charger. The first charge took about 3 hours, then the led turned green. I accidentally disconnected the power, when I plug it again, the led turns orange, and start charging again. Will this hurt the battery</review_text>
Compact Design....bought it since 2002.....still going strong...went to soo many trips wit me...and easily fit in ur luggage....now i use that for my Travel only and use Powerex MH-C204 F for my daily use...can take at least 2 hours of pics wit my Minolta Z</review_text>
When I bought a digital camera, I already knew that I would need rechargeable batteries for it. What I didn't realize was how quickly the camera would eat the supplied alkalines. I had taken barely a dozen pictures before they were drained to the point where the camera would no longer operate!So I looked for a set of rechargeable batteries and a charger and quickly settled on this one because of previous experience with Monster Cable's products.It performs better than advertised. The initial charge may have taken 3 hours, but subsequent charges have been much quicker. I have yet to drain these batteries to the point where they won't operate the camera. The charger itself is an attractive unit for an appliance, and has an LED indicator that lights up red for charging and changes to green to indicate fully charged. It is compact enough to fit comfortably in the camera bag and the plug folds into the back of it.I have had good service from it and can highly recommend this charger</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I bought one of these for my Canon SD-800 and can recommend it.  For many years now, I've carried Canon pocket cameras on my belt while traveling and the Canon-branded cases are simply the best for this purpose.  My only criticism of the Canon cases has been their lack of a small pocket for media.  I was hoping that with the tiny size of SD cards Canon would have added such a pocket to their newer cases, but they haven't.  On the plus side, the case retains the superior leather construction, uses a neat magnetic tie down for the flap instead of Velcro or a snap, and has a belt loop that is tight enough to hold the camera comfortably against your body.  The package also includes a nice looking leather replacement strap for your camera.  Incidentally, the SD-800 is well matched to the case, fitting quite securely</review_text>
The leather, design, craftmanship all exceed my expectation.Instead of velcro, it replaced with magnetic button, which is a plus.It also included a matching leather wrist strap with Canon logo, another plus.My Canon sd40 can also fit into nicely, although leave some room on the side</review_text>
Very impressed with the prompt service and delivery of said product. It is perfect for our new canon camera. Congratulations</review_text>
I'm the owner of Canon SD630.This case fit very good to my camera and it is very good kind of leather</review_text>
Quality leather case is great for the Canon Elph digital cameras.  The only negative is that there is no place to store extra battery or memory card</review_text>
I have the cannon SD600 and i've been pleased with my carrying case, it takes a beating but protects my camera nicely. Highly recommend both the camera and this case</review_text>
I received case quickly and love it! It is a perfect fit for the sd700IS and protects it nicely.  It is also a nice quality leather that looks nice as well</review_text>
I had originally bought a case from walmart but it just wasnt working out.What a difference this one made. Fits like a glove and well worth the few extra dollars this one cost in comparison to the ill fitting one.I highly  recomend this for your canon sd630Plus the service and delivery were excellent</review_text>
Excellent case, no question about it. It is stylish and well-put together. This can not be worn on a belt, though, it must go in a pocket, purse, or in your hand. The main thing is that it keeps the awesome camera safe and sound, and it looks good doing it.</review_text>
Case is pretty much what you see...I have no complaints. =)  The case protects my camera very well</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.I use this filter on my 50mm f/1.8D lens and on my 18-55mm lens.</review_text>
Just what I needed with out having to spend a fortune on a glass filter to protect my expensive Nikon Lenses.  I bought one for each of my different lenses because I would rather break the filter than the glass on the lens</review_text>
This filter is an excellent cost efficient way to protect your valuable lenses.</review_text>
A basic protection item you should have.  Does not appear to be multi-coated, as the more expensive Hoya filters are, but clearly worth it.  Fits the Nikon 18-55mm ED perfectly and allows the Nikon lens hood to fit well</review_text>
The filter is decent. I paid only $3 with free shipping so im not expecting much out of this filter. I bought it for protection and it does that perfectly. Not the best for night shots obviously but overall a good buy</review_text>
Great product for people that want more out of their digital camera. Not so easy to operate at the beginning, but learning is quick and the results are extremely satisfying. With a little dedication, you will be able manipulate the secrets of high end photography. Best buy for the buck</review_text>
As an early adopter of digital, dating from 1999 and the Agfa ePhoto 1280 and 1680 to the current iteration of the Nikon family, I can attest that this camera is as flexible as any of my film cameras that I use for studio and location work. Fujifilm has migrated the best features of a mecanical film camera over to this model.From a hot shoe for external mounted flash and a sync terminal for off camera flash, to the cable release socket on the shutter button, Fuji has melded the best of the analog with the best of the digital.With 9 mega pixel resolution, ISO from 80 to 1600, shutter speeds from 30 seconds to 1/4000, a 1.6 inch CCD sensor, Fujinon 28 to 300 mm (135 equivalent) zoom, tilting LCD monitor (if you use those things), RAW file format support, real time histogram display, eleven shooting modes, movie recording, AF assist illuminator and full manual control when needed, Nikon, Canon, Olympus, et al have a lot of catching up to do.No need to change lenses means a sealed camera and that equates to the sensor staying spring time fresh in the body. No dust getting in every time a lens is swapped (although, I still miss all that Nikon glass).All this for less than $ 600.0</review_text>
I bought this camera based on several online reviews, including Steve's Digicams, and couldn't be more pleased. I've been using it since last Christmas (bought it as a present to myself after six months of looking at various brands and models). Aside from image quality (which it has plenty of) I insisted on at least an LCD viewfinder (EVF) as well as screen, a real filter ring (no adapters, please!) easy basic controls, long optical zoom, CF card, hot shoe and the ability to use ordinary AA batteries in a pinch. Also had to fit my hand and feel natural.This had all that, plus an actual cable release socket in the shutter button! (Thus I can easily use my cable and bulb releases, as well as a long-duration timer I have in my 35mm kit.) It also has a standard pc socket for more flash options than the built in flash or hot shoe.The heft is good, but not very heavy. You can carry it for a long time without fatigue, but it has enough mass to steady your hand, and enough size for easy gripping. I find it very instinctive to point and shoot with it. Most of the basic control locations are convenient and easily remembered. (Zoom is manual only, but that suits me. I don't like waiting for motorized zooms to get where I want, especially with a zoom range this long.)I'll leave it to the pro reviewers to discuss the image merits, but I will say that for me they seem perfectly sharp with very good color even at the default settings. In addition, I've gotten very good results shooting at night with very long exposures. (Starry sky, clouds backlit by the moon, streets under moonlight and streetlamps, etc.) Much less noise and "grain" than I've experienced with other cameras. So far it's the closest to film I've found in such situations - at any price I can afford, at least.The electronic viewfinder (EVF) is bright and sharp and performs well in low light. I don't miss an optical viewfinder much at all. There's a diopter adjustment to accomodate most people's visiion. (Stops just short of enough for my worst eye - comes closer than most, though - but I find I can use the EFV with my glasses on if I want).One accessory I strongly recommend is a soft rubber, wide angle, lens shade (for a 58mm filter ring). They can be found cheap (I paid $7 at a local store) and will protect the rim of the lens when you set down the camera in addition to shading the lens. There is an included hard-plastic lens shade that clips on the outside of the lens's rim, but t's "notched" and I worry about catching it on things - I like the soft rubber ones better (they look more "pro" too).  It may interfere with the supplemental illumination lamp for focussing, so you'll want to remove it when shooting close to mid-range photos in dim light</review_text>
I spent a lot of time reading reviews and posts, finally I bought it, it is the best camera I have used, I went from an old Konica 35mm film camera to a Sony Cybershot 2 mp and then to not having a camera for a while later I had a Kodak P850 (great camera also, but slow to my taste) and finally this S9000, belive me this is a great choice it is the only camera that I have found that is positivly compared to DLSR and still being a prosumer camera, that tells a lot.The lack of picture stabilization is not a big deal, it has the anti blur mode which is almost the same, and have a full array of controls and manual settings that will help and please from amateurs to not so ameteurs.It also has the first steps os face detection in it's multifocus mode, which focuses most of the times in subjects faces where ever they are on the frame (not necesary centered), I have to mention it has its limitations and you have to know how to compose your shot.The User guide is easy to read, understand and follow, you don't have to know nothing about photografy with this manul you will use most of the functions in a few hours with easy.Summary: 5 of 5!!!Nice camera</review_text>
Many of the options on this camera are mechanically on the body of the camera rather than on an internal menu so wanting a change in focusing method etc is easy!  Shaking is no problem with the 10.7x optical zoom and warning icons appear if it may be a problem.  Icons appear if the subject isn't focused warning you to change the focusing method.  Automatic power turnoff to save batteries after two or five minutes, your choice.  You can set the camera to take instant pictures; again, your choice.  This camera allows you to set your options rather than have the camera go to default after power off and having to change it back to your option.  That was a problem I had with my previous camera.  Maybe a little pricey, but the results are great!</review_text>
(Wife of account holder)I knew before I bought this camera it was just what I needed!  I am a semi-pro-am that does photography as a hobby and a job.  I knew I didn't need the $5K camera we have at work, but wanted something more than my $200 point and shoot.  This is it!  Out of the box, it took about 15 min to take my first pic.  Hardest part was threading the camera strap with the lens cap holder - a nice little detail.  The main selling point for me was the "Natural Light" mode.  Tried with flash and without in N mode and the quality is amazing.  My little P&S didn't do any good in low light without flash, this camera gets an A+.A few minor notes I wanted to make before I was lovestruck: The LCD screen has no protection, just kind of out there in the open.  A cover or even just that little plastic stick-on most low end cameras come with would be enough to make me feel like it isn't going to bust.  The viewfinder is really just a mini-LCD screen, which I imagine does a bit of a number on the batteries, though not as much as the full size LCD on the back.  The menu looks pretty extensive, but fairly easy to navigate once it becomes a little more familiar.  So far, I love it, but took off one star because of the LCD issue.  Maybe I can find a cover or something for it to help me feel better about it.Other than that, I can already tell this camera will do everything I need to take great pics and get creative with some manual settings and exposure manipulation.  Love that it takes xD and CF cards - and both can be in the camera at the same time!  Save movies to one, pics to the other!  It feels pretty solid, and takes super inexpensive AA batteries - another selling point for me, as were the hot shoe and sync capabilities.  If you are looking to go SLR, but can't fork out the dough, this is a perfect alternative.  (Though check around for price - with [...] rebate, I got mine for less than [...]!!</review_text>
Good price for a 9MP camera with 10x zoom.Image quality is good.  I'm still shooting mainly on the 3MP and 5MP with good results.  The spot metering works really well, especially while shooting on a bright day with the objects sitting under an umbrella.The Macro works nicely.  I still yet to find a good use for the Super Macro.The camera recycles between shots pretty quick.  The anti-blur mode (using higher ISO rate) works well.Controls/menu make sense.  Although I wish the memory switch feature is not buried too deep in the menu.  That's another good feature.  You can have 2 memory cards in the camera and with the xD being so cheap.  You can combined the capacity instead of having to buy a bigger and more expensive card.I especially like how the menu is displayed even inside the viewfinder (it's an exact copy of the LCD).  That way, I don't have to take my eyes off of my object while cycling through the menu.I wish the battery life could be better.  In effort to conserve battery power, I shoot mainly using the viewfinder and avoid using the flash by using the anti-blur mode.But on the bright side, one can just carry more high-capacity, rechargeable  AA's.  It just takes a while to get used to the battery consumption rate.  I carry a 2 sets of backups where the third one is Alkaline</review_text>
I paid $225 out the door for this camera and it competes with cameras almost twice that price!  On the automatic setting, it takes incredible photos, but has the capability to go manual if you are so inclined.  For the price, there is nothing on the market that comes close.  The macro on this camera is great and the close ups I have taken even on the automatic setting are unbelievable.  If you are looking for something that is SLR like, but not the SLR price, this comes close.  Of course, the SLR's will take better photos if you are an expert, but if you are an amateur or intermediate photographer and want something that gets the job done, put this one on your list...taking the price into consideration this thing doesnt disappoint.  You will be glad you purchased this one!</review_text>
I am pleased with this camera.  Its pretty easy to use.  I have virtually no camera experience, save for breaking them.  This camera is easy to operate and is pretty fun to fool around with.  I have used the aperture setting several times to get different focus points on the pics.  The instructions were easy to comprehend.  I have taken quite a bit of Sports photos and I have noticed its extremely difficult to get shots inside a gymnasium.  The shots are usually very blurry and the color just isn't right most of the time.  Fluorescent modes on the camera are helpful, but do not fix the problem.  It could just be me though</review_text>
i like this camera very much is easy to use and gets good result</review_text>
Reviewed most digital cameras on the market today to replace a worn Olympus.  Decided that this camera fitted my needs even though I had never purchased a Fuji camera before.  I bought it before I made a two-week vacation to Greece.  WOW.  I was stunned by the quality of my pictures.  Colors were unbelievably true to nature.  I love to take low level lighting pictures like at sunset, sunrise, etc.  I couldn't believethe outcome.  It gave me some of the most beautiful shots I have ever madewith high priced film cameras.  And I did this on automatic.  No more worries about f stops, speed, etc. for me</review_text>
I gave this to my wife for her birthday, and so far no complaints at all.The camera has plenty of functions that you can play with, but it can also work in point and shoot situations.Good quality pictures, and it looks and feels top notch</review_text>
I'm using it for a few months now; I haven't found a single problem so far. Earlier, I was using an old FinePix and the optic/sensor sensitivity was not very good; poor quality of photos taken in dark environment. This is not a problem any more. Also, I was impressed with the sharpness of photos of sport actions taken with 10x zoom. In general, I was pretty enthusiastic about all the features of this camera; it took me nearly 3 days to try everything out :-). Sure, there are better cameras on the market; however, considering the price it is just a great deal</review_text>
I went from taking the camera out of its packing to taking professional quality pictures in twenty minutes.  It's amazing</review_text>
These cameras are as simple to use as any I have ever seen and the quality of the pictures are as good or better than cameras costing 3 times as much. Great Buy</review_text>
The quality is definitely great. When attached to the S3 IS, it makes your camera look serious about taking good shots. If you are attaching the hood and doing flash photography, I suggest you use a slave flash to eliminate the shadow caused by the hood</review_text>
The black color of the adapter and hood are a nice match for the gunmetal finish of the S3. The fit is good and they do what they are supposed to.I noticed that the hood tends to "lock" to the adapter if you accidently squeeze it when unscrewing it -- probably because the plastic bends a little. Use a lighter touch and it unscrews right off.The one off-putting thing to me is the price of these two inexpensive pieces of plastic. I know they may be precision-engineered plastic with a nice finish, but please, over 15 dollars each for the two pieces? They're plastic!I know corporations supposedly owe it to stockholders to maximize profits, but perhaps these could have been included with S2/S3 as standard equipment. Or sold for a price more in line with the construction material</review_text>
I purchased this for my S2 IS instead of a third-party adapter.  The only issue I have is that it's black instead of silver (doesn't match the camera).  I also had to make sure I purchased the correct camera bag to hold the camera with the lens adapter attached</review_text>
Very important to shade the camera lenses and avoid flairs. It doesn't fit in the carrier bag designed for Canon S2, S3, though, which is a big time bummer. However, I would recommend it anyways, because the quality of the pictures and the protection of your lenses are worth carrying a different bag for the rest of your stuff</review_text>
It is a great camera. It has a small size, good optical zoom and Excellent quality. I love it too much and I take it anywhere and carrying it in it's Nikon small case</review_text>
I bought this camera because of the small size, megapixles and zoom + digital zoom.  I wanted something to take outdoors into the wilderness and not worry about hurting it.  Price wise I feel this camera offers pleanty of featrues at a very reasonable price</review_text>
What a wonderful camera.  The photos come out sharp and clear.  The small size makes it very handy to carry around with you at all times.  The photos   load very quickly on to the computer.  For the price I would rate this a "best buy".  I found only one drawback which I feel is minor.  In very bright sunlight it is difficult to see the object on the screen unless it is shaded by a hand or a piece of paper or cardboard.  But this minor problem would not stop me from purchasing a second Coolpix L4.  You can purchase a 512 or l Meg memory card for very little money.  Check Amazon for Kingston or SanDisk.  I have both and they are great.</review_text>
I am not a photographer, but the pictures I take look great.  It feels great to know that I can capture memories in vivid color too. (that's the setting I always use.)On the other hand though, there is a long wait time to use the camera again after a picture was taken using the camera flash.  I don't quite know why but it seems that if you have to take many pictures in quick succession then using the cameras's flash is not the best way to go!All in all, for the price i paid the quality is quite suitable.If you don't have any experience in photography, buy this one</review_text>
This is an excellent pocket camera and it lives up to the Nikon reputation for quality. While it lacks some controls seen on more sophisticated models the pictures will please the most demanding for this class camera. I liked it so well I bought two, one for myself and one as a gift to a budding photographer</review_text>
I simply love this camera, it's very tiny in size and takes great pictures and you can buy rechargable batteries or regular batteries if you should choose. it is simple to use, didn't even have to read the manuel. for a starter camera or advance user, get this one, you will love it !!!</review_text>
The Coolpix L4 is a great camara. Love the night modes, portrait.  Takes great pictures, took it on our honeymoon, and all pictures came out great.  It also takes very good movies, I thought it wouldn't and that is why I didn't go for the one with speaker, but seeing the cuality of both pictures and video, I should have gone for the one with mic, that's the L3</review_text>
This camera is worth every penny. I just recieved it today and so far I like it a lot. Seems to be well made, has a nice size LCD screen, and takes good pictures from what I have seen so far. Battery life seems good. It has 15 scene modes which you would not expect with a camera in it's price range. Macro mode is excellent! The only downsides really is the time it takes from when you take a picture to the time you can take the next, it takes a second for the flash to charge. The camera only comes with 10mb internal memory, so unless you are going to invest in a bigger memory card, you will only be able to take about 6 pictures. The video mode is good, but does not have any sound. Overall I give it a 4.5. Price paid: $11</review_text>
I use my Canon 10d mainly for Astrophotography. Most of the time,it involves keeping the camera shutter open for long periods oftime, anywhere from a few minutes to tens of minutes. This ACK-E2adapter takes my worries away from monitoring battery status or adrained one, while i control the camera remotely sitting inside myhouse. Continuous power also ensures worry free writes to its flashstorage. The package included several AC power connectors which isvery useful while travelling. Amazon provides a wide range of itemsto choose from.</review_text>
If your camera spends any amount of time connected to your computer--either copying pictures, or using the remote capture program--you should have this AC adapter.  It is also obviously handy to have if you do a lot of shooting from a fixed location--for instance: a tripod.The adaptor is an ingenious little contraption.  There is the normal AC line that runs to the power adapter, but instead of running the DC output to a dedicated jack on the camera body, the connector is in the shape of the normal battery pack.  If you look closely at your camera, you will see a little grove at the bottom of the battery compartment providing enough room for a wire to exit.Now for the surprise.  I'm planning a trip to Europe.  I knew the battery charger that came with the camera, and this AC adapter both support 100-240 volts AC, 50-60 Hz input.  Which covers all the worlds power supplies.  But the battery charger included with the camera only came with the US power cord.  I've been looking for various European cords that would fit the charger so I could keep my batteries topped off overseas.  What should I find when I open the box to this adaptor?  A complete collection of all the worlds cords, which also happen to fit the charger.  What a win, now I can run my camera on AC, and stay charged while I'm on vacation</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid petal shaped one and three quarters inch long offers limited protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Being so shallow and petal shaped, even this type of protection is limited. Even if the protection is limited, replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 16-35mm f/2.8L EF and normally comes included with the lens when sold new. There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. This lens isn't unusually wide so the extra inch may not be a problem.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityReduces lens flare problemsOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the lens</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
I'm using this hood for the Canon EF-S 10-22mm lens on a 20D. It's a bit shocking how big this hood is until you realize it's really necessary for the very wide field of view. On the Canon 20D, the lens is equivalent to the EF 16-35mm f2.8, only it's f3.5-4.5. Bottom line is that it does the trick and is made to the same good quality as the rest of Canon's stuff</review_text>
Using either on EF 16-35mm lenses or EF-S 10-22mm lenses (on 20D or Rebel bodies with 1.6x crop factor) this hood helps to eliminate (I mean reduce a lot) the flare on sunny days or certain lightning conditions..... highly recommended for those who like to shot at the lower end (16mm) of these lenses.</review_text>
This is a fabulous and reliable camera. Feels solid. Fantastic pictures. Easy to operate. A new D40 has been announced over the past few days, but its lack of an LCD display and buttons to manage basic camera controls (to reduce weight and make it more user friendly) would still make this my recommended Nikon DSLR. Expect prices to fall as the D40 becomes available</review_text>
I am not a photographer, but I enjoy taking good pictures. I never had a digital SLR before; the camera I had before the D50 was a Nikon Coolpix (a compact one). I thought this would have been a good camera for someone who enjoys good pictures without being a pro. I realized that it was even better than what I expected (maybe because I was coming from a Nikon Coolpix). The colors are amazing and the quality of the picture is extremely good.The D50 is among the cheapest digital SLR's, and, at the same time, it is a very serious product. I don't think the D50 is much inferior to the Canon Rebel, even if the Canon has 2 more megapixels of resolution. I used both the D50 (which I own) and the Rebel (at my school) and I think the D50 feels much more like a "pro camera" when you hold it in your hands, while the Rebel feels more like a toy.The lenses provided in the package are good, but are basic. According to me the 18-55 is better than the 28-80, but I think I should have bought the 55-200 as well: 18 to 200 covers most of the pictures that you can take. Also the 18-135 that Nikon sells with the D80 looks good to me, but they don't make a kit with those lenses for the D50.The last thing that really amazes me is the .NEF format (Nikon's RAW format). It is impressive how quickly you can improve a .NEF picture with your computer in just very few clicks of mouse.If you want a good camera, and you don't want to spend too much money for it I think this is the best choice</review_text>
As an amatuer photographer this gives me the what I need at a price I can afford. It has many features that I am still learning how to use. The difference between the pictures that the D50 takes as a DSLR compared to cheap digital camera is like night and day. I am really happy with this camera and the lens combination I purchased. I can do anything from a macro of a spider to a zoom-in of a squirrel sitting in a tree. The battery has a good life span and I rarely have to change it for my spare while shooting. Remember to puchase seperately your memory card as it is not part of the purchase. I'd recommend at least a 2GB card, which can also be purchased at amazon. I was able to catch a squirrel jumping between trees because of the number of frames you can take each second. It is also so easy to take photos indoors without using flash and being obtrusive during the event you are photographing. I also recommend purchasing 52mm lens filters, to keep your nikkor lenses free of fingerprints, etc.</review_text>
Nikon D50 is an absolutely fantastic camera.If you are moving from point and Shoot, you will jump to a completely new leage of photography.Pros:1. Noise extremely low at ISO 800, and highly usable at 1600.2. Camera control is good, you get 2.5 frame per second, more than enough for non-professionals.3. Flash sync is 1/500 sec, one of the best in market.4. Image quality (IQ) is excellent.Cons:1. LCD screen is small.2. Top LCD has no back light.3. No depth of field review button.Regards,csoura</review_text>
I felt the price was very competitive and it was received within the time frame the seller told me it would be. The camera is very easy to handle and has so far taken wonderful shots.  It was just what I was hoping it would be</review_text>
As a long time film person, I really wanted to find a digital slr that could surpase the feel and quality of film without the guess.  other digital cameras were basically point and shoot versions.  with two children in athletics year round, the d50 does it all.  we've shot over 3000 pictures in the past three months just of soccer and softball.  the nikon software makes converting and storing a breeze.  the only thing missing was a protector for the viewfinder, it's standard on the d70 and now the d80.  there is an aftermarket available that does fine in that dept.  I have recommended the d70 to so many people that nikon must put me on their marketing team</review_text>
The Nikon D50 is my fourth digital camera, and my first SLR camera. I don't know why I didn't try SLR earlier, but now I have decided that I will never go back to non-SLR cameras (well, I still have my other 3 point and shoot digital cameras which sometime is more convenient to carry.) I guess I'm just trying to show how much I like the SLR camera.Now back about the D50. Unless you are shooting sports/actions professionaly (which then you will want to buy the D2H or D2X for faster focusing processor, faster frames per second and larger memory buffer), the D50 is pretty much all you will need (equipped with several lenses of course).The D50 has all the pre-configured settings for the casual photographers ("child" mode is also added for the D50, night landscape mode is not available), and it has the usual P,S,A,M mode for the more serious/advance photographer. I have stopped using the pre-set mode now and strictly uses the aperture priority and the shutter priority mode (as far as the manual mode, I'm not there yet). This shows that this camera is versatile and suitable for all ranges of skills.Comparing with its siblings (D70s, D80, D200), I think whichever you want to buy is fine. They are all great cameras. It comes down to your budget. And comparing to other brand like the canon (Rebel XT or the 30D),or pentax or sony, it will be just brand preference (and what lenses that you already have). Moreover, If you come from a point and shoot camera user, any SLR brand you buy I don't think you will be dissapointed (just the fact that SLR performs better in most important aspect of photography)Image quality of the D50 is good which is #1 factor that I look for in a digital camera.Here are the pros and cons of the D50 in my opinion:Pros:1. Nice out of the camera result picture quality (on Auto setting, and pre-programmed setting)2. Fit perfectly on my hand (grip nicely)3. Instant on and can take picture right away4. 2.5 frames per second5. large 2 inch LCD6. Battery life (will take 400-2000 shots on a single charge depend on how often you use the full power flash)7. Uses SD card8. Fast USB2 connection9. capability to copy and re-size pictures to small size (great for email)10. repeating #1 again. Great image qualityCons (which are mostly minor):1. No backlight on top panel2. No Black and White picture mode3. No night landscape mode4. No ISO 100 (and on ISO 1600 the picture is grainy though still usable)5. No depth-of-field preview button6. No front command dial7. 1/4000 max shutter speedI started using this camera for landscape and portrait, but later on I started shooting sports/action and night (low light) settings, hence I added the Nikon 50mm f/1.8 AF-D which is a great prime lens and I'm recommending to everyone to get this "fast" lens. I'm also recommending you to get the Nikon 70-300M f/4-5.6 AF G, which is a nice (for the price) zoom lens. If you have the budget then go for the Nikon 70-200mm f/2.8 VR AF-S which I think the best zoom lens that nikon currently have. (The VR really works especially for stationary object. If the object you want to photograph is moving and in low light situation/indoor then you will need a "fast" lens, i.e. lens with large aperture such as f/2.8, f/1.8, or f/1.4 etc)Happy Photographing!</review_text>
I am very happy with this camera.  It takes very good photos in automatic mode, but all the extra features make you want to learn how to take amazing photos.  Also, I have big hands so the camera feels a lot nicer in my hands than the Canon Digital Rebel XT.  The only improvements I would make to the camera are:1 - I am a big guy so the strap doesn't seem to be quite long enough.  Eventually I'll pick up a new one.2 - The battery charger setup is very bulky.  I'm not quite sure why they chose to put a 5 foot electric cable onto the charger instead of making it plug directly into the outlet.3 - After being used to the Canon camera software, the Nikon preview mode zoom feature seems cumbersome.Otherwise this camera is great.  I'm looking forward to learning more and picking up another lense</review_text>
My first digicam, bought it 2 years ago.Simple to use, great pictures, and a year ago (and hundreds of pictures ago) I dropped it (no in its case) on a cobblestone road - no damage.Have never seen the need to replace it.I like the common batteries it uses and the SD memory</review_text>
I've had my Canon A510 for over a year and I still love it.  I've taken it on vacation with me several times, including one trip to Yellowstone Park, where I took about 1000 pictures.  It's great.  It's small and light and I like the way it fits my hand.  It's fast. I never have to spend time waiting on it.  It takes great pictures!  It uses 2 batteries and the batteries last longer than my last camera lasted using 4.  The only problem I've had is that occassionally the lens cover will stick and not completely open.  I can just barely touch it with my finger and it unsticks and opens the rest of the way so that's not a major issue</review_text>
My mom & I have each have one of these cameras.  Neither, one of us has had any problems until recently.  I dropped mine while taking pictures with the timer. The drop on my tile floor smashed the telescoping lens out of alignment and wouldn't close and gave a E8 error on the screen. I contacted the canon US website then, I sent it into the canon repair center in IL. It cost $87 to have it repaired and shipped back.  It took about a week and a half to have it returned to me.The only thing I would improve about this camera is the speed, I had trouble taking pictures of my son on the merry go round(but it could be that I need to change settings). It has many features on it and accessories to add on.  Since, I am learning more about digital photography this is a great little starter camera to have with many features that canon is known for.  Also recently I've been looking at some of the newer canon models, their casing/ bodies look/feel really cheap to me.  It may make them lighter but it makes me really afraid that I would break them</review_text>
I've had the A510 for about six months and have been pleasantly surprised by the ease of use and reasonable picture quality for a 3.2M camera.After six months the lens and cover have jammed and I noticed that many Amazon reviewers have had the same issue. One evening I took several pictures and the next morning the camera would not operate.I'm hoping the service center can provide me better service than some of the reviewers.</review_text>
I own this hood and Canon Digital Rebel XT.I like the hood. It works well limiting stray light as well as protecting the lens.As you will hear from many experienced photographers (I'm an amateur), they would never shoot pictures without the hood on the lens so why would you?All hoods are expensive for what they are, a piece of plastic, but they serve a necessary function.Get the hood if you want the best from your lenses, including this lens the 50mm f1.8 II.I would give it 5 stars but it is pricey</review_text>
It works great with my EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens.  The price of this hood with ring seems pricy compare to the lens price, but it does the job when it's really needed.</review_text>
My existing battery aged and I started to look forward a replacement. After I read several reviews, I preferred to choose the original one, because of heating and performance problems. Therefore, I found a good bundle price If I'd selected the cord, battery and case for my sd100 camera. By the way, I did not have a good case as this new one. I rated 4 stars, because I preferred to stay with the original cord</review_text>
It would cost you more to buy these separately.  The battery alone could cost this much.  The rest of the accessories have come in handy.  I originally wanted this only for the battery, but now, I have options.Great value.  Buy it</review_text>
I am am very happy with this package. The only issue, the thick stainless steel neck strap. I had no use for it and I have never seen anyone using it. I would prefer to have another extra battery or have the existing battery be an extended life one.Overall, for the price you cannot get a leather case and battery combo from somewhere else for the same price at Amazon. I consider the neck strap an unnecessary component as the one that comes with the camera is lighter and more flexible. it is also more elegant.</review_text>
If you've bought the Sd550, this is a great addition, the case has saved my camera a couple of times already from scratches and dings (especially with little kids around), the extra camera chord is long and durable (coated metal link chain) and the extra battery of course is invaluable.  I'd give it 5 stars, if I didn't feel that these items should come standard with the camera. :</review_text>
After researching numerous websites looking for a Canon fitted case for my new camera, I again turned to Amazon and found just what I was looking for at the lowest price.  The leather case fits well and isn't bulky, just protective.  Now I don't have to worry about  damaging the camera by dumping it in my purse with everything else so it can always be handy for impromptu shots.  The neat, comfortable neck strap was just an added bonus</review_text>
I rated accessory kit 3 as well.  Gave Kit 3 a 3 star.  I gave kit 2 to my mom who just got a SD550.  Great camera from what I can tell.  This kit however needs major improvements.  Going from the best about kit 2, to the worst about it, we will be starting with a review of the battery pack.Battery...Uhhh, not much to say here. Spare battery that to use as a hot spare out there if your running low after taking too many shots.  Mine from kit 3 is great and I still use it to this day. I swap the active battery each time I charge.  This is what gave this product as many stars as I have given it.Final decision (Battery): WONDERFULNeck Strap...  (Taken from Kit 3 and added improvements)If your moving around this thing is WAY to long or way to short. It's too short to strap across you chest. It's way to long because if it hangs in front of you, your precious camera you just paid a couple to a few hundred for is now freely bouncing around. NOT good.  My mom is really short and this is just too short for her to use as well.  Not as much of a bouncing issue as me but still not useful enough for her.   Her comment was, "This strap is either too short or too long.  Doesn't fit me at all." Cracks me up because I never told her my personal opinion of the matter and she came up with the same results.Final Decision (Neck Strap): use it for a jump drive that you use often or anything else. Just not your precious camera.Case...They screwed up on Kit 3, and this kit is still screwed up (managed to be even worse than kit 3).  Velcro is fine for most usage so I can't knock that.  Belt clip is fine and dandy.  Case is pretty darn good at keeping the camera safe from outside elements and harm.  Hole in center is useless as heck just like kit 3 (mom came to same conclusion). Here's where they REALLY screwed up.Stitching in this case is worse than kit 3.  In kit 3, you only had to worry about stitching screwing up your screen in the back of the case.  In this case, you have stiching in the back AND the front.  Unlike kit 3 which had a magnetic clasp where the stitching or any attachment to the case was hidden behind a soft cloth, this one is velcro and the stitching for that is on the inside front.  The belt clasp has stiching on the other side.  No escape in this kit.  I HIGHLY advise for you to get a screen protector if using this case.  Poor design and shame on the people who manufacture this case.Final Decision (Case): "Move along people... nothing to see here."  Seriously... don't bother using this case without a screen protector.COMPLETE DECISION:  I wouldn't buy this kit again at all.  It's great that there's an extra battery but I don't think anything else is worth a penny more in this kit.  Better off buying everything seprate.  Going to lower my rating to 2 stars</review_text>
I've had my D2H for 9 months now. I've heard of the magenta skin tones issue but have never seen it..skin tones on my unit are great. It seems this issue plagued a minority of users.Camera is very fast, exposes well and delivers results. It's primarily designed to be a sports and Photojournalism camera -- for situations where speed counts. It's a 4 megapixel wonder -- it's true it only has 4 megapixels, but they are 4 GREAT megapixels. Images upsize wonderfully.I love my unit, and am debating whether to buy a second one as a backup, or wait for the D2X. The price of the D2x is making that decision a bit easier and I'm leaning toward another D2H.</review_text>
I ordered this camera in December, have had it since then, and it an amazing camera. First time I have ever had professional camera, and it takes time to learn how to use it. It is not a point and shoot camera. If you want large pictures and like to crop, this may not be the camera for you. However if you want the ability to take great pictures, and learn how to use a professional camera at a great price this is the one to buy.Ability to have custom curves, which means to have predetermined parameters for different conditions. Ability to chage ISO at random for different conditions.  You can pay five thousand dollars for its successor, the Dx2, however for $2000 this is a bargin that you will never find again.Jim Comfor</review_text>
I bought the battery grip, based on the fact that my Rebel XT  is a small camera, when using it at my last model shoot, someone mentioned it looked like a tourist camerawhich is pretty depressing, since adding the grip not only do I have more than enough battery life to my camera , it also has that pro look that people recognize, and even though I still believe that it's not the camera, it's the eye behind it that counts, having a good looking camera is always welcome</review_text>
I tried this product out at local camera store before I was sold on the idea. The two main things I was concerned about were how does it attach and does it add too much weight to the camera.The attaching to the camera was a little concerning, I was worried that it may damage the camera. But, after watching the guy at our local camera shop put one on a Rebel I was sold. Basically you remove the door to the battery compartment. Which comes off a lot easier than I anticipated. The grip slides in like a battery and you screw it on the bottom of the camera. Don't worry their is another hole on the bottom of the grip for the tripod.The grip does add weight but its not that significant and I noticed it adds a lot of stability while holding it. Since the grip adds height to the camera its easier to hold the camera in one hand. Much like holding one of the more expensive models. It also adds battery life since the grip holds two batteries.If you hold the new grip to take pictures with the camera on its side. You will be pleasantly surprised to see a duplicate set of buttons and the scroll wheel added on the new grip just for that purpose. It is now a permanent attachment and I am glad I decided to buy it. The buttons work just as well as the camera even at 3fps.Another note is that the quality of the Canon grip is much better than the cheaper version.</review_text>
Don't be mislead, this is an ab-so-lu-te-ly great product REGARDLESS if you have big or small hands. And it fits the new Rebel XTi (400D) too!!My hands are small, but before the BG-E3 grip I had no real use for the fifth and fourth fingers (except tucking them underneath the XT's small body.) With the BG-E3,  the hand grip is firm and the whole hand grabs the camera. This gives you an extra feeling of pleasing assurance, not an unnecessary sensation.Better still, the front panel of the BG-E3 is rubberized so the bottom half of your hand won't slip away (Canon should have covered the camera's own grip with that material instead of using the average plastic that makes the body mould.)Having a little extra weight is NOT a problem, rather it always comes handy as a counterbalance for you zoom lenses (say in the 300mm range).In short, this accessory gives the Rebel camera user a welcome feeling of overall control and the sensation of having a more professional gear in your hand. The extra slot for a second battery, of course is a plus.I'm selling my XT as soon as the new XTi is available, and it's nice to know the investment I made not long ago with this Grip, will prove to be useful when I switch.  Now, if only the future  40D (who knows) were to have the same compatibility...</review_text>
I bought this for a trip and not only did it fit my purpose but it makes the camera look even cooler than it already looks.  I had several people stop me and ask me what it was so I got a chance to explain how it benefited me</review_text>
I've used a battery grip on almost every Canon camera I've owned since 1980. This Rebal XT battery life seems to be almost forever and with the battery grip, that gets doubled.The grip also allows you to use regular batteries so you could use them should the rechargables ever die on you and need to keep shooting.It adds another shutter release button for turning the camera 90 degrees.Larger hands would probably find the camera more comfortable with more grip area.It adds more mass which can be a pro (a little more stability) or a con (heavier to carry around).It would have been nice if Canon could have slightly remolded it to stand the camera up. As it is, the camera will lean forward on it lense.Bottom Line: I'm glad I purchased but think it could have been much cheaper. When you consider (way back when) these types of devices added a motor winder (standard on modern film SLRs and not used on digital cameras) along with added battery capacity. All this adds is additonal battery capacity.The price is the reason for 4 stars instead of 5. Of course most businesses don't care as long as people are buying.Mark</review_text>
A neccesary add to the Cannon Rebel. A Good product. Too bad it doesn't come with the camera</review_text>
I took the plunge and bought the BG-E3 Battery Grip from Canon.  After reading the reviews of the off-brand model and deciding that I didn't want any 'button' problems, I got the Canon.  I'm VERY happy with it, (not from the standpoint of having the extra battery capacity because I have 2 batteries at all times anyway) but because I like the 'look and feel' of having the additional weight and fit for my large male hands.  I felt that without it, I might drop the camera at any time and while it's safely suspended about my neck, I don't like that feeling.I also like being able to spin the camera for portrait or landscape shots very quickly and cleanly and having that extra set of buttons available to change the Tv and Av settings for various effects.  I got some exceptionally nice photos of a waterfall and this made it easy to use.  If you're thinking about buying it, it's worth every hard-earned penny and should significantly enhance both professional and amateur uses</review_text>
If you're serious about photography, get this accessory.  With the second battery, I get plenty of juice for any event (even with my zoom lens using Image Stabilization).  Gives a solid grip for taking vertical (portrait) pictures while still having access to the controls you need.  I can't imagine being without it now (in spite of the additional weight).</review_text>
I had no investment in a DSLR but narrowed my choices to the Canon 30D and the Nikon D200. I had always wanted a Nikon. The D200 is definitely a joy to hold and it did take good pictures (I tried both at a camera store before I bought the 30D). I did a lot of research (more than I care to admit!) and there was no conclusive evidence that one camera had a clear edge over the other. Depending on your specific needs, one camera may be "slightly better" than the other.After trying out both cameras, I was convinced the 30D was as good a fit for my needs as the D200. For "value for money" the 30D was a clear winner over the D200 (I got mine when Canon had the Cash in with Canon promotion going). Also, as a beginner to SLR I found the 30D with its fully automatic and scene modes easy to start out with. I don't expect to use the scene modes or the full auto mode after a week or two. I expect to quickly graduate to the creative control zones. But to use as a family camera, the quick scene modes are very helpful. If you expect to use it more on a professional basis it'd probably not matter.Additionally, when I checked it out at the store, I noticed the Canon 30D focused sharply almost every time. The D200 did not at least a few times. I'd take this with a grain of salt though since it was a brief trial at a store. But I thought I'd share my experience. It may have just been an anomaly with the actual equipment I tried out.Do I still find the Nikon D200 to be a great camera? Absolutely! Do I regret having bought a Canon 30D? Absolutely not! The decision swinger in my case was really the "money factor". I was more than willing to spend up to $300 more for the Nikon D200. But when the difference became $550 it no longer became justifiable for my Christmas gift to myself:-)My purchases included the Canon 30D [...], Canon 17-85mm EF-S IS USM lens [...], and a SanDisk Extreme III 2GB compact flash card [...]I plan to add an external flash to this soon, and will consider eventual lenses after I determine that the camera is a long-term keeper.</review_text>
I compared a number of pro-sumer cameras and became firmly convinced this was the best camera for the money. Although Nikon at one time was considered the premier camera for the professional, they now take second stage to Canon not only for engineering, but for the quality of the lens, innovative and user-friendly design, and overall quality. I have used the camera for approximately one month and have been delighted. Having talken pictures for over 35 years - including professional - and always using Minolta equipment for all of those years, I am truly enamored with this Canon camera</review_text>
I am so pleased with this camera! There's really nothing negative I can think to say about it! I also own the Cannon XT. I use both for wedding photography as well as family portraits and I am so impressed with the color quality of the D30! Well done CANNON</review_text>
This camera is incredible. I ordered it for my husbands birthday and he is just begining to figure it all out. There are so many great features. One of the best is how quickly you can take digital pictures. Our other digital cameras have a lag time between shots, but not this one. The pictures are crisp and it is easy for even a novice like me to use. I highly recommend this camera if you want to take digital photography to the next level. It is one of the best</review_text>
I have had my Canon Eos 30D for about a week and after 500 shutter actuations I am completely addicted to photography.  I bought the 17-85mm Canon lens and it takes phenomenal pics especially using the software and post-processing in RAW.  I also have a 70-300mm lens for sports/outdoors/nature and bursts of 5fps are a beautiful sound.  I bought the Camera through Dell and with rebates currently this is the best deal out there!  Strongly recommend.  Pay the extra $$$ and get this over the Rebel XTI.  You won't be disappointed</review_text>
For those who truly know digital cameras, having more than perhaps 8 megapixels is important only if you plan on blowing your images up to "poster size", or if you are a pro who knows how to use all those pixels. And truthfully, how many of you really plan to do that type of stuff? To say that the Rebel XTi is better than the 30D because it "has more megapixels" and is "smaller" is not the best advice. Any Canon DSLR is going to give you great images, if know how to use it.  For those of you who are trying to decide which camera to buy, you really need to go to a camera store and ask to handle each camera. While you're at it, ask yourself how it feels in your hands.  Is it too bulky?  Is it too small and hard to handle?  Does it have the features you want such as spot metering, which the Rebel XTi does not have? The 30D is a terrific DSLR. It has all the features 99% of us need. There is a reason why it costs more than the Rebel.  The 30D is a better camera overall.</review_text>
This was a great purchase at $150.  I bought it to shoot amateur pictures of family at youth football games.  The images are sharp across the football field on a sunny day, I use the Canon monopod and recommend it.  It's 75-300mm so I have to switch out lenses to take pictures of people standing close to me.  There was a 28-200mm lens but it was much more expensive and I like having the extra zoom</review_text>
This lens works very well for two amateur photographers like my wife and I. We take photos of our kids in their sports activities. Even though the lens is a little on the heavy side and feels like we are shaking a little when we snap a picture, none of our shots have come out blurry. I am pleasantly surprised by this. We feel it was well worth the price we paid.(under $100</review_text>
This lens is a wonderful starter lens. A professional might want a little upgrade, but this is just right for someone starting out.</review_text>
The Canon EF 75-300mm is a Excellent product, I own the expensive USM version and this lense doesn't have nothing to be jealous about it, it's speed to focus is excellent,the main reason i bougth it is for my wildlife photography while kayaking, I wouln't take the USM version on my kayak, to expensive to get it wet, they both perform excellent, but the cheap price of this lense make it affordable and risk proof for your pocket, it's a little noisy but nothing that will affect it's use, plus it is a intimidating peace of equipment, that will make any person think you are a professional photographe</review_text>
A exceptional portrait lens for both digital and film, the Nikkor 85mm f/1.8D is usably sharp wide open and tack sharp by the time you stop down even just a bit. Relatively small and very light, it feels just right in my hand. Steve McCurry is one of my favorite photographers and I was happy to discover that many of his great shots were taken with this lens.Also, if you shoot on a manual focus body like the F3, you'll like the solid but smooth feel of the focus ring.The 85mm comes with a metal, screw-on hood. My preference is the plastic bayonet mounts, but I find that I don't need the hood that often since this lens doesn't tend to flare.Two minor complaints about this lens: first, the bokeh is not exceptional. That's OK; I'm not a bokeh hound. But when I see the creamy out of focus specular highlights that the 85mm f/1.4 produces, sometimes I dream about spending the extra money.Second, I wish it were AF-S. But even without AF-S, it focuses faster than you'd expect.Finally, the construction is solid. I've used it heavily for two years in deserts, jungles, and glaciers (ok, and in less glamorous places like around the apartment) and it still looks brand new.In short, my favorite lens. Absolutely worth every penny</review_text>
I bought this lens when I purchased my Nikon D70s in February.  I have to admit I have not used it too much.  However, when I have used it, I am pleased with the results.  Mostly, as I have been walking around town practicing taking photos, I have little use for the 85mm, because it's not good for "point-and-shoot" scenes.When I have taken portrait shots, however, the 85mm is very clear and creates great depth of field, which I find important.I hope this was helpful</review_text>
I have a D200 and while all the hype is around the 18-200 and others, this is one awesome lens for portraits and other closer up type photos.  I read a few things that I had to research and thought I'd pass on my experience:- How is this with a D200?  (ans: great.  fast auto-focus.  no compatibility issues)- Do you really get crisp photos and cool bokeh? (ans: absolutely)- Is 1.8 ok or do you need 1.4?  (ans: I don't have a 1.4 but the 1.8 is so competent for the price and I get the crispness and shallow DOF I was looking for)- Is the shooting distance for an 85mm acceptable or do you need a 55mm so you can be closer to the subject?  (ans: I really like the shooting distance for the 85mm.  I really would not less distance between me and the subject)Enjoy</review_text>
If you don't need the speed or can't afford the expensive 85mm f1.4 Nikkor lens or both, then this lens may be the right one for you. It took Nikon a while to produce a superb compact 85mm lens, but this time they finally got it right. Without a doubt, this is a fine portrait lens for photographing head-and-shoulder portraits (The only lens which is optically better is Nikon's legendary 105mm f2.5 Nikkor lens, and its close optical twin, the 105mm f2.8 Micro Nikkor.). Since the 105mm f2.5 Nikkor lens doesn't have an autofocus version, then this might be the perfect moderate telephoto lens for owners of Nikon autofocus SLR cameras. Regardless, this lens has a well-earned reputation for excellent contrast and resolution</review_text>
It's very sharp lens.  You will be wised to use it extensively on little children, they have such clear faces.  Be careful when you use this lens with middle age women.  It could show imperfecton in thousand fold.  Again very sharp, very fast Af focusing on my Nikon F80.  Ecxelent portrature lens, but be careful-women will hate you for unflattering portrature.  My advise use black and white film-you will see less imperfection in prints with the same rasor sharp focus</review_text>
The battery charger is original equipment.  I have used it for Canon Batteries and two different no name batteries rated as NB2L.  All charged properly and were useable in my Canon ZR500.  The charger is small and easy to travel with making it unnecessary to cary large quantities of batteries</review_text>
This is original equipment battery charger manufactered by Canon. The performance of the charger is excellent as are most Canon products. The price paid was comparible to non-sale priced items puchased via internet sites. The item was recieved in original packaging, 3 days after placing the order, was new (not reconditioned with a new appearance). I am extremely pleased with the entire purchase process experienced, from the information given at the site to ease of ordering and fast shipping</review_text>
Could not be any simpler to use.  Have used it a few times since it arrived and it works flawlessly.  +++  Recommended for all users.  Quicker and easier than the built in charger in the ZR700 camcorder</review_text>
Slightly smaller than the charger that comes with the S(40,45,50,...) series cameras and the digital rebel series cameras.  Seems to charge in about the same time.  Feels a bit more substantial, but that's not saying much as the chargers that come with those cameras seem pretty flimsy.  I can't give it 5 stars because it does nothing more than the chargers that come with the cameras (which I lost)</review_text>
I bought this lens to go with my Canon Digital Rebel XT.  I absolutely love this lens.  I got it to try some insect and other macro shots and it has served this purpose very well.  With some practice this lens will produce fantastic macros with some great bokeh to boot.I read the other reviews and must say that I have never scared an insect away with the noise as mentioned before.  And I have taken countless insect shots with this lens.  It is a bit louder than the other lenses I have but I don't see it to be a problem.  The one problem I do encounter is when using the autofocus in a busy closeup scene it often will focus on the background instead of say a closer insect on a flower.  When this happens I just flip it to manual and focus that way.  No big deal.Overall, great lens for an even greater price.  Definitely worth it.  (I submitted a photo of a bee that I took a couple of days ago with this lens as an example.)</review_text>
I purchased this lens back in March of 2005 to shoot static "Warhammer models" with my 10D.  I found that longer lenses such as the Sigma 105mm, the Canon EF 100mm, and the Tamron SP Autofocus 90mm all were "too long" with the 10D's 1.6 focal crop and would result in requiring me to use a lot more physical space that what I had room for to get the shot.The Canon EF 50mm f/2.5 is nearly a perfect match with the 10D for this purpose.  Its small, its compact, and its short focal length do not require that I be standing three feet away from the model I'm shooting.As far as shooting at non-static objects, such as insects, the lens is slow to focus and loud, in both noise and vibration, which results in "startled" subjects and missed shots.The same also applies for non-macro shots as well.  Its slow focus makes it a poor choice for action photography, and its loud enough to draw attention to you when you are attempting other shots as well</review_text>
I really like this lens but my results are not consistent. I think though this is more of a function of my limited skill of photography. The focal range seems very narrow but when you hit it the results are outstanding. I occasionally get images that are out of focus but again I think this is my fault. I bought this for macro work but I use it as a prime lens most of the time</review_text>
First I do not have this lens yet but I am buying it. It is reportedly an excellent lens with very little distortion along the edges (which is why I'm buying it). I will update this review after I have the lens, however, I feel that people should be warned about a big error in another well received review because it will only lead to frustration.Do not listen to John Kwok's suggestion to buy the Canon 60mm macro lens UNLESS you you own the 20d, 300d, or 350d/Rebel XT. The lens is an EF-S lens and as of September, 2005 it will ONLY fit those cameras - it has NOT been optimized for all Canon DSLR's as he states. On the other hand, the 50mm macro here will fit all Canon 35mm film cameras and all digital SLR's.</review_text>
The Canon EF 50mm f2.5 macro lens is yet another example of Canon doing a fine job catching up with the likes of Nikon, Zeiss and Leica with respect to optical design; optically it may be the best 50mm macro lens currently available for 35mm SLR film photography. I am impressed that a lens as cheap as this counts at least one aspheric lens element and an apochromatic lens design; unfortunately it is not nearly as durable a lens as the celebrated L series lens line or the Canon EF 100mm macro lens. Unless you are constantly working out in the field taking close-up photography, then the durability of this lens's lens mount and barrel should not be an issue. More importantly for the user is the quality of its images, and having read some test reports on this lens, I have no doubt that it is a capable performer. Those interested in digital macro photography may choose to look instead at the new 60mm macro lens, which is optimized for use with Canon digital SLR cameras</review_text>
I never thought a $250 lens could be so good. I have been trying to buy lenses that are light-weight for my 20D, due to a neck injury problem, and this 50mm fits the bill.Great in low light, and agree also, the bokeh is sweet. I do alot of bee chasing and manage some great macros with bees in flight with this one. All hand held. Can also take great indoor shots without flash, with a steady hand.I chose it also because it was one of the least expensive high rated canon 50mm's.It goes well with another inexpensive canon lens, the 55-200mm ef f4.5-5.6 II, which also does well outdoors, including macro.I am very pleased with both, and wouldn't part with them</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer.  Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare.  Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality.  A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light.  The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one.  This hood being a solid conical three and three quarters inch long offers some protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element.  There is nothing more irritating than reviewing your images to find dust spots or other flaws.  When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects.  Replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L EF lens and normally comes included with the lens when sold new.  There is no need to buy one with the lens as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position.  This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch.  An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge.  Fortunately Canon provides a storage case with the lens that can be used in addition to your camera bag.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the len</review_text>
This hood comes with the 100-400, so don't buy it separately.Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
I picked up the Canon 350d while I was in Italy.  I was thinking to upgrade the camera to another Canon that didn't have the built in flash.  This flash is great, I've only used it a few times, but I am more than impressed by it's functionality.In the title, I only said "oops" because I think it's more flash than I really need, at least for this camera.  Overall, I am more than impressed with this flash</review_text>
Super easy to use and significantly extends your flash photo distance over in-camera flashes.  Versatile flash direction accommodates multiple scenarios and moods</review_text>
This is a very powerful flash unit that works as a master to other Canon flash units. You can get very nice results with a small amount of experimentation. It does what it suppose to. I used it with the 420EX I've had for several years and it worked fine. Mounted on the camera it's a larger version of the built in popup on the 30d with some extra niceties and lots more power. Thinking of the 430EX? Cough up the few extra bucks for this baby, you'll be glad you did. It's a one shot deal, [no pun intended], you'll be using it for years to come. I bought the 420EX for my Elan II E about 6 years ago. It's been a great unit. This one recharges  faster and has gobs more power. You'll love it! Don't let all the dials and switches scare you, read the instruction manual</review_text>
I bought this flash for my Canon 30D because of the numerous promises Canon makes for how it performs with all of the 30D's automatic and manual functions...and they are RIGHT!  In spite of it's relatively small size, it is THE most powerful flash I've used of any brand.  Having replaced a non-Canon brand flash that was supposed to work with the 30D but didn't, I could not be more delighted with the 580X.  Whether you're shooting in AV, TV, P, or M modes, you will not be disappointed with its performance.  It's expensive; but it's worth the price if you rely on your flash to perform to your camera's capabilities</review_text>
I didn't have a ton of time to research this flash. I've used it now on several occasions with my Canon 5D and couldn't be happier with it. It's great for shooting portraits. I can shoot 10 shots in a row and the flash keeps up. I would definitely purchase the plastic diffuser - get's rid of the typical flash harsh light</review_text>
I hesitated for a year to upgrade from the 550 to the 580 because, on paper, I did not see much advantage.  In fact, the 580 is a worthwhile upgrade.  I like the new dial on the back for adjusting exposure compensation, etc. and the catchlight screen is a nice touch but the biggest advantages are the incredibly fast recycling time and smailler size.  I can machine gun my 1Ds2 and this flash keeps up.  The 550 could not.  It is small enough not to overwhelm my little Rebel too.  I did note that there is some vignetting at 24mm with a direct flash unless I drop the wide lens screen.  The manual says ths will not happen but it does.  Not a big deal since I use a Gary Fong diffuser or bounce flash almost always</review_text>
Like most every Canon accessory, the 580EX is well made and very expensive. I cheaped out when I bought my Digital Rebel and bought the Sigma EF-500 DG, which was represented as being "almost as good as" the Canon 580EX. That appears to be true. The problem is that "almost" leaves me with no master/slave lighting. So when I picked up a EOS 30D, I bit the bullet and paid the big bucks for the Canon. It works as advertised and nicely makes the Sigma the slave it was really born to be</review_text>
I'll spare the technical review of the 580ex Flash for now. I've been using this new flash for on-the-go shootings and find it very helpful especially with the capabilities of using multi flash units and off-shoe mode. It's great on hard to reach places where I want to produce more light or fast moving subjects, i.e. wedding guests and fast pets. I do plan to pick up at least 2 more of these units for it's compatibility on the most part. Not only that I can get good light coverage on the subjects, but the possibilities of making a more interesting artistic photographs that defines my work. Still nothing beats the use of the higher end lighting kits like Profoto Acute systems. But that's alot to lug around.</review_text>
I'm very happy with my Speedlite 580EX, is a new dimension for my photographic hobb</review_text>
The 580EX is a wonderful flash and I would not hesitate to buy it again.  In fact I might even buy a second one.There are however a couple of issues that you should be aware of.1. The battery compartment door takes a little getting used to.  You may feel like you are going to snap it off at first.  Not really a big deal though.2. (and in my opinion this IS a big deal).  The `Auto Focus Assist' is completely useless.  Its just an LED pointed through a rather bad `lens'.  It won't do anything past a couple of feet.  A laser diode with diffraction grating would have made it work far past the useable flash distance and at this price Canon should know better.All told however it is a wonderful flash.  The circular command dial make adjusting the flash exposure easy (dial in more or less flash relative to ambient light).If you do not have an external flash get one.  It makes a huge difference.  And this is a great offering.</review_text>
I love this camera.  It's my second Canon and, at 7MP, the best value for the money I've seen.  I took it to France this summer and loved the fact that I could recharge the battery overnight while my friends were constantly changing their batteries (and searching for places to buy them!).  My favorite option is the "Scene" button.  I don't think I'll ever try the "underwater" option, but the "night shot" and "inside shot" work fantastically.  It also seems as though you can take movies until the card or battery fail - which is a huge improvement over my older Canon. Unlike a lot of newer cameras, this one has a viewfinder. A friend of mine has a Nikon that has no viewfinder and it was extremely hard to use in bright sunshine.  I carried my camera in my purse without a case a few days ago in New Orleans without a problem - it worked like a charm.  I would recommend this camera to anyone who wants an easy-to-use model that produces fabulous results.</review_text>
This is a great camera that takes the place of an earlier Canon Digital Elph that I lost several years ago. The 7.1 megapixels ensures great quality and the 3x zoom provides crisp clear pictures. In fact the digital zoom also works great - just make sure the camera is steady (I purchased a nice compact monopod and the results were awesome). Although the image stabilization feature on the newer models would have been great to have, you can't beat the price and overall quality of this camera and the pictures it takes. The Canon SD500 is a great little camera</review_text>
I'm by no means an expert!  This is the first digital I have owned.  It took me a long time because I was so used to my film camera.  But I searched long and hard to find what I thought I wanted.  And so far I am not disappointed.  At first the size threw me because everyone else had a bigger camera and I felt it would be hard to handle to take good pics.  But that's not the case.  I like the feel, the size...I like to be able to throw it in my purse...It takes great pictures to use for my e-bay, and sending to family and friends.  I haven't had any pictures printed from it yet, so I don't know how exactly they will come out, but I'm thinking they should be okay since my online pics have been great.  I haven't had a single blurry pic, both regular and close up. The video works well...it has lots of little options I don't use..like sounds for each function, but I can change those if I want. Overall I have no complaints</review_text>
I bought this camera in February, and it really did a great job in so many different situations.Unfortunately, I lost it this past September and have been kicking myself ever since.  I will be purchasing the exact same camera again.Excellent features include:easy to usesmallgood quality (as long as they aren't EXTREMELY close) picturesI like the software that came with the cameragood accessories, esp. the camera caseclear LCD screengreat options for picture takingGood features include:fast shutter speed, although not quite fast enough.  I'd like to take more pictures at a faster repetition but cannot with this cameraI recommended this camera to my best friend who is a lighting designer for retail spaces (Dolce & Gabbana, for instance) and he gives it an excellent  review as well, so I know it is good in all types of light and for professional purposes</review_text>
I LOVE THIS CAMERA!  I bought it to keep in my diaper bag so I always have a camera with me.  It's small, easy to use and takes great pictures. I recently sent a few in to have them developed and they came out great.  The only recommendation I have is to purchase a larger memory card - the one it comes with only hold a few pictures</review_text>
hi i am surendranadha reddyi purchaged a CANON SD500 7.1MP . It is verygood digital camara.previously i used pantex that is also good, but in this photos are very natural and realistic.One more the Amazon price also good.Thank yousurendr</review_text>
I like the picture quality and features of this camera at this price point so much, its the third one I've purchased. My family seems to be hard on cameras such that this model only seems to last for about a year or so. At that point its been banged around in my wifes purse or accidentally dropped by the kids that the telescoping mechanism for the lens stops working. In doing web research it seems to be a common problem. So if you're typically more gentle than me and my family seem to be, this is a great and easy picture taker</review_text>
I bought this camera for $249 new which marked down from the $499 retail. This was an older model as the new models had just come out.For the money this is a good camera, but I am very particular and was not blown away. The images are good, but I was expecting more vibrance. Colors are a bit weak. It will not take a focused shot indoors unless the flash is on, and the flash is way to bright for closer shots. The image is often over exposed, and I find myself placing a piece of paper over the flash to get more of a correct shot. I upgraded from a Canon A40 2 megapixel camera (AMAZING CAMERA!), and the images are very similar in quality, except the new SD500 captures them bigger, having the 7 megapixel chip, hence a little better detail.I do like the small size, and the battery lasts a long time between charges. Holds lots of pictures with the 1 gig card I purchased seperatly. The video quality is quite good for a still camera.</review_text>
First Amazon thanks for the great service in delivering our item.   It works fantastic.  We are very satisfied with it.</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This is my lens for handheld images of birds in flight. It's sharp and exhibits no color fringing or other chromatic aberration. By comparison, my Leitz 400mm f/6.8 Telyt shows a fair amount of color fringing outside the center region. To be fair, the Telyt is a much simpler design.The Telyt does have higher contrast than the EF 400mm f/4 DO IS, but a levels layer in Photoshop can fix that.The 400mm f/4 DO IS is much lighter than any 400mm f/4 lens with conventional optics. DO lenses have a diffraction element that compensates for the color dispersion of spherical lens elements. It also reduces optical complexity and size.The f/4 speed makes autofocus faster, and allows even better isolation of subjects using narrow depth of field. While bigger and heavier than Canon's 400mm f/5.6L, the f/4 lens is light enough at 4.3 pounds that it's still easy to carry. I've used mine on hikes above 10,000 feet to photograph bighorn sheep.IS definitely makes a difference handheld, and on a tripod below 1/125 second. Canon's 400mm f/5.6L is a non-stabilized lens.I've taken some of my sharpest wildlife images with this lens - you can see every feather in some bird shots. Highly recommended if you can afford one.</review_text>
I do not have take more than one bags. This bag is big enough for everything.</review_text>
Good quality and very configurable. Fits body plus 2-3 lenses easily. Even fits my camera with a telephoto lens attached and a second backup lens</review_text>
My kit includes a Canon D60 DSLR, Tamron 28-75mm f/2.8, Canon EF 100mm f/2.8 macro USM, Sigma 100-300mm f/4, 420 EX Speedlite flash, 4 assorted filters, AAA batteries, 2 extra batteries for the D60 & tripod collar.First few times I tried to fit everything in, my Sigma 100-300 did not find space.  I was about to return this bag, but tonight, decided to give it another try (10th attempt).And surprise, surprise... the best configuration just came to me all of a sudden.  With the Sigma lens on the bottom, stretched out to occupy the width of the bag, the 100mm and the flash fits perfectly on the remaining part of the bag's bottom.  Then, a divider on top, to prevent scratching, place the D60 and the Tamron lens attached on top, and the height of the bag makes it easily possible to fit everything in, and close the hood, without stretching the bag at all.  My 4 filters (jn their think cases go into the front pouch.  The generous side-pockets fit my tripod collar for the 100-300, 2 spare batteries, a new and a box of 12 AAA batteries .... this means my entire kit fits perfectly, without the bag being stretched uncomfortably.I'm glad I gave it this one try</review_text>
I bought this bag to use with my Canon Elura 100 Camcorder.  Camcorder's these days are as small as camera, but I knew I'd need a lot of room for accessories and this bag fit the bill.  I have in this bag right now: Camcorder, 5 MiniDV Tapes, Extra Battery, Head Cleaner, Extra Wide Angle Lens, External Mic, L-Bracket for mounting Mic, Lens Cleaning Kit, Remote Control, All Wires, Lens Filters.  And I still have room for quite a bit more!What I love about this bag is that it's really a BIG bag that doesn't at all feel like a BIG bag - and that's a great thing to me!  The inside is super configurable which is great 'cause you can set it up the way that is best for the accessories you have so that everything fits, but doesn't move around.This same bag cost almost double at Best Buy and other retail stores so it's a steal here at Amazon!  I LOVE it</review_text>
This camera bag is just as I expected.  What was written as a description fits it perfectly.  Nice bag!  Great response time in delivery.  Thanks</review_text>
I have had this bag now for over 9 months and can honestly say it has more then surpassed my expectations. It stores everything I need when out with family or friends to catch all the action in one convenient place.In the center of the bag I have the following:1. Rebel XT body2. Canon 430EX Flash3. 17mm-85mm Lens4. 75mm-300mm Lens5. Sony Handycam Video Recorder6. Power plug for charging Video RecorderOn the sides I store the Battery Chargers and Batteries for Flash, Camera and Video Camera, plus Tapes for the Video Camera. The front holds all the manuals for everything and a few extra Memory Cards and lens covers. Even after this, there is still space in the bag for other things. The bag has held up very well and can see no signs of wear or tear after dragging this bag all over the place for the last 9 months.</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall. Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile.</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer.  Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare.  Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality.  A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light.  The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one.  This hood being a solid petal shaped one and three quarters inch long offers limited protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element.  When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects.  Being so shallow and petal shaped, even this type of protection is limited.  Even if the protection is limited, replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 24-105mm f/4.0L EF and normally comes included with the lens when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position.  This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch.  An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge.  This lens isn't unusually wide so the extra inch may not be a problem.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityReduces lens flare problemsOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the lensHigh price for a molded piece of plasti</review_text>
I enjoy that I can get a closer shot now. Its quality is good. I am happy with the purchas</review_text>
Jim K. made a great review.....I just wanted to let you know that I agree. This is great. It is very light weight. The only reason why I gave it 4 stars is that you need to zoom a bit or else you get a burnout effect (a circle where the corners are dark because it is getting the inside of the lens). That is annoying, and forces you to remove the extender when you want to take closer photos. At a distance though, it is great. Pictures come out great. I highly recommend this.....I would have given it 4.5 stars if it were an option</review_text>
Question: The Canon S2 has only 1 color - silver.  I believe this telephoto converter came in only black, doesn't it look silly to have a silver camera with a long black nose?I was going to get this adaptor but I am holding back because of it's color.   Instead, I am looking to find a adaptor and converter kit that comes in silver instead of black.Although I don't have this converter.  Assuming that I am satisfied with its quality and featuers, I would only give it only 4.5 stars because of it's color.Anyone has any ideas</review_text>
I was surprised at the heft of this tele converter when it arrived. It comes in a pullstring pouch that offers reasonable protection in a camera bag, purse, or other similar carying case and will hold the lens while attached to the required adapter. It also comes with a lens cap for each end. The converter has a high quality look and feel throughout, and as with the lens hood included in the inexpensive adapter kit (required), the mounting threads are cut accurately enough that the lettering on the lens and hood all line up perfectly at the top of the assembly. It looks as I would expect from Canon, which is to say, instrument quality.OK, looks don't make good pictures, so here is the rest of the story. The body is made of tough, lightweight materials (FRP?, polycarbonate?), so what you feel when you take the lens out of the case is the weight of several glass elements. The glass coating is well done, as pictures are nice and contrasty. Flare and distortion are minimal, and on par with a quality SLR offering. The base lens on the S2 is fairly fast, and doesn't suffer from defects at maximum telephoto, so this converter was built to complement that quality, and it does a fine job. As a matter of fact, the converter lens is optimized to supplement only the telephoto portion  of the main camera lens range, At less than moderate telephoto settings, you end up with a view of the back end of the converter lens, and not much else.Used as intended, it gives you the ability to use your 5 mp sensor to take spectacular 650 mm telephoto shots with incredible sharpness, color, and detail. There is no comparison to digital zoom at all. This lens alows you to "reach out and touch someone"  while using every pixel your sensor has available, and without adding eyeball noticable distortion at all. On top of that, the image stabilizer in the camera lets you shoot 650 mm telephoto pictures handheld in reasonable lighting conditions. Check out the price of a 600 mm image stabilized lens for an SLR and get back to me after you recover. Sure, having a $5,000 SLR body/lens combo will win the comparison at a lab bench, and might be a stop faster (only on the high end though), but the S2/teleconverter combo lets you take far better and more creative pics than the classic 35 mm with a mirror tele lens can ever offer. Further cropping the photos on your computer later will simply amaze you. For the price, it's a must have item. It also catches the action on the field in movie mode from the nosebleed seats at the stadium.It is a big lens, and will make your S2 look as though it must be an SLR, but the combination of S2 and teleconverter is light enough (compared to an SLR) to carry all day long in a desert without a problem. It offers the digicam prosumer quality glass reach that used to be reserved for higher end SLR's. For what it adds to your photographic range, it's cheap, too.One suggestion. The lens adapter/lens hood combo you need to mount any of the three converter lenses Canon offers is dirt cheap. The combo sells for around 26 bucks everywhere. The adapter attaches to the camera with a push button release bayonet mount, is quick to change, and feels very secure. The adapter also takes 58 mm filters of all kinds, and I like to keep a UV filter mounted on my camera for the improvement in contrast it offers, and to protect the camera lens from damage (I dropped my S2 this past weekend, and the Hoya UV filter took the fall. It dented, but didn't break). Anyway, because they are so cheap, I suggest getting one for the S2, and each converter lens you buy. That way, you can switch lenses in an instant, and keep the front of each lens protected with it's own UV filter and/or hood. Oh yes. A good circular polorizer filter really kills glare, and brings out contrast with any lens under many typical shooting conditions. The tele-converter lens does not have front threads to mount filters (most don't), but I made an adapter by mounting a 72 mm UV filter to a 7/16" long cardboard masking tape core with an inside diamerter that slipped snugly over the end of the tele-converter. Prior to gluing the UV filter to the tube section, I painted the tube flat black. Now, the circular polorizer (or any other 72 mm filter attaches to the adapter, looks like it belongs there, and works perfectly.I think you will enjoy this converter as much as I do. Good shooting.</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall. Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile.</review_text>
This hood does a more than adequate job at controlling flare on the EF 100mm f/2. Additionally, the hood can provide protection to those who 1) do not adorne their lenses with UV/SKY filters, or 2) do so adorne them! The lens is already a capable performer; it is moreso with the hood. The price is a bit steep, but that does not effect its performance. Thus, my rating stands</review_text>
It's easy to attach -- and detach -- and works well with most (but not all) of my 58mm lens. It does cut down on glare, and let's face it, the hood makes your lens look a bit more dynamic, while also protecting it from the elements</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid conical two inch long offers some protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. There is nothing more irritating than reviewing your images to find dust spots or other flaws. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing or replacing a lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 85 f/1.8 USM EF, 100 f/2.0 USM EF, 135 f/2.8 USM EF, 100-300 f/4.5-5.6 USM EF lenses and normally is not included with the lens when sold new.  Amazon often suggests purchasing one with your lens, and is worth considering.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. Fortunately Canon provides a storage case with the lens that can be used in addition to your camera bag.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the len</review_text>
I bought this hood for Canon's 85mmf1.8 lens, one incredible lens.Years ago I went to a lecture by Ernst Wilde, MR. Hasseblad himself, where he showed the difference that a lens hood would make on a Hasseblad lens.  Since then I have always used them faithfully on every lens I own.  The longer the lens, the more efective the lens hood can be if it is specifically designed for that lens.  This is the hood Canon has for their medium telephoto lenses, the 85f1.8, 100usm macro, and 135mmf2.8 lenses.  The hood will protect your lens from dust, scratches, damage, while at the same time preserving the maximum contrast your lens can deliver.  This differs from a filter, that will take away from the inherit lens sharpness and contrast.  A analogy is wearing a baseball cap which will improve your vision and protect your eyes from cataracts, while not distorting your vision like sunglasses will</review_text>
I bought this hood after reading elsewhere that it fits the 50mm f/1.8 Mark I (the version with the metal mount and distance scale) that I purchased recently.  Canon specs the discontinued ES-65 hood for this lens.  The great thing about this ET-65III is that it is longer, so it blocks more stray light without vignetting on full-frame or 1/6-frame slrs.  The interior on this mark III version is also flocked, providing a bit more light absorption.I've used those collapsible rubber hoods before while in college, but this hood is definitely worth the investment:  well built, fits backward on the lens for storage (but too long while the lens is on the camera), and provides good protection for the front of the lens (it's quite deep).Note that this will NOT fit the newer 50mm f/1.8 Mark II version (all plastic mount with no distance scale)</review_text>
What a great little piece of kit. It's great with my EF 70-200mm f/4L.  The only drawback is you've no AF.  You are forced to use manual focus. Now this isn't a big problem, unless you're photographing wildlife or moving objects.  Well worth the price though and very useful</review_text>
Just received Canon EF 2X II from Adorama. Paid $279.95 plus $17.95 shipping. Len has been previously used and placed back in the pouch and sold as new. Len cap is marred with several scratches. Looks to have been handled rough. My advice is bypass Adorama as a third party vendor and buy directly from Amazon. Adorama refunds within 14 days less shipping. Thats $17.95 for me to return a used product sold as new. Won't go there again</review_text>
This high quality extender is a great addition to my Canon EF 70-200 L f/4 !! With a top-notch build quality and a tough, weather resistant design equal to that of their highly respected line of &quot;L&quot; lenses, Canon has produced a great product for its unbeatable zoom lens !! Although the 2X extender renders the A/F function useless on many Canon cameras, I found this to be a Very small drawback overall ( I prefer to manually focus under many of my shooting conditions). This extender is more suited for a low f/number lens due to the 2-stop change in brightness, but it is still VERY effective with my f/4 in normal lighting. A lightweight and fairly inexpensive way to double your focal length, while maintaining the incredible optical quality of the main lens...My backpack will always contain my 2X and 1.4X extenders !</review_text>
The POWER-2000 XP-333 charges batteries in pairs, with one LED per pair, not as described.  The XP-555 charges each battery independently and slightly faster (3 vs 4 hours).  The XP-333 charger is very lightweight, the XP-555 is slightly heavier.   They work on 110 or 220 V and includes plug adaptors for round European type plugs.  I have used the XP-333 in the USA and overseas.  POWER-2000 makes several other charger models as well.The XP-333 and 555 AAs are 2500 mAh, and there are XP-33327 and XP-55527 versions now available with 2700 mAh batteries.  AAA batteries charge faster as they hold less charge.  AAAs from Power-2000 currently come in 850 and 1000 mAh capacities.I believe that these capacities for AA and AAA from POWER-2000 and other NiMH makers are twice as great or maybe more than alkalines.  As I recall, some years ago Duracell copper top AAs have 1100 mAh.  I have not found recent figures on the web, but got the old figure by calling the 800 number on the Duracell packages.  Duracell Ultras appear to have a bit higher mAh figure, but I do not know that that is.The 1.2 V for NiMH vs 1.5 V for alkalines seems to make no practical difference as I am told, and I believe it is correct, that alkaline voltage drops rapidly under 1.5 V after initial use while I understand that the NiMH holds its 1.2 V value for some time.</review_text>
The Kodak PH160 Media Cartridge Kit is the best bargain around! You get 4 cartridges plus paper in each pack. I have used more paper than ink! Thank you Kodak for such a money saving kit</review_text>
Very convenient.  Easy to use.  Paper and cartridge matched up for quantities is a smart idea.  Sometimes the printer jams but easy to clear.I find the colors a bit dark and skin tones not balanced to be the most attractive.  If they can work on these items this would be a fantastic device and I would probably keep several for office, home, garage, travel...and use a lot of media cartridges too.I am one of those that takes 800-1000 pictures on a two week vacation so I really would use the heck out of these cartridges if the image quality were better.  I usually make 3 or 4 copies of each print to mail to friends that are in the pictures</review_text>
I find these PH160 packages of toner cartridges and photo paper to be the best deal for me.  I take a LOT of pictures and print them off to send as postcards to friends all over the USA.  This way I have plenty of the photo paper on hand and a good supply of the toner cartridges and don't have to constantly run to the store to buy a single toner cartridge and package of photo paper.  I do wish however that you could just buy the toner cartridges without the photo paper as I always have more paper than what I can use with the number of toner cartridges</review_text>
This product works really well, and the price was great.  I am always pleased with the quality of Kodak</review_text>
We love this product.Took me minutes to hook up. So easy to use. I understand total cost of printing is few Cents more than what you can get in Costco.But.its the ease of use AT HOME!Specially if U have guests at home....and you wanna give instant photos...hmm....Cosco/Walmart....going on a Christmas day.....I dont think so!!!!My guests love it....when we give them photos....right after the party!Everybody gets a kick out of it!Amazon.....GOOG SERVICE!ON TIME!!!N</review_text>
I can't believe how advanced things have become.  The quality of the pictures that are printed on the Kodak Easy share media cartridge.</review_text>
Kodak has made printing pictues as simple as 123.  The paper cartridge snaps in place quite easily.  It can be removed quickly and stored out of the way because the paper is protected in its own tray with convenient lid.  This is high quality paper and has a protective coating that is applied to the photo to give it many years of durability.  I thought the price was competative with other methods of printing with photo paper</review_text>
I won the Kodak printer at a scrapbook convention & then went on the hunt to find the refills at a reasonable price. Purchasing the 160 count made the price per print the lowest & beat out anything I could find in the local stores. It is a great convenience to be able to whip out a 4x6 print instead of having to download it to a store's website, wait a few days, go there & pick it up, etc. Great value</review_text>
I love this product, because I love the camera and the printing dock.  I have been using them for 2 years.  My daughter-in -law and son got theirs a little earlier because of the arrival of their first child.  I saw it and had to have one of these marvelous things that I could do by myself at home.  I think she discovered your site and that you sold the product.  We have both purchased from you a few times. Thanks for the reasonable film prices that have allowed me to take more pictures and copy for my friends and relatives</review_text>
The Digital Rebel is the most amazing camera i've ever owned. My previous camera was a Canon A90 and I loved using all the features on it [great camera!]. I decided recently that maybe I should graduate to a SLR because I was starting to get more creative with my photography. I spent a great deal of time researching cameras and finally decided on the Digital Rebel. After a few months of owning it I still am amazed. The image quality is fantastic, it's quick and responsive, and every day using it I learn a little more. It's the perfect intro SLR camera for me because everything makes sense and it's easy to learn. I've gotten amazing shots that I could never dream of getting with a point and shoot.If you are finding yourself wanting a little more than a point and shoot, go for this camera, you wont be sorry.</review_text>
I purchased this camera a year ago (summer 05).  Definitely a great upgrade over the original rebel, although the new xti has a larger screen which is the one aspect of this camera that is not perfect.  There are other sites that will perform more comprehensive reviews of this camera, but after a year mine is still working perfectly</review_text>
I almost didn't buy this camera simply because of the plastic body (I'm used to a Praktica MTL3 film camera, which is built like a tank).  However, I'm glad I overlooked that because the camera is top-notch in terms of robust features and the quality it provides.  Startup time is very quick and making adjustments to shutter speed and aperture is intuitive.If you get the bundle with the kit lens, I highly recommend complimenting it with the very affordable Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens, especially if you are a big fan of DOF and do a lot of available-light / low-light photography.</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
When I bought this camera the sales people tried to get me to buy another battery.  They said the one that came with it would only be good for about 20 minutes.  Now I have bought alot of items in my lifetime, a 20 min battery on a camera just doesnt seem like a very good "business" choice.  So I said no.  So I got the camera, charged the battery until the light went green (which sucked because I wanted to play with it right when i got it) and started taking pictures (oh I also got a 2G CF) worked great....so I planned to go up a mountain and take soem scenery shots.  Keeping in mind what the sales person had told me I pocketed the charger just incase.  Well, 6000', 300 pictures, and 5 hours later the camera is still running strong, still have 200 shots left for the trip home, battery life indicator hasnt budged off of the full button.  So all in all, I think the battery life is great, now i can see if your taking say thousands of pictures all in a row you may need another but for just going on a trip and shooting a few pictures at every stop point, the original will work fine.  as for the quality of photos.....i love them</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
It's not the best looking remote you'll ever find but the design is made practical to fit the strap. You'll never lose this remote and it works like a charm</review_text>
I decided to get this after buying the Rebel XTi and already owning the Rebel XT (this works with both.)  I already had the corded shutter release which was nice when doing long exposures or macro work where even a little camera shake can make a huge difference.  But this goes to a new level, you can set the camera up get everything in focus and then step back and take as many shots as you want without any risk of touching the camera.  Make sure to cover the eyepiece when using this so stray light doesn't ruin your exposure.  This is also handy when you want to take pictures with you in them.  I have even used it with two cameras at once to get multiple angles of the same shot.  I am thinking about setting up a blind and setting up the camera on a tripod to try to get some close up pictures of wildlife that would not be possible otherwise.  Basically if you ever have a need to take pictures without holding the camera this is your solution</review_text>
I bought the remote control so that I could trip the shutter while my camera was on a tripod.  Mostly landscape stuff.  It works great for my intended use.  The only minor problem is that you have to point the remote control at the front of the camera.  I have found that it works fine if I hold the remote in front of, and below the lens (out of view of the lens)</review_text>
My photography does not have much call for a wireless remote but this was too easy to pass up.  It delivered as advertised and I am finding that I am using it in place of a wired remote for ultra close up and low light photagraphy when using a tripod.  It is very small so it is easy to pack away anywhere</review_text>
good remote.  Can be finnicky at times if not lined up correctly with the camera</review_text>
I bought this remote for canon digital rebel XT. Pretty much programs itself. Great asset that it clips to camera strap. Works from good distance. Highly recommen</review_text>
I like using a tripod with my long zoom lens, and this device has really added to my hobby.  The remote is perfect for taking pictures of birds in my birdbath and squirrels and other critters in my yard.  I personally don't like cables, I don't like dealing with them.  This is just right for my purposes.The remote is also better for taking pics of people.  It is much better than a timer in my opinion since I can move people in and out easier and more efficiently, taking pictures more quickly.  This gives me so much more control than using a timer.</review_text>
Got it. worked as per described. value for money. works both from front and behind for rabel XT(somebody wrote here it doesn't work from the back side of the camera)</review_text>
I am lifelong photographer and I purchased this camera in January. I have taken it on several major trips. It is an wonderful performer. I have many 11x14 enlargements that I have received terrific feedback on. The quality of this camera and the Cannon optics will not disappoint. The price is right now that the replacement is out.</review_text>
Wonderful camera. Very flexiable, very versitile. Can be the most wonderful creation device in someone whom is capable. Def a good buy now that the 30D is out.I've had this camera for over a year and I STILL love it</review_text>
Excellent Camera with high end capabilities. Easy to use and intuitive system controls</review_text>
I am just a hobbyist.  This was a big purchase and a big step for me to get into this level of camera.  I still haven't mastered using it yet, and I've had it for a few months.It does a wonderful job of taking pictures.  If you have the right lenses, it can take some of the most beautiful pictures you've ever seen.  Again, I'm just a hobbyist/enthusiast.  I use it to take pictures for work, too.I highly recommend getting a couple of VERY good lenses to go with it.  Don't go with the cheap lenses that Canon, Tamron, Sigma, etc. make for this camera.  Do yourself a favor and get a nice zoom - spend some bucks.  You'll be happy you did.The camera itself is pretty easy to use if you leave it on auto, but that's like buying a race car and never shifting out of first gear.  The auto settings are great, and they do a wonderful job, but you can do so much more if you learn to use the camera in Manual, Av, Tv, or P mode.  It allows you so much more creativity that you'll be amazed at the difference.The 30D came out right before I bought the 20D, and I would probably buy it for the price now, but I'm very happy with my 20D</review_text>
This camera is really great.  I knew I liked it before, but I immediately began to appreciate this camera all the more when I ended up with a Rebel XT as a "loaner" while my 20d was in repair.Not that the XT is a bad camera, it just doesn't really compare to the 20d.The 20d has a nice feel to it; it is fairly large, which is great since I have somewhat large hands.  The features are great too.  And the image quality is awesome.  I don't really need to go into all of the details, as most of the other reviewers have done an excellent job.  Let me just say that it is a great camera and is worth the five stars.The only complaint I have about the camera is that it doesn't have spot metering.  The ability to do your light metering off of a single point of interest would be great - and they did add it to the 30d.</review_text>
Impressive feature list wih affordable price, for the serious ameteur. i've been using the 20D with 18-55, 50mm 1.8, 35-80, 80-200 and 500/1000mm lenses. i am not disappointed. i am planning to upgrade to the L series lenses but slowly.i do not mean to be over entusiastic about canon, but i am yet to see a Nikon camera with the same specs at the same or ever a near equal price. i've got the FM10 for film photography. i love both my cameras.Impressive features include:Mirror lockupISO 3200 with noise reduction18 custom functionsaccepts the entire series of canon lens.heavy metal body (no cheap plastic feel</review_text>
This camera is amazing, I couldn't have asked for more. Just be warned that the manual is pretty terrible. It's best to just play around with the camera until you figure it out, rather than wasting time trying to decipher the manual</review_text>
My kids are in competitive Tae Kwon Do. I have now used the camera my wife gave me one year ago at several tournaments. It is able to stop action and take great shots even in low lighting. Now, we tried it when we went skiing and it also worked great in the glare conditions of the snow. I bought a monopod that worked real well to stabalize and I use software called PhotoFinale to crop and share the photos.One year into the usage I am still looking forward to each chance I get to play with this "toy".Next options: battery grip, flash diffuser, extra remote flash..</review_text>
I bought this camera about 2 months before my son was born.  I knew little about Digital SLRs, but after research I found that this was the one for me.  This camera is well constructed and durable.  The pictures are excellent.  I have blown a few of my pictures up to 11X17 without any problem.  Also, if you are going to be doing any editing of photos on your computer, this camera would be great.  I would recommend purchasing the newest version of Photoshop or Photoshop elements (when I bought mine it only came with Elements 2.0 and 3.0 was already on the market).  Also, if you want your pictures to turn out, you MUST purchase a larger flash.  The onboard flash is weak, will leave shadows and it does not allow you to do any type of "bounce" flash.  On the whole, this is the best camera I have ever had in my life and it would be great for anyone who has previous experience with SLR cameras.</review_text>
This is my first L lens.  As an amateur, this really makes you see the difference in lenses.  I use this as a general lens and have basically put away the lens that came in the kit.  I am also planning to purchase the 100-400mm IS for better wildlife and family sports photography.  Wish it came with a better lens hood.</review_text>
The walkaround lens. This very topic leads to a heated discussion among DSLR photographers.First, determine your budget, focal length, and aperture needs.If you frequently find yourself zooming out to get everything in a frame, you will want a wide angle lens such as this. If you frequently find yourself zooming in, this is not the lens for you. On a full frame body such as Canon EOS 5D, this lens becomes ULTRA wide angle. On an APS-C crop body such as Digital Rebel XTi (which I used for this review), it becomes MEDIUM wide angle. But thanks to 1.6x crop factor, this lens expands to more usable 35mm equivalent focal length of 27 to 64mm.Second, audition the lens if you can.By definition, a walkaround lens should be relatively portable. At 1.1 lbs., Canon's EF 17-40mm f/4L USM is neither super light nor neck breakingly heavy. In fact, it weighs almost the same as Digital Rebel XTi -- really nice balance. The lens feels very solid with supreme build quality that only L-series lenses offer. Although this lens is weather proof and therefore sealed against liquid and dust, I strongly recommend getting a 77mm filter to protect the front lens element. With it, this lens is made to last.In terms of looks and feel, it doesn't get much better. Its rubberized full-time inner focus manual ring USM focuses smoothly, quietly, and quickly. Since it's inner focus, the lens will not extend beyond its metal casing whether you zoom in or out. The focus window shows focusing distance from 0.28 meter (0.92 feet) to infinity. The focal length marker indicates 17, 20, 24, 28, 35, and 40mm. The lens exudes quality from tip to tip.You may tolerate heavier lens or may not mind lesser build quality of cheaper lenses.  A walkaround lens will be used very often, so make sure you will be comfortable with it.This lens is famous for saturated color and deep contrast. Its images are simply stunning. At 17mm wide angle, barrel distortion is noticeable but relatively mild. From 24mm to 40mm, its images are distortion free and perfectly suited at capturing people.Vignetting (corner darkness) is minimal with mild chroma abberrations (color shadows). At f/4 aperture, details become noticeably softer toward the edges. The center region is very sharp and at f/5.6, edges remain fairy sharp. Thanks to 7 diaphragm blades, this lens can produce very nice bokeh at 40mm (blur effects).One of the most cited weaknesses is the f/4 aperture. In my experience, a bump in the ISO speed and steady hands are all you need to take well focused images indoor. On the other hand, if you are shooting with very little amount of light, you might wish for f/2.8 or image stabilizer. Although the difference between f/4 and f/2.8 is just 1 stop, my other lens, Canon EF 24-70mm f/2.8L USM (too heavy to be my walkaround lens) easily outperforms in such challenging situations. But by and large, I was not handicapped by the f/4 aperture.Some of the main competitions (sorted by price):- Sigma 18-50mm f/2.8 EX DC: Arguably the best wide angle lens for limited budget. The focus mechanism is a bit slow, corner is very soft, chroma abberrations can be a bit of an issue, and the lens is highly prone to flare. Works only with EF-S mount.- Sigma AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC macro: A bit more expensive than Sigma 18-50mm, but has wider focal range with macro capability.- Canon EF-S 17-85mm f/4-5.6 IS USM: This "traveler's lens" has a wider focal range than most wide angle lenses (widest among Canon) and is equipped with an image stabilizer. But the lens is famous for extreme barrel distortion at 17mm and chroma abberrations. Works only with EF-S mount.- Tamron SP AF 17-50mm f/2.8 Di II LD Aspherical (IF): This is the most direct competitor. It takes sharper images with faster aperture while costing less. Both the build and focus mechanism are significantly worse, but should be good enough for many. Works only with EF-S mount.- Canon EF-S 17-55mm f/2.8 IS USM: This is THE reference, if you can afford it. Its images have razor sharp details and great performance all around (minus vignetting, which is typical of EF-S lenses). The build quality is worse than L-series but not too shabby. Works only with EF-S mount. This is the best EF-S lens hands down.- Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L USM: One of the most expensive wide angle zoom lenses. It's larger and heavier, but has f/2.8 aperture.This is how Canon EF 17-40mm f/4 USM stacks up.Pros:- Among the very best build quality.- Excellent, buttery smooth, super fast front-focus system.- Top notch color and contrast. Very sharp center resolution.- Almost non-existent vignetting, generally low distortion, and well controlled chroma abberrations.- Ideal weight and size for walkaround purposeCons:- Edge softness at f/4 aperture.- Narrower focal length than most competing lenses.- Slower than some third party lenses.All in all, this is an excellent wide angle walkaround lens. It may not offer the most bang for the buck, but if you value full frame compatibility (EF lens mount) and excellent build quality, this is the default choice. This lens comes with a nice pouch and a lens hood. I find the hood to be somewhat ridiculously shaped and because the lens is resistant to flare, I do not use it often when shooting outdoor</review_text>
This is a great lens.  I use it on full-frame film and digital SLRs, and love getting ultrawide shots.  However, if you have the cash, you'll probably be happier with the 16-35/2.8 lens, as f4 can be pretty slow indoors</review_text>
This lens produces magical images.  I am stunned by its sharpness, contrast and color saturation.  Simply amazing!  This is a great option as a standard zoom for APS-C cameras and a great wide-angle option for full-frame.For APS-C ussers, I have sold my EF-S 17-85 IS USM because this is just miles better.  I simply love this lens!  I am now so sold on the difference an L makes, that I have also sold my telephoto lens for a 70-200 f4 L.I believe this is a great investment because:* Canon lenses lose very little of their value* Should Canon abandon the APS-C sized sensor for full-frame 35mm, then the EF lens range will make your kit far more future-proof* Once the initial sting of the price has receded, you will never regret the quality of the images you take with this lensJust try it - it's awesome!Some reviewers call this a slow lens - I would disagree.  Many zooms are f3.5-5.6, or perhaps f3.5-4.5 in the pro-sumer range.  There is virtually nothing between f3.5 and f4, and a constant f-stop is an advantage.  f4 is not fast, but it's certainly not slow, either</review_text>
I am really glad that I bought this lens. It comes with hood which can be reversed when not in use so it is very useful. Leather pouch, front cap, and back cap is included. Focusing is super fast with USM.</review_text>
Having owned the distortion-prone Nikkor AFS 17-35 f2.8D for six years, it was time to switch over to Canon's EF 17-40 mm f4L USM.  Canon's version was over a $1000 cheaper, optically superior and lighter in weight.  For me, an outstanding standard lens when coupled with the Canon 5D.Vignetting at f4 is minimal.  Adobe Photoshop CS2's vignetting tool can correct the vignetting.Distortion at 17mm is minimal.  Less than Canon's EF 16-35 mm f2.8L USM set at 16 mm.With the 5D pointed at a blue sky, the EF 17-40 hunted for a focus point while the EF 16-35 didn't.Flaring is minimal when compared to the EF 16-35.Portraits taken at 40 mm produced better results than the EF 16-35 and AFS 17-35 at 35 mm.Images produced at f4 are sharp.  At f8, the images are very sharp.This lens is a definite keeper.</review_text>
This is a magnificent lens deserving of high praise. In general, I tend to shoot "available light" and towards wide angle, and EF 17-40 F4L is one perfect lens for someone like me. On an APS size sensor camera (mine is Rebel XT), it works approximately like a 28-70 mm zoom--a perfect walk-around lens, giving you decent wide angle and at the tele end, a pleasing perspective on faces you expect from a moderate telephoto. I spent two weeks with EF 17-40 on the coast shooting nature and street stuff in small towns. It performed perfectly. But I only realized what a real treasure I have when I began having second thoughts about it on the eve of a long overseas journey. I asked myself whether I would not have done better buying EF-S 17-85 F4-5.6 IS. After all, it gives you better reach - an equivalent of 28-135 mm zoom on a 35 mm camera. Would it not be a perfect lens on an overseas trip? A dilemma worhty of Hamlet. So I decided to order it from Amazon while I still had time to return EF 17-40. As soon as EF-S 17-85 came, I did some tests taking pictures of still life, flowers and a portrait at similar focal lengths and at full zoom. The results put 17-85 to shame. Color and light were flat and paled next to 17-40. But there was still the problem of reach. I took a portrait at full zoom of the same person (40 mm or 65 mm equivalent and 85 mm or 135 equivalent), cut out the critical focus area from both pix and equalized the two crops in terms of pixel numbers. Unprocessed, 17-85 produced a perfectly focused picture, the 17-40 crop was visibly softer, but in terms of tonality and richness of gradations, it was way ahead of its rival. Photoshop to the rescue! After I fiddled with sharpening and contrast in CS2, the focus softness in 17-40 was gone, and the result was a better all-around picture of the same portrait detail. In other words, if you wish to take a picture, say, of a building's detail or a monkey mug shot in a zoo--a situation calling for a telephoto of 135 mm that 17-85 is capable of--EF 17-40 F4 can do the job, in fact a better job in terms of textures and tonality--and focus, too, if you do a little post-processing in SC2. I am returning EF-S 17-85 and will stick with EF 17-40, taking it on my overseas trip. Unlike EF-S 17-85 F4-5.6, which is a feels like a decent consumer zoom,  EF 17-40 F4L is built like a tank and has weather sealing. It should also come in handy if and when I decide to switch to a full-frame camera (EF-S lenses work only with the APS-size sensors).</review_text>
I also have the SB-600 and this product, the SB-800, is much better - and worth the extra $100. It is much easier to use since it has a simple menu structure and not the wierd button combo selections of the SB-600. The flash output is better, the recycle time is better and you can use the flash as a commander for other wireless flashes. Also the extra battery holder for a fifth battery reduces recycle time further and never comes off my unit. The diffusion head is also included so you don't have to buy a separate one from Stofen... works great</review_text>
I purchased this Speedlight for my D70s. It is easy to take out of the box and fire up. But it's capable of a lot more than your standard portraiture and vacation shots.I have been using this unit for in-store photography and it's worked wonders. The included filters help balance out the horrific fluorescent lighting found in most stores. While it's highly intuitive, I can also control it's output.This is an essential part of any Nikon package</review_text>
I would not be able to imagine shooting without the SB-800, it's just so integral to my photography. My only gripe is the TTL preflashes which can cause some people to blink of half-blink by the time the main flash goes off. But you can easily get around this by using FV lock.Fill flash is perhaps the most excellent function of the SB-800. I usually stop it down about by -1.3EV to -1.7EV to get imperceptable results</review_text>
Nikon designed this unit to exploit the possibilities of their latest digital SLRs while still being compatble with their oldest F-series cameras.  The SB-800 is more expensive than the SB-600, but it gives you more control and more light.  You may find more light to be critical if you want to use bounce flash to soften shadows.I would have given the SB-800 five stars if the user manual had been a little better.  Nikon obviously tried very hard to provide good documentation, and to make the user interface as intuitive as possible.  But, a unit with so many features and modes inevitably will require effort to learn, and will present cases where you are working against the built in automation.  Expect to make a large number of experimental shots if you really want to learn how to use this unit.My chief plea to Nikon would be for a more straight forward explanation that cameras like the D50 DO NOT HAVE TTL FLASH.  The so called i-TTL uses pre flashes and computation to set up a calculated flash rather than a real time measurement during the exposure to quench the flash.  One would normally expect the same result, but not if a slave flash is used.One of the beauties of the SB-800, however, is that it can be used as a slave unit using its own sensor to determine when the master unit is firing, even if (as in the case of a D50 using its built in flash) the camera and the SB-800 are not communicating i-TTL info via IR pulses</review_text>
Here is my point. When you buy a digital SLR, most likely in a couple years there will a newer model available with some better features for the same price. But lenses as well as flashes a not changing that fast and keep value much longer. So from a purely financial prospective, it's always better to invest more in the long lasting lenses and flashes and less in the DSLR body.Another point. Most people don't need all advanced feature of the modern flashes and can probably easily survive without them. But also almost everyone sooner or later finds him/herself in a situation, when the place is just too dark and too big. So it's more likely you'll need just more raw power then any of the advanced features.So the bottom line, since a general purpose flash is usually a long term investment, if you have a choice, try to get the most powerful one</review_text>
Bought it together with the D50, 6 month ago.Simply the best choice for digital Nikon SLR, superior compared to the high-end flashes for the analog Nikon cameras.Within a range of up to 60feet this flash will brighten very smooth, no red eyes, the press will focus perfectly.But you need the 5th battery, and you better spent the money for high-end batteries, don't use "consumer-type" rechargeable ones. They will last for a very short time only, not enough to fill a 1GB card!</review_text>
For those of you who have the D200 and are wondering if you need this flash consider this.That with the D200's  built in flash acting as commander you can use the SB800 off camera. Just set it up on it's included stand and coordinate the flash and the camera conrols and you now have the ability to capture portraits that look professional.  Set it up behind your subject, off to the side, angle bounce for anywhere.I am sure you get the idea.Just one more reason why the Nikon is a great value. Think about what it would cost you to have similiar capability with your Canon.This flash may seem high priced but it is the most sophisticated unit on the market in my opinion.Good luck!</review_text>
I do have to say, being a semi-pro photographer, this one item has made a vast difference in many of my shots.  It has allowed me to get studio like shots (to an extent) without having to use those giant studio flashes that cost thousands of dollars.  I was able to just set up a few hot lights and use the SB-800 off camera thanks to that amazingly wonderfull wireless feature and got great quality shots for what I needed to do.  Also, being a concert photographer, in low light areas this works great especially since most tour managers don't take to highly of Flash use, it allows me to be farther back and get a great shot since I know have a little more fill light to work with.  The SB-800 I do have to say is by far one of the few products that you won't regret paying a high price for. I had originally thought of getting the 600 and decided to go all out and get the 800 after reading all the featuers it has that the SB-600 doesnt.  This product, coupled with my D70 and DR-6 right angle viewfinder (another great investment you should all look into) give me so many great shots, I do have to say the only design flaw about the SB-800 is that I can't use the DR-6 while the flash is on the camera unless I buy a bracketing system. Most of the time though, When I am useing the DR-6 I am at an angle where the pop-up works just fine but there have been a few times that I wish I could use the 800 as well.  So for those who are unsure between this and the SB-600, go with this product.  Now all I have to do is find a better lens then my Sigma 28-300 and I am all set.  Anyone know where to find a good deal on the 18-200mm Nikor Lens? If so someone (if there is a way) please email or contact me I have a myspace search my companyHope this helps at least one personBradPremier Image</review_text>
Just bought my first SLR (D50) and my first external flash (SB-800 AF).  I didn't know what to expect, but I was amazed!  I could take the flash into a very dark (mostly candle lit) and large (40'x65') room and take a shot that looked like daylight.  As far as the speed, its amazing - I can shoot off 12 shots in continuous mode on my camera and the flash will keep up (sometimes it will miss a shot or two - still trying to figure that one out).  So far, I couldn't be more pleased</review_text>
Nice intermediate level flash, works great within its perameters</review_text>
I'm an amateur photographer, with mediocre skills. This flash makes all my photos look better vs the built-in, with little to no intervention on my part.I use it with a Digital Rebel. I like that the flash varies in intensity, depending on ambient.  Time between flashes is reasonably quick (particularly when ambient doesn't require a full flash).  To avoid washed out faces, I'd always gotten accustomed to bouncing the flash off walls/ceiling (on my old camera setup).  I've learned that I don't need to do that with the 420EX, and almost always keep it directly pointed at subjects (unless I'm trying to purposely create shadows across people's faces).I also seem to get much less redeye vs built in</review_text>
I bought this flash hoping to improve my indoor pictures with my Rebel XT.  Amazingly, I find absolutely no difference between using the built in flash of the camera or this unit.  I find pictures taken at a very reasonable distance (8-10 feet) to be under-exposed unless I correct the exposure using the menu.  Would be curious if the more expensive units including the 430EX are better, but I cannot recommend this one</review_text>
All my life I have seen myself and especially babies for some reason be a victim of redeye.  I bought this right before my son was born and have taken nothing but beautiful pictures ever since and haven't had a single red eye no matter how light someone's eyes are.Another great benefit/feature is to be able to bounce the flash off of the ceiling or wall to avoid ghost face (to go along with the devil eye)  It takes BEAUTIFUL pictures even in dimly lit rooms without a smidge of graininess.  (see one of the two pictures of my son indoors in the customer images for this product)  We use this with the Canon digital Rebel XT</review_text>
This flash is working great for me. It has an amazing recycle time. I have been able to easily fire off multiple shots indoors in low light without missing a beat. I have also used it in a completely dark room, and all worked great. I don't like the locks on the bounce head, it is necessary to press the release on the side prior to tilting. Just a minor annoyance</review_text>
First off, this lens works wonderfully with Canon's 20D, 30D and 5D. The image stabilization gives the photographer a serious edge. In my experience, when the IS is active, I'm able to shoot at a much lower speed, without having any blurring. Throughout the range of the lens, image sharpness is excellent, although a little soft when you zoom near 300. Otherwise, from 75 to 280 aprox. image quality is astonishing. I have shot at weddings, sport events, low-light conditions and very in cold climate conditions and the lens performed flawlessly. The ability of focussing manually is a plus. Automatic focus is always accurate. Just a few times in more than 3000 shots has the lens slowed a bit when focusing, but I must say that the objets were moving. The weight of the lens is ok, not too heavy, construction seems according to Canon standards. When shooting in particular situations, the silent USM mechanism is really a welcome feature. Overall, a very nice lens for the serious and amateur photographer</review_text>
I get frustrated by all the negative reviews this lens gets on the web. Yes, the AF is slow and the IS is first generation. Yes, it's not totally sharp and it's slow at the long end. But what other $440 (inc shipping) 300mm lenses with IS is there?* The DO costs $1100 and is shorter but heavier and the optics are not much better.* The 100-400L costs $1400, is much larger and just as slow.* The 70-200/4L is 50% more expensive, only 200mm and lacks IS.* The new 70-300 IS that replaces this lens will probably be a better lens than this version but it costs 50% more and currently (Oct 05) is still not available in the US.The 75-300mm IS is my zoo lens so I don't use it nearly as much as my standard zoom for everyday photography. On my Digital Rebel with its 1.6x crop factor this lens is the equivalent of 120-480mm in 35mm terms, and with the image stabilization feature it makes for some exotic optics. Play to this lens' strengths (middle of the aperture range [don't be afraid of higher ISO settings to achieve this] and not the extreme long end) and your images will be able to be printed at 8x10 without an issue.You're not going to be able to easily track a speeding cheetah with this lens but that is not what this lens is for. It's also unfair to compare this lens to L series alternatives - if you can afford L series lenses then use them but don't cut those of us down without your disposable income just for enjoying this lens. If you own this lens and you want to improve the quality of your images remember to always use a lens hood. Also, the IS is amazing but there are limits; a monopod will improve image sharpness no end. But both these tips apply equally to most lenses both cheaper and more expensive.This lens has earned a permanent place in my camera bag. It's cheap enough and light enough to carry just in case you might need a strong telephoto. The IS really works and is really useful on a telephoto with this kind of zoom range. Don't be put off or intimidated by lens snobs and line counters. This lens also holds its value well; buy it, and use it, now while you're saving for your L dream telephoto and you will be able to sell it for not much less than you paid for it when the time comes to upgrade. When that time comes you just might decide that you want to keep the 75-300mm IS around as well. This lens is great value and very useable even if it is not a great lens.</review_text>
Yes due to be released in Sept 05 is an updated NEW version of this lens. It will be a 70-300mm f/4-5.6 lens with a new IS set up which can be viewed at the Canon Website. The Canon item number is 0345B002. The MSRP of the NEW VERSION LENS is $649.99I have the older version 75-300mm III USM w/out IS and I have had nothing but good things to say about that lens! (I only paid $189.99 for it) Can't wait for this new version to come out</review_text>
For anyone considering this lens, according to Canon's site, there will be a newer model to supersede this one which will out perform it. Item # 0345B002 will be a 70-300mm f/4-5.6 IS USM lens available at sometime in 9/05</review_text>
This lens has gotten some bad reviews, I think, partly because it is starting to show it's age.  This was the first USM IS lens, and the technology has REALLY grown since then.  If Canon were to come along with an updated 75-300 USM IS lens, man, it would blow everything away.That being said, yes, this lens IS a little slow to focus.  But, if you are not using it for work like one of the professional sports photographers you see on the sidelines at baseball games, you should be okay.  It also could use an extra stop (or two, or three!) because when you are handholding, you need that aperture to be as open as it can be.All of this aside, I really have gotten some gems of pictures out of this lens.  It lets you get as closer then you possibly could hope for.  If you have asteady hand and plently of availible light, you can get some really nice shots.  If you are in a low light situation... you will need a tripod.  The IS of lens works... pretty good, but I have had a number of ever so slightly blurry pictures that wouldn't have been had there been some more aperature room to play with.All in all, its a good starter telephoto lens, especially for digital SLRS since it really extends the zoom on those.  Its great for the price, and when you decide to upgrade to one of those white canon L beauties, just sell it</review_text>
I cannot help but giggle when I saw comments like "great lens for the money". It is selling for $440 at here, even on so-called clearance. However, one can easily find the same lens at least $50 cheaper at some decent online camera store, such as B&H, ritz camera, etc. Sad Amazon..</review_text>
Owned 2 weeks:The only thing to cause me to stop short of 5 stars is the weight of the lens. Stabilization is great and worth every dime. Don't even think about the other 75-300mm non-IS version, it is junk - I tried it.  You can hand hold this lens at 300 mm at 1/60!!  No kidding.  Focus is fast and accurate with my Digital Rebel - almost no hunting like on the other 75-300mm.  You *must* get a skylight filter to protect the front element.I'll update this review after a few months' use.</review_text>
First of all it took me a few months to decide on what lens to buy because I did so much research. My choices were between Canon 70-200L 4, 70-200L 2.8 and the 70-200L 2.8IS. After much investigation I opted not to buy the 4.0 because I knew that I would be shooting in dim lights and needed the 2.8. So to save money I bought the 2.8 NON IS. The lens is great and I travelled to Utah with it. All was great until I tried to shoot a deer at full zoom. Every one came out blurry and could not use. Apart from that it is a fantastic lens. As a result I decided to fork out for the 2.8 IS lens and it is amaizing. It has the same optics as the non IS but handheld the IS really works great. Like on some of the reviews it does not make every shot in focus but certainly most of them and the picture quality is amaizing. Fast focus, great colours. Fantastic. If you can afford it buy it and the IS is def worth it because the lens is heavy and you do shake a bit, which is noticeable at full or close to full zoom. Hope this helps</review_text>
I shoot with a Canon 20D and have used the Canon EF 75-300mm f/4.5-5.6 III USM lens. I've always noticed the limitations of this lens when shooting amateur softball. I reviewed the lens lineup at the Canon website and decided on the Canon EF 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L USM Lens. The 100-400mm is a great lens, but it can be a bit soft.  For that reason I decided to add the Canon EF 70-200mm 2.8/f IS USM telephoto zoom lens to my lens collection.Being an L lens, there are numerous features and its manufactured with high quality materials and a higher level of dust and moisture resistance compared to the standard line of lenses. This is a pro quality lens meant for serious photographers. The construction is sturdy and consists of 23 elements in 18 groups.  The four Super UD-glass elements largely eliminate the secondary spectrum reducing residual chromatic aberration. An improved 8-blade circular aperture offers a more pleasing out-of-focus image.  The Canon EF 70-200mm lens weighs in at about 3.24 lbs/1,470 g, and accepts 77mm filters with a minimal focusing distance of 4.3 ft/1.3 m.  This lens is compatible with the extenders 1.4x II and 2x II.  Be sure to get a good quality UV haze filter to protect the front lens element.Being white, this lens looks a bit strange, but helps keep it stay cool when shooting in the sun. Some people are concerned that being white, it attracts attention to criminals. From my experience, my 20D attracts attention regardless of what lens I put on it. In addition, I most likely have a camera bag and tripod/monopod with me to further attract attention.  I personally doubt a thief looking for something to steal is taking the time to evaluate the cost of the item and are more concerned with the ease of taking something they can unload. I try to make things difficult for would be thieves and have insurance as a back up.The dual IS system has two modes. Mode 1 is for stationary subjects while mode two is for moving subjects. It is recommended that the IS function is not used on a tripod; however I have used it on my monopod with success. The IS helps to eliminate camera shake and helps stabilize the lens when shooting from a moving vehicle. While there are limitations to what the IS can do, it can give you a few extra stops. Just keep in mind, the IS attempts to eliminate camera movement, not the movement of the subject being photographed.This lens permits for auto or manual focus depending on how the switch is set. There is also a switch to shift from a 1.4m/4.6ft to infinity or 2.5m/8.2ft to infinity.Included with this lens are the Tripod mount, lens hood, and storage case. The tripod mount is the best option to use when mounting to a tripod. This helps to balance the load. Mounting the camera instead creates an unbalanced set up that may topple over. The case is a zippered soft case (LZ1324) that can also be purchased separately. The lens hood (ET-86) is used to reduce lens flare and can protect the front element in certain situations.  Often times, Amazon recommends purchasing the lens case and hood, however they are normally included with the lens.The Canon EF 70-200mm is such an awesome lens, it almost fails to compare to the Canon EF 75-300mm.  The Canon 100-400mm lens is a well used option for me, but the clarity and sharpness of the 70-200mm IS lens is more refined. The auto-focus is quiet and quick. This lens can be used for portraits, landscape, sports or as a general walk about lens.  The f/2.8L combined with the IS makes this a good option for certain low light situations.  The features add creative versatility. The Canon EF 70-200mm IS lens comes at a price, but it is worth every bit of it.PROS:Incredible clarity and sharpnessQuiet and quick auto-focusFeatures add creative versatilityDual IS systemCONS:Heavy and bulky (This should be expected with these types of lenses</review_text>
It's a bit heavy but a superb lens.  Interior construction has quite a bit of plastic however which is a bit of a concern.  I've dropped one onto hard packed dirt/soccer field w/no damage...so it's pretty sturdy :)If you can live with 1 stop less light consider the newly released 70-200 f/4 L IS.  This is the new 70-200 f/4 with IS from Canon and will save you some weight if that is a concern</review_text>
You know, I researched this lens again and again. I put it on my Christmas list. A year and a half went by and I finally just bought it.My gosh, everything is true! This is one of the world's great lenses. What a piece of glass. With the image stabilization I can take candid shots in a candlelit restaurant using available light.The lens is magical. It captures the soul of its subjects. Nature photography is phenomenal. This is an incredible tool that will take you to a new level.Just do it! No regrets. Honest.</review_text>
Nick Xu, if you can't figure out the difference between this lens, and the cheaper consumer grade lenses, by all means, stay with the cheaper consumer grade lenses. After all, "Mr Magoo" of cartoon fame couldn't tell a Chevy from a Rolls Royce. All kidding aside, this lens is simply awesome in use. Having one of these lenses in a camera bag is very close in practice to owning three or four high end prime lenses. Yes, it's that good.I am using a borrowed version right now, but as soon as I pay off my new 24-105 f/4 L IS USM lens (very, very awesome), I will buy my own  70-200 f/2.8 IS USM. It's as good as it gets in this lens range, but if you feel comfortable with a pinhole camera, carry on, as it's all about the end user.For everyone else, this lens is the Holy Grail of mid range telephoto lenses. It is simply the best available in it's range, and responds well to Canon tele adapters. If you can figure out a way to afford this lens, buy it, as it is all that. If you are a Nikon lover buy this lens anyway, and buy a fairly cheap 20D body to make it work. It's OK to tell your friends that you used a Nikon to take the pics, but you will end up knowing that Canon is the premeir lens crafter of the 21'st century.(Sorry, Nikon fans, but this lens stands all by it's self in the grand scheme of things. It's simply awesome.)</review_text>
Pros:  Superb Retention of Color, bokeh (background blur), sharpness. Fast silent and accurate autofocus. Great Build quality.Cons: Size, weight and price. Not your everyday walkaround lens. Expensive.</review_text>
I had read the reviews on this lens and no one had anything bad to say about it. It is fast, crisp, focuses fast, quiet, solid and a bit heavy. The weight is vastly compensated for by all ofthe positive features. I have used it on my 20D and was just amazed. I just purchased a 5D and cannot believe my eyes. Just a great great lens</review_text>
Best camera I've ever owned.It has features found on larger SLR's such as shutter speed & red-eye reduction.The several shoot modes such as portrait allows for close ups as well as a scenery mode which allows for sharp vivid photos of foilage as well as sunsets.A marvelous little camera and the size being slightly bigger than a pack of cigarettes allows you to take this anywhere without the bulk of some of the SLR's and their required lens.Too many features to list here.Try one for yourself you'll be amazed</review_text>
I love this camera!  I did a lot of reading-up and price-checking before I bought this item, and I'm delighted with the quality of product and value for money.This was my first 'own camera' and I've had almost zero camera experience, so to find myself taking the most amazing photos and being able to edit/add text/e-mail them - well - WOW!  I've been stunned by the results this camera has given, all within about a month of purchase.The basic handbook had me taking quality 'normal' photo's within 24 hours and, using this handbook I've progressed into some fantastic close-up stuff, and some fun stuff too - get your spouse to dress up for the sepia shots and have a good laugh!!I've had enormouse fun learning with this camera - and I've got loads more to learn and I feel that some good camera work is now within my grasp.  This has required a modicom of concentration and diligence, but it's paid off, and is precisely what I had hoped for.I found the batteries that came with the camera were almost useless, but that your quality name-brand batteries give excellent life - also, if you plan on taking more than about 15 pics at a time, you will want a memory card.Oh Yeah! I'm an 'old bird' of 53 years, so if I can do this, ANYONE can :o</review_text>
I bought this camera as a gift for my 16 yr old daughter who takes lots of fun pictures of her friends.Her photos are great quality.  This is a dependable camera, and takes the abuse a teenager gives it.  I love it for all those reasons besides the great pics</review_text>
I just finished the first set of pics with this machine and was surprised at the amazing sharpness and the accuracy of the autofocus, not to mention the deapth of field when compared to our older Canon digital camera.Don't be fooled by the low price, however. The 16MB card is a joke, and the batteries are not rechargable. It is best to get a 1GB memory card along with a battery charger pack right away. The price is still very reasonable for such a high quality machine</review_text>
I bought this camera owning 2 more digital cameras. One Kodak and another canon (a70). Amazing product...Pro... almost everything..Cons... no audio on videoI definetly recommend the product for the price</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 10 year old daughter.  She is thrilled to have her own camera and has taken may vacation pics for the family.  I would reccommend for all beginning photographers.  Great price range with all the options.  Plus easy to use</review_text>
At the time of this writing, there is something wrong with the product shot on the Amazon site: It makes the lens look much shorter than it is in reality.  It's not a large or heavy lens at all, but it's not _that_ short.I've had mine (part of a 20D kit) for about a year, during which I've taken maybe 4000 frames or so with that particular lens. The lens still appears as solid as it was on day 1, so no complaints in that department.The image stabilization (IS) feature works quite well and is surprisingly silent (far more so than the IS system on the EF 70-300mm IS).  That said, for a good fraction of the focal length range, IS is a relatively minor (but still useful) benefit of this lens.Autofocus (AF) speed is okay: Better than the kit lens that came with the original Digital Rebel I used to own, but not as fast as some other lenses I have (all non-L).  AF accuracy is fine on my copy.Optically, my concern is primarily sharpness. In that department, the lens seems only marginally better than the 18-55mm kit lens that came with the original Digital Rebel (and which can be bought for close to $100, I believe).  It's often worth turning off IS to improve things, ironically.  Still, it's not awful.I haven't found vignetting, distortion, flare, and aberrations to be significant hindrances.  In part, that probably due to a workflow that includes DxO Pro for the images I care about.Overall, I think this is still a pretty good choice for a lens to keep by default on a Canon EF-S camera (30D, 20D, or a Digital Rebel variant). The optical performance over the lower-end EF-S 18-55mm lens is not _that_ great, but the feature set may justify the premium.  The higher end EF-S 17-55/2.8 IS is another alternative if you're willing to double your investment and change lenses to get the longer focal range: Its imaging quality and the larger aperture are certainly desirable.  Tamron and Sigma have some offerings in this range too, but I'm not at all familiar with them</review_text>
i have had so much fun with this lense and managed to take some pretty incredible pics.  i use this lense for probably 95% of pics.  i have 10-22mm, 28-300mm, and 100-400mm, all of which take great pics but this 17-85mm works great for general use</review_text>
The lens fulfilled all of our expectations as to quality of portraits and field of view flexibility.The stabilization aspect is a great help, although it doesn't compensate for someone pushing the shutter too fast in low light conditions.Highly recommend this lens as the standard use lens for the Canon Rebel XT</review_text>
I got this lens with my 30D and have found it to be a useful walkaround lens, able to handle just about any situation I threw at it, other than very low-light situations.  Even in dim illumination it was able to function fairly well, thanks to the image stabilization, which let me shoot at shutter speeds as slow as 1/4 second hand-held.  I wasn't thrilled with the barrel distortion at the wide end of the zoom range, but I was able to fix this using Photoshop's Lens Correction adjustment with no problem.  It's simply an additional post processing step that's necessary</review_text>
If you are only going to buy one lens for your 10, 20 or 30D then buy this lens. I haven't seen a better general purpose lens out there.The EF-S 17-85mm takes great photos, especially in an action oriented situation where you need to run around a lot and get a variety of different shots at different distances.Some have complained that the lens is overpriced. I agree that for the price, it would have been nice to get a hood and carry bag thrown in, but I can say that Canon has impeccable warranty service. I got sand inside my lens and the autofocus quit while I was shooting photos of military helicopters landing in Iraq.I got the lens repaired and shipped back to me within 30 days - in Baghdad in the middle of a war. I was able to speak to a human tech fairly easily and they even replaced something I clearly broke through heavy use that wasn't covered under warranty. The repaired lens works perfectly.If you're looking for a reasonable alternative on a budget try this lens: Sigma Zoom Super Wide Angle AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC Macro Autofocus Lens for Canon Digital SLR CamerasBear in mind that if you have issues and you're using non-Canon lenses on a Canon body, the support you can get from Canon will be limited</review_text>
This lens is very versatile, offering good wide angle to a good head-and-shoulders portrait length.  It's internal focusing, which helps with speed and close-focusing performance, and has image stabilizer for better low-light performance.The IS can be of a particular benefit to those that shoot in darker open areas, like wedding photographers in churches.  The IS, combined with a flash, can allow use to get more background detail for indoor events.  No longer do we have to accept dark, dungeon like backgrounds!Ideally, the lens would be a little bit brighter (say, f4 at the top end), and a bit heavier built.  But then again, we could have that for $1,000 more</review_text>
I got this lens to replace the kit lens that came with my Canon EOS 30D.  This lens is definitely a more "substantial " lens than the kit lens.  Even though the outer housing is plastic, it has a metal mount and seems very durable and sturdy.  The IS really helps to improve the image quality induced by my unsteady hand.  The USM is very fast and quiet.  I have read accounts of this lens not being able to lock on, but I have not had any issues with it in varying (including low) lighting conditions.  I know the lens supports FTM focus, but I have not tried it yet.  I like the focal length range on this lens.  At 17mm even with the 1.6x multiplier, the angle is very wide.  The only drawback to this lens for me is at 17mm there is significant barrel distortion.  My test shots my next shot was at 24mm and the distortion was completely gone at this focal  length.   It's not a showstopper though since it is easily corrected in Photoshop.  Of all the lenses I plan to get, (Sigma 30mm 1.4, Canon EF 50mm 1.8 II, and the Canon EF 70-300mm IS USM), this will most likely be the lens I keep on the camera most of the time, using the others as opportunities warrant</review_text>
Got it two days ago, and can't say how much I love it. My camera fits perfectly, and I even put my video camera on. Although it doesn't have wheels, I can move the head around in any direction and make it stiff easily. I love the double extensions in the legs and then the neck extensions for the minor adjustments.</review_text>
I bought 2 of these to carry a camera support to be suspended over a treadmill for filming from above.  I love the fact that they can extend to 70".  They are very sturdy and with the hook on the central post I could hang a sandbag for additional support.  Furthermore, the support beams from each leg to the central post are attached to a central ring that can tighten to change the size of the base of support as measured by the distance between legs of the tripod.  This is extremely helpful when you have limited floor space and tight or cramped corners.  With the addition of sandbags, this narrow base of support can still be quite stable.  The additional bubble levels on the stand are enormously helpful on rough terrain.  The locking mechanims on the legs are plastic, however and are thus not very good for outdoor, dusty conditions.  They are very much like the Samsonite 3751 with the same camera release mechanism, locking legs, bubble levels, extendable center post, changeable size of base of support--the differences are: cheaper, greater extension, hook on center post, and carrying case</review_text>
I am 6ft tall and this is such a perfect tripod for someone who is a beginning/novice photographer for occasional to moderate use (would be my guess). My fort is post-production, as I am a graphic designer and needed something to use with my new dig camera. I did a lot of research for tripods and this seemed to have what I needed for my usage. The plastic clips concern me somewhat with durability for the long haul, but I would love to be surprised and that is just my nerves and luck talking. How can you beat the price regardless?I am so happy with this tripod so far. I love how tall it is for me particularly and how easy it is to use. I did so much research online and found this 70" one and said "screw it" I am tired of looking and bought it. I knew I needed something that accomodated for my height and there isn't a whole lot out there for us tall folks that have decent ratings and is in the hundred and below dept. I didn't have the pesos to make another "hundred+" purchase and took a risk here when I rated the cost versus quality (in my head). I feel as though I have won this battle for now.I like the two "levels" (that i have noticed) to make sure I am squared up on this piece of equipment. Equipment has a smooth pan and I will be using it for my own photo work, video tours for my husband's realtor work and recreation/family photos. I am excited to use this more with my dig Rebel. Legs extend easily. Metal (light weight) body with plastic clips and pieces. Comes with a black bag to hold your tripod also. Easy snap-off piece to remove your digital camera and to attach. In fact I just leave it always on my camera as it expedites the process when I am in a hurry.Tripod feels quite sturdy with my Rebel attached. I think this is a really good-looking tripod. It is so SO light weight and portable. I love that it is NOT clunky and loud to assemble when pulling it straight out of the trunk/car for quickly assembly.I would've liked to seen a manual for recommended usage and ways of maximizing longevity of the product, but I am over it and the product is great so far.(revise 10-09-06) Still LOVE LOVE this tripod. I use it ALL the time. So easy to use and it is SO lightweight and I can just toss it in the trunk. So quick to set up too. Love it ... it ROCKS (from a tall gal).:</review_text>
I bought this tripod with the camera bag as a duo deal....When they say Professional, they mean professional.  It's a large tripod, easy to telescope out and back again, but heavier and longer, and thicker than other tripods I've used. It does appear to be well made and very sturdy.</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift for my brother-in-law.  He's over 6 ft tall and wanted a tripod that he didn't have to bend over to use.  I couldn't find one locally, and was very happy to find this one online.  He's very happy with his gift!Highly recommended</review_text>
I was a little hesitant to purchase this tripod because of the low price. The last cheap tripod I bought was lightweight and wobbly. I am very pleased with the performance of this tripod. I wasn't expecting Bogen type quality, but its good enough. It's lightweight, and surprisingly sturdy. I would recommend this tripod to a friend</review_text>
I bought this battery for a Canon 30D and can take around a thousand pic's on one charge.  Very happy with the battery's performance</review_text>
I bought a generic Chinese "equivalent" bp-511 battery that boasted a higher milliamperage rating and a cheaper price than the original Canon battery that came with my camera.  The battery worked fine for about 3 months and now only holds a charge for about 20 minutes.  I have had it fail at critical times.  Never ever buy some knock-off Chinese battery--read the reviews.  The Chinese push out their crappy knock-offs to unsuspecting consumers (like I was) just to make a quick buck.  Also, don't trust the glowing reviews from the generic sellers.  They are self-generated.  In my case, the seller is no longer selling under his original company name.  He has a new name with the requisite (sham) glowing reviews.  CHINESE PRODUCTS SUCK</review_text>
Last battery was good for almost 5 years. Easily rechargeable. Couldn't ask for more</review_text>
Okay, a lot can be said for saving money, however there can be problems with no-name or non-branded products. No matter what your "style" of photography, you will have a battery empty its charge at a critical moment. Having a back-up is essential. Having a quality back-up battery that will get you through is imperative. Knock-off brands do not hold the same charge as the branded battery meant for your camera; although their manufacture may claim it does.Get in the zone and get the shot!</review_text>
For some reason, Canon- branded batteries are better than those sold by actual battery manufacturers. Don't just look at the $$/mAh ratio, consider safety, reliability and longevity. In these categories, the Canons rock. I bought a G1 camera about five years ago, and the camera is toast, but the battery still works like a charm in my 20D. Others start out with 1400 or even 1700 mAh, but fail after six months - read the reviews here on Amazon.com</review_text>
I do not trust any batteries except Canon for my Canon cameras.I have found "compatible" batteries do not always charge inCanon charger, and do not last as long on camera</review_text>
There are many after market batteries for this camera and every review indicates they are not effective,This OEM battery by Sony delivers the goods, with extremely long lasting power to handle not only the digital picture taking but all the additional flash requirements</review_text>
This is an excellent battery that powers my Canon 5D camera very well. Although I haven't tested it against the spec for how many shots I can get from it, I've been very impressed with the longevity of it's charge</review_text>
This grip is a great value for the price paid. The batteries alone  are worth the money spent. I've banged this around for a week out on the rugged Bruce Peninsula and had no problems with it.I would recommend this to anyone needing a grip. The money you save you can put towards your next lens</review_text>
I'm a loyal canon fan who only has 4 Canon branded lenses (though I had a great Sigma 70-300)..  That being said, I'm a huge fan of the Opteka grip.  The canon is just not worth the extra money. Excellent build quality on it, and the batteries that it came with work very well (more maH than the std battery). I had heard some complaints about how far you had to depress the shutter release on the grip -- it is further than the camera, but very usable, and since purchasing I've heard similar complaints from users of the canon grip.  Save the $ on the grip, get the opteka and get other accessories... You wont regret i</review_text>
This is the same as the Canon grip, made in the same factory.  I don't know how they can get away with it, but it's the consumer's gain here.  Through in 2 batteries and your over a hundred bucks ahead---to spend on all those lenses you'll end up getting for the XTi/400D.</review_text>
We traded up from the original Rebel to the XTi.  This was the first add-on we purchased and has been GREAT!The battery grip adds some balance and overall sturdy-feeling to the Rebel...especially, the slightly smaller XT and XTi bodies.Good stuff, no regrets</review_text>
I know it sounds too good to be true, I've read too many reviews where people say that "I never knew how I ever took pictures without this grip," but it's the truth. The first thing I noticed was the vertical handle, it's amazing. You can shoot vertical shots with one hand! All of the buttons you need are on the grip, the shutter button, wheel, and the two buttons on the top right of the XT.Installation, it's a joke, don't even read the manual. You have to charge the batteries, but in the mean time you can put in your regular Canon battery, or 6 AAs because this comes with a AA shell.Think of it this way, the XT is a baby...it's easy to hold if you have small hands; I don't, I knew the camera was small, and I decided to buy this really so I could have a better handle on it, the extra battery life was whipping on the cake.I really don't know how I could stand to hold the camera without this grip.  Don't spend extra money on Canon's model, this one is perfect</review_text>
I bought the Opteka Battery Pack Grip for my Canon EOS Digital Rebel XTi, and was a bit leary about the considerably lower price than the Canon brand battery pack grip. I am pleased to report that the Opteka grip has met my expectations.PROSThe grip fits extremely well on the Rebel XTi. It even comes with a convenient place to store the battery compartment lid (which must be removed to insert the grip into the camera. Removing the lid is an easy procedure).Attaching the grip is quick and easy, with a large, serrated wheel to tighten the grip against the camera bottom.The finish on the grip is different than that on the Canon-brand grip. The Opteka has a thin, rubbery, texturized non-slip insert layer over the front, bottom and back. The Canon grip's rubbery insert is smooth and looks more "finished."  My only concern about the Opteka insert is that it shows signs that it may not stay perfectly attached to the grip, and will likely need a touch of cement in the future. Not a big deal, though.The vertical shooting buttons on the grip (exposure bracket, A-E lock, Auto Focus point selection, selector wheel and shutter release) are, as far as I can tell, identically placed like those on the Canon grip. All work like they are supposed to.The grip comes with an "On-Off" slide so you can turn off the vertical shooting buttons when they are not needed. This prevents accidentally activating one of the buttons or taking a picture if they are inadvertently pressed while shooting horizontal.The battery compartment in the grip is very easy to remove and insert batteries. Although I haven't used it yet, the optional AA battery insert looks easy to use, and is good to have in emergencies.The two NB-2LH batteries that came with the grip seem to be OK, and charged up just fine. With the battery that came with the camera, I now have 3 batteries to use. More than enough for the number of pictures I take during a typical shoot.The grip certainly improves the handling and feel of the XTi, which comes with a too-small grip for many hands. Personally, I like the additional heft and mass the Opteka grip gives the camera, although some may object to the additional weight.CONSThis is a very minor point, but worth pointing out. The shutter release button on the Opteka grip is a bit "mushy." What I mean is that it is not always easy to tell when you have pressed the shutter releae halfway down to activate auto focus or metering. There is a noticable tactile difference between pressing the shutter release down on the camera, and the shutter release on the grip. It's as if the spring underneath the camera's shutter release button is a bit stiffer than the one for the grip. However, if you use the viewfinder to determine whether you have achieved focus or not, then the little bit of mush in the grip shutter release won't make no never mind.BOTTOM LINEWould I recommend this grip to a friend? Yes.Would I buy another one if the need arises? Yes</review_text>
it was shipd fast and is a verygood buy for the money look the same as the more expensive canon one plus the batterys are good brand i think but it realy up to you the buyer ihave a canon rebel and it fit verrysnug</review_text>
I read rave reviews about the Opteka battery grip being manufactured to the same specs as the Canon grip but at a fraction of the price, so I knew I couldn't go wrong with it.  It came with two 3rd party batteries as well for only $20 more, so what did I have to lose?Let me start off by saying I have experience with 3rd party batteries and they are usually a waste of money as they are horrible from a performance standpoint.  Not these however, I have taken a few hundred pictures with about 20% flash and the battery meter is still full. Great value overall.The grip really does balance out the small size of the Rebel XT and always stays on my camera.  It does add considerable weight to the camera however, but nothing overbearing</review_text>
I have both the Canon version of the grip and this version. They are identical. I have two Rebel XTs and they work great. I like them for the feel it gives holding the camera. The camera was small in my hands and this makes it perfect. If you are thinking of buying accessories for the Rebel XT, this should be one of them. The grip holds two batteries, which gives you way more shooting time. I highly recommend this</review_text>
Well, it's Canon, so there is no doubt about the quality. The only downside -- because it doesn't have a string the cap is very easy to misplace. Always put it in your pocket everytime you remove it from the camera to shoot pictures</review_text>
I have the lens, I have the cap....and its been so long since I bought both that I don't remember if the cap came with the lens or not.   SURELY it does !!!!!!!   I do love my add on lenses but I will have to say that now that I've added all these other toys (macro, wide angle, telephoto, filters) I now realize I shouldve gotten a SLR digital and held out for true lenses instead of the conversion option.   I love my S2IS but just think how nice a real camera would be !!!!!!   sigh...</review_text>
Good quality, and perfect attach, but no cord to avoid loose it.Incredible that Canon forget it!!!So... remember to put it inside your pocket when you use your camera</review_text>
Lost your old SLR lens cap?  This is what you are looking for.</review_text>
I got this lens cap when I ordered a close-up lens for my camera, a PowerShot S1 IS, because it was recommended as something people who ordered that part would also order.  I, therefore, assumed that it went with the same camera, or with the lens/adapter I was ordering.  However, it does not appear to fit either the camera itself or any of the attachments, so I now wish that I had done some more research to determine whether it would actually fit my equipment</review_text>
I'd be stating the obvious and preaching to the choir if I said that care of lenses for SLR cameras required a decent lens cap.  This one snaps into 58mm threads on the end of many lenses (Canon and otherwise), so just be sure to confirm that that it's the proper size for your lens</review_text>
My husband bought me this camera as an early Christmas gift. At first I wasn't in love with it. I was disappointed because I wanted a camera that had image stablization. This camera instead boasted about its ISO sensitivity settings and fast shutter speed. (They claimed it was similar to image stablization) When I first tried it out I was in a very low light setting and was experiencing some blur in my images which was exactly what I was trying to avoid in a new camera!I almost traded this one in for something different (A cheaper priced olympus with IS) but thankfully I gave the camera another chance first and decided to play around with all the manual settings. There are a lot of them in the menus so you can fine tune it like you wouldn't believe. This ability to change its setup is what made me stick with the Sony.However, I wouldn't say this camera is ideal for very low light situations. The two preset choices of shooting a low-light scene without flash won't give you crystal clear pictures especially if you experience a tiny bit of camera shake. But again, it goes back to the adjustments in the menus, you can make manual adjustments and get pretty decent pictures with minumal (or no) blur. But you have to take the time to find and set the right ISO and light settings. I highly suggest using the histogram that you can pop-up onto the screen for help. Unless you are willing to spend about $200 more on a camera, you won't find one that will perform great in very low light anyway. And like my husband said... "really... how often are you taking shots in the dark honey?" Hey, there's Halloween trick-or-treating and fouth of July fireworks and other night time events I retorted, but he's right. There really isn't a lot of real low-light pictures you take where you aren't using a flash.I know lots of people (me included) like to try and figure out all the menu options and settings on their own before reading a manual... but this one, if you really want super amazing shots, reading the manual will give you A LOT of insight on how powerful a camera it really is. For people that always read the manual this is probably a big "DUUUH"! But if you are like me and like to try and rush through and figure it out, you are missing out on a ton of nice options.Some great features:The camera doubles as a video camera and it is only limited to recording up to the amt of space available in your memory stick. Other cameras will only let you record a pre-set maximum number of minutes.I also like the Burst modes which allow you to take shots in fast succession. Great for action shots. But take note, when using a burst mode you cannot use the flash. (Again, watch out for low light!)I have a 3 year old daughter and the fast shutter speed (and burst) works great in a well lit situation. Just the other day I caught shots of her running around and jumping up and down that came out crystal clear. No blur at all. Every flying and bouncing hair on her head came out perfectly frozen in time. Quite neat!I gave this camera 4 stars because the camera performs wonderfully in every situation except very low light. But for the price, you can't do much better anyway. Its a great buy and I think just about anyone would be pleased to receive it as a gift.</review_text>
Just be sure to get a case along with it, because the large screen could get scratched</review_text>
I had previously owned a Kodak Easy share that died while I was on vacation.  I loved the easy to learn and use features on that camera so I wanted another camera that was easy for a non-professional to use.This little camera has been great!  I've had it for a few months now and LOVE THE PICTURES!  It is very easy to use and is super small which makes it easy to throw in my purse to take anywhere.  The pictures are crisp and clear and the battery lasts forever.  My old Kodak used to take real AA batteries and I thought a camera with its own little rechargeable battery might be strange but it's actually MUCH easier and lasts way longer than the AA's did in my old Kodak.  The LCD screen is huge and makes it very easy to review photos.  Just one little click to go to review and back to taking photos.Only two downfalls I've found so far are that the little setting dial moves easily on its own so you have to always check it before taking a picture or it might be on some strange setting or video.  The other thing is that I haven't been able to figure out if there is a way to delete all of the photos on the camera after you upload them - I've had to delete them one by one which is a slow process.  Other than those two little things this camera is WONDERFUL!  Highly recommended</review_text>
I am very pleased with this item. The size is right, the resolution of the photos perfect. I am enjoying using the camera</review_text>
OK -- allow me to mention that the ONLY thing I dislike is that to charge this camera's battery, you have to remove the battery and put it in a small wall charger. The battery charge seems weak and I have to charge it a lot more than the old one. My last Sony digital camera (a recent one, too) has a plug that fit into the camera and you'd charge it while it sat downloading or just "parked"... I get a bit nervous about opening and closing a battery door constantly. That's what did in a Nikon CoolPix I had. :/Now that said, I gotta shout - I LOVE this camera. Slim to fit into my pocket or small purse, lens covers when it's off, screen I already have a plastic guard on, and the photos are quality. Hard to take a bad pic with this! I'd say "I'd buy it again!" but I already did -- a gift for my son! Two thumbs up for ease of use, quality pics, and, GREAT price</review_text>
I bought this camera two weeks ago, have taken about 100 pics, and my battery is still nearly fully charged. I thought I'd have to buy another battery when I decided to buy this camera, but I'm glad I held off, because it's not necessary (unless you're going on a two-week excursion in the bush with no access to electricity...) No problems with red-eye, no blurry pictures when taken inside with low light, and outstanding battery life. I am getting more than I expected when I purchased this camera. I would recommend it (and show it off!) to anyone</review_text>
This is a outstanding camera for it's size. Easy to use, easy to carry and produces great pictures. Would recommend to anyone who is ready to give up film and go digital</review_text>
I purchased this camera a year ago (summer 05).  Definitely a great upgrade over the original rebel, although the new xti has a larger screen which is the one aspect of this camera that is not perfect.  There are other sites that will perform more comprehensive reviews of this camera, but after a year mine is still working perfectly</review_text>
I almost didn't buy this camera simply because of the plastic body (I'm used to a Praktica MTL3 film camera, which is built like a tank).  However, I'm glad I overlooked that because the camera is top-notch in terms of robust features and the quality it provides.  Startup time is very quick and making adjustments to shutter speed and aperture is intuitive.If you get the bundle with the kit lens, I highly recommend complimenting it with the very affordable Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens, especially if you are a big fan of DOF and do a lot of available-light / low-light photography.</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
I love the new digital Canon. The only problem is it's not nearly as tough as it's film twin.  I had the camera less than a month when the pop-up flash quit working.  The Canon people have been great, and very helpful, but I'd rather not have had to send a brand new camera back to the factory.  The photos, however, are wonderful.  Film quality for the most part - printable and enlargable.  (It would probably be better to use the camera with a tripod when using the 300mm telephoto but I hike with it, so just remember to steady it before taking wildlife photos.</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
When I bought this camera the sales people tried to get me to buy another battery.  They said the one that came with it would only be good for about 20 minutes.  Now I have bought alot of items in my lifetime, a 20 min battery on a camera just doesnt seem like a very good "business" choice.  So I said no.  So I got the camera, charged the battery until the light went green (which sucked because I wanted to play with it right when i got it) and started taking pictures (oh I also got a 2G CF) worked great....so I planned to go up a mountain and take soem scenery shots.  Keeping in mind what the sales person had told me I pocketed the charger just incase.  Well, 6000', 300 pictures, and 5 hours later the camera is still running strong, still have 200 shots left for the trip home, battery life indicator hasnt budged off of the full button.  So all in all, I think the battery life is great, now i can see if your taking say thousands of pictures all in a row you may need another but for just going on a trip and shooting a few pictures at every stop point, the original will work fine.  as for the quality of photos.....i love them</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
This is a great product.  I have a rather large lens and it helps stabilize it so that I don't blur my pictures when I'm taking pictures of the kids playing soccer.  However, people think I'm a professional photographer from the local newspaper when I use it at the grandkids' games.</review_text>
Strong and rigid, easy to control on the head so that you can have it loose for free movement but tight enough that the camera doesn't flop over.  Opens and closes very easily.  It's kind of expensive for $50 but its probably worth the money</review_text>
Solid design, quick and easy to adj height. Great way to steady camera. Doubles as walking stick</review_text>
I gave this monopod to my boyfriend, as a gift, and it's been perfect for his use.  He videotapes his kids's baseball and softball games, and was tired of holding the camcorder for so long.  He didn't want to deal with a bulky tripod when he was getting up and down, so a monopod seemed like a great idea.  He has LOVED it!!  He says it keeps the camera very steady and it's very easy to change the height so he can use it sitting or standing.  He's no professional, but he uses his camcorder a lot, and he'll be happily using the monopod for a long time</review_text>
It works fine, but the Canon S2 IS digital camera sometimes feels a little heavy for the monopod.</review_text>
I was very pleased with Amazons quick delivery of my new Canon monopod.The monopod is very easy to adjust and use. It's the ideal ridgid support you would want for your camera.It even doubles as a great walking stick, sometime need, on those long treks you make to get a good photo</review_text>
This monopod is exactly what I expected at a good price.  It extends very smoothly, and the stops hold the leg firmly at the height I set. Easy to set up and adjust with one hand so I can change height with the camera attached</review_text>
I love this monopod! I'm a person who uses my camera nearly every day (Canon EOS Elan 7 35mm).  This item is one of my favorite accessories for the camera -- so much easier to travel with than a tripod! It's sturdy, but lightweight, easy to use and is very portable. I am mostly using the monopod to support my camera with an enormous, extremely heavy 500mm telephoto lens attached. I'm actually able to hold that huge lens steady with just the monopod -- not one blurry photo! I've dragged it all over the Bluegrass of Kentucky ... across fields of horse farms, and even to the racetrack.   I've taken it out into the wilderness to photograph elk. I had to keep closing it down and extending it out every time we got in and out of the vehicle, which was often. Also recently traveled all over Arizona with it to the Grand Canyon, Monument Valley, Canyon De Chelley, etc. I was constantly opening and closing it, taking literally hundreds of photos (about 14 rolls) with no problems at all.  I'm wondering if the other reviewer just got a defective one.  I wish I'd bought one of these years ago!  I highly recommend it</review_text>
If you've found these reviews, you already know this lens is one of the best Canon products out there. I did not bite on the IS version, and I have not found myself ever wishing I did; this lens is everything it's hyped up to be and performs well in low-light/indoor situations.I don't think it's weight is that big a deal. I really don't have any problem carrying this lens around for a day -- in my hands or in a bag -- even with a 1.4 extender attached. It can feel a bit heavy but I don't mind, and neither will you when you see the results later on.I've used this a lot for shooting professional baseball and it's landed me front page ink several times. In my mind, I could get the 1.4 extender with this lens and give myself a 70-280 range, which is pretty adequate for most sports and nature photography, considering the 300 f/2.8 and it's friends are much, much more expensive. The lens works basically just as fast and sharp, in my opinion, with the 1.4 at f/4, although some may debate this. Flip on any baseball or football game and you will see this lens around the neck of most every pro.If you can swing the price, enjoy it! My advice is to continue reading up on this or similar products, although I found most everyone agreed, this is one of the finest lens around. It's one that makes people stop and stare and wonder who you are</review_text>
...there are two things that you should know.  The first is that the f/2.8 version of this lens is big and heavy.  The second is that the f/2.8 version of this lens is the more versatile and, therefore, the more useful of the two choices.Why is the f/2.8 more useful?  It allows you to use Canon's outstanding extenders and still have a sharp and practical lens.  With the 1.4x, you will have a very, very good 98-280mm f/4 lens.  With the 2x, you will have a good 140-400mm f/5.6 lens.  In both cases the lens will autofocus--very well with the 1.4x and adequately with the 2x.  The use of the Canon extenders also allows the 70-200 to make a pretty nice close-up lens.  The original close focus of the lens is maintained with the extenders, giving you both 280mm and 400mm focal lengths that focus closer than most prime lenses of the same focal lengths.  While you can use the extenders on the f/4 version, it makes for some pretty slow lenses with limited applications.There's not much you can say about this lens that hasn't already been said.  It's one of the sharpest zooms around with a look that, while certainly subjective, is highly appealing.  I have a preference for prime lenses over zooms but I still rank this as one of my sharpest lenses.Is there any reason to choose the 70-200 f/4 lens over this one?  Cost aside, I can see a valid argument being made for the f/4.  Carrying around the f/2.8 in a full camera bag is no fun unless you're putting it to use.  Since I mostly use shorter focal length prime lenses, sometimes the f/2.8 is a pain in the neck for me--literally.  Unless I know I will need it, I have taken to leaving it behind in favor of a lighter, smaller and less sharp Canon 100-300.  So I can see the utility of the smaller 70-200.  Maybe I can talk myself into owning both.  Nah, that's a little too excessive.</review_text>
I forgot my wife's birthday and she subsequently hinted that she wanted a telephoto lens... I started by looking at the cheap ones, but decided, that I might as well do it right if I were going to do it at all.   When it arrived, my wife took it out of the box and we were both stunned by how massive this lense was.  It's heavier than you might think as well (which means that the mounting ring that come packaged with this lens is an absolute God-send).The first thing we did was go out and buy a Mono-pod for it.  Next we took it camping and then water-skiing and ended up with some of the most incredible, crystal clear shots we've ever seen.  The autofocus was incredibly fast - I was able to hold down the button and snap through multiple exposures while speeding across the waves.   Most of the time - the thing was right on.We then mounted it on a tri-pod and shot family portraits.  This was the first time we had all the kids and grandkids together in six years and once again - the lens didn't let us down and the photos were fantastic.I don't have any real training with a camera (I use the Cannon Rebel and auto-focus most of the time) but this lens was worth every dime. ...It also worked to get me out of the dog-house with my wife..</review_text>
I have a few 'L' lens, and this is by far my favorite. Reviews saying this is their favorite lens are not kidding. There are plenty of other reviews going over all the features, but I would like to add to the IS v Non-IS.I purchased the NON-IS version because I did not want to fork over the extra million-dollars for IS. If I knew I was to like this lens so much and it would become my favorite lens, I would have splurged for IS.Somewhere on the great-big-internet I read a comparison between the two versions. The IS version clearly shows less sharpness, but it was not clear if that is only when IS is on. And I'm not sure if it would be noticeable on Digital</review_text>
I don't personally subscribe to the notion that the big brand manufacturers always make the best lenses out there, but this is one instance where they really, honestly do. This thing is lightning fast, sharp as a tack, the bokeh is much better than Sigma's equivalent, and you'll have a hard time finding a use for your raw processor's chromatic aberration correcting sliders when coupled with a digital body (you CAN still get some purple fringing around backlit subjects, but genuine CA bad enough to show up in a print has so far proven non-existent for me at any focal length or aperture). The weight is a serious downside, but it's one I can live with.If you're a nature photographer who really has a problem holding still or if you plan on using extension tubes, the IS version might be worth the extra $700 to you, but if you're doing event photography where the subjects are the ones jumping around like rabbits, save your money and your battery power; ain't a thing wrong with this lesser model</review_text>
This is probably Canon's best value in a mid/long zoom.I got this the same day I purchased my 30D...along with the EF-S 10-22 and the EF 24-70 2.8L.  Talk about pleased!  No regrets whatsoever.This lens just screams quality.  Images just pop out at you.  If you're considering the f/4 model...take a hard look at this one.  Add a hood (cha-ching) and (yikes) the $100+ tripod ring and the value of this lens really shows.  It's a bit larger & heavier but look what you gain!  If you're one of those that considers the sweet spot of a lens to be stopped down a step or two just look at where that puts you on the f/4 compared to this one.  And the focus speed is nothing short of "holy mackerel that's fast!"Sure, you could spend a few more bucks and get the IS version...but frankly, to me at least, if it's that important I'll be using a tripod anyway.  Hmmm, just took the shakes out of the equation.All in all, a great lens at a decent price</review_text>
This lens is fantastic very fast .colors that will blow you away.2.8f stop can set very fast sutter speeds .I put this lens on my reble xt and I dont want to take it off. Love it Amazon great.........</review_text>
I keep it short and sweet.Very Sharp - quick autofocus.  I use it with my Canon 20D.</review_text>
my cousin's wife is a professional studio photographer who occasionally lends out her lenses to me for clothing / lifestyle photoshoots (I've been pretty active in this area for some time, just now starting to go full digital), and I've used the f/2.8L about four or five times and this is one of the best lenses I've used. period. shooting wide open allows you to retain high shutter speeds for night shots, as well as get very interesting and vibrant long shutter shots (of crowds, the freeway at night, etc). when shooting action shots, the tripod mount can get in the way of zooming and focusing, but it can be removed easily enough.I personally just purchased the f/4.0L, which, coupled with a relatively wide max aperture and shooting at either 1600 or 3200 on my 20D, should do nicely, but I still rate the 2.8 high up on my list</review_text>
Good quality product which actually measured slightly larger than indicated providing room for a good sized zoom lens. As usual Amazon shopping beat all others for pricing</review_text>
I'm not sure why "rkm001" had so many issues with this product. I have owned one for about two months now and use it very heavily. It cuts a straight line for me everytime and I have never had something "stick" to the cutting strip. I actually bought this one to replace a very worn (and more expensive trimmer/cutter) I had for years, and wish I had done it sooner</review_text>
It performs as you'd expect. The bar holds the paper in place, and the cutter cuts the paper. I also got the perforating and scoring blades, and those also work very well. Using the cutter and perforator, I've made several custom-size notebooks with tear-out pages</review_text>
Excellent product, easy to use, great for edging cards and making trims for cards and craftwork.  I can't wait to experiment with it</review_text>
Clearly "rkm001" has had some difficulty in using this equipment.  I have one that I used as part of my job.  I have probably cut over 1000 photos/labels/etc.  Other people in the office have cut more than 2000 photos.  It does exactly what it is supposed to do - it cuts a straight line along the edge of the guide.Where this problem arises is when the cutting surface, underneath the cutting wheel, becomes worn from use.  I grove will slowly develop and since the cutting surface is not fixed in position and can slide from side to side, the grove will not be straight nor will it be parallel to the cutting guide.To solve this problem, you should not use extreme force when cutting.  Gentle pressure is adequate for cutting a photo.  You can also remove the cutting surface and rotate it 90 or even flip it over.  This gives you four cutting surfaces to work with.  Ultimately you will need to replace it.  Carl makes those too.For $20, it works well and unless you plan to cut thousands of times a month, it is fine for home or light office use</review_text>
When digital cameras first came out, I, like many people swore I'd always be loyal to film. Digital could never take the place of film. I'm not convinced that it has replaced film completely. There's still something I love about putting a roll of film in the camera, shooting away, sending the film to be processed, and seeing the results. I also know it's a bit expensive. I know that the argument about quality has always been paramount in the discussion, but digital cameras are improving in this regard, and most manufacturers are assuring users that while the technology will always be improving, we are at a point where a good investment can be made in a digital SLR and it will not be outdated as soon as the buyer purchases the camera. So I figured now is the time to get a digital SLR.I have been a loyal Nikon user for nearly ten years, and have owned the Nikon N60, N70, and N80. My first love was, and still is the N70 (I've been told by the person who sold me the camera he thought I was the only person who loved the N70).  I purchased the N80 only after my N70 cost too much to repair, but I've enjoyed the way my various Nikon cameras have handled all sorts of situations and the fact that they can be as simple to use as a point and shoot if I don't have the time to use specific controls, but it also has options for more creative and artistic purposes. My Nikon cameras have allowed me to capture family moments with ease and majestic landscapes, wildlife shots and all sorts of other things I can't resist to capture forever.I decided to purchase the D70 since it was close to what I've already experienced with Nikon. In many ways it works in a similar way to the N70 and 80, except it's a digital rather than film version. Like the film versions of the midrange Nikon SLR's, it has a dial that allows an automatic setting,  portrait, landscape, sports, close-up, nightscape, and night portrait modes, the ability to select aperture, shutter speed or manual controls. The camera has auto and manual focus abilities. Photos can be as easy or technical as the photographer desires. The controls are easy to use, though it takes practice to be comfortable. On a personal level, the camera has passed the Halloween test, niece's birthday test, and fall foliage in New England test and favorite scenic spots test. The only real difficulty I've had with the camera is trying to capture stained glass windows in a dark setting. Auto focus has not worked at all and I'm not thrilled with the manual focus of these shots, but at this point I'm sure it's the photographer and not the camera.I do have one suggestion for anyone who purchases this camera. The manual is very confusing. It uses all sorts of symbols and can be more of a distraction than anything else. I've had luck with the "Magic Lantern Guides" with my other cameras, but have not as of yet used it for this camera. I did purchase the NIKON D70 FIELD GUIDE (David Busch, Wiley Publishing) which has been helpful. It can be a quick reference for anyone already familiar with Nikon and photography in general but it also provides and introduction for the novice to photography.</review_text>
I've had my D70s for about a year now, haven't regretted it for a second.The controls are laid out logically, with everything to hand. The dual control wheels make adjustments fast and accurate. I personally love the optional grid overlay, I have no excuses for horizons that aren't horizontal. The wireless flash system is great, though you have to buy an SB-600 or SB-800 to get the full benefit. This camera is bigger and heavier than the D50 and D80, which in my opinion is a positive thing.</review_text>
I am a professional photographer, and I have owned this camera for nearly two years.  I also have a D70 for backup.  The batteries go forever, it is very quick to respond, the images are beautiful, and it has the typical Nikon durability and reliability.  If you are already a Nikon user, the controls will fall easily to hand.That having been said, the computer software with this camera is a joke.  For the best image quality shoot RAW files, color balance with a grey card, and render the images with software like Capture One LE.  The uselessness of the included software is the only reason that this camera gets four instead of five stars.  Come on, Nikon, be real!!!Shortly after I got my first D70, I shot a model for a small photo for a side bar in a catalog.  I got an ugly feeling in my gut when I was told that the designer had taken a shot that was 3/4 figure, cropped to the head and shoulders, and enlarged the image for the cover of the 8.5 x 11 in catalog.  By the time I found out, it was already at the printer.  As it turned out, I was pleasantly surprised: the cover shot looked great.  After that incident, I have trusted this camera and have always been pleased with the results.This camera is better than 35 mm in every way except response to the shutter button.  In resolution and color reproduction it is more comparable to a medium format film camera.  It is imperative to shoot RAW and process the files properly to get the most out of this camera.I can't wait to try the D80</review_text>
I do weddings, portrait, and outdoor photography and I don't see any reason why I'd ever switch from the D70 (other than the D80 :).  This camera is professional grade at the consumer price point.  Don't be scared by the 6.1 MP.  I print at 20x30 all the time w/ out any problems.  I'd recommend reading Thom Hogans manual</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
Excellent camera kit. Versatile. I have a lot to learn about the camera, though, as it is no simple point-and-shoot. However, in Auto mode, it takes great point-and-shoot pictures. I look forward to learning how to use it fully. Lenses came with warranty cards, but the camera itself did not. I bought the SB-600 flash as well and another battery and two 1 GB compact flash cards to round out the kit. Camera with lens attached is large, which I underestimated. $80 camera bag is too small for it all. Great camera, though. Price was the best I could find anywhere</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
I bought this grip a year ago after shooting homecoming weekend at my school, Central Michigan University.The pain it saved my wrist being able to shoot sports vertically without having to hang my hand over the top of my camera was a HUGE relief.Recently though, after a year of solid use, I've been having problems with it. There will be days that my camera will suddenly say my batteries are dry - after charging them the day before. I've checked, and my grip is not part of the series that was recalled for a similar problem.I have to actually removed the grip, and the batteries, and restart the camera to correct the problem. --this is a big problem in the middle of a sports match--However, the grip is a great addition to the 20D/30D models. It's not the same feel as using a 1D, but it's as close are you're going to get. And for $150, you can't go wrong with the vertical shooting and doubled battery life. It also simply evens out the weight of the camera, especially with the heavier L-glass lenses on your camera</review_text>
I appreciate the difference in balance the battery grip provides for long lenses.  The E-1 hand strap that can be attached with this addition provides a very solid, secure grip.  Also, the BGE2 comes with a carrier for 6 AA cell batteries for those instant dead battery emergencies</review_text>
I just received the Canon BGE2 Battery Grip yesterday and already have it attached to my EOS 30D (nice).The unit fits very well and is very secure. I had no trouble aligning and tightening the Grip to the Camera Body.I also found the additional shutter release very handy. In addition, the shape of the unit allows a solid "grip" in the Vertical orientation as well.I too already had an extra battery pack, as TWO Batteries are required. Please note that the unit COMES WITH the Canon BGM-E2 Battery Holder, which allows you to use AA batteries. There is NO NEED to buy this as an accessory (unless you want a second AA battery magazine).One accessory that compliments the Battery Grip very well is the Canon Hand Strap E1. This Strap is designed to work with the neck strap yet provides added security and control with the Battery Grip (and well worth the $25-$30)</review_text>
I had the similar battery grip for my Dig Rebel, and I never took it off the camera.  So as soon as I bought the 30D, I immediately ordered this.  The dual batteries allow me to do an entire wedding (close to 1000 shots) without ever having to switch batteries.  Plus it really improves the grip of the camera with heavier/longer lenses. It has worked very well for me, and is a breeze to install</review_text>
I just attached my battery grip to my 300d for the first time today, and the difference was amazing. I already had an extra battery pack, so I charged them both up and slid them in right away.The added weight is a very nice addition to the 300d's small body, and I can already see an improvement in my ability to hold the camera still. It also makes the camera feel much sturdier.I have seen a few reviews that complain about the fitting. I have not had that problem. The connection is seemless for me, and there is no shimmy what-so-ever when I have a 70-300 lens attached with the camera on a tripod. So maybe this accessory was optimized for the XT?I love the extra shutter button as well, it makes taking picture in the portrait orientation EXTREMELY comfortable and easy. The buttom is almost exactly the same as the actual shutter on the camera as well, which makes it easy to go from button to button.After reading all the hype on this accessory, I forced myself to buy it, and I was not dissapointed! I recommend it to anyone using the XT. Buy it now or else</review_text>
Although people had problems with the first generation of this grip, I've been completely satisfied with mine. Recently, I've been shooting with a 300 2.8L, and it would be much more difficult without the extra length the grip ads to the body. Similarly, the second set of buttons for vertical shooting makes a big difference, too. (One note: when shooting vertical, it is hard to actuate the thumb wheel and impossible to use the joy stick--which  I do frequently to change focus points--without moving my right hand.) By holding two batteries, the grip also keeps me from worrying about running out of juice during high volume shooting sessions.The grip still has a little flex in it, but I've never had any of the power problems that I've read about here and elsewhere</review_text>
I recently purchased this for use with my 550EX. If you use alot of flash for event photography, you will want this in your kit. It is expensive, but I think it is worth every penny. It will keep you from changing AAs in your strobe and it quickens the recycle times to nearly instant. You can shoot bursts and still get the proper flash exposure. You can attach a strap to sling it over your shoulder or slip it on your belt. Mounting on my 20D was just not comfortable. It gets in the way of the hand-grip</review_text>
I'm very happy with the product and would recommend it to my friends.Your service is also excellent</review_text>
Recycle times fantastic.Batteries seem to last forever.Much less expensive than the alternatives</review_text>
Yes, it's overpriced, just like any specialty item. And yes, the screw attachment to the bottom of the camera is useless. But when you need fast recycle times or hundreds of flashes at a go, the CP-E3 is invaluable. You can strap the case to a light stand or flash bracket, and the coiled cord length is adequate for these uses. I use the elegantly compact Really Right Stuff flash bracket which has no place to attach the CP-E3, so the battery back without its case slips into my shirt or pants pocket. The case could also be strapped to your belt.The unit is a little weighty with 8 rechargeable AA batteries aboard, and I'd hate to see how many pieces this plastic gizmo would break into if I dropped it on a hard surface. On the top is a tunnel for a strap to hang it from something, and a strap should have been included. I made a loop from some hiking boot shoelaces (from which I also make zipper pulls) and I hang it from a knob on a light stand when shooting with a studio set-up.Without the short recycle times the CP-E3 allows, my 580EX flash would have gotten only one shot of my daughter bowing after playing her piece at a piano recital. Instead, I got three. Decide for yourself how important that kind of thing is</review_text>
Got this for my 580EX flashes for shooting weddings.  Works great and recycle times are excellent. It will last an entire event filled with 2500mAH batteries</review_text>
I'm using the CPE3 with my 20D and 580EZ.  I'm shooting over 500 wedding flash shots before I notice any slow down in the recyle time.  Recycle is about 3 seconds after a full discharge and hardley noticeable for anything less.  I am using "Digital" brand 2200 mAh NI-MH  batteries.  The Pack uses 8 batteries to recharge the flash capicitor while the 4 batteries in the flash are running the flash electronics.  I am very happy this combination.  By the way I'm using the Stroboframe Pro-RL flash bracket and it great.  The battery pack of the CPE3 straps right to the bracket</review_text>
I bought this because I needed top recycle speed from my 550EX flash unit without spending a huge bundle.  I shoot karate demos with my EOS Rebel digital, lots of fast action in a rather large space (meaning many full power flashes).  With the digital Rebel set to ISO800 mode and the flash set to +1 stop exposure I can adequately cover the action in a basketball court sized gymnasium.  Using this battery pack with 2000MaH AA sized batteries (about 6.50 for a set of 4 at walmart) I've taken over 400 pictures with no slow down in cycle speed.This particular pack uses 8 AA cells and is compatible with Lithium ion cells.  The older version of this unit used 6 cells I believe, and was not compatible with Lithium ion batteries.The unit is very simple.  A box with a light on it, a space for a strap (though none is included) a slide out battery tray with locking button and of course the connector with a coiled cord that hooks into the side of the flash unit.  I'm sure they do it for reasons of resistance, but the cord is kinda short, thus limiting you to where you can hang the battery package.  If your tripod socket is free they do include a screw designed to mount the battery package to the bottom of the camera (kinda useless if you ask me). The battery box comes with a fairly nice padded nylon case that includes a velcro strap, this is what I use to hang the battery package from a camera or bag strap and it works fine.  Eventually I'll get around to finding something I can use for a strap as that will worry me less (with 8 batteries in this thing it's a bit heavy to be trusted to velcro if you ask me).The unit works the way it's intended but I think the price is exhorbitant for a hunk of plastic, the price should be about half what it is.  If you can't go all-out and buy the top end with the rechargeable battery or a true professional (what they used to call 512) battery package then this is enough for most of us</review_text>
I am not a professional photographer, but I wanted high quality lenses to go with my Canon 10D (which I may upgrade soon).  I researched for over a month before purchasing this lens, and I have not been disappointed.  I only wanted to carry around two lenses, so I purchased this one, and the Canon-EF 17-40mm f/4L USM Ultrawide Zoom Lens. I have found this combination works very well for me.  My uses include photographing landscapes, wildlife, sports events, and my family.  The speed and quietness of the autofocus is outstanding, and the zoom doesn't compromise the quality of the prints.  Even though the price is high, you really do get what you pay for in lenses.</review_text>
I love EF 70-200 f/4L USM Telephoto Zoom lens. The price is right, super quality of pictures in color and contrast. It is light weight about 1.5 pounds in comparing with its siblings, 70-200 f/2.8 with or without IS (about 3.5 pounds).I am think about to buy the new model 70-200 f/4L with IS. With IS, I can take pictures in lower light conditions, which I could not do it with my 70-200 f/4L.</review_text>
My first L lens.  Very sharp and solid build. With Canon DR and Amazon GC, you can get it in lower $400!!</review_text>
At first, I had a selection of third-party lenses. Nothing bad, just none that were spectacular. I was somewhat disappointed in the shots I got. Then I bought the 85/1.8 and saw the contrast and colors I was expecting. Since then, I've bought several Canon lenses and this one is my latest.Like the title says, WOW. My first shots were in the house and around it and at all apertures and zoom lengths, the shots are simply incredible. Just fantastic sharpness - no PS USM needed! The colors are real and vibrant and the contrast is sharp and clear.This (and my 24-105/4L) is what lenses SHOULD be. Well built, solid and great glass. Sure, you do pay more. And you could enhance your shots with PS. But to see the results from these lenses vs the cheaper alternatives, you'll see what you spent all that money for!I'm sold on Canon</review_text>
This is a great lens, amazingly sharp. Only thing I would say is if I had the money the 2.8 IS version would be even better and certainly something I'll consider as an upgrade in the future.Use a fast shutter speed or mono/tripod with this thing. Anything below 250/sec gets to be a problem at 200mm</review_text>
Like the Canon EF 17-40 f4L USM, this is it's sister and $100 cheaper to boot!Excellent images at f4!  Outstanding images at f9.  A lightweight combination with the Canon 5D.  An even lighter and more compact combination with the Canon Digital Rebel XT.The only gripe I have is having to purchase the optional and expensive tripod collar ring.  The ring does add a bit of noticeable weight.Since I am not a steady shooter, I will be upgrading to the Canon EF 70-200 f4L IS USM when it is available in November this year.  At least the tripod collar ring should fit on the newer weathersealed lens.</review_text>
Like many people my decision on a telephoto zoom lens came down to buying the Canon 70-200mm f/4L or the Canon 70-300mm f/4-5.6 IS USM. The trade offs seemed clear at first. The former performs slightly better (see Canon website for MTF data), is better designed & built, is faster and has the "L" lens status. User comments and ratings (at more than one site) are slightly more favorable for the L lens. The 70-300mm has an improved IS and of course a longer focal length. Both cost about the same so money was not a factor in my decision.I eventually decided on the L lens and was initially disappointed. Photos ranged from wonderful to not very good at all. In fact, I almost returned the lens. Eventually I figured out the problem. My yard is heavily shaded so most of the initial photo's were taken in low light and I had selected shutter speeds that were too slow. To avoid camera shake you need to shoot at the reciprocal of the focal length or faster. Sounds simple but with the Digital Rebel XT (which I was using) you need to consider the camera's 1.6 multiplication factor. So at 200mm you need a shutter speed of 1/320 or faster not 1/200 like I initially thought. Once I made the speed adjustment things changed for the better.Still I have some mixed feelings about my decision. When the light is good this is a fantastic lens but with the IS feature offered on the 70-300mm I would probably get photos that I will miss with this lens.I can't fault the performance of this lens for its limitations and I have given it 5 stars. In other words it does what it is supposed to do very well but my message to other buyers is to consider where you are most likely to use the lens before buying. Remember IS becomes increasingly important as you extend the focal length. If your camera is already extending it by a factor of 1.6 you may find IS a very attractive feature.(Note the 70-300mm has a recall on certain model numbers because of problems when using the lens in a portrait position.) By the way, I purchased from Amazon and it was a flawless transaction</review_text>
I agree with the previous review.  The deluxe blower brush just left more dirt in the camera because the hair of the brush is falling out</review_text>
This is the lens I use most often. It is unbeatable for portraits and low-light photos indoors etc. It is very sharp and relatively light and small. I have also found it useful for aerial photography. I used to have the 50 mm 1.8 but upgraded because I like the extra low-light power of the 1.4 (which I often use) and the one-touch USM manual focus with distance scale (which is just a nice-to-have). That said, the 1.8 is a great lens too</review_text>
This is a wonderful lens with great image quality, very fast, and very good build quality.  No complaints</review_text>
What can you say, other than it's 4 times cheaper than the 50f1.2L.  Not an L, but a great bright fast quiet lens, small and optically superb.  On a crop camera it's a 80mm portrait lens.  Super</review_text>
This lens is great. I've been doing portraits and just random snapshots and it makes every picture beautiful! The only downside is the lack of ability to zoom. Other than that it's a great lens</review_text>
After reading a number of on-line reviews, I bought this lens a few weeks ago straightly for its low-light photography capability.What I have gotten is a little more than I have bargained for.  The pictures it produces have made a casual hobbyist like myself look like a pro, at least in the admiring eyes of unsuspecting acquaintances.  Now only if I have the heart to mumble-jumble a few far-fetched jargons, I might have a new packing order firmly in place.  When paired with my Rebel XTi, the 80mm effective focal length and wide apertures make it an ideal portrait lens.  It is also compact, light-weigh and solidly built, has fast and acurate auto-focus, and most importantly, has superb optical qualities.  The best part is I have gotten these without breaking the bank nor does it break my neck hauling it around.However, despite its low-light capability, the very attributes that make this lens outstanding for portraits, i.e., narrow angle of view and shallow depth of field at wide apertures, make it an odd choice for in-door group photos.  Also if you are taking action shots, the 80mm focal length may not be long enough to provide a safe distance to avoid mishaps.  Instead of being a distal observer, I have found myself an unwilling participant in the middle of the action ducking the camera from the ever-curious tongues of my Golden Retriever and her playmates.  No wonder zoom lenses are so popular.What else is there not to like about this lens?  Not much unless you are a proud owner of one mammoth of an expensive L prime lens.  Well, it does come with a free hood and that wonderful soft leather pouch, doesn't it</review_text>
The lens is great!  I'm using it on my EOS 20D, and the shots are beautiful.  At the wide open setting (1.4), the depth of field is amazing and provides an absolutely outstanding boquet.  This lens is definitely worth the difference in price over the 1.8.  The boquet is much better. A little advice:  avoid using the auto focus on your camera when using this lens... its too easy to catch any little thing in front or behind what you are intending to focus on, and you WILL see a difference, with just a small difference in depth.  Manually, the lens will provide you with perfect shots every time!  And its well worth the extra few seconds to make sure the shot is composed correctly</review_text>
The latest 50 f/1.4 EF lens is the best performing chunk of glass that any photographer can buy for anywhere near the price. Granted, the 50 1.8 lens is awesome for it's dirt cheap price, but it is outclassed by the f/1.4 in all respects.Others have already raved about the virtues of this cheap (not really) lens, so I'll just agree with with the strong points, and lay out the broad picture on an open table.First, the 50 f/1.8 is usually a fine lens. It is dirt cheap, has better quality control than anything built by Sigma, and is super light weight. That being said, it does have issues with lens to lens quality, it is "only f/1.8", has a plastic lens mount, and is pretty slow in AF.The 50 f/1.4, on the other hand, can darn near allow you to see in the dark through the viewfinder, can focus in total darkness with the right shoe mount flash, records tack sharp images at most all apertures, has great contrast, is light in weight, small in size, has a metal lens mount, and is pretty cheap to buy.It is NOT an L lens in construction, yet it offers L lens optical quality. It does have a USM, but it is the "old style" USM, and is not as fast as the modern ring type USM lenses. Still, it is very fast, it beats the speed of the throw away f/1.8 lens to death, and is pretty darn quiet. Also, despite the majority plastic build, and lack of distance data for E-TTL II flashes (the f/1.8 also lacks this feature) the f/1.4 lens does offer a very responsive full time manual focus ring that works like a charm for manual focus, or just touch up in difficult auto focus situations.This lens is all that, and everyone should own it as their first lens. Zoom lenses included in body/lens kits are just plain junk (sorry), but this lens will stay in your camera kit for decades, no matter what camera body is in your future.People who are using 1.6 crop factor cameras like the 20D, 30D, and Rebel line should bear in mind that the 50 f/1.4 lens is effectively an 80 mm f/1.4 lens when mounted on their cameras. That makes the 50 f/1.4 an awesome portrait lens, and the aperture and diaphragm design of the f/1.4 make it unbeatable for capturing shallow depth of field shots with pleasingly blurred backgrounds.As fine a lens as the 50 mm f/1.8 really is, it cannot begin to compare to the 50 mm f/1.4 lens in terms of functionality. Buy this lens today, and it will be with you until the end, no matter what Canon body you use in the future. If you use a 1.6 crop factor camera today, this lens will become a favorite, and the best 80 mm portrait lens you have ever owned.As always, use it with the factory lens hood at all times (only about twenty five bucks), and use a UV filter that is multi coated on both surfaces at all times. Anyone who suggests that you use a cheap filter is steering you down the wrong path. No matter what lens you buy, always use a UV filter that is built at least as well as your lens. Cheap filters, and filters that are not multi coated on both surfaces are just plain garbage. The shame of it is that even Canon offers garbage filters for cheap, and many people who spend hundreds of Dollars on a lens claim that "If it's good enough for Canon, it's good enough for me". Nonsense. A cheap filter is just that. A good lens with a cheap filter might impress, but a good lens with a great filter WILL impress. Don't fall into the cheap trap</review_text>
When I worked as a photojournalist many years ago, 50mm was the "standard" lens in that it came closest to a real world perspective, especially for street photography. That is no longer always true because of the field-of-view crop of many cameras. Canon's popular digital Rebel and its successors, for example, have a 1.6X view that turns a 50mm lens into an 80mm lens. The 1D MARK II has a 1.3X view that makes it a 65mm lens.So, if you're looking for a standard lens today, 35mm probably is closer to the mark on those cameras. And Canon has a couple of options there - a 35 f/1.4 that is great and expensive and a 35 f/2 that is a good value at about $250.If you're still looking for a 50mm, however, there now are four options from Canon: 50/1.2, 50/1.4, 50/1.8 and 50/2.5. Here are the pros and cons of each:50/1.2 is the newest, fastest and the most expensive at about $1,600. It is an "L" lens, which means it is more durably constructed than any of the others. The image quality is a cut above all of the others, especially at wider apertures. If money is no object, you'll probably want this one. But most of the rest of us have to ask the question whether it's 5X better than the 1.4.50/1.4 is maligned by some for the softness of its images at f/1.4, but for me its a good, compact, low-light lens at a terrific price ($325). And the lens gets sharp quickly as you stop it down. It's sharp at f/2 and very sharp by f/2.8 with good contrast and colors.50/1.8 is a step down from the 1.4 in speed, image quality, build quality and the smoothness and noise of its autofocus. But it is a big step up in value - a decent lens for about $80. If you're just getting into digital photography, this is a great lens to learn on until you get a better feel for the lenses that you want/need.50/2.5 - this is a macro lens, although you can use it for general photography, too. I wouldn't recommend it. If you're doing macro photography, spend a little more for the 100/2.8, which is a sharper lens that gives you more subject distance. If you're looking for a standard lens, you'll appreciate the wider aperture of the 1.4.All that said, of the 50mm Canon lenses, I think the 50/1.4 still offers the best mix of image quality and value.</review_text>
This is an awesome lense, especially for the money. I would still purchase this one. There is nothing second rate about it.   However,   Canon has a new L series version on their website as does B & H photo.  It is a 50 mm NORMAL  EF  f/1.2 L USM   for   1599. 00. I heard of photographers who shoot whole weddings with this one 3 hundred dollar lens 50mm lens.</review_text>
This monopod is very sturdy and easy to set up. I was looking for a monopod that was capable of handling the weight of my large Canon lens (over 3 lbs), and this one does the job very well. I mainly use it for taking soccer pictures, and so far, I'm very pleased. I highly recomend it</review_text>
This is a very good product, the price is cheap, come with the bag which is a plus, if you are looking for a cheap but sturdy monpod, this is the right one, highly recommanded</review_text>
Sure, this isn't a pro mono pod and it doesn't have a mobile head but for the money it's great. Easily holds my Olympus E1 with 50-200mm lens. Great as a walking stick as well. Stores tight and light.Highly recommend this product. I may just get a back up</review_text>
I use this monopod for my pentax optio w20 camera and for a panasonic video camera. I use it when camping and it doubles as a sturdy walking stick. When I'm out in the wilds people think it's a walking stick until they see my small camera perched on top of it.It has really improved my ability to stay steady and blur free with my new pentax which has no optical viewfinder. I like the quick adjustment legs as opposed to screw type.I've also used this tripod to stick my video camera out of my sunroof to cruise through New England to catch the Autumnal leaves while driving which has given some interesting results. I plan to do the same thing on Rt 1 to film the big sur highway.The only thing I need to get is a ball head to adjust the angle of the camera.For the price this was a steal and a hearty deal</review_text>
The Optika MP100 Pro Photo Monopod is surprisingly sturdy, functional and well-made.  It is supplied with a reasonably decent quality zippered nylon case with carrying strap.  No, it is not "professional grade", but it is something every amateur photographer can use for weekend shooting.  I've used it both with digital still and camcorder, where it offers respectable improvement in long-distance shots (versus trying to hold the camera still, or propping it up on the roof of the car, a not-nearby-enough fence post, and so on.)  Certainly a LOT handier than the old tripod!  I bought two, keeping them ready-for-action in the trunk of my cars.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Price went up!!! Great value for money spent. Will be buying a "Ball" attachment for better adjustability. Got some great steady shots with 48x digital zoom with the Canon S2 I</review_text>
Good quality, particularly for the amazing price. Sturdy, well-made, and even the case is nice. Pops open in a second, collapses just as easily.Keep in mind that fully collapsed it's wider than a standard backpack, so if you lash it under a backpack it will be awkward. But the strap on the carrying case makes it easy to loop the monopod and carry it vertically</review_text>
The MP100 has served us well since getting it 2 months ago. Like other reviewers, I wasn't expected a whole lot after being disappointed by a $40 monopod made for those well under 6 feet tall. Quite stable, usable as a walking stick, easier to reset height than competition under $50 with twist-lock legs. This monopod definitely exceeded my expectations!Seems to be a niche here for a higher priced version with a pan/tilt head, but I had a 30yr old Leica table top tripod pan/tilt head and the combination works great!On balance, can't be beat even if all you order is the MP100 and pay $6 or so s/h!For use at the beach or where dirt and grit is in the air, you'll want to wipe down the legs before collapsing (cloth used for gun   storage work great) or you may have grit in the legs and scratching the MP100 legs in subsequent use.</review_text>
This camera is SO user friendly and versatile! With the 8 megapixel resolution, the pics are sharp and clear! Honestly the best camera I've ever had!! A GREAT buy for the cost for all of us non-professional users</review_text>
I have to say that is an excellent purchase. I'm a fan of my P880 camera.Wide Angle Len, a feature included, allows to take great panoramic views, with no efforts. The manual optical zoom is great, gives you a control of the picture that i never had with a comercial digital camera.One of my favorites features is the zoom for reviewing the picture, is a 10X zoom and you can check detailed the picture in the LCD screen as in your PC.The 8 Megapixels, allows you to see with great precision minimal details that usually you don't see.Is a great experience, when you take a picture,return home, and the picture is better than your memory.I'm still learning about the other features, but rigth now i think that has a great performance-value relation, and most important, allow my to have photos with a professional touch,.From the South Of the WorldCarolina</review_text>
Great affordable camera, that takes very nice pictures.</review_text>
The Kodak P880 is a remarkable bargain that produces astonishing photos.  With its 8 megapixels and zoom lens it operates like more expensive SLR's.The quality of the photos, even at the highest zoom, is astounding.  For anyone interested in an easy to operate, high quality camera, this is the one</review_text>
I bought my camera a few months ago, so I have had a chance to figure out most of its features, not all lol, but I consider that a good thing (extra features means more messing around with it ^-^. Well anyways it is an excellent camera, it does all of the things I want it too, and its half the price of a Rebel. The video it takes is amazing and can record till there is no space  on the SD card. For me I have a SanDisk 1g SecureMemory SD Card and I can take about 27 minutes on it which is plenty. And about 38 secounds on the 38mb internal drive. I can take about 329 pictures on the 1g SD and about  10 on the internal. The battery is great on it, I have used it countless hours and havent gotten one bar to go down, so about 2-3 days of use will run it down. So I asume about 8-10 hours. I have never had it die on me, with out me intentually letting it (I guess its better to let the battery run out and then charge it) The focus and zoom feature is fun to play with on the camera and comes in really handy (for the extra zoom there is the zoom button on the top left of the camera, so you really dont need to buy one of those cameras with the 10x) What else? Well the manual features (the biggest reason I got the camera)so play with the ap., iso, and shutter speed they are so fun to mess with, even the hue of the photo which I didnt expect to like, I actually got off really good shots with. The auto features come in handy too, just click and shoot! Macro is a neat feature, get in close its amazing and your shots will be beautiful! Screen is good to, with a crowd around me most can still see the image on the screen (I take video's of my boyfriend and friends sparing)The Mic is on top, it does its job (when its windy you can actually block the wind without even knowing because your hand while on the "on,off-shoot" button covers it (good design)Uploads pic quickly on computer and deleting picutres is extremely quick and easy. The af (auto-focus), focus, and ae are easy to get to for quick fixs other then the focus on the front of the camera. And flash does good. Well I hope my long drawn out review was helpful. I hope you enjoy your camera. I will shortly be purchasing a smaller camera for v-logs possible a canon sd630. But YES DO BUY THE KODAK P880 the mega-pix are simply amazing</review_text>
Bought by P880 about a month ago. I am a sem-pro outdoor adventure photographer and I use Nikon 35mm film equipment for the most part. I shoot slide film on my F90s Nikon. I had a 5mp Kodak digital camera but wanted to upgrade to a better digital camera but I could not justify buying a Nikon D50 or D70s as they are only 6mp. And I didn't want to drop 2 grand on a D200. So I looked in the mid-range camera lines. After doing MUCH research, I decided to buy this camera. So far I am happy I did. I have taken it hiking several times, enough that I know its a good camera but of course its a toy compared to pro Nikon film cameras. But I knew that when I bought it. I wanted to have a good camera to take lots of "documentary", "fun" and "travel" shots. For the really powerful stuff I will still shoot slide film. But its too expensive to shoot with extensively!Here's my initial impressions based on the perspective of an outdoor photosgrapher:The Good:1) Fairly easy to hold as its tall and has an actual grip.2) Lightweight (but of course at the expense of impact resistance I'm sure...)3) Great set of manual controls! This is the best part. Autobracket is good as is the interval timer which is great for self-potraits. You can walk far away from the camera and get yourself in the shot (great for solo hikers).4) Large 2.5" LCD makes it easy to check out your photos5) Image quality seems pretty good (although not comparable to a high-res. scan of a slide).6) The manual zoom is great! Much better than power zooms in almost all other cameras.7) The 24mm focal length is simply amazing! Great for landscapes and outdoor adventure shots.8) The battery life is great. Shot 250 or so pics on a full charge and that included a lot of playing around with the menus, reviewing photos, etc. I just boughta second Kodak battery on Amazon for $16!9) Built in flash is pretty powerful and you can add a shoe mount unit as well.10) 8mp of resolution for the price of a 6mp camera.The not so good:1) Seems to write to the card pretty slowly. Definately not for action shots! Maybe this would improve if I bought a faster SD card.2) The "toggle" button on the back for navigating through the menues worries me. Seems like it could break someday. I am gentle with it. Wish they would create a more durable feeling toggle.3) The LCD viewfinder is hard to see on a bright sunny day. This is where a film camera is WAY better. Optical viewfinders cannot be beat.4) The in screen manual focus is no good at all. Better just focus with your eyes.5) Wish they would have made the handgrip a little grippier by adding a rubber stip or the like. Is a little slippery in the hands (always use a neck strap!)In all I highly recommend this camera. If they were to improve upon some of the items for which I have some critisism, I would easily give this camera a perfect review!!Good luck with your purchas</review_text>
This was the third 8 meg SD camera I tried - it was the only one that without using a tripod indoors gave me sharp, crisp pictures most of the time.  The zoom was smaller that the Fuji or the Panasonic, but the color saturation and sharpness were heads and shoulders above the others.  Excellent camera that shoots jpg, tiff and raw</review_text>
This is my second "L" lens the other being 70-200L f4 and both are exceptional. If you are looking for professional results you will need good equipment used within it's limits.</review_text>
This is my favorite lens. I could not carry the heavier long range teles, and it was a hard decision for me. In the end, I chose this because it was lighter than the zooms.Having previouly used the 75-300 IS zoom, I was leary of getting another 300mm prime, because I may miss the 70-300 range of shooting. But the clarity and colors are so true for this 300 prime, I don't look back.Easy to handle, not so bulky. Fast, impressive photos. Even when I add a 1.4 teleconverter shooting in the 500mm range on my 20D. I use the f4 alot, no problem, great clarity. Awesome lens for the price</review_text>
I got this lens for shooting architecture from a distance--an unsual application. I've also found myself using it to shoot kids soccer games. It's super sharp and very fast focusing. I haven't done formal tests at all apertures, but images appear vivid and contrasty at a range of settings. Online reviews rank this lens very highly and my own experience supports those findings.The Image Stabilization seems to work very well, although be sure to turn it off if you're using a tripod--I've found that it can reduce image quality if you forget to turn it off in that application.For shots where you'll be standing around a lot with the lens to your eye, ready for a shot, it gets kind of heavy to carry. If you're shooting sports, you might want to consider a monopod. For other applications, its weight is low enough not to be too big of a problem.It comes with a canvas-like case that includes a loop you can use to attach it to your belt. I've found this works pretty well out in the field, particularly when combined with a photo-vest. The case also can be carried with a neck strap, but this gets in the way of your camera strap and is also thin, so it kind of cuts into your shoulder.As I write this, the Amazon site has a link for 58mm filters for this lens. It takes 77mm filters</review_text>
This filter works great.  I have used this filter on a Nikon 18-70mm lens and have produced excellent pictures.  I have yet to experience any flare with this polarizer.  Great polarizer for a great price</review_text>
Other than the months of waiting for Nikon to deliver them to Amazon for shipping, the battery itself in a good deal.  They work well, charge up easy and hold their charge nicely.  Priced well, they cost less than the same type battery than Canon or Sony.  I bought them for a D80 and the older En-EL3a would not fit.  Of course I had 10 of the older batteries for my D70s and was rather surprised when they didn't fit the D80.  Basically the same size and shape, but keyed differently.  I was also surprised to find the 3e WOULD fit in the D70s, meaning they are backward compatable.</review_text>
This is the real thing. It seems to be impossible to get anywhere and I got it overnight from Amazon. Wow</review_text>
This battery is backwards compatible with the D50, D70/70s, and is used in the D80 and D200.  So if you have any Nikon DSLR and want a second battery, you want to get this one so that when you upgrade your camera you can use the battery.This battery has built-in circuitry that tells you the actual charge status of the battery, and it is accurate.  This is a big deal; *if you are using the D200 or D80* it lets you know when your really do need to switch batteries or charge up.  This is the first battery I've seen that is accurate in this regard.  Kudos to Nikon. (This feature does not work in the D50/70/70s but the battery otherwise works fine)</review_text>
This review is from personal experience.  I recently picked up a D200 to replace my D70.  This past weekend I took the photos for my sister's wedding.  I shot with full functionality using LCD review for every shot and was using the Nikon 18-200 VR lens.  Over the course of the wedding and reception I took 295 photos in Fine JPEG mode and reviewed them while shooting.  At the end of the afternoon, I still had battery life left and very likely could have taken 100 more photos.  Given the features and capability of the D200, I have absolutely no issue with that many photos.  I will pick up a second battery for a back up as soon as someone has some in stock.And I could not agree more with the previous reviewer.  If you do not have personal experience with this product, there is no need to attempt to review it based on hearsay or something you might have read elsewhere</review_text>
I used my new Nikon D200 this past weekend at a Renaissance Faire in high heat, and the EL3e performed like a champ (as did the camera itself).  I couldn't believe that I got through three full days of picture-taking (using fill flash after five pm or so) on one battery charge.  I finally ran out of juice late on the third day, after approximately 500 exposures.(One caveat: I don't use auto-focus.  At all.  Ever.  So, you know, YMMV.</review_text>
I have owned the Canon 10D but could never get used to the "cropped" view from the limited sensor. I barely used that camera over 3 yrs of ownership, preferring to shoot with my film Nikon. With the 5D, the full field of view is back. The "sweep" one feel in framing a picture through this camera is just marvelous. The images (with "L" lenses) are just stupendous. Arguably better than film. This is the first camera less than $6000.00 to be every bit as good as film. I highly recommend it if you are a serious amatuer or professional photographer</review_text>
This camera is amazing. I have been a canon user for many years, upgrading as I go.  I can not think right now of a camera they could come out with to make me want to upgrade from the 5D.  This will certainly be my camera for some time to come</review_text>
This is an excellent camera.  I upgraded from the EOS 20D which was also a great camera.  I upgraded for a couple of reasons.  The first was the Full Frame sensor.  The EOS 20D has a 1.6X crop factor which effects your lenses overall focal length.  On the EOS 5D you get the true focal length of your attached lens.  Just like film SLR cameras.  Awesome!  The one problem I've noticed with the Full Frame sensor on the EOS 5D is it is huge.  When you are changing lenses this sensor picks up every little piece of dust, dirt and fibers like a vacuum. I'm constantly cleaning the sensor with a blower.  I also had to bring it to a Canon service center. Just to remove some of the dust off the sensor that my blower could not remove.  The Canon service center was very far from my home.  (Very annoying).  I never experienced this problem with the EOS 20D.  But, the images you get from the full frame sensor are far superior to the smaller sensor on the EOS 20D.The other reason I upgraded was the larger LCD.  The 2.5' LCD screen is a nice plus.  The images look bright and sharp.Overall I love this camera.  Build, features and image quality are excellent!!!</review_text>
After 3 decades as a Nikon 35mm film 'loyalist', a co-worker let me test drive his Canon 5D, Canon EF 16-35mm f2.8L USM and SanDisk Extreme III 2 GB card.Viewing the images on his LCD computer screen helped me decide to sell almost everything Nikon (I kept their SB-800 flash for wireless slave setups) and switch to the established DSLR leader, Canon.  Finally, no more heavy and bulky Nikon F5 and having to pay and wait for film processing!  No more scanning negatives for hours each night!I've owned the 5D, Canon EF 17-40mm f4L USM, Canon EF 70-200mm f4L USM with tripod collar and Canon Speedlite 580EX for about 3 months and have taken over a thousand RAW and large JPEG images in ISO's ranging from 50 to 3200.  (Note:  4 weeks ago, a backup Canon Digital Rebel XT black body was added for the 70-200.)The 5D's image quality stunned every person I have given 4" x 6" and 8.5" x11" colour and monochrome images to.  Credit must be given to Canon's Digital Photo Professional (DPP) RAW processing software, Canon's i9900 bubblejet printer, Canon paper and Canon ink.  I rarely have to use Adobe Photoshop CS2 anymore because of DPP's quick-to-use tools.The above 5D and any one of the lenses with flash fits nicely into a Tamrac Velocity 7 bag.  The larger Velocity 9 bag will fit the entire 2 body with lenses and flash kit.The only negative about the camera is the closed compact flash card gate moves slightly along it's hinge giving the body a less than solid feel.  The Digital Rebel XT does not have this issue and therefore feels more solid.A built-in flash would have been nice but not absolutely necessary.  Unlike the superb Nikon SB-800, Canon's 580EX is a bit chunky but does it's job wonderfully.The low noise images at ISO's above 800 can easily be removed with DPP or Photoshop.  Photoshop goes a step further by removing colour artefacts which lowers the saturation of the image.  Meaning saturation would have to be increased after noise removal.Bottom line:  If you believe that it costs Canon more to manufacturer a full-frame CMOS image sensor and don't mind spending several months salary on the 5D, go for it!  Also, choose your lenses carefully.  Canon L lenses go well with the 5D.</review_text>
If you've been considering a digital full frame camera (and who hasn't?) this is the one that doesn't cost an arm and a leg.  Now that Kodak is out of the picture, your choices are the EOS 5D or the 1DS Mark II, which costs more than twice as much.You do have to give up a few things, such as a super-fast frame rate for continuous shooting, but the 5D has the resolution you need for top-quality images, and the ability to get true wide angle perspectives from your EF lenses.  I happened to shoot this camera at a concert side-by-side with a vendor "N" camera, both under available light with 85mm f/1.8 lenses at a range of ISOs.  I found some shots I liked from the other camera, shot at ISO 400, and comparable shots from the 5D which, to my surprise, turned out to be exposed at ISO 3200.  The 5D absolutely lives up to its low noise reputation.  But don't take my word for it, try one out for yourself</review_text>
THE CON:I've own this now for 6 months, i shoot weddings & portraits. I did alot of tests, especially the picture modes.Well don't waste your time with these, their all bad, with theexception of the landscape. You'll just end up using the Standardmode for best all arround shooting. The venetting does accure arround the edges, mostly in low light.Worst of all is the color ballance or White ballance in Auto mode. For what ever reason it has a hard time. My D60 out performs it here big time, not sure why. So you may have to shoota grey card to get your White ballance more accurate.THE PROS:Quality of the pic is excellent, color saturation is awsome.Blow up of 2'x3' was excellent detail, no noise.I've found the focus of mine to be real good, no problems here.Ease of use after learning curve becomes easy, just read the manuel.CONCLUSION:I would buy again except for that AWB problem. Now i have owned both the D60 and the 10D and neither seemed to have this problem as bad. I use this mode when doing weddings because I'm always on the move and go from one differn't light sorce to another inbetween shots (Tungsten to Daylight).I still think Canon is the best and will alway buy their products</review_text>
While the 5D may be less expensive than the so-called professional grade, the camera is more oriented toward the Pro end than the 20D (or 30D) with fewer of dial settings but more capability.  Others have covered some other areas, so I'll try to avoid repetition.The full frame makes a great deal of difference to me. I like to print large images and I like to use L or other higher end Canon lenses (with a couple of knockoffs). There's no tradeoff in weight of consequence or compactness. The truth is that I prefer the recent glass that isn't computed for the smaller sensor.I liked the 20D, a lot, and most of my gear carries over to the 5D. I now have three cameras that take the same card and battery. The 5D if anything feels and looks more rugged that the 20D while being very compact.But the pictures? Great. The 20D was and is a first rate camera at 8.2 and its ability to use all Canon lenses, plus the EF-S for the smaller digital image.One person cited slowness over the 20D. I won't disagree with that, but it isn't a big deal to me. I typically use the drive for bracketing on the fly, but almost never for anything just to do a fast sequence, e.g. sports. I've owned motorr drives going back to my days as a pro in the 60s and 70s and they have their uses. Esssential sometimes.But they are like autofocus. On occasion, you need to be manual. Whenever  possible, I prefer to single shot or on occasion, a three shot burst. I find there's less chance of missing what I'm shooting.The "Decisive Moment" too often falls between the frames on motor driving.  But that's to everyone's taste. I really am impressed with the camera and having tried it, look forward to a trip with it, with the trusty 20D as the second.</review_text>
Just got the 5D..traded in my 20D...the 5D is a more solid camera with a full frame sensor...pictures are great and it is easy to use if you are familiar with the Canon system...a little pricey, but worth it!!  You'll use it for years</review_text>
I switched from the Digital Rebel XT. Since I already had L-glass lenses, I didn't run into problems with the 5D "exposing" cheaper lenses. The 17-40mm really shines on the full sensor! The burst rate is simply astonishing. Missing flash doesn't bother me, heck it's a $3000 camera, I don't expect a built-in flash. I have the Speedlite 580EX, which of course is wonderful in itself. I also have the battery grip which I recommend, as well as the RS-80N3 cable release. Image quality is superb overall - the 5D REALLY shines in high ISO numbers - more so than even the 1D from what I've read. Even at 1600 there's hardly any noise. It allows you to take great, crisp photos in low light where other cameras would require a flash.The camera also is quite light while being very sturdy at the same time. The 3 fps might bother some, but I prefer the incredible burst numbers.</review_text>
I will use this lens as a standard on my Rebel XT rather than the the 18-55mm lens that came with the camera. It gives much greater flexibility in outdoor shoots when I'm capturing my grandsons in action on the soccer field.</review_text>
For the price, this is an excellent lens.  On an APS sized sensor it is equivalent to 480mm at the long end.  Some complain about it being a slow lense since the max aperture at full zoom is 5.6  That just means you can't use it in low light and expect great results.  If you want a fast lense at that length, however, be prepared to pay a lot of money.  With the USM it focuses very fast.  Works well for outdoor sports.  My rating is based on what you get for the money.  Of course it's not as good as L glass but it's way less money</review_text>
I bought a Canon EOS 20D digital SLR and the Canon EF 75-300mm zoom lens to take photographs of my children's various sporting events.  The magnification factor of this lens is perfect for a variety of sporting events including lacrosse, basketball, swimming and gymnastics.  The focusing speed is very good for capturing action shots.  I highly recommend this lens as an affordable general purpose zoom lens</review_text>
This lens was all I anticipated and more. The auto focus fast and accurate. I gat stunning action shots</review_text>
There are no professionals or would-be professional  photographers in our house.  Instead we are ametuers who love to get fun shots of our friends and family.  We're not particularly interested in birds, flowers, bugs, race cars, etc.  We want to catch our kids doing what they love best; football, basketball, swimming, band, golf...My only advantage is that I am very experienced with Adobe Photoshop, which lets me creatively salvage some less-than-perfect shots.This year our son is a high-school senior.  Instead of buying an expensive portrait package, we voted to spend the money on a Canon Digital Rebel XT kit (with lens).  We choose one extra zoom lense (the 75-300mm f4-5.6 III USM Telephoto) for up-close action sports shots.  We didn't chose the IS lens because it was out of our price range.We are having great fun with this camera and lens.  We have already taken a variety of football game pictures using the 'basic' sports setting on the camera (burst mode at full zoom).  They are great - crisp and clear.  These have been taken in full sun.  We realize that we'll have to get a little more creative when we are taking pictures in lower light situations.  But I think we can do it.I would recommend this lens for anyone who just wants to capture some fun shots.  They might not be professional quality, but they are just what we wanted</review_text>
I have just begun my interest in photography and this was the first zoom lense I have ever bought.  The lense provided all that I could ever ask for.  I just got back from the zoo with the kids and the photographes are excellent</review_text>
Bought this lens a few months back and shot volleyball with it, occasionally used it for football when it got dark.What can I say or add to other reviews?? F/1.8 is great, although the lens is sharper at f/2 or 2.2. I use it near the wide open edge all the time - indoor gyms simply do not have much light.The USM autofocus is great - demoing it in the store, it seemed to nearly anticipate my actions. No rotating front filter, and it doesn't protrude, either. It's got a full time manual focus ring, so I don't have to worry about killing my autofocus  motor. In combination with c.Fn 4-1, this is killer.Why the four stars? Chromatic aberration at lower apertures. I do not know where it starts to go away, because I almost never shoot in good light. This was most apparent in a shot of a recent football game. Granted, the team's jerseys were white, and the background was the pitch black of an unlit parking lot, and I had to perform a 100% crop. Nevertheless, an alien-like purple halo surrounded the huddled offensive team. Oh well, you can't have it all!As for volleyball pics, this is the lens. I regularly shoot at f/2.2, ISO 1600, and 1/500, but I might change that soon because that is pushing it. The photos are pretty sharp and the USM definitely helps here. I bought this lens because my 50mm 1.8 just wasn't cutting it - I'd get shots with a tack sharp background and a beautifully bokeh'd subject - just the opposite of what it should be. Using the 85mm removed about 85% of those shots. There are still extreme instances when I swing my camera around and instantly shoot when the USM can't keep up, but there are other instances when I am amazed that it got the shot in focus. From the sidelines, 85mm is too long to get the outside hitter nearest to you, but that's why you move around! Shooting volleyball requires a strategy.The focal length is also good on my 350d for shooting events and staying a bit back from the subject.I'm overall pretty pleased with the lens. I can see what many people call this a "hidden L lens.</review_text>
I recently purchased this lens along with the 24-105mm as a part of the fall cash in with cannon rebate program.  So, originally, my main reason to get this lens was because it would save me another $50 off of the other lens via doubling the rebates and make it pretty cheap.  But now that I have used it for awhile, I am really happy that I got it.  The 1.8 maximum aperture does two things really well, lets you take low-light handheld shots and isolates the subject.  See my example photos for examples of both of these features.  I use this on the Canon Rebel XT and Rebel XTi which have a 1.6X crop factor and make this lens more like a 135mm which is good and bad depending on your usage.  This lens produces very sharp results and doesn't weigh much, so it is easy to carry around.  If you already have a good range of zoom lenses and are looking for something that will just take really nice, sharp, handheld shots, consider this lens</review_text>
All the reviews about this lens are all true.  It's a great lens.  I love the quality of it.  However, if you like to take in door photoes and don't have very big rooms, you might want to consider the 50mm f/1.4.  I mostly find my self backed up in a corner trying to take a picture at home</review_text>
This lens changed it all for me. I was happy with my Tamrons and Tokinas - I thought. Then I bought this lens. The colors and contrast simply POPPED out from the pics. It is amazing! While there's no red ring around it, it deserves one.The difference in the shots was incredible. It's very well built, focuses (like all Canon USM lenses) fast and quiet and provides the photog with truly beautiful bokeh. For low light, it's awesome. Using an extension tube for macro, it's great. And for portraits, it's nearly unbeatable.So what's the downside? For sure there is one: you'll be sold on Canon lenses. Since this one, I've bought five more, including two "L" series. If that's a downside, so be it!Just buy the lens - you'll love it</review_text>
I am really impressed with the results I get from this lens.This is my first USM lens and 85mm is new to me. It serves me really well taking people pictures outside - fantastic background blur and fast enough for low light indoor close ups.Full time manual focus is handy too at times. With my tamron 17-50, this lens is great combo for me</review_text>
bought this for my daughters karate tournements and i am very pleased with the quality of pictures i have gotten. this baby never comes off my xt</review_text>
I recently bought this lens amid trepidation that the 85mm focal length would overwhelm the x1.6 crop factor of my Digital Rebel XL. My worries were needless: just a step or two back from the subject plus some getting used to the telephoto perspective were enough to turn this lens into the most effective portrait lens that I have.  When attached to my EOS Elan 7n film camera, however, the lens really truly comes into its own, as the full frame 35mm SLR delivers the entire focal range of this lens.  The focused image is incredibly crisp compared to any other non-L grade lens.  And I agree that this lens deserves the red ring of courage around it, like the L lenses have.  This glass is absolutely essential in a very short list of affordable lenses, and should give many of the non-affordable ones a run for their money. Solidly built too, with an old-fashioned no-nonsense look to it.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
Not much to add on top of the other reviews. The only thing you should be aware of is that the depth of field at f/1.8 is paper thin, which is excellent for portraits, but requires perfect focussing.The bokeh (the structure of the background blur) is nothing short of great, easily competing with much more expensive lenses. Yes, it has "L" quality</review_text>
The answer is most likely yes; since its price make it the best value for a fast canon prime lens. But before you make the $350 plunge here are few useful things to know about how it can be used. Keep in mind that I use this lens on the Rebel XT (1.6 factor), which means it provides me with an angel of view similar to 135mm on film cameras.SHARPNESS: Yes that's one feature you can count on when buying this lens. This lens produces very sharp pictures. So much so that it will blow away your 18-55 kit lens (if you have one) and all other zoom lenses.  Exception to that are the L-series zooms. The sharpness difference will be obvious even in the smallest of prints (4 by 6). If you can't envision such difference then consider this. Sharpness can be viewed as contrast between the edges of different color objects. Hence, the sharper an image the greater the contrast in the edges between such groups of color. This lens captures the contrast in such setting better than most other lenses.SPEED: This lens is blazingly fast. As such you will have the opportunity to shoot at higher shutter speeds wide open (remember the inverse relation between aperture and shutter speed). More importantly you gain the ability to shoot in low light situations (concert for example) and still maintain a decent shutter speed for handholding. Here's the best part, if you're like most new people to photography, you probably plan to take self portraits. This lens will give you that ability, as you will be able to buy few clamp on lights coupled with 100-150W bulbs and start shooting at medium ISO speeds wide open.ANGEL OF VIEW: Assuming you will be using this lens on a 1.6 digital format consider that you will be having a tight crop, more like that of a 135mm lens on a film camera (1.6*85=136). What does that translate to in practical terms? You will have to stand 6-8 feet away from your subject to be able to cover their head and shoulders at landscape orientation.SPECIAL EFFECTS: Here are two special effects you will find useful in this lens depth of field and compression. To some degree or another every lens offers depth of field, which can be summarize as having only the subject of interest in focus and the rest of the picture blurred. This lens is unique in that it creates a very shallow depth of field in which the subject is truly isolated from the whole scene. Set the aperture to 1.8 and focus correctly and you can achieve such results. More importantly the lens quality of such blur (known as bokeh) is outstanding as there are eight diaphragm blades that control the aperture opening vs. 5 or 6 in many other lenses.As for compression, since the camera is a telephoto it will compress everything in its sight closer together to fit in its sight. For example, if you are photographing a person, their face will look wider and their nose will look smaller or flatter. Keep in mind that unlike some of the longer telephoto lenses (300mm for example) the effect with this lens is subtle and pleasantSIZE AND BUILD: Its size and weight are perfect! It balances my XT very nicely. So much so, that I can take pictures at very low shutter speeds with this combination (though I don't find my self doing that that often with this fast lens). All this translates to comfort and confidence when I am shooting with this lens. The build quality is excellent, I find no inherit weakness in the design.If you plan to photograph friends and family then this is the lens. You will take sharp pictures with the right kind of effects for portraits like compression and beautiful bokeh. The lens is fast and designed excellently for maximum control and comfort. You won't miss a shot because of shake with slow shutter speeds and even if you do (that's a big if) you can put its speed to use by dialing a higher aperture. It's only draw back is that it has a pretty tight angel of view on 1.6 factor SLRs. I can't think of any other prime in the non-L canon line up that matches this lens (other than possibly the 50mm 1.4). Truly an incredible value, buy it with confidence!Ps. By no means does this review cover all the merits of this lens. To name a couple, the lens offers precise auto focus and low chromatic aberration. Rather, I covered the features that were most useful for its intended purpose; taking pictures of people.</review_text>
I decided to rave about this lens after taking about 80 portraits, or head shots, for a children's theater production.  I set the aperture at 1.8 and shot away inside a temple with great indirect soft lighting.  And the results were exquisite!  The background, located five feet behind the subjects was a subtle blur while the subjects came to life (with single strands of hair resolution).  Not bad for my first experience shooting portraits.Now the better part is that I get equal or better results with the thousands of pictures I have taken at high school basketball games.  I set my ISO to 400 on my Digital Rebel XT and get shutter speeds of 1/200 to 1/1250.  Again, the intended subject jumps out.  And there is no red eye (or white eye) from using a flash to light the scene and freeze the action.  So after much experimenting, I prefer this to my 70-200 f4/L and my 24-105 f4/L IS lenses as an indoor sports lens.I love all these lenses.  This one wins in the area of price and being the fastest lens. This is my lens of choice for a majority of my current shooting situations.</review_text>
the monopod functions as i hoped and for the price was an excellent dea</review_text>
This monopod does a great job for my camera. You have the quick, easy-off, it attatches to your camera by a screw, and you can press the button on the side of the monopod and just slide your camera right off of it quickly. I wanted a nice, inexpensive monopod for my new zoom lense. I have a Canon 35mm, and I recently purchased a 75-300 zoom lense for it, and I needed a monopod to stabilize the shoot. If I knew then what I know now, I would buy it again. Nice product</review_text>
The Sima monopod is perfect if you're looking for something easy to carry and set up.  It exends quickly and has a quick release mount that can stay attached to the camera base.  Stability is good, but it does not have a sturdy feel.  If you want something with a solid feel, you will have to move up the food chain, but will sacrifice compactness and light weight of this product.</review_text>
I bought this monopod after reading reviews here.  It's really  light-weighted. I used it to take pictures for a dance performace where tripod was not possible. I was able to use slow shutter and got great images.Cons:I saw a pro ( I knew he runs a studio) using a similar monopod which was black. So my only complain is its non-black color. Well I am not a pro anyway.</review_text>
It was everything it was reported to be.  It works very well.  We take it on every trip we take</review_text>
Great product for the price.However, Amazon did not specify how much it can handle. My experience is about 5 lb. Tried 8 lb on it, start to feel shaky. Still usable if you handle it carefully, but not solid for 8 lb of load</review_text>
This lens bag is a fine product but don't be fooled into adding it as an accessory to Canon's 1.4x or 2x extenders.  Both of them come with this exact pouch.  Amazon should remove this as a "Suggested Accessory" on the web pages for the two products above</review_text>
I am very happy with the item I ordered. Shipment was fast and the price was cheaper than retai</review_text>
FAST DELIVERY, GREAT PRICE. I WOULD BUY FROM THEM AGAIN, THANKS =</review_text>
This product served its purpose; it is the same cord for hooking up the camera to a PC as the one that came with my camera</review_text>
my mom lost her USB cable for her digital camera and Amazon always has everything I need so I order it for her</review_text>
this cable was a very essential need for me to upload my photos to the computer. i was very fortunate to find it on amazon.co</review_text>
it works just like the one that comes with the camera.  Comes in a little plastic bag</review_text>
Item was just what I needed to hook my camera to my computer and start downloading photos.  Had it unpacked, plugged in and working in less then a minute</review_text>
This cable is a four-point USB connector that works with some Kodak digital cameras.  Be sure that your camera uses a four point connector before buying this one.  Many cameras use a five point connector.  These Kodak branded cables are high quality at a fair price</review_text>
This is an essential part of the digital picture taking. Can't download the pictures from your Kodak camera onto the computer without it.It should come standard with your camera purchase, but if you misplaced yours, this is the one to get.Arrived promptly as ordered and the value is great</review_text>
We received our USB cable promptly. As you know the Kodak USB cables are special in that they do not fit any other regular devices that uses a USB cable. These USB cables are for Kodak's only. The product itself turned out to be everything that it was represented as</review_text>
I got this stuff as a gift for a friend of mine. He seems to be happy using it. So I am giving this a 5 star</review_text>
The case is made of high quality material and fits my Canon powershot A700 perfectly. I would have given it 5 stars if the case had a seperate compartment for carrying an extra set of batteries. There is just enough room to carry the camera and an extra memory chip. No extra batteries.</review_text>
Why use another case when this one is built specifically for this camera?I like it, it's sleek and belt-mountable.Also has enough padding so you can throw it in a backpack, suitcase, etc</review_text>
After reviewing my options to purchase for my new Canon A540 we chose this case and I'm glad I did!  Nice snug fit for the camera, extra compartments for a memory card & batteries, no need for a strap, you are already provided one with the camera.</review_text>
IT GIVES THE PROTECCION AND THE HANDLING YOU ARE LOOKING FOR.BUY IT ALONG WITH THE CAMERA NO REGRETS</review_text>
Great case. Small, soft, and compact, with extra space for batteries. HOWEVER, the hole for the camera strap is in the center, which means that if your camera strap attaches anywhere OTHER than the middle of the camera, it doesn't line up with this case. Minor detail. For example, the strap of the A530 is near the top of the camera, so the strap goes out the side of the case, unless you pull it sideways to go through the case hole.</review_text>
I bought this camera when i was a sophmore in college.  And now, 2 years out of college, a handfull of beautiful days, a half-dozen life changing moments, and umpteen vacations later it's still goes with me everywhere and snaps photographs.  all the sticker labels on it have since been knocked off but it doesn't matter because i know what they all do.  This puppy is built to last.  When I eventually pass this one down in the family and buy a new one, I'll be getting another canon for sure.If you're looking for a high-value digital camera that thinks it's a tank, get the Canon s100.</review_text>
I bought this camera for the same reason many of you are considering it, or have already bought it--it's size.  It is amazingly small, it's hard to believe all that has been packed into this camera.  I take it with me everywhere,literally, it is so small that I am able to keep it in my pocket, and I don't have to fear that it will get ruined in my pocket because it is so durable. There is also a small covering for the lens, so you need not worry that the lens will get scratched.The picture quality surprised me, when I first saw this camera I saw how small it was an instantly assumed that the picture quality would not be good--but I was wrong!  The picture quality of this camera is outstanding (taking its' size and price into consideration).However, I do have a few things to complain about...First off, the battery.  This camera uses a lithium battery, I find lithium batteries to be highly inconvenient; because what if you are on vacation, where the nearest place to buy batteries is just a gas station--there is no way that you are going to find lithium batteries there.  Not only is it inconvenient, but also the battery life span is short.  The longest I've had it work was about 1 hour and 45 minutes.  This isn't uncommon in cameras, though, just as long as you bring your charger and spare batteries, you should be fine.Another problem I had with this camera was the zoom function.  Such a small zoom length that you would think that the zoom would be silent since it hardly zooms in...wrong!  Very wrong.  The zoom function on this camera is so loud that sometimes you will be unable to use it if you find yourself in a situation where you must be quiet.  Even just turning the camera on will move the lens a little, resulting in a noisy start-up.The flash is very weak.  Really dissapointing. If you are inside, you can't be any farther away then 10 feet in a lit room.The last problem I found with this camera was the macro function.  The auto-focus on the camera seems to have trouble focusing on the subject.  To make matters work, there is no manual override to overcome this problem.  The focus is great, though, if you are not taking a macro shot.These are all the flaws I found in the camera, it's not my first choice in cameras, I have come across many other beginner cameras that I prefer over this camera, but the thing you have to keep in mind about this camera is the size.  If you are just looking for something to keep with you at all times, then this is a great camera choice.</review_text>
I originally gave this camera 5 stars. When I had Windows 98 it was wonderful but I got a new computer last November with XP the usb software is Sooo... not compatible with XP I have found however that you can just buy a card reader to solve this problem. The new drivers on cannon's site do not help at all but try them if you want they have made me have to use the backup software. The Adobe software also was wonderful in 98 but it will not let you print correctly with XP so you are forced to create your document then either print it from Windows or export it to another application. But it takes gorgeous pictures for a 2.1 MP camera</review_text>
I want to protect my lens. While not the most expensive, the Canon is adequate for what I nee</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I'm sure there are those who'd wax philosophical over the subject of filters and how one brand is "much better" than another, but for my Canon EF-S 10-22mm on a 20D, I figure Canon would be fairly good at making a filter that they're willing to have branded "Canon." It fits fine, doesn't interfere with the lens hood, looks clear, seems to attenuate that nasty ultra-violet part of the light spectrum and perhaps best of all, protects the front element. What more would one want</review_text>
This is a good, affordable UV filter for protecting your expensive lenses.  I leave it on my lens all the time.  This particular filter (L-39 Sharp Cut) is especially good for wide angle lenses (&lt; 24mm focal length), because of its ultrathin profile, which prevents vignetting.  I have used regular filters on wide angle lenses, with very bad results.  Although this filter is NOT multi-coated, I have not found it to be a big deal in the pictures I've taken.  Multi-coated UV filters can cost 2x or 3x the price of this one, which I don't think is worthwhile.  All in all, I recommend this filter for Canon or non-Canon lenses</review_text>
Works as designed, performs well with intended lens, construction is plastic though</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
This is also the correct lens hood for the new EF 70-300mm F4-5.6 IS USM lens.4 stars because it's $40 for a piece of plastic that should have been included with both of its intended lenses.Shame on your cheap ways, Canon</review_text>
I got these gloves to use when taking outdoor photos in the winter.  They work very well, the little rubber grips help you better control the camera without having to expose your hands to the elements.  They are not really warm enough for really cold weather (below 20), but work well for 20-50 degrees</review_text>
What a wonderful lens!!  I'm purely a hobby shooter, but I do like to take nice shots.  I took this to the zoo the other day and was able to take fantastic closeups of the polar bears, even through glass, and pick out the details on the butterfly wings.  The lens is not as heavy as I had feared, and unlike some zooms it does not telescope out under its own weight, so it was comfortable enough to keep carrying all day.  I'm using it on a Canon D60 and am nothing but pleased with the performance so far</review_text>
I received my 28-200 yesterday from Amazon.  Having read the customer reviews, I immediately put my Rebel XT on a tripod and ran two series of comparison shots with the 28-200 and my Canon 28-135 IS.  Three shots each at f-stops 5.6, 11, and 20, one set indoors at ISO 1600 and the other outdoors at ISO 200.  Focal length 135 using the same scenes with each camera, highest jpeg setting. After shooting both series, I compared them fresh out of the camera, side by side.  Results:  the 28-200 was at least as sharp as the 28-135 in both foreground and background in most instances.  It was visibly sharper at ISO 200 with f-stops 5.6 and 20, (the 28-135 took the honors at f-stop 10), and at 20, it was visibly sharper in both the foreground and the background.  The 28-135 was one-stop faster shutterwise.  Both lenses produced pictures which would sharpen nicely in Photoshop.  There are the vagaries of autofocus and different shooting conditions to consider; different test scenes conceivably produce different results.  My conservative conclusion:  the 28-200 is as good as it gets for a super-zoom on your Canon (unless you are going to drop $2200 on the L Series 28-300 IS and carry it), and the 28-135 IS has no clear sharpness advantage.  Between these lenses, its a tradeoff---an extra 65 mm of focal length (105 mm after a 1.6 conversion) versus image stabilization and low-light shooting capability. Both lenses focus quickly and silently, and both lenses produce usable shots.</review_text>
I am a railfan, and having a very large range of zoom is important.  Shooting on the fly from a distant bridge shot to a closeup coming around the bend.  Focuses quickly too.  I have a Canon 10D and I HATE changing lenses because it gets dust inside the camera.  This 28-200mm is very practical for my hobby, and gets used on Waterfall and other outdoor scenery too.One note of interest, it is hard to get super-sharp background details with this lens, compared to any of the IS lenses or the L Series lenses, (a buddy and I shot the same closeup shot with an ore dock way in the background and the dock details looked a LOT sharper on his 28-135 IS lens).  Same Camera, same settings.  Closeup Focused object looked great on both, just when looking at the out-of-focus objects, the IS lenses seemed to do better.This lens is worth the price in my opinion, and superb for amateurs and hobby-photographers like myself.  But those looking for a touch more in distant details out of the focused field, the 28-135 IS USM lens by Canon seems to be a little step ahead of this.  The L series lenses, of course, are in a league of their own</review_text>
I am generally pleased with this lense, and if I could only carry one lense with my digital rebel, this is the one I would take</review_text>
We use it with a Canon 300D.  It gives good picture quality and are quick to focus.  Become a 44-320 on the 300D.  A good buy</review_text>
From portraits to sporting events, this is wonderful multi-purpose lens.  Prior to purchasing the lens, I asked a buddy of mine (photographer for the Philadelphia Flyers, NHL Hockey Team and long time Canon user) if this was a quality lens.  He told me to go for it as it is the best buy for the money and that distortion and spherical abberation are extremely minimal with this lens.  Truth be told, I've never seen an EF lens I didn't like</review_text>
I found this lens resonable as an all around lens, although when it comes to portaits or close-ups I would recomend the Canon 100mm f/2.8 macro. If your looking for a camera to use it on I would highly recomend the Canon 10D WOW</review_text>
If you would like a list of sites with reviews emailgumby (at) dontquotemeonthat (dot) comPros:  Great sharpness even wide open (wayyyyy better than the F2.8 zooms at F2.8). nice weight and size. shallow DOF in a wide angle lens.Cons:  Lateral CA glows purple and green in close and distant bokeh. Watch for high contrast situations. My first copy was DOA. No weather seal. Hood is too tight.Pros:  Fantastic! This is one excellent piece of glass. Incredible in low light, with vibrant clarity and color. Well balanced with 20D/Batter pack or a 1D.Cons:  None what so ever.if your a newbie here's some infoA lens is "fast" when it has a low f-stop... ok so when you have a smaller number the apature is bigger which allows more light through, so this means you can up the shutter speed. and still have enough light reach the sensor.ok so lets say you have an out door shot if you have say an f/4 lens the shutter speed could be 1/250 of a second and you would get a good exposer. Now this lens can only go f/4but if you in the same outdoor setting, had an f/2.8 lens you could jump to 1/500 of a second and get the same exposer. and freeze the action mmore effectivly, this i believe is why it's a "fast" lens.ok have fun and get it done</review_text>
This is a great lens if you need to shoot wide angle in very low light siuations. If you don't need a lens for this exact purpose, you'd be better off spending a few extra dollars on either the 16-35L or 24-70L. These two zoom lenses cover 24mm (and more) at a very reasonable f2.8 with good results. They won't bag a shot in the shadows, but they will handle any decently lit scenario with ease.If you just have to own an f1.4 prime lens, the 35mm f1.4 is a much more universally well-regarded L lens than the 24mm f1.4. The 50mm f1.4 is 1/3 the price of either and just as amazing in my opinion so long as you don't need the wide angle.The only reason I give the 24mm f1.4 a 4 instead of a 5 is the price</review_text>
You'll never regret buying the Canon L series.  The fit and finish is perfect and image quality is excellent</review_text>
This, in my very humble opinion, is the most useful, the sharpest, and just about anything else good you can think of say, best wide angle lense ever produced by anybody, anytime, anywhere. Lightning fast and that's what you want when the light is low.My gal pal Sara and I have often wandered the Caribbean islands in the dawn's early light, as she is into shooting old homes. She particularly likes the gingerbread homes in Marigot, on the French side of St. Martin. I swear she must have them all on her hard drive. It's like an obsession with her and this lens aids her passion, feeds into her manic desire to try and control the light.She just loves it and since I love her, I gotta love it too. Seriously though, I've used the lense quite a bit myself and it's a keeper if ever there was one. You just go wrong with a Canon "L" lense, no siree.Jack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
I needed more reach than 400mm gave on my EOS 1D, so I purchased Canon's 500mm f/4L IS three years ago. It's incredibly sharp out to the corners at f/4. With bird and mammal portraits, you see every feather, every hair.The lens is light enough to use on a Wimberley Sidekick. Some claim to be able to handhold it, but I think its eight-plus pound weight is a bit much for that. I carry mine in a long lens case with backpack harness from Kinesis Gear.This lens' image stabilization works very well. I've used it on a tripod with one-second shutter speeds and good telephoto technique, and gotten sharp, publishable images.With an EOS 1D or 1Ds, lens and camera are rain-proof in mild storms.I also got mine through Adorama, and had no problem with delivery or post-sale advertising.If you buy one expensive long lens for wildlife, choose this one.</review_text>
I've bought several lenses from Adorama, two of which include a new 300/2.8 IS and the other, this 500/4 IS. All of their deliveries were prompt and well packed. I have zero complaints with them. I dealt the John (Green, I think is his last name) via email. I highly recommend them.As for this lens, it is incredible. Wide open it creates a wickedly sharp subject against a wonderfully soft background (good bokeh). AF is very fast. This lens is extremely good and will still AF when used with the 1.4x converter. (AF works up to f5.6.</review_text>
Let's face it.  This is a great lens.But, I want to warn you about Adorama.I highly recommend that you choose a better vendor.Adorama is SLOW.They don't respond to emails.They took a week to ship my lens when they said it was in stock.Their customer service is non-existent.Their prices are no better than anyone else.Almost every time I've ordered from them they have contacted me to try and sell me more stuff. (Which further delays shipping)A totally unprofessional organization.I for one will never order from them again.Good luck if you do</review_text>
After noting the captions of exceptional photographs that appeared in nature and photography magazines were often shot with this lens, I began to read the reviews.  Based on the uniformly excellent reviews, I bought this lens and spent two weeks this January in the Florida Everglades taking pictures of birds.  Based upon my experience with the lens, I would rate this as second in sharpness and contrast only to the 300 mm f2.8 Canon L series lens.  The lens is handholdable for short periods to shoot birds in flight, but it is best suited for use on a solid tripod with a Wimberley tripod head to allow tracking of birds in flight</review_text>
Good advice from the other reviewer about the picture.That having been said I have three of these and really wouldn't want to do without them.These clean my camera's screen and the glass on my lenses without a scratch every time.In my opinion almost a must have in your bag!Good luck</review_text>
Amazon states;Product Dimensions: 13.0 x 10.0 x 7.0 inchesThere was no photo (until I uploaded one) so I thought this was the size stated, but turned out to be one of the little keychain bags with about a 5x5 cloth inside.Works fine, just not what I thought it was, and didn't want someone else to think it was large also.  See my photo for actual size next to some keys.Update 4/8/2006I see they added a photo of what I THOUGHT I was getting when I ordered..  see my uploaded photo in "customer" photos to see what they sent.Not sure WHICH you would get at this point..Edit 07/29/2006I see now and then the price I paid jumps from about $5 to $20 for some strange reason.. I have to add that it's a good product @ $5 but not for $20</review_text>
This is hands down the sharpest and most used lens that I own. The combination of macro capability, relatively fast 2.8 aperature, and prime sharpness keeps it on my camera more than anything else. I shoot a variety of subjects from macro nature work to indoor sports, and this lens never lets me down.One of the major compliments I have for this lens is its versatility (I disagree with many of the reviews here.) I continually find 100mm to be an ideal focal length with my 1.6 APS-c sensor XT for shooting indoor swimming and diving competitions. This length allows for beautifully tight framing, slightly compressed depth of field, and shallow focus to get amazing portrait shots while eliminating distracting background. The speed of the lens allows me to catch swimmers in the air without using a disturbing flash. This is imperative because flash photography is prohibited at the start of a race. Apart from sports events, the lens allows for very intimate portraits without having to be in the subjects face. This performance along with macro capability truly make this a multi-purpose lens.I usually hand hold for sports photography with good results (the accessory battery grip on my XT is invaluable for this), and usually use a tripod for nature and still-life situations. If I've had one too many cups of coffee I'll use a monopod during sports events. I do wish the lens came with the accessory tripod collar, because it is undeniably a fairly heavy piece of glass, but it is not so important that I have shelled out for one yet. I have no complaints with the AF, and I find that the switch to limit the AF range away from the extreme macro is very helpful. Once you use Canon's USM lenses, you will never buy anything else. The large and easy to use manual focus ring is a luxury. It allows for quick manual override and great control when switching to manual focus. In many situations that I don't want to carry my large bag with me, the 100mm and my 17-40mm L usually cover just about everything I need. (I know that my idea if traveling light is not taking the kitchen sink however.)This is not an L lens for reasons of the lack of some weather resistance and L level coatings, but don't let that dissuade you. It easily outperforms both my L zooms in sharpness and I find it to be comparable in contrast and color. The level of performance and a price that is a fraction of many L lenses makes this an unbeatable value.</review_text>
I have been delighted with the quality of pictures I get with this lens.  The autofocus is fast and quiet, while the manual focus is very solid and smooth.I'm finally taking pictures worthy of the jewelry my partner creates</review_text>
I purchased this lens primarily for use as a macro lens.  Since I shoot mostly wildlife (including bugs) I thought the field of view of 160mm (used with my Canon Rebel XT) would be just about ideal.  In reality the FL was not enough.  I had to approach the bugs much too close and they frequently left the scene quickly.  The pictures taken with the lens were extremely sharp and the bocah (out of focus area behind the subject) was very nice.  I wound up selling the lens on eBay since it didn't meet my needs</review_text>
This is a really handy lens to have in your bag.  I added this lens to my collection several months ago, and I haven't regretted it one bit.  I took a trip to Montana in August and used this lens to photograph a ton of wildflowers.  I was also using a 70-300mm telephoto lens and a 24-70mm wide angle lens heavily, but most of my favorite shots on that trip were taken with this lens.Autofocusing is very quiet since it's USM powered, but it's often tricky to get the right focus if you're doing an extreme closeup.  This is a general facet of macro lenses, so you'll probably find yourself using manual focus 90% of the time or more.  The manual focus on this lens is quite excellent though, and responds well to fine adjustments.  It's also quite easy for me to handhold it, as long as I have a decent amount of light or pop up the flash.With all that being said, this is a nice lens to grab after you have a decent telephoto lens, if you like photographing small things.  Otherwise, you might look into getting some other lenses first, i.e. wide angle, fisheye, etc. (unless you already own all of them :-))</review_text>
This is a fantastic piece of glass.  Extremely sharp and little artifacts.  An awesome lens that I recommend highly.  I love going to the local botanical gardens and mounting this baby on my 20D.  WELL worth the cost.  If you dont have a tripod, buy one</review_text>
This lens has extremely fast (and quiet) focus, and is razor sharp.  What more could you want, when photographing wildlife up close</review_text>
This is a fantastic lens not only for Macro shots but for portraits too. Having the extra distance allows for far more flexibility when out and about.Having tried both the 50, 60 and 100mm - I'm glad I went with the 100mm</review_text>
I use it for my s70..It works over 10meters (thats right!) and from the back too, so I am very happy with it..I bought it today so maybe it is improved now..</review_text>
Great for using with a tripod, now you can be in the pictures too</review_text>
May I introduce you to one of the least know and yet most superb lenses Canon makes. You probably even stumbled on to this page by accident, looking for another Canon lens, looking at various macros, or even just intrigued by this higher-priced lens you've probably never even considered.Let me just say this about this lens: Ultra sharp. Ultra colorful. Ultra contrast. Ultra solid.Like everybody else, I initially bought this lens for its macro. The 60mm and 100mm options were a lot cheaper, but my collection is entirely L-class and I'd learned to trust putting gobs of money into the lenses with the red ring. So I put my money where my L-faith is and went with this lens. Needless to say, my faith was rewarded again.Yeah, sure it's got the 1.0x macro capability, and this is important. But what I wasn't expecting was the image quality. It is unbelievably good. Now I'm not somebody who's taking his first trip into L land and comparing this lens to the $300 run-of-the-mill glass. I've used six L-class lenses significantly and I'm comparing this lens' image quality to THOSE.You will find yourself using this lens as much as its 180mm focal length and f/3.5 aperture dictates. The lens is versatile both as a super-fine telephoto and as a 1.0x macro.The macro capability is the main feature. 1.0x macro literally means that a 35mm wide object will completely fill a 35mm frame. Basically, it's a small microscope. If you dare to dial in the aperture to the wide-open f/3.5, the DOF is approximately that of the thickness of two sheets of writing paper at 1.0x. Needless to say, you'll need a tripod, preferably with macro rails that slide forwards and rearwards for ultimate control.(For those of you new to macro, focusing the lens changes the magnification factor. So as one focuses the object, the object's size in the viewfinder changes. This is why I mention the macro rails, they allow you to achieve focus and physically move the lens/camera in and out to reachieve the desired composition.)As a telephoto, due to this lens' superb image quality, it actually produces images of a much greater quality than the 70-200mm f/2.8L IS. (I know firsthand, as I own it too)  The difference is in the 70-200mm's versatility. If the light drops too low, the f/2.8 and the IS bests the f/3.5 quite rapidly. If the distance of subjects change quickly or you are unable to move your feet to frame images, the 180mm will be too constricting and the zoom will win. But under conditions where the 180mm f/3.5 can perform unhindered (such as at an airshow or out flower hunting), it will consistantly produce brighter, more saturated, and sharper images than the 70-200mm F/2.8 IS.There is a complaint that circulates about the slow speed at which this lens autofocuses, expecially annoying when trying to be used as a telephoto. This is actually incorrect. The lens' autofocus drive does infact move very quickly, but it must traverse all the way from infinity to about 4" in front of the lens to find the subject. This is where the wait time comes into effect. Here's the solution: utilizing the AF limiter switch allows you to limit the AF search to only between infinity and about 5' in front of the lens. Consequently, this range is about 10% of the focus range (the other 90% is in between that 5' and the 4"). I no longer experience AF "hunting" problems when trying to use the 180mm as a telephoto.Some other info about this lens:The front objective element is actually concave. I think this is the only L lens Canon makes with a concave front element. It's probablyexpensive to replace if an accident should occur, so utilize a UV filter (72mm filter size). I recommend only the B+W or Hoya Multi-coated brands. (Yes they're pricey, but worth it)The hood for this lens is actually a little too small in my opnion. If shooting a backlit object, I sometimes get the heavy orange glow in the viewfinder soI am forced to use my hand as a "hood extender" and block the sunlight.For its size, this lens is relatively lightweight. It is much lighter than the 70-200mm F/2.8L IS and easily handholdable for extended periods of time.This lens is compatible with Canon's extenders. I have personally used it with the 1.4x extender. The results are excellent. While CA and sharpness degrade noticeably on the 70-200mm, this lens shows barely a difference in image quality, except for the change in designation to a 252mm F/5, of course. And add to the fact that the macro capability is now gone from 1.0x to 1.4x, a big bonus.So for whom does this lens apply?-Those who neither have a macro or a telephoto prime who desire a single piece that can handle both aspects with excellent results.-Those who plan on performing professional product photography.-Those that are looking into serious nature photography (packing this lens with a wide-angle is pretty much all you'll need on a day hike).What this lens does not do well:-Low-light photography.-Event photography.-Landscapes.Alternatives:-60mm/100mm: lesser image quality, less telephoto compression in macro images, no real double-duty as a telephoto, but a whole lot cheaper and wider aperture.-MP-E 65mm: much greater magnification (5.0x), lower image quality, no telephoto capability, odd design means studio use almost exclusivel</review_text>
When this lens is used with a 1.6X camera body such as the XT, 20D, or 30D it ends up giving you an amazing 288mm Macro or you can go one step further with the 1.4x or 2X TC's and make it a 403/576mm super power.  Of course whenever doing this you must either use a tripod or flash except in blazing light.  It is a little slow to focus compared to many of the other lenses canon offers, but since you will most likely be using manual focus a lot of the time anyway, this is not a huge drawback.  It also gets heavy to carry after a few hours and you will have people ask you questions about both your and their cameras.  On a good note parents are pretty good about keeping small children out of your way when you have this lens mounted.  The narrower background as compared to the 60mm or 100mm macro lenses makes cluttered areas easier to deal with.  The extra working distance is also a plus when working with wary insects etc.  It is best to use a shutter release and mirror lockup for shutter speeds longer than 1/30 if you want sharp pictures.  The 60mm Macro wins in convenience, but for absolute clarity and improved working distance the 180 comes out on top</review_text>
I spend most of my time as a photographer taking macro photographs of flowers and other small things in nature.  I chose this lens over Canon's 50mm macro and 100mm macro for two reasons: (1) it is constructed with higher quality UD glass, so it has great color and contrast, and it's incredibly sharp at all f/stops, and (2) at 180mm, it allows you to stay farther away from your subjects and still focus to 1:1.  This makes it easier take photographs without disturbing your subjects and it allows you to have a smaller, more blurry area in the background so that the background doesn't compete with the subject for attention.  The lens also comes with a tripod color, which allows you conveniently change from vertical to horizontal, and it adds stability with your lens better balanced on your tripod.The lens has an ultrasonic motor, so it's fast and quiet when focusing, though I highly recommend setting the focus limiter 1.5m-infinity when not shooting macro photography.  It will speed up the time it takes for the lens to focus.  The only drawback I can find with the lens is that it is constructed with only an 8 blade aperture diaphram.  Theoretically, with a higher number of blades, it would allow more natural blurs, but I can say I've never noticed a problem in my photographs</review_text>
I have seen glowing reports on this lens in several magazines, most notably in Shutterbug. It is truly a splendid performer and one well worth paying for if a photographer needs the extra working distance afforded by a macro lens in the 180mm to 200mm range. Its performance is certainly as good, if not better, than Nikon's venerable 200mm f4 Micro Nikkor, which was one of the first - if not the first - telephoto macro lenses in this focal length. This Canon lens excels not only in macro photography but also in nature photography, getting close-up images of animals in the wild without working too close to disturb them. If I owned Canon equipment, then this lens would be an essential part of my kit</review_text>
I purchased this camera a year ago (summer 05).  Definitely a great upgrade over the original rebel, although the new xti has a larger screen which is the one aspect of this camera that is not perfect.  There are other sites that will perform more comprehensive reviews of this camera, but after a year mine is still working perfectly</review_text>
I almost didn't buy this camera simply because of the plastic body (I'm used to a Praktica MTL3 film camera, which is built like a tank).  However, I'm glad I overlooked that because the camera is top-notch in terms of robust features and the quality it provides.  Startup time is very quick and making adjustments to shutter speed and aperture is intuitive.If you get the bundle with the kit lens, I highly recommend complimenting it with the very affordable Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens, especially if you are a big fan of DOF and do a lot of available-light / low-light photography.</review_text>
I am new to SLRs and I cant belive how good this camera is.  This camera is worth every penny for the amazing quality it produces.   I always thot my old digital pics with point and shoot were excellent, but looking back, they look terrible compared to this.</review_text>
I am 67 years old and started out in photography as a kid with a contact printer and a box camera. I have had all types of cameras over the years, mostly 35mm film Canon slr's. I too bought all sorts of these 5-7 MP point and shoot digital cameras before returning to my true love, SLR's. I have had my digital Canon Rebel XT about a month now and I can't keep my hands off of it. It lacks nothing. Although the kit lense is good, I bought a 28-135 Canon zoom lense with image stabilizion and have produced stunning photo's with it. I love the way you can use the 7 points to focus, I mainly use only the center point with focus lock and never get an out of focus picture. I guess the nicest thing for me is that I now don't have the urge to buy every point and shoot camera that is paraded out on QVC or HSN that has a "wonderful" new feature like "low light or non-shake." This Canon has every good feature in the known universe and you can't outgrow it. Its a camera that will let you be as good as you can be, it won't hold you back. The battery life is great, the built in flash is good but I bought a 430EX and that's even better. I never figure I'm wasting money buying accessories for this camera as it will be my main squeeze for many years to come. I always missed my 35mm Canon slr's and now feel that I have an old friend back again, only much much better. Believe me, you can't go wrong getting this camera, its beyond description...</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
I love the new digital Canon. The only problem is it's not nearly as tough as it's film twin.  I had the camera less than a month when the pop-up flash quit working.  The Canon people have been great, and very helpful, but I'd rather not have had to send a brand new camera back to the factory.  The photos, however, are wonderful.  Film quality for the most part - printable and enlargable.  (It would probably be better to use the camera with a tripod when using the 300mm telephoto but I hike with it, so just remember to steady it before taking wildlife photos.</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
When I bought this camera the sales people tried to get me to buy another battery.  They said the one that came with it would only be good for about 20 minutes.  Now I have bought alot of items in my lifetime, a 20 min battery on a camera just doesnt seem like a very good "business" choice.  So I said no.  So I got the camera, charged the battery until the light went green (which sucked because I wanted to play with it right when i got it) and started taking pictures (oh I also got a 2G CF) worked great....so I planned to go up a mountain and take soem scenery shots.  Keeping in mind what the sales person had told me I pocketed the charger just incase.  Well, 6000', 300 pictures, and 5 hours later the camera is still running strong, still have 200 shots left for the trip home, battery life indicator hasnt budged off of the full button.  So all in all, I think the battery life is great, now i can see if your taking say thousands of pictures all in a row you may need another but for just going on a trip and shooting a few pictures at every stop point, the original will work fine.  as for the quality of photos.....i love them</review_text>
I had 2 Rebel cameras so it just made sense for me to pick up this digital camera and attach my old lenses.  While I had owned other digitals I keep going back to my old Rebel, until now.  We got the back up battery pack.  My husband and I love it</review_text>
I LOVE,LOVE,LOVE this camera. If you have teens in the house watchout!, they'll definitely want this camera. It is easy to use and well worth the money.  When my camera arrived, I was amazed at how small and compact it was.  I let my son check it out first and within no time we were both using it. I really love the movie feature.  You can record anywhere and everywhere and the sound is excellent.  My last camera only recorded, but didn't have any sound. It was nothing compared to this Sony.  The 8.1 mega pixels makes the pictures come out great.  My sons and I love it.  They record all the time and take numerous pictures.  I also like that it has internal memory, so if you don't have a memory stick yet, you can still take pictures. The 2.5 inch screen is perfect.  It makes it so easy to get a good shot all the time.  I have had no problems with this purchase at all.  The only thing I would recommend to Sony is to make something that would protect the 2.5 inch screen from getting scratches, just like they do with the optical lens. It is always closed and covered when its not in use. But besides that small detail there, the Sony is a GREAT investment.  I will definitely buy Sony again, especially when I decide to update or if I'm looking for a gift to give.</review_text>
Best camera I have ever owned. Easy to use even with all the features. Don't be afraid to buy this one</review_text>
The DSCW100 8.1 was a great shirt pocket point and shoot with easy menu directions to the added features built in</review_text>
I bought this camera several weeks ago and have test-driven it in the forest preserves of Chicago and in Upper Michigan.  It does a terrific job.  I am an artist who studied film in school and yet never used a digital camera.  I wanted something that was kind of between a point and shoot and an SLR.  I wanted some manual functions to fool around with, and yet I also wanted the easy shot for family photos and such.  I didn't want to start my digital experience on an expensive SLR, so this proved to be a great buy for me.  It's very small and compact and yet very powerful.</review_text>
If you are looking for a digital camera with many high level functions and features, the Sony  Cybershot 8.1 mp is a great buy.  It is highly affordable and takes photos with excellent precision, day or night.  The camera is very user friendly and the ease of use is a plus.  The memory stick is sold separately and is a must purchase accessory if you plan to take many photos.  I am happy with the clarity of the photos and the video functionality that you may want to have handy.  The camera is an excellent buy!!!</review_text>
I bought this little camera recently from Amazon. Thanks for tremendous service and speedy delivery, Amazon.The Sony DSC-W100 is terrific. It is very simple to operate. The menu system is well-organized and easy to understand. Inserting the battery and memory card is a snap. The Zeiss lens system yields incredibly sharp photos even at the automatic setting. The flash is pretty powerful,too! I took some shots in a rather dark restaurant, and the pictures came out really nice and clear. The macro function is superb with crisp, well-defined details at very close range.The powerup time on this camera is fast as well as time between shots. There is very little shutter lag, and you usually get the picture you intended to get. Autofocus can be a little slower until it "finds" the target perfectly in certain situations. But this is no big deal compared to older digicams.I like being able to switch quickly from viewing the pictures in replay mode back to camera mode by simply tapping the shutter release button lightly. You are quickly ready for another picture.The camera is not miniature and weighs nearly six ounces, which is not extremely light--but is comfortable to carry or place in purse or pocket.I also have a Canon Digital Rebel XT, and this little camera does take sharper pictures. Of course, you do not have the versatility of the SLR, but it is a great everyday camera to take along with you for all the shots you would otherwise miss. I highly recommend this camera and recommend purchase from Amazon.Update: I have now used this camera in the video mode. WOW. It produces incredibly sharp videos with a fast frame rate that looks terrific on our television. A multi-purpose cable is supplied with the camera that allows USB 2.0 and audio/video hookup. You must decide what zoom level before you start shooting your video because once you start, you cannot zoom in and out. If you have a 1 Gb memory stick Pro Duo you can take about 12 minutes of video. I want to get the 2 Gb Pro Duo stick which allows almost 25 minutes of video. This would be ideal to take along when you want to switch between still and video shots and keep your video shots consistent and consecutive in order. You must use the PRO Duo stick for the high quality (fine) video mode</review_text>
My Sony DSCW100 camera is small but very functional and user friendly, it makes photography an easy and interesting hobby.</review_text>
Photography afficionados have long had two choices when it comes to buying a digital camera: a tiny everything-automatic portable camera that takes decent pictures or a brick-sized everything-manual professional camera that takes fantastic pictures. Almost a decade after the introduction of the consumer digital camera, Sony has finally taken a swing at combining the best qualities of both worlds into one package, and the DSC-W100 is a solid first effort.Sony has had the tiny part down for some time - dimensionally, the W100 is on par with other recent Cybershot models and competitor brands' offerings, and features the now-common 2.5" bright LCD display with a minimum of buttons on the back. Aside from the attractive mini-diamondplate face and chrome trim, visually there's little to set this camera apart among the others at your local electronics counter.Initial toying with the camera doesn't dispel any first impressions. All the prerequisite automatic features are there, the buttons are smartly arranged so all the most common functions are right at hand, it's obviously a point-and-shoot camera. But it's when you begin to delve into the features that you realize that the W100 is something entirely different.The usual mode knob is there on the back with the Auto mode and Scenes modes, but now there's Program and Manual modes - something standard issue on professional cameras but radically new for a point-and-shoot. This means you can use any combination of auto or manual settings on all functions to get a shot. For example, shooting in a dimly lit room, you can use a slow shutter flash to even out lightning, or turn off the flash with a slower shutter for richer colors, or raise the ISO so you can get a steady shot with a higher shutter speed, or just put it in auto and shoot, etc. All the different possibilities previously reserved just for professional cameras are now at your disposal. The camera is as simple or as involved as you want, and it still fits in your pocket.I've owned several other digital cameras, both portable and pro, and they've all had somewhat manual features, but the W100 takes it to a new level. Mounting the W100 on a tripod, I attempted to get a long exposure shot of the night sky, something all the other digital cameras have done adequately. Manually setting the shutter speed, the camera displayed the overall exposure value as I adjusted - the camera was telling me before even touching the shutter button if the resulting picture would be dark, bright, or even. I set the shutter as slow as it could go and using the two-second timer, fired away. The picture was amazing; though only a few stars were visible to the eye, the W100 caught the light of well over a hundred. I noticed a bit of radial blur on the stars around the border of the image, only to realize later that the camera was pointed North - the shutter speed was so slow that I was actually *capturing the rotation of the Earth*. Now THAT'S manual.Also of special note is the W100's digital "Smart Zoom". As a general rule with digital cameras, you should disable the digital zoom feature, as zooming in beyond the optical range produces a cropped and therefore lower-quality image. But here again Sony has a trick up it's sleeve, by cropping from an 8.1 megapixel capture regardless of where you have the image size set. If you shoot a 5 megapixel-size picture that utilizes the digital zoom, the image is actually captured at a full 8.1 Mps and then your 5Mp picture is cropped from that. The result is an optically-zoomed clear picture. This also means that at the lowest image size, you can get a full 15x zoom (the equivalent of a 500+ mm telephoto - in a pocket camera!). It's an absolutely brilliant technique that you'll probably see on all future digital cameras.Sony still has a bit more work to do on the pocket SLR idea. Included with your purchase is an accessories catalog featuring an array of lenses and filters, none of which are compatible with the W100. It's typical of Sony to have a bizarre distribution of features in any given product lineup, but it would seem obvious that the most SLR-like camera should have SLR-like accessories. And W100 owners should disable the Auto Focus Illumination light when shooting people; the blazing red light is great for focusing on inanimate subjects, but could probably be used as a tactical light to blind assailants in a pinch.Overall, the W100 is a remarkable newcomer that truly raises the bar for what you can expect from a point and shoot pocket camera. Novices are accommodated with full automation, and can learn gradually by trying out individual manual functions while other settings remain automatic. And experienced photogs will be right at home with the Manual mode and wide range of settings. Five stars for what is hopefully Sony's work in progress</review_text>
Unlike some of the other reviewers, I've had no problems with this battery...and I've had it over a year.  I'm a pro photographer, so it has been recharged over and over and over and still holds a charge.  Maybe it is better because I tend to totally drain my batteries before recharging?  I also use this battery in the Dual Battery Grip alongside the Canon and other off brand batteries</review_text>
Ive had it for a couple months now. I notice no difference between it and my canon bp511. My only gripe with it is its cheazy silver plastic color, but hey, who looks at your batteries</review_text>
Bought one of these a year ago.  Works about the same as the Canon battery I got with the camera. I alternate between the Canon and the Lenmar batteries and haven't noticed any difference</review_text>
I didn't think it would be, but this lens winds up on my Rebel XT most of the time.  The lens is compact and performs well indoors in low light - best to use autofocus set to center point only. 35mm focal length is a nice general purpose focal length on a 1.6 crop DSLR.This lens is sharp at f2.0 and really sharp by f2.5-f2.8. I have a lot of experience and test my lenses with tripod/mirror lockup, I'm not just saying sharp at f2.0 - it IS sharp. I considered the 24mm f2.8, but f2.8 is a pretty slow prime at wider focal lengths - loses a lot of the low light advantage.I am impressed with the colors I have been getting from this lens, wasn't really expecting the colors to be so good at such a low price point - doesn't have the L lens coatings, but Canon did  the colors right.The autofocus speed is pretty good - not as fast as ring USM lenses - and it is a little noisy/buzzy.I currently own 7 Canon lenses (2 Ls) including 4 primes - this 35mm is definitely a top bang-for-the-buck lens. (another is the 28-105 f3.5-4.5 USM zoom - and I don't even like zooms)Looking for a low-light prime? For 240 bucks at Amazon - just do it</review_text>
Super lightweight, sharp wide open, short minimum focus distance, fast AF. Decent bokeh. Ability to take pictures in very low light , Super cheap when compared to it's 35mm f1.4 L $1000+ brother and at 1.6 on digital its a normal lenssee some shots:  http://www.pbase.com/2bruce/gillin</review_text>
Bought this lens as a 'standard' prime lens for my Digital Rebel XT.  What I found was that it was a fast, sharp, and lightweight lens that made the camera great for long walks.  This would be the perfect lens to take to an amusement park, hiking, or biking where size and weight are a concern.I've also used this lens for macro photography and portraits where it shines.  The F2 Bokeh is wonderful and center sharpness is superb even at F2, much better at F4 which is what I use most of the time.On the negative side, autofocus is noisy.  To compare, it's like a drug-crazed wasp trapped in a matchbox.  Maybe a mosquito buzzing close to your ear.  It's not louder than the shutter, though.  If this were a film camera and I was trying to take candid shots, I'd complain more, but it's a 56mm equivelant lens.Another negative is build quality.  They really should make the body of this lens out of thicker plastic.  No reason to skimp there as the 'feel' of the lens certainly gives you much more confidence for very little weight penalty.  Make it feel solid.I've got a 52-55mm step-up ring on it as I've got a slew of 55mm filters.  This also helps in that the lens cap is further from the body of the lens and easier to remove and replace.If Canon had made a faster lens in 28mm at the same price point, I would have gone that way.  For my tastes, it would have been preferable to have that extra field of view assuming the quality was as good</review_text>
The product is a top quality product. The filters work excellent with my Canon Powershot S2. Without a doubt, worth every penny, especially considering the price I paid for it, which was at least half of where I saw it listed at other places. Very happy with the purchase</review_text>
I am very happy with this set of filters. The price was right and they come with a carry case so you dont have to worry how you are going to carry them if you go lite, camera and filters</review_text>
I am starting my career as a professional photographer, and I haven't had any problems with these filters. They come in a nice case, and are easy to attach to my lenses.</review_text>
This set of basic filters is a must have for every camera bag...even new SLR users will find them easy to use and they will enhance your pictures - without a doubt</review_text>
The backpack holds all my stuff with extra room. The only thing was that I thought I was ordering a bag not a backpack based on the picture shown. The backpack is a little on the heavy side for me but I do like it</review_text>
This bag easily accomodates my new Canon S3 IS, along with the lens adapter and hood, with room to spare. Recently, during a trip to Europe, I was also able to fit several other items into the bag: the rechargeable battery charger, AC adapter, and outlet adapter, along with two sets of rechargeable batteries, as well as a UV filter, and I still had room for more. I've no doubt the wide- and tele-converters for this camera would also have fit, with room to spare</review_text>
If you are at the intermediate level with photography and need a camera bag that is strong and comfortable this bag may be for you. I can fit my canon s2is, adapter, two filters or a lens in this bag. This is all I expected from what I read about this product. If you have a SLR with multiple lenses,,, sorry,,, you will have to spend more bucks for a bigger bag.</review_text>
Absolutely love this camera bag! I hate dealing with a purse and camera bag while traveling, so I just carry this bag. Everything I need (wallet, cell phone, car keys & chap stick) plus all the camera equipment fit just fine in this bag.You can't go wrong with this. My husband will even hold it for me since it's not a purse!</review_text>
I've had many camera bags over the years, and this one seems to fit the bill the best. It is roomy - carries camera body and one lens, plus charger, extra batteries, manual, memory card, and has room for another lens or two. I wouldn't say it would be able to hold more than three lenses. We recently took this on a trip to St. Lucia and it held up well, even repelling some unexpected rain. We were very pleased. The size is perfect - roomy but not overly bulky. I'd highly recommend this bag!</review_text>
I would have rated this bag with ***** if it would have been a little bit larger.It will fit only a SLR camera with its lens on. No aditional space. Actually, there are some good spots to keep your extra flash cards, you extra battery and charger.So, if you want to move around with your SLR with at least two lenses, get a bigger one</review_text>
This bag is small, but it fits my Canon Rebel XT with the kit lens and battery grip. I also carry the 50mm/1.7 lens in there and still have room for the manual, battery charger and other small components. I will be getting a bigger bag when I start acquiring more lenses, but it is great for now and for summer travel.It also looks nice and is very sturdy</review_text>
The bag is suppose to hold two cameras,I have a rebel and two lens and cant fit them in with lens filters and extra batteries. I recomend you buy a bigger bag it does not meet the billing here. might be good for a couple of point and shoot cameras but not SL</review_text>
silver,light,sturdy..carries camera securely from the neck or on a belt</review_text>
I was able to scout out the different case options for my Sony DSC-N1. After much review, I asked my wife for her opinion and she picked the LCS-NB. It holds the camera nice and snug but you could work in a memory stick or battery. So far, so good</review_text>
Was extremely pleased with the prompt service as well as the pric</review_text>
The battery pack arrived quite quickly, and we were delighted to be paying far less for it than the manufacturer was charging for a product that works just fine</review_text>
nothing wrong with this battery.  personally i would prefer my camera to use AA but battery life for lithium ion batteries is pretty good.  no complaints here except for the price.  but necessity made me purchase a second one, not because my other one died, just cuz sometimes i need a spare</review_text>
Exceptional perfomance and long life makes this battery a great deal.Always good to have a back -up and this battery comes in handy</review_text>
I received in a short amount of time and  was just what I needed. This way I am able to have my camera turned on for almost a full day using this as a backup Nothing is worse than needing that little more time to be able to get the enire family reunion and unable to add the last family into the scrapbook but this cured it all</review_text>
Battery works great, shipping from amazon took too long. I purchased other items the same day from other retailers and they were delivered 5 days sooner than the amazon item</review_text>
We bought this as a second battery for the Sony W50 digital camera. These batteries, in this camera, last a LONG time. Having a spare allows us to keep one in the external charger and swap quickly when needed. It is an original Sony product so fits and works perfectly</review_text>
Sony has done it again!  Fast charging and LONG lasting, this battery is perfect for my Sony Cyber-Shot Camera!</review_text>
I bought this for my Nikon D70 Digital SLR with 18-70mm Nikkor lens.  It works great except that the lens cap does not work with the polarizer filter on.  It works with the other three filters: ND4, ND8, and UV.  The price still beats buying four filters individually.  I like the case also</review_text>
Sure beats the price of buying a Polarizer, UV and 2 ND filters individually</review_text>
It's a pretty convinient bag.I put a Canon rebel XT with a Tamron 28-75 lens,a Canon 70-300 lens and a external flash inside and I still have the small pocket for wallet,keys etc.The only drawback of this bag is,you can not put in big lenses.The Canon 70-300 is the limit.But if you only have a limited gear collection,you need to give it a try</review_text>
Have had this bag for a year now & love it. This is what I carry in the main compartment:Nikon D50 with 18-200mm lens attached.Wide angle 10-20mm lensDepending on where I'm going - either the D50 charger, the speedlight and other little accessories OR my Canon SD550 elph with its charger.The top compartment holds extra batteries, cleaning supplies & filters.The small zipper compartment on the flap is a little bit tight for anything other than a cleaning cloth, extra memory, ID's/Credit Cards.CONS:Being a woman... the strap isnt all that flattering going diagonally across the front, but I usually carry it in a sort of "1/2 slung" position or fully around in front anyway (unless I'm hiking).It could be a little snug inside if you are trying to carry alot of accessory items.Would have liked to see the padded portion of the main strap a little longer so padding is still on shoulder when bag is in the front slung position (since I carry it that way alot).PROS:Compact yet perfect fit for my camera body, 2 lens, & accessories.Very snug & secure on the back - easily hike, ride a bike or even a horse without fear.Had no trouble getting used to "slinging" it around front. Actually can use bag as a kind of shelf for stabilizing elbows while composing shot.Superior Lowepro design - great quality, sturdy zippers, love the rain cover.Note: I did try the slingshot 200 version 1st and found that it was just too big for my needs so exchanged it for this smaller version - no regrets, cant imagine I'll ever need another bag.</review_text>
I have had this bag for a year and recommend it.  I use it all the time.  It's a great walkaround bag.  The first time you're in a place where you want to get to your camera quickly or don't want to put your bag down you'll appreciate the sling design.  Just be aware for a long mountain hike you may feel the weight on your shoulder after some time.My only error was getting the 100 - I should have gone with the 200, and plan to do so.  I like to keep my lens hood in place which requires a little more room.  I'd also found that I need a little more room for non-camera things.A word on the all-weather cover - a great feature.  A few weeks ago I was in Bermuda and walked to a beach about 25 minutes away.  Just as I arrived a soaking rain began that didn't let up for the entire walk back.  If I hadn't been able to pull on the cover my equipment would have been soaked.  Now I wouldn't buy a bag without one</review_text>
I compared a lot of bags for use with my new Nikon D50.   I wanted a bag that was versatile and could be carried on hikes.   The Lowepro Slingshot is definitely the bag for my camera!   Plenty of room for a couple of lens, the battery charger, and other small items.</review_text>
I just got back from vacation. I have a bad back, and it was sore. I was very happy to discover that the way this bag hangs, I could carry my Nikon D-70 and one or two extra lens very comfortably.Gear is super easy to access and the bag provides a nice platform for changing lenses.I have other bags which heft lots of gear, and they're great for travel days and the occasional big shoot, but if you're looking to hike (and have a separate way to carry a tripod), then this is a wonderful bag</review_text>
Just got the Slingshot 100 for my Nikon D50 with kit lens. Previously, I bought a Nikon bag but as this was just a bag to fit the camera and nothing else, I found this unpractical. The D50 fits perfectly in the slingshot 100, though I had to readjust the velcro camera compartment dividers first. This was quite disappointing as I have almost no free space in my camera compartment anymore!I guess the Canon 350D, which has a smaller body, will fit in this bag better. Anyway I have no other lenses yet (the 18-200 still on order) so that all my gear (battery, memory cards etc.) finds a place in this bag. The bag fits very well, is comfortable and is well-made. Before buying though, do check if your camera and lens will fit</review_text>
This is my first review on Amazon because I've bought products and never really felt like they deserved a review.  I would say I did a thorough search for a bag that would fit me.  I have a Nikon D50 with the 18-55mm lens and a 70-300mm zoom lens.  I originally had a large Nikon bag that was a pain to carry around.  It was inconvenient to carry and to access my camera.So when searching for a bag I wanted something that was compact, easy to carry, could hold my gear neatly and securely, and have my camera easily accessible for those moments when you want to take a quick shot and put it right back.  I went to camera stores and tried on bags, looked all over the internet for reviews and finally came across the Lowepro Slingshot 100AW.  It had everything that I was looking for plus more.Besides being able to hold my camera gear, it was able to hold my battery charger, cleaning supplies, extra batteries, filters, and has a built in all weather cover.  Even with all of that packed I still have space for my wallet, cellphone and keys, thus freeing up my pants pockets.  The great thing about the bag is that it is able to give me that extra stability when taking photos when bag is slung around to the front of me.The bag is so well designed that there's no worry about having the bag opening up and having all your expense gear fall out.  The opening where you remove the camera has straps that prevent it from opening all the way by accident.All in all I am very satisfied with the bag.  I would recommend it to anyone but if you have more than a couple of lenses to your photography arsenal I would upgrade to the Slingshot 200AW.</review_text>
This fit my Olympus E500 great.  I recently took an overseas trip and this bag was great for traveling and on the go trips. And the weatherproof cover really came in handy a few time when it started to rain unexpectly.  The only thing that was a bit odd is the strap that you can wear around your body.  It comes up the chest at an odd angle, my husband didn't have a problem with it but I did.  So maybe thats just a girl thing....  :)Most times I didn't use the extra strap, just threw it over one shoulder and went.  The bag held 2 lenses, extra battery, charger, and I had room for keys, wallet and a few little personal odds and ends.  My friend was so impressed with it, he is buying one today.Some one asked if they can attach a tripod to the bag.  There aren't really any extra loops on the outside of bag.  A stadard tripod won't fit insidde.  You would have to rig something up on the outside yourself.  IMO I don't that that it would work very well but you can try.</review_text>
This bag is very sturdy and padded.  The description is pretty scanty, but I took a chance and bought it.  Glad I did.  The bag holds my JVC GR-DVL805U mini DV camcorder, the strap, battery, AC adaptor cord, 4 tapes, the remote, and all connector cables.  It's kind of a tight squeeze with all those accesories, but the bag is compact, comfortable, and easy to carry, with the camcorder still being protected.  The bag also comes with a lifetime guarantee against defect.  The only thing that could be improved is that it's awkward to get the camcorder in or out of the bag while carrying it with the strap over the shoulder; the zipper is hard to reach and goes all the way around the top. That's the only thing that could be improved, and could be considered a safety feature, because the camcorder certainly won't come out unexpectedly.  The bag is also very durable and nice looking. I recommend it</review_text>
Ordered October 9th.... Not delivered as of November 22nd. Now due to arrive mid December. Yuck</review_text>
No need to run and guess whether the self-timer has already fired when I want to have a picture together with my girlfriend. Extremely useful when taking shots in low light conditions with long exposure, too. Works perfectly with my D50</review_text>
I love this remote. I find it very convenient to take self portraits and night time long exposure shots. Unfortunately I lost the remote during my trip to smokies and still have no clue how and where - might have slipped from my pocket in a hurry. I have ordered a second one now. It is so tiny that you do not feel the weight or volume in your pocket or camera bag. I wish it had a strap/thread or hole so that it can be attached to key chain or camera or etc.</review_text>
I love using it, long exposure, great for bulb. Cheap and cool.</review_text>
Works as advertised. I use it extensively for environmental work where I want to remain a short distance from my camera. It's great for portraits where I am near and concentrating on my subject and can shoot remotely without losing contact with model. The remote also came in handy for several self-promotions where I seated seating myself in an office atmosphere.</review_text>
I use it with my Nikon D70, and am very satisfied with it.I most often use it for long exposures, for taking picture that include myself, and for taking pictures of my 6-month old daughter, who stops acting naturally when she notices I hold the camera, so I place it on the tripod, and take pictures of her.</review_text>
I use it with my Nikon d50 and it works as promised.  I took some long exposure shots with it last night and they came out crisp.  I am also a parent and I find that using a remote is much easier than setting the timer and rangling a toddler in place within the limited window of time.  I recommend this device to anyone and I find it quite affordable.Like most reviewers, I think it would have been great if it was an included accessory</review_text>
This great lens is a joy to use....Keep in mind the min on 1:6 sensors will be about 160mm so you are limited in that respect.Would be nice if you could see lens IS settings like focus range preset  in view finder.Don't like the fact that the lens hood does not have a mark to show where it can be installed quickly.. not bad using the logo as indicator for normal use, but always have problems putting it back on reversed to put away.  Other hoods have a small dot etc to help line it up.This lens with grip & double batteries will get your attention after a days shooting with it.  The GOOD news... when you take it off you feel you have a pocket camera weight.I posted some action/panning shots for this lens as there didn't seem to be any others.  A couple of aircraft and a couple of auto racin</review_text>
I was using my new Canon lens during the 4th of july Rodeo in Redlodge Montana. Although I was pretty far from of the bull and horse riders gate,  all my photos were sharp and no blur at al</review_text>
If you use this lens on a 1.6X camera body such as the XT, 20D, or 30D you end up with a 160-640mm equivalent which is an impressive range by any standard.  You can also add the 1.4X TC for a 896mm upper limit or the 2X TC for an amazing 1280mm.  Of course this comes at a price, and I'm not just talking money.  You will have to use a tripod, cable release, and mirror lockup a lot of the time when using such long focal lengths.  Plus this thing is very heavy and very large and people will take notice.  So if stealth photography is your goal, go with something like the 70-300 DO.That being said, this is an amazing lens, admittedly a little slow near the long end, but to get down to f/4 would have most likely doubled or tripled the price and weight, so it seems like an acceptable trade-off.If you want sharp pictures, an amazing zoom range, and a good workout, but don't mind being the center of attention, this is the lens for you</review_text>
I agree with all the others comments about this lens.  It works great but it is big, heavy and attracts attention.  When I say it attracts attention, I am not kidding.  I was at an airshow taking pictures along with a lot of other amature photographers.  My 100-400mm lens, however, attracted the attention of a local newpaper reporter who interviewed me.  However, I bought it to use with my 20D at airshows and I can honestly say I am not disapointed.  It was well worth the money.I also bought a cheap Kenko 1.5x teleconverter for kicks.  While the converter isn't "L" grade, I am pleased with the results and the autofocus still works which I understand is not the case with the Canon TCs.For those looking for a big zoom lens and you want IS, you are ulitimately going to wind up buying this lens.</review_text>
I've only had this lens for a few days and I will say it has impressed me. It does have drawbacks, needs lots of light and is somewhat heavy. I would not like to carry all day,but for my need it isn't a problem.I have a couple of photos on display taken the first day I purchased the lens . It was a very overcast day and I think they turned out reasonable for the weather. My test at home when the sun popped out were outstanding. As for the push and pull adjustment I see no problem with it.I think with a little more experience it will be a very good purchase for my budget. I know there are higher quality lens but price becomes an issue,when you are a amature hobbiest like I am.I would recommend for any one who likes to take wildlife photos. The 5 star rating is for the money and quality it is a very good lens!</review_text>
This lens is super-sharp, colors come out vibrant, it has two IS modes, and is push/pull (some people don't like that, but your zooms are super-fast). This is probably the best Canon telephoto lens in terms of focal range. One bit of warning; it's not only fairly large and made of metal (not plastic), but it's kind of heavy -- while it doesn't weigh 50 pounds, be aware that it's NOT light. Carrying it around when attached to the camera, you carry the equipment by the lens, not the body</review_text>
I shoot with a Canon 20D and have used the Canon EF 75-300mm f/4.5-5.6 III USM lens. I've always noticed the limitations of this lens when shooting amateur softball. I reviewed the lens lineup at the Canon website and decided on the Canon EF 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L USM Lens. Even so, I was apprehensive about the push/pull zoom system. Since this lens seems so expensive, I wanted to try it before I bought it. After renting the lens and using it over a weekend at a softball tournament, I knew this was the right lens for me.This is a serious lens meant for serious photographers. Being an L lens, there is a lot more features and is manufactured with better materials. The construction is sturdy and consists of 17 elements in 14 groups. The fluorite and Super UD-glass elements largely eliminate the secondary spectrum. This lens is compatible with the extenders 1.4x II and 2x II. The Canon EF 100-400mm lens weighs in at about 3 lbs/1,380g, and accepts 77mm filters. Be sure to get a good quality UV haze filter.Being white, this lens looks a bit strange, but helps keep it cool when using in the sun. Some people are concerned that being white, it attracts attention to criminals. From my experience, my 20D attracts attention regardless of what lens I put on it. I personally doubt a thief looking for something to steal is taking the time to evaluate the cost of the item and are more concerned with the ease of taking something they can unload. I try to make things difficult for would be thieves and have insurance as a back up.The dual IS system has two modes. Mode 1 is for stationary subjects while mode two is for moving subjects. It is recommended that the IS function is not used on a tripod; however I have used it on my monopod with success. The IS helps to eliminate camera shake and helps stabilize the lens when shooting from a moving vehicle. While there are limitations to what the IS can do, it can give you a couple extra stops. Just keep in mind, the IS attempts to eliminate camera movement, not the movement of the subject being photographed.This lens permits for auto or manual focus depending on how the switch is set. There is also a switch to shift from a 1.8m/5.9ft to infinity or 6.5m/21.3ft to infinity.Zooming with this lens takes a little time to get used to if you have never used it before. Once it is gotten used to, it seems to be much faster than the typical twist zooming. A resistance ring is used to tighten or loosen the resistance to zooming. This allows for practically locking the zoom in place or providing no resistance at all. Zooming is as simple as pulling or pushing the lens as its name suggest.The push/pull system causes air to be noticeably pushed around. Because air is pushed into the camera, there is a myth that the lens causes dust to settle and accumulate on digital camera sensors. I mostly use this lens in one of the dirtiest environments I shoot in for amateur softball pictures. Even so, my experience does not support the myth. I have not seen any evidence to support the myth from any reputable source either.Included with this lens are the Tripod mount, lens hood, and storage case. The tripod mount is the best option to use when mounting to a tripod. This helps to balance the load. Mounting the camera instead creates an unbalanced set up that may topple over. The case is a zippered soft case (LZ1234) that can also be purchased separately. The lens hood (ET-83C) is used to reduce lens flare and can protect the front element in certain situations.The Canon EF 100-400mm is such an awesome lens, it almost fails to compare to the Canon EF 75-300mm. The clarity and sharpness is incredible. The auto-focus is quiet and quick. The features add creative versatility. The Canon EF 100-400mm comes at a price, but it is worth every bit of it. Now that I have both lenses, the Canon EF 75-300mm is no longer used.PROS:Incredible clarity and sharpnessQuiet and quick auto-focusFeatures add creative versatilityDual IS systemCONS:Heavy and bulky (This should be expected with these types of lenses</review_text>
Reviews of this lens on the web are mixed with some showing soft results, particularly at 400mm.  This is likely due to wide variations in sample lenses.  I decided to take a chance and seem to have gotten lucky.  My copy, just received from Amazon (Build date of Oct 2005) produces fantastically crisp and contrasty images on my 20D at ALL focal lengths from 100 to 400.  It's almost magical.   The images are much sharper using the same f-stops than those from a 70-200 f2.8IS lens at 100-150mm and virtually the same at 200mm.  Even wide-open at 400mm this lens is quite sharp.  At 400mm, I've compared to a very nice Canon 400mm f5.6L prime lens, with and without 1.4X teleconverter.  The images have virtually the same extreme sharpness and contrast if the zoom is stopped down just one one-third stop (e.g. zoom at 6.3, prime at 5.6).  With the 1.4X TC both lenses had to be manually focused but produced outstanding clarity with NO perceivable loss in quality.  The focus is swift and true and the IS on this lens really works (and does not hum like that on the 70-200 f2.8IS) allowing handheld shots at 1/100 sec at 400mm.   It may be that Canon has quietly improved this lens since recent reviews seem to be much more positive than those from a few years ago.   Some folks don't like the push-pull zoom but it works great for me and allows very fast composition of scenes.  The lens is about the same size as the 70-200 f2.8 IS but seems lighter and better balanced.   Given the razor sharpness of its images and 100-400mm range, this seems like the perfect single lens solution for nature and bird photography.  However, it is big and white so it may not be the best for candid people photography.</review_text>
I bought this lense recently. At first I thought it was heavy, but once I got used to it, I decided that it was heavy due to quality. It is a big lense, and the tripod mount is very useful, especially for balance.You can't but notice the quality of this lense. The IS function is very useful.Combine this lense with the 2x Extender, and you've effectively got a 800mm lense.For anyone looking for a zoom lense, this is one to seriously consider. For sport, the IS function is brilliant, for wildlife ... well, I can go on and on about how good this lense is. Bottom line - well worth buying</review_text>
I have been very happy with this camera bag. The slingshot design works well and makes unloading the equipment far less cumbersome than a traditional backpack. I also like the features of the bag. It has all the great Lowepro niceties like a protective sewn-in cloth to cover the sensitive camera viewer  before you zip it up, the waterproof covering for that unexpected downpour and compartments for the digital memory cards. It's a good buy</review_text>
I purchased the Lowepro Slingshot 200 to replace the Tamrac Adventure 7 backpack I recently returned to Amazon.  I spent quite a few hours researching bags to use for sightseeing/hiking and had initially purchased the Tamrac bag b/c of its similarity (in style) to a regular backpack.  A recent "L series" purchase has encouraged me to keep a low profile when transporting my gear.  While the Tamrac bag certainly looked the part, its functionality left something to be desired.  The Adventure 7 held my entire kit, which includes: Canon Digital Rebel XT, EF24-105mm "L", EF50mm & EF18-55mm "kit" lenses, EX580 flashgun and the various hoods/filter/etc for the above lenses.  Now the bad part, once strapped into its normal position, the only way to access your gear (in the Adven. 7 pack) is to fully remove the backpack, place it on the ground, unzip the zipper fully, then remove/replace the camera/gear you desire.  This proved VERY cumbersome while on the rocky terrain of the "Great Falls" national park in VA (near DC), in fact, there were times when I gave up on a few nice photo opportunities simply b/c getting to the camera would have been too difficult.  I do own a Lowepro holster, but by going that route, I would have limited my ability to bring alternate lenses/accessories.After some additional research, I decided to try the Slingshot 200.  Let's compare the tow on some key points:Gear Capacity:  Nearly identical for both bagsAdditional Capacity:  The Tamrac trumps the Lowepro, it has nearly double the useable storage capacity, great for bringing along a snack, your keys, etc.Styling: Again, the Tamrac is a winner, looks like a standard backpack, versus the strange look of the slingshotFunctionality:  As a backpack, the Tamrac is much more comfortable, has greater storage capacity and even offers a waist support strap for longer trips.  BUT, this comes at the cost of accessibility.  The Lowepro slides easily around to the front.  Simply unzip and your camera is right there. It also is a stable platform for lens changing/cleaning/etc.To summarize:For hiking/walking/etc where you need instant access to your camera and accessories, the Lowepro Slingshot 200 wins hands down.Pros: Instant access to your gear, includes all-weather cover (attached), nice attention to details (lens cleaning/protection cloth is a particularly nice touch), etc.Cons: Strange styling, not reversible (can only be worn on right shoulder), nearly impossible to carry hanging on one shoulder.</review_text>
I think I may have found the perfect camera bag.  This one is comfortable to wear all day, it holds my Alpha 100 with my kit lens, my 100-400 lens both with lens hoods.  My battery charger, manual, misc cables, wallet, phone, misc items such as a small rain jacket.It also has a little pocket for your memory cards.  The best part of this bag is that you can swing it around to the front and pull your camera out without having to sit it down or showing everything you have in the bag.  The bag is plain enough that most people wouldn't know that you have a camera and all of the equipment that goes with it.  Which is a big plus with a women traveling alone</review_text>
This is a wonderful bag for the photographer that wants a light weight bag that can still hold a lot of lenses or bodies.  The bag slings around to the front allowing the user to easily switch out lenses without having to unload the entire bag or worry about dropping an expensive lense.  Also, the bag can hold a lot of accessories.  I had to Canon Rebel XT bodies and 3 lenses in just the camera compartment.  The flap that opens up to the user when the bag is on your chest has the memory card holder, but it hold 8 memory cards which is huge!  The top has a small pouch where you can tuck away larger objects like a water bottle or map.  The all weather bag cover is built into the bag so you do not have to worry about folding it up and storing it.  The bag cover also has velcro pulls that latches it onto the bag so that it stays on insuring a dry environment inside the bag.  Basically this is a top notch bag that can get through anything.  Yes, I have actually used the bag on a few trips and find it very user friendy and reasonable</review_text>
This bag is very spacious and stylish. It holds my Rebel XT and my three lenses very well.  I can even hold a 70-200mm f/4 in there, although it is a bit snug.  The best part of this bag is that it is completely customizable.  I have set it up in such a way that I can get to any one of my lenses just by slinging the bag around and unzipping only the top compartment.  This is very useful when you don't want to constantly set your bag on the floor to access your equipment.  I do have one complaint.  When wearing this bag as a sling, it will sit on your right shoulder.  I am more used to bags sitting on my left shoulder, so that does take some getting used to.  When I carry this in "non-sling" mode (i.e. not over my head), it can comfortably sit on my left shoulder.  However, the best and most unique feature of this bag is the ability for it to sling around and have access to the camera without taking the bag off, which is only possible if I wear it as a sling bag on my right shoulder.  It would have been nice if that portion of the bag is customizable as well</review_text>
The case opens partially on the side to allow removal of the camera only. Then after unclicking the fasteners you can unzip the rest of the case to allow for access to lenses. It makes it easy if you only want to remove the camera. You can swing the bag around while wearing it and pull the camera out without taking off the pack.My digital Rebel XT fits with the Canon Battery grip and my macro lens attached, however it would not fit with my 200mm lens attached.My Canon Speedlight flash did not fit well in the lense section but fits perfectly in the separate section at the top portion of the bag. The lenses all fit nicely allowing for several lenses depending on the size of them.I bought a regular Lowepro camera bag, but found that it was awkward to place the camera in with lens attached. This bag is designed to have the camera with a lens.If you search Google images for the Lowepro Slingshot 200 you will see what I mean about the side unzipping to allow the camera removal.</review_text>
Great product. Compact, easy to use (took a couple of trys), feels good and was able to put two large digital cameras, four lenses and room for more.Love it</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.</review_text>
If you are a believer in protecting your expensive lens purchase with a filter than you can do a lot worse than a Tiffen filter.  The glass quality is good and the price is reasonalbe.  The filter cuts down on the glare that can adversly effect some shots with out an uv filter as advertised. Not much else to say.</review_text>
This UV filter produces high quality pictures at a fraction of the cost of many ather brands</review_text>
works as advertised.  you screw it on the end of your lens, and there you go</review_text>
Great filter for the price-no reason to spend more. The filter threads are high quality, and it is possible to stack filters if you want-not recommended, though, if you are using it on a wide-angle, as I am.No vignetting, sturdy filter.</review_text>
A UV Filter is about as standard as filters get. Tiffen makes a good quality filter and this was just as expected. The price was equilivant to other vendors and as expected I had no problems; ordering was simple and the product came on time</review_text>
There are some of you who are reading this because you are wondering why should I pay more than a grand for this lens? Some may wonder if what they heard about this lens is true? And others may wonder if this lens has any draw-backs?First, let's look at the Canon product line. At one time I owned several Nikon cameras and believed in the Nikon product line strongly -- but that was with film. With technology quickly advancing and prices dropping on the digital front, I knew it was time to decide again -- Canon or Nikon?I happened to be visiting the national park at Fort Scott, Kansas. There was a traveling professional photographer there who had a digital Canon 5D. He showed me the myriad of L (luxury) lenses he had -- I stopped counting after SEVEN!"Why Canon over Nikon?" I asked. "They both have excellent product lines," he replied. "Every year their digital camera body designs keep leap-frogging each other in technological advances -- but I decided on Canon because of its lenses." Duh! Of course, it's the glass stupid -- I thought to myself.Based on his recommendation, I purchased a digital Canon 30D body (I will wait for technology to leap forward some more and pricing to take another drop before I invest in a more expensive body) and several lenses -- including the 24-70mm f/2.8L.As a semi-professional photographer, I took an assignment shooting a conference at a hotel in Las Vegas. Shots included vendors tables, speakers and awards' ceremonies. The rooms were dimmly lighted and a professional photographer who knew the hotel suggested that I take a flash even though he knew I would be using the 24-70. As it turned out, I needed but one lens for the entire shoot and it was the 24-70 with hood.The other gear I used was the 30D grip, the 580ex flash with the omni-bounce attachment and the CP-E3 compact battery pact -- all mounted on the Strobofgrame PRO-RL using a camera quick release system. Of course, all total, there also were 12 batteries: 2 camera, 4 580ex and 8 CP-E3.How did the shots turn-out? Did I really need the flash as suggested even though I had a fast 2.8 lens? First, I tried some shots without the flash and they turned-out okay, but a flash was needed for professional shots. So, how did the shots turn-out?Canon delivered what it promised! The shots turned-out beautifully! The auto-focus was fast and quiet. The color saturation was magnificient and subjects' skin tones were natural and vibrant. It was true with what I had heard about the 24-70 zoom -- the quality was so good that it was as if I was shooting with different straight lens with different focal lengths -- all in one lens! The lens' hood is large and impressive looking to those who are not into cameras. Even though it serves a purpose, the hood with its accompanying lens can make an amateur look like a pro!So why did I list all of the above equipment? Because in total it is HEAVY!You will need a grip on your camera to help balance this long heavy lens. I carried the camera with attached accessories around for some seven hours and at the end of the day my wrist/forearm muscles were tired! Yes, I know I could have had the battery pack attached to my belt rather than the frame -- but for flexibility I decided not to go that direction. And, frankly, I do not think it would have mattered.So, you are going to get quality with this lens, but beware of it being heavy for someone slightly built like myself. For this reason, there has been some talk about "image stabilization" being added to this lens, however, to date it is mere talk and, personally, I do not see it happening in the foreseeable future. Also, for me personally, because of its weight, I do not consider this to be a walk-around lens that I could carry with me for hours on-end. I know that many will argue with this statement and they probably are a lot physically stronger than me.So, do you buy the lens? In my opinion, it is a resounding "Yes!" with a couple of caveats. The price is high, but it keeps on increasing -- so buy it when rebates are available from the manufacturer.Also, do not pay the big bucks for this lens unless you are seriously into photography. Canon has many non-L lenses that can give you oustanding quality photographs -- sometimes there is a fine distinction between a photo derived from an L lens and a non-L lens. Unless you are looking at greatly enlarged photos, in many cases it will be difficult to see the differences. So, save your money and take advantage of Canon's other quality lens instead.Last, whatever you decide, enjoy capturing the moments -- life is short</review_text>
This is a fantastic lens.  It takes crisp, rich photos, has a large apperature that makes for impressive low-light photography, and includes USM technology for lightening-fast focusing.  Since I am only a serious hobbyist, I can't yet afford another quality Canon lens...but for 2 years I have been perfectly happy to leave this lens on the camera (a 10D).  Portraits, landscapes, indoor shots with no flash...it can do them all with ease, and the photos look great.This lens is a little heavy, and combined with my 10D the weight is certainly a consideration.  But to me it feels well-balanced on the camera, and I like the substantial feel that the lens-camera combination gives.  If you plan to use a flash, remember that this is a big lens and the built-in flash may not clear the barrel (especially on the 10D, before Canon redesigned the pop-up flash)...might want to think about an external flash head for the hot shoe.There's a lot of glass on the front of this lens, don't forget the UV filter for a little extra protection</review_text>
Exceptional images! I can shoot indoors with low light due to the large aperture. The lens is a bit heavy though!I had to choose between this lens and the 24-105 F4L IS lens. I went for the 24-70 F2.8L for the wider aperture. I have no regrets!I do miss the additional reach of the 24-105 F4L IS lens, but this was a compromise that I was willing to make.Once again, excellent lens</review_text>
There is very little doubt that this is one of the better Canon lenses available.However,  why buy from AMAZON when it did a price increase of $73 as soon as Canon starts the 2006 fall rebate program.  AMAZON has officially become the most expensive online retailer for this lens.</review_text>
My all-around favorite lens in the Canon EOS system is the 50/1.4.  I find that most of the time, most of the pictures I want to take can be achieved using hte 50mm focal length, and the fast aperture allows me to take photos in low light.I bought the 24-70/2.8 in hopes of getting high quality images from a zoom lens, as a lot of my pictures weren't in particularly dark places, and the flexibility to get a little wider or closer sounded appealing.I was not disappointed.The image quality produced by the 24-70/2.8 is outstanding.  Great color, great sharpness.  It might not make images quite as striking as Canon's 135/2 lens, but they are very good indeed.Does this lens replace the 50/1.4?  No way.  The 50 is a lot smaller, weighs a lot less, and is still much better for low light shooting.  But for photographing events where you don't want to lug around several prime lenses or go to extreme lenghts to frame the shot better, the 24-70 can be a great tool</review_text>
I agree with all the positive reviews of this lens. It's a great lens, give's that certain silky smooth bokeh that the 24-105 lacks and gives a nice bright viewfinder.It does have a couple of quirks though--It's very heavy so be prepared for that. A lens of this quality and high speed will need a lot of glass in there.-When you zoom out to wide, it actually gets longer which is a bit strange. Sometimes when you are taking a group picture and you need to zoom out a bit to fit everyone in the shot, the subjects see the lens moving towards them and think you are going in for a closeup. This can be partially remedied by using the included hood which masks the lens a bit and is always extended.</review_text>
This is a great lens. The pictures I take are very sharp and alive with color, and the brokeh is excellent. I am a big fan of keeping a shallow depth of field when shooting people or animals, so the f/2.8 helps out. Also dim wedding receptions are no problem with even the weak built in flash on my Rebel XT. The autofocus is practically silent, accurate and very fast.If you don't think you need f/2.8, go for the 24-105mm f/4 L IS. It has an extra 35mm on the telephoto end, image stabilization, and is lighter and smaller</review_text>
You are buying quality not price. Im amazed with the quality of the pictures I get with my new lens. It seems I changed my camera to a new model... totaly diferent pictures. I have compared to my previous cameras and lenses and WOW... I cant believe I thought I had some great pictures in my collection. I dont want to use my other lenses anymore, I have a new standard in my pictures.I have to say that it was a "crazy" decision to buy this lens because of the price, but this is an investment that once you have it you will enjoy and will last for many years. If you love photography and really like to go to full detail you wont regret it</review_text>
this is a wonderful filter.clean your front element, place this filter on it, and now you never have to think about it again.  the thread fit is very good on both ends of it.the canon 67mm cap fits on the front of this filter perfectly.  there's even a slight raised metal lip so that the cap doesn't sit against the filter glass.well engineered, and worth the money</review_text>
i am a fisheye lens addict.  i have had this lens for a few months now, and i use it for almost everything.  the lens was worth every bit i payed for it.  and the sigma customer service was so fast and easy.  the lens takes clear sharp pictures everytime.  this lens takes the best skateboarding and band pictures!  if you are considering this lens, i would definately reccomend it.  i love how the pictures can either be circular or full frame.  its a great investment......</review_text>
Manufactured of a soft gray felt like material, a tough leather bottom, and draw string closure at the top, this lens pouch helps protect your lens from dust and the elements. I store my lenses in a camera bag, and these cases fit nicely around the lens taking up little precious space.This case is meant for use with the Canon 28 to 135mm f3.5-5.6 IS USM, and the 28 to 200mm f3.5-5.6 USM EF lenses. These lenses do not normally come with the case when sold new. Amazon often suggests purchasing one with your lens, and is worth considering depending on how you store your lenses.PROS:Protects your glass investmentCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
I already have 2 of the smaller versions for other lenses but wanted to be sure my EFS 17-85-mm would be snug as a bug in its own pouch instead of a cheap felt sling thing. Well, Canon came through again with another of its soft felt line the LP1116. This pouch is thick and has the same firm bottom made of naugahide that protects the inside lens. The cord is strong and silky and doesn't open accidently the way a silky cord would. Obviously we can't throw the pouch around and we have to be careful but it really does the trick and feels good in your hand. The moment I buy another lens, I shall have to buy its matching pouch</review_text>
This is my first review on here.Bought the marine pack for a houseboat trip for my Sony DSC-N1 camera.  It is very solid and feels great.Somehow I mistakenly thought before obtaining it that the touchscreen could still be used when the camera was installed.  Though that's not accurate, a good number of other functionality is retained (you can switch between movie/camera/review modes, zoom, etc.).It worked very well for the trip, and it took fantastic photos.  We even took several movies going down water slides and diving into the water (which isn't suggested in the manuals) but still everything turned out perfectly.All in all, I'd easily recommend this unit</review_text>
The marine pack for the DSC-N1 is good enough to get the job done.  The camera has a special housing setting to change the functionality of the camera so that it can be used in the case.  Unfortunately, this means losing the ability to use manual settings.  Luckily, the camera does fine figuring out its own settings, though occasionally to get the picture just right you need to do it yourself.  I have taken the case to 130 feet several times and have never experienced a leak</review_text>
I have not actually taken this underwater yet, but it appears to be well made and of similar quality to other cases. It keeps theover-all size of the camera/case down to a size that could fit into a BC pocket. On the downside, it does have only limited functionality of the camera through the available buttons. You can zoom and telephoto, change from camera,playback and to movie mode and shoot the picture. You cannot do any of the setup functions while it is in the case. Regarding a stobe, Sony makes one that looks a little cheezy. There is a "universal" strobe by Sea Life (SL 960D) that fits, but the fiber-optic trigger is just taped onto the flash of the camera. I'm waiting to how this works. One replacement O-ring comes with the case-replacements from sony were outrageously expensive. Color-correcting (red) lenses are about $100 from sony, but not needed if you use a strobe. (unless maybe to shoot movies?)</review_text>
Great camera, easy to use, and great movie quality on video cam part. Bought a 4GB SD card for it, so photos are just about endless</review_text>
This is my first camera and I'm very happy with the choice I made. This camera has allowed me to take amazing pictures I wouldnt' dream of. I love accentuating colors and taking sepia or black & white pictures of great backgrounds. It's certainly an aggregated value to the camera.Before I bought this camera I used to borrow my brother's, and I can say that mine is SO much better than his. The colors are more vivid, the images look brighter and I can shoot faster with mine. The only feature I miss from his camera is that I was able to cut the picture right in the camera. With my Canon I have to wait to get home, download the picture and then cut it. You should take another picture if you dont' like the first one.One other thing: the camera claims to have "Image Stabilized Zoom" but that didnt' work for me when I wanted to take the picture with no flash. I hope it was because of the lack of experience, and I'll try to improve my skills so I can come back and give you more details about that specific feature and about the camera itself.Still, knowing all this, I would buy this camera again</review_text>
I did a lot of research in picking out a camera and wish I had known about this camera before purchasing a Nikon P3 (with WiFi). I happened to receive a refurbished SD700 right before our honeymoon and took both to test them out. What better place than Kauai to take some great shots...So, after about the first day of shooting I came to the conclusion that the Canon was a better camera hands down!!! As a matter of fact it is the best camera I've owned and I'll never get another brand again. There were several things that set this camera apart from others:1. Picture quality on scene modes (beautiful beach and floral mode)2. Picture quality on auto (true sign of a good camera)3. 4X zoom (unbelievable - best feature...took pictures of a lighthouse from a mile away and looked like I was right in front taking it. I also used camera as binoculars to see a mountain goat in Wimea Canyon and picture was unbelievably clear)4. Battery life5. User controls and softwareI really can't find anything bad to say about this camera. I didn't get a chance to even read the manual before our trip and figured out all the "bells and whistles" fairly easily. As a point and shoot camera, this Canon delivers a professional quality like no other! Definitely a great purchase</review_text>
With 2 toddlers, I'm the type of person who likes to have a camera with me to capture those unexpected moments on film. The ELPH cameras are ideal for this because they're small and lightweight. I used a 3.2MP Canon ELPH before this one, and I thought the 3.2 was good until I started using this new one. The clarity and stability control on the SD700 is great! And downloading the photos to my computer takes only seconds. I highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I gave this camera to my husband for his birthday.  It is the first digital camera we have owned though my college age son is on his third one - all have been Canon digital Elphs.  This is such a great little gadget - it is smaller than a pack of cigarettes, has a big screen on which to view your photo(s), is easy to learn to use, and great for taking on trips - as long as you remember to keep the wrist strap on your wrist while you are using it so it doesn't drop and break.I also purchased a small Canon digital printer which is great for us to take to our aging parents, take photos, print them immediately and leave them with our parents to enjoy immediately.  Every Canon product we own has not disappointed us and this little camera is no exception!</review_text>
I love this camera.  It does everything you'd want a compact point and shoot camera to do.  Perfect for taking pictures of my toddler.  Fits in your pocket and starts up in a split second.  Never miss another "Kodak moment".</review_text>
Worth the money in every way.  Sturdy, compact, great pictures, easy to use, easy to upload images</review_text>
I mainly use this when taking landscape shots where I want to either make the clouds pop or liven the sky up some (remember it works best 90 degrees from the sun.) I also put it on when shooting highly reflective vegetation or waterscapes that would otherwise cause blown-out highlights. One other little secrete is to use this when shooting waterfalls since it will allow you to shoot at slower shutter speeds thus increasing the wispy waterfall look.</review_text>
Obviously, I am enamored with the Nikon D80.  As one who has extensively used the D100, D70s, and D200, I was curious as to how the D80 would "shake out" in comparison with these fine cameras.  The answer is that it does very well indeed.The most obvious improvement in D80 over the D70s and D100 is the upgrade from 6.1 to 10.2 Megapixels--the same as its "Big Brother," the D200  This is not a major issue for many users, as a 6.1 MP image (uncropped) looks essentially exactly the same as a 10.2 MP image.  However, if the user intends to crop images in post-processing, the larger amount of resolution becomes important--the more megapixels the more detail when images are cropped.  Shooters of wildlife, for example, will appreciate the additional resolution of the D80, as it is often necessary to photograph wildlife at a distance and then crop the image to cause the subject to dominate the frame.The other very obvious D80 improvements are the larger viewfinder and larger rear-LCD.  These are very welcome improvements, also borrowed from the D200.  The viewfinder is wide, bright, and a literal joy to use.  Combined with the 11-point autofocus system (basically the same as that of the D200 although with some differences in options) the viewfinder makes the D80 a powerhouse camera for moving subjects, or for framing the subject in places other than the center of the image.The autofocus is fast and sure.  I literally never use manual focus with the D80--the autofocus is just too good not to use for almost every conceivable situation.The 2.5 inch rear LCD is bright and vivid--a joy to use.  This too, as mentioned above, is borrowed from the D200.  The menu selections in the D80 closely track those of the D200 and are largely pretty intuitive for anyone who is somewhat familiar with the Nikon system.A few nits.  First of all, the D80 does not have a selection for focus-priority continuous focus mode.  This is unfortunate, as such an option (present on the D200) allows fast action shots using continuous-focus with surety that the subject is, in fact, in focus.  Happily, this absence (which I predict and hope Nikon will correct in a later firmware revision) is not a huge loss.  I have shot hundreds of images of fast-flying birds using continuous focus with the D80 and the images are almost all perfectly focused.  The user can trust the D80 in continuous focus mode, focus priority or no.Nikon chose to equip the D80 with SD cards rather than CF cards.  Why Nikon did this is a mystery to many of us as the D80 clearly is an upgrade to the wonderful D70s, which uses CF cards.  Further, the D80 is a fantastic backup camera for D200 users, and the D200, of course, also uses CF cards rather than SD cards.  CF cards would have been a more logical choice in my opinion for the D80.  Fortunately, the cost of these media is dropping so fast that this is less of an issue than it would have been a few years ago.The D80 sucks up power a lot faster than the D70s.  That 2.5 inch LCD entails higher power use as a price.  Most users will want to own a spare battery.As to ergonomics, the D80 is terrific!  I have just finished an 8 day stay on Maui, Hawaii, during which my D80 was literally always with me.  The weight of the camera is low, and its bulk, reasonable.  There is no digital SLR I would rather carry for an extended period than the compact D80.  The placement of the various controls is excellent, and pretty intuitive.  The quality of the D80 body construction is standard Nikon-Prosumer grade, which is to say, excellent albeit not as heavy-duty as the metal-body D200.Overall, the D80 is destined to become one of the great Nikon cameras that will find a place with users all over the world</review_text>
It doesn't get any better at this price point. Excellent build quality, very easy to use, and intuitive. The optics are simply brilliant for a kit lense (135MM).Went from a Canon Rebel film SLR which I loved, but when I tried to move into the XTi, there was just no comparison between the XTi and the D80. You could immediately feel the difference in quality and functionality. And the auto-clean feature is absolute marketing crap from Canon. THe CMOS shakes off the dust, but then where does the dust go? Bologna feature, not to mention the Flash nearly knocks your eye out when it pops up on the Canon XTi.The D80 blows it away, and for it's price there is nothing out there better. If your in the market at this price point, or relatively close, just go for it. You WILL NOT regret this purchase.</review_text>
You are reading a non technical review from your average fun photographer. So don't expect a lot of technical stuff. I finally stepped up from a Fuji S9000. I have loved my Fuji cameras ease of use and the colors they produce. I was a little reluctant to spend the kind of money it takes to get into the D80. I am thrilled I did. I finally have a digital camera that when the kids do something I catch it as opposed to the camera taking the shot after they have left the room. Super fast. A few Saturdays ago I was outside in our wooded back yard taking pictures of the changing colors in the trees.When I went to take a shot the flash popped up. I said this isn't right the sun in filtering though the trees but I took the shot anyway. Wow the camera new what to do. Unbelievable photos. Easy to handle even with the pistolgrip MB D80. I also sprung for the SB600 flash and a great two dvd training program on Ebay. So don't be afraid to spend a couple of grand for the D80 and accesories. You will be glad you did. Happy in Alabam</review_text>
I recently test drove a D200 and was impressed with the useabiity of the camera. It is almost perfect. When buying I opted for the D80 because it has a very similar feature-set for less cash. Which meant additional money for lenses. OK, it doesn't shoot 5fps or have the alloy body with weather seals, but it does have the sensor and useability. It is light, quick and a joy to use. Changing settings such as ISO, WB and flash is almost as easy as the D200. This is a fine camera. And it uses SD cards - much more preferable than CF in my opinion. Worth every penny</review_text>
I just purchased this camera and lens (with another lens in a different set) and it has blown me away so far.  The pictures have been just incredible.  The focus, metering, exposure, flash, color balance...  Everything is perfect so far.I have mainly used the camera in full automatic mode and it really shines.  Its as simple as a point and shoot in this mode.  I have used the camera in difficult lighting situations and the photos have been incredible.  There is no noticeable shutter lag, which is very important to me.  I have a 6 yo son who goes from smiling one moment to looking away the next.  I have missed so many photos in the past due to shutter lag, but that is not a problem with this camera.  Another feature that helps is the continuous mode.  I can take 3 pics a second for up to 100 pics and then select the best.  Generally I find I can get a good pic in like 10-15 photos.I used to be a serious photo hobbist during the days of film, but always had problems finding a darkroom to develop my film.  The darkroom issue and the shear cost of film and paying for processing made me abandon the hobby.  But this camera is really bringing back the excitement of this hobby again without the trials and expense of the darkroom.The only downside in this camera is the price, but in this instance, you get what you pay for.  You might be able to save a buck or two with another camera, but I wouldn't even try.  I can't imagine a camera taking a better picture.By the way, I love this lens.  The 18 to 55 mm focal length is a nice every day lens.  Its much wider angle then you find on the point and shoot cameras, yet you can still get close.  I have a 55-200 mm lens as well, but I find I use the 18-55 lens more.  The shorter lens is great in confined spaces, where you can't easily back away from the subject, and its always better to move closer to your subject than use a long lens (unless you can't for safety reasons).My only regret is waiting so long to get a DSLR camera of this quality.  It has really opened up a old hobby for me.</review_text>
I started with a D50 and have loved it from the very begining. I felt ready to step up to the next level, but didn't think I was ready for the d200. When I heard about the d80, I read everything I could. The biggest selling point was the fact that it was the same internal workings as the d200 in the more consumer friendly d50 body. I don't use all of the mode setting and find myself in Shutter and Aperture Priority most of the time, but it's nice to have the others there when I don't want to think about or have time to fiddle with settings.The in camera image enhancements are amazing--but a word of caution. Vivid +2 will definitely give you vivid shots--if not too much so.I've had this baby for about 2 weeks and imagine it will be my camera for the next couple years.Compared to the Canon 30d (which I was thinking about) or even the new 400d (I haven't actually held one yet), this is the Nikon to have.On batter life, I had a recent shoot where I took over 800 shots in a 3 hour period. The battery was at about half and that's with quite a bit of LCD viewing.At this level both Canon and Nikon offer great equipment--you can't go wrong with either. Just get one of each in your hands, snap a few shots, and go with the one that feels the best for you</review_text>
This camera is awesome! I upgraded from my D50 for the better sensor and more MP. Wow - am I amazed at the increase in quality. Say goodbye to that digital look. The extras are a lot of fun and I've only begun to play. B/W with various filters to name one. Very worth the money</review_text>
After way too much time infront of a PC reading reviews or a camera store counter (damn I was sick of it), this D80 is what I chose. Bought it 2 weeks ago and then went on a 10 day trip West. After draging it everywhere I has not let me down. For the price its perfect. I'm still working out exactly how to make it work to its potential aswell as fighting understanding of other manufacturers camera layouts in my head) At work I have a Rebel Xt I bought last year as I need its compact casing. My Brother has the Canon D30 after he progressed from the XT and a friend on the west coast has the D200. Having experience both I still love what I chose. My biggest reason however for going again with Nikon was that I already have a N6006 film camera with a lens and my hope was I could use its Nikkor AF 35-105mm with this camera and give myself more options. After reading lots of reviews as to whether this was possible and finally taking the lens to a shop I found it worked fine. Experience in the field in the last 10 days has shown it does not work seemlessly buy that may well be me not the lens. The 2.5 inch LCD is sooo much easier to read than the Rebel XT. The info read out on top is much better placed than the one above the LCD on the XT (if obstructed in an architectural model shoot and I can't see through the viewfinder myself, I certainly can't see the info screen if its below it). I didn't go with the 18-135 in the end for a lens as there is a vinyetting issue at the high end which bothered me. I got a great deal for the same price at Cameraland in New Hampshire for the D80 and the  (D70s) 18-70mm tried and trusted lens. Fab. Now need to save up and wait for the release of the  80-300 VR lens thats coming out. Would love the 80-400 Vr but its 3 times the price.My hardest time was finiding someone with it in stock, at a price I wanted to pay, the set up I wanted and who wasn't trying to make a dodgie deal (like some of those cheap web based places in NYC).It really was the hardest part of the purchase in the end. I was surprised. Many people were almost reluctant to make a sale. It was wierd. Parts are hard to get too apparently like a spare battery and very few places have the 18-135 lens instock either.Anyway enjoy your purchase if you choose this camera. I hope it takes many great pictures for you.</review_text>
I've been looking at Digital SLRs ever since Canon came out with its 10D. Since then, there have been so many by so many companies. I've always been a Canon user. I have had 2 EOS bodies-the Elan IIE and the 7E. And also the Canon IX, its APS camera which I still have (its small viewfinder was a major disappointment).Anyhow the 30D came along, and its viewfinder was small too. The camera was still too large for me, and I just wasn't sold. Now the Nikon D80. It is narrower than the Canon 30D, and what is breathtaking is the panoramically big viewfinder. Such a delight to use. The 2.5" LCD seems to fit perfectly in the back: nothing bigger or smaller would be right.The pictures are fabulous. I bought a 2 GB Sandisk Ultra II card, which I thought would be fast. It takes about a half second for the picture to come on the LCD, but I'm not complaining. 2 GB is a big card. It can hold 500 photos using the Normal JPEG, large image. I'm sure the 1 GB would be faster. On the Canons, the onboard flashes never would use the advanced metering that the external flashes provided, but with the Nikon D80, I see such perfectly illuminated photos with the onboard flash.The 18-135 lens is something I jumped for. 28-200 in 35 mm size is quite a huge range, and yet the lens is not massive. I thought hard about the Image stablization you could get with the Canon 18-85 IS lens, but naaah, the 30D just does not measure up so I dropped that idea. There are always such things called tripods!! The entire camera, lens and battery feel just right, and not too heavy. The lens is excellent. The kit fits nicely into a relatively small Lowepro bag.This truly has been a camera worth waiting years for. 12 or 14 MP models are sure to come along in a couple of years, but I doubt that they can make the bodies any more compact; the file size is large enough as it is with 10 mega-pixel. The D80 is so perfect in shape I doubt Nikon can do much better. This is one fantastic digital SLR.Raj</review_text>
First of all I do not consider myself anything more than a very beginning photographer !!! So I will not go into anything technical.  I will leave that to people who know more than I do. But what I am is an international traveler.  I simply got tired of coming home from fantastic trips with "snapshots".  I wanted someting much better, and boy did I get it with this camera.  I looked at the D70s and since I have very small hands, I could never feel comfortable holding it.  This camera is smaller without being small.  I have only taken photos locally, but at this time of the year with the leaves changing it makes a good start.  The built in editing features (filters etc.) are wonderful to work with.  I would highly recommend this camera to anyone who wants something more than "point and shoot" snap shots</review_text>
I was in the market to buy a new camera last year and walked into BestBuy alone just browsing.  I have an older EOS Canon Rebel 35mm Camera from 1992, and I loved that camera too.So this was my second camera purchase, and was not sure what I wanted, but I knew what I wanted to take pictures of.   I take this camera everywhere, vacations, visiting friends and family, take pictures of scenery, sporting events, and people.There are a lot of options on this camera that I don't know how to use, but can't wait to learn them too.  I upgraded my memory card to 1 GB so I can take a lot of pictures and not have to worry about running out of room.When I travel or go to a sporting event, I take anywhere from 75 to 200 piictures.  I get a lot of compliments on the camera and the photos it takes are great</review_text>
The Canon G6 is a great camera.  I upgraded from a Canon Powershot A80 to the G6.  The A80 showed me that Canon makes a good camera, but was lacking a few features I really wanted.To me, this camera is a perfect collection of compromises.  I want a small camera for family snapshots, that's easy to use.  I want a large, capable camera for art work like portraits and landscape, and action shots like sports and recreation.When I'm on vacation, and want some snaps of the kids goofing around or of dinner or something, I don't need a camera that makes me jump through hoops to get a decent shot, I just want to point and shoot.  In full auto, or aperature priority, or shutter speed priority, the pictures are usually sharp and crisp.  Set the image size to one of the medium or small settings and you can use the high speed multi-shot feature to get a series of action shots that guarantee that you'll get at least a few good ones.I have no qualms about setting this camera to auto, handing this camera to a person with little or no photgraphic experience, and letting them click away.  It's easy enough to learn that most folks can be taking nice pictures in less than an hour, and pros can be taking great pictures in no time at all.On the other hand, a lot of the work I do is very artistic, and involves using manual settings.  When going for the perfect picture, it is often necessary to adjust the focus, aperature, and shutter speed to get the exact picture you want.  This camera has manual focus, a feature I sorely missed on my older Powershot A80.Another thing that bothers me on most other cameras, is that you have to wade through a bewilderingly large collection of menu options to make the smallest changes.  While I can understand using a layer or two of menus for things like basic settings (time, format a CF card) I can't see it for something as basic as film speed or white balance.Which is why I love this camera.  The following items are one button away:FlashFlash Output LevelMulti-imageTime delay photoAutofocus areaMacro modeManual FocusWhite BalanceZoom in / outFilm Speed (50 to 400)Picture mode (auto, Manual, Manual preset 1 and 2, Av, Tv, Portratit, Landscape, Backlit, Panorama, movie)My favorite things about this camera:Battery life is excellent.  I bought a spare battery, but I've never actually use the one that came with it in less than a day.  It charges fast too.Picture quality:  The larger lens allows for better pictures in low light conditions, and it is very clear.  The large CCD allows you to get pictures in a large enough resolution to print out fairly large copies and have them look very good.Ergonomic.  This is a very comfortable camera to hold for a long time.  It's not quite in the same range as some much more expensive units, but I've never gotten tired from holding it.  Plus, all the buttons you need to hit while running it are right there under your fingertips.  The scroll wheel under your right index finger is very intuitive to operate.  Push it to change modes, roll it to change the settings.  The fold out screen allows you to take pictures from odd angles without ever having to lay down on your back for a picture.  Plus, the fold out screen feels very solidly built, not like it'll snap off in your hands.  I was always worried about my Powershot A80, as it didn't feel very solid.It works well with my computer, which runs Linux.  I use gtkam, a great camera programIt has an infrared remote that can be used to take pictures without worrying about camera shake.  This is very useful for group pictures you'd like to be in yourself.User savable white balance settings.Real flash shoe.  This camera takes a standard Canon flash unit.Manual focus mode puts a close up of the center of the screen right in the middle of the picture for you to check the focus with. This would be really bothsome for composing pictures, except that when you half depress the shutter button, the small zoomed square in the center disappears and leaves you with the whole picture.The rapid fire photo option is very useful for action shots, and some candid stuff, like subway pictures.The mechanical view finder is more than just an adornment on this camera.  It's quite good, and it changes its field of view according to the current zoom setting.  It also has a focus adjustment on it.  This is very nice if you wear glasses, as it lets you adjust the view finder to your eye, and you can get your eye right up to it, and not keep bumping your glasses into the back of the camera.Very wide open Fstop of 2.0 to very closed off 8.0.And lastly, it remembers virtually everything you setup the last time it was on or in a certain mode, and reverts to those settings the next time you turn it on or switch modes.  This includes things like white balance, settings that were NOT remembered by my Powershot A80.Now for the negatives:The door that covers the USB port / DC input, and AV output is very easy to catch in the swivelling / revolving fold out screen, and as the screen takes a fare bit of effort to revolve, it's quite likely you'll have snapped the door in half before you notice it's gone and gotten itself caught in the spinning LCD screen that's passing by.  If it's gotten a little bent, it will get caught every time by the fold out screen until you snap it off or bend it back in place.The flash is way too close to the lens, which makes for some pretty obvious shadows in the bottom right hand corner of some photos.  Luckily, I'm not much for flash usage, and if I was, I'd probably spring for a real flash that sat in the hot shoe.  Still, if you're looking for a great built in flash, this is NOT the camera for you.Slow focus, and the autofocus can become confused by objects within a few yards, and never really focus.   Plus, focusing is pretty slow.  If you are looking for a camera with a very fast, nearly perfect autofocus, you might do better with another camera.Movies are limited to 3 minutes maximum, which seems rather arbitrary.  Even 5 minutes would be a big step up, as it would allow me to catch the average musical performance in one step.Final Word:This is a great compromise camera for someone who really wants two separate cameras but can't afford them.  It's a good snap shot camera, and a good big lense, big body, big CCD machine capable of creating art.It's not the best at either of those categories when compared to other cameras, but for one that does both, it represents a a perfect compromise at a pretty reasonable price</review_text>
I am by no means a pro at taking pictures, but this camera makes me look close to it. So far I have just used it as a point and shoot and the pictures have been of really good quality. I am tring to learn more of the functions and one I have run across so far that I enjoy is you can choose in certain functions for your photo to be black and white, color, or sepia. I am not high tech but I can use this camera pretty easily. My first digital camera was a canon digital elf with only 3.2 mega pixels and there is a huge difference in the quality of the pictures when you compare. So if you can affored to spend more for more mega pixels do it. The only down sides I have seen so far is it doesn't come w/ a great memory card which most do not and I imagine if I did not have small hands that the camera would be a little awkward to handle. It has lots of buttons and dials so you have to hold just right so that you don't hit any. But overal I am very satisfied w/ my purchase and hope to become a better photographer with the help of this camera. Canon cameras have served my family and I very well over the years</review_text>
Incredible quality and zoom!  Low power consumption.  Buy the 1GB SanDisk compact flash card.  It gives you plenty of room for a 2-3 week vacation</review_text>
A camera more for the advanced photographer with a very detailed instruction booklet. Takes excellent photos in auto mode. Memory chip included is not near big enough</review_text>
This camera does all that Canon says it does.  Fantastic pictures.  Great flexibility for manual control or simple point-and-shoot use.  I did a lot of research before buying, and I could not be happier with the Canon G6</review_text>
This is my third digital camera, but it's been a few years since the second and it was definitely obsolete. I was tempted to go top of the line, because I've two excellent SLRs (Nikon and Minolta) with all the trimmings, but the prices made that unfeasible right now.I'm very satisfied with the features of the Canon G6 however; I've taken about 400 shots so far, plus one movie, tried out all the software for stitching panoramas together, etc. I still mainly use PhotoShop, but the Canon software is quite good.The photo quality is excellent, including color and the opticalzoom and wideangle range is good for most purposes. The macro setting also does a nice job.The controls are easy to use for the most part for anyone at all familiar with full featured SLRs, and better than most. I've made very few mistakes in the field as a result of control confusion.What I'm less thrilled about (nitpicking):Like most electronics these days, even if you've got very small hands like me, it is hard to keep from getting a finger in the wrong place, just about every square inch is covered with a control. I would have liked to have an insert (like Nikon supplies) to cover the flash hotshoe contacts. And every time I remove the battery or memory card, I have to watch out to grab the camera by the few areas that don't have a control on them. Also, the cable input has a typical tiny plastic door that would be all too easy to break off, and the neck strap attachment is too close to the memory card door, and tends to interfere with it opening all the way.Also, in preview mode it tells you how many shots you have taken but not how many left, and in shooting mode, vice versa. It is annoying to have to switch to shooting mode to see how many left, especially if you are using the lens cover, because then the lens deploys out, and you have to remember to take the lens cover off first (deploying the lens with the cover on is a no-no.)I also got the camera case designed for the G6. Again like all too many "cases" it is a tight fit, only has a single inside pocket that you can only get an extra card in and still get the camera in too. And the case would not really be good dust protection and it zips up the sides but the top opening is just covered by a flap. And because of the tight and awkward fit, it is easy to accidentally turn the camera on, deploying the lens, while putting the camera into the case. The case comes with a belt loop, but you have to supply your own belt, and it has no other strap or handle except a tiny loop located at the top end of on side zipper, where it just gets in the way. Not a good design.I also checked out some of the accessories available, like additional lens and flash, but they're very expensive, like the macro lights are more than the camera! So I don't know if I'll get any of the add-ons later on.But overall, the G6 is already my next favorite camera to my Nikon SLR, powerful yet easy to use, and even fun! Definitely 5 stars for the camera, 1 star for the case</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I would highly recommend buying a Canon battery over an after-market brand. I have bought two non canon batteriesfor my powershot S30 and both failed to last as long as the original canon battery</review_text>
This is a must have product for any Digital Rebel XT owner.  Always carry a spare fully charged battery.Amazon has a competitive pricing structure and very timely delivery</review_text>
I've been using these in the Rebel XT since about two weeks. On Friday I went to a show at a local bar and took about 600 shots in medium to low light conditions (just small stage lights lighting up the band) and finally killed the battery after about 2 1/2 hours/600 shots</review_text>
This item is a good companion to use as battery backup; I recommend this item to all people using a Digital Rebel XT. This battery has a long life after full charge, is very light and small piece you can accommodate into any pocket or bag, I'm very satisfied with this purchase</review_text>
I have a Canon ZR700 camera, it comes with one of this batteries. Since it was just giving me a little more than an Hour of recording, i felt i needed an extra battery. When i saw the options, because the high price on this product, i felt tempted to buy a OEM battery that's cost was 16.00 USD with shipping and it has good reviews from other customers. But them i found the Canon BP-2L14 here at Amazon, which gives twice the power for only 56.00 USD, just 13.00 USD to double the power and a original product (and double the size too, the only bad thing about it, but it is really not that much)</review_text>
Very good rechargable battery pack.Holds charge for a long time even if camera is not used much. Capable of taking many shots with plenty of review time. Very pleased with it</review_text>
I find Canon batteries work very well. I also do not mind not using AA - an extra NB-2LH is small and easy to carry around - easier than several AA (rechargable or not)</review_text>
I am certainly happy I bought this filter kit. For a starting photographer, the price was right, and I have not noticed any quality issues. The UV filter stays on a lens at all times, as it's cheaper to replace the filter, than it is to have a scratched lens element repaired.The light polarizer is very handy, and also works very well, cutting down greatly on glare.I have not yet had the occasion to use the warming filter yet.The filter case is a nice extra, it fits right in my camera bag, and is out of the way untill I need it</review_text>
I received the lenses and they were all good quality. The case that comes with them is also very nice. I was worried about the polarizing lens not working after reading the other reviews,but mine worked fine.</review_text>
I purchased this set, and upon arrival, I found the circular polarizer to be defective.  Amazon quickly replaced the set, and this polarizer did not work either!  I returned the set, as I am not going to waste any more time trying to get a polarizer that works.  I'll pay more, and get a quality product from a different maker.  I will say that Amazon is second to nobody for customer service.  I appreciate that, and will continue to be an Amazon customer.  However, I can't say the same for Tiffen.</review_text>
Great kit! I haven't used any filters before but I can tell that I'll be using these quite a bit</review_text>
This is one of the best bargains that i've seen, "essentially" you get 3 filters for the price of one.  The image quality with these filters is great, the 812 (warming) filter is by far a favorite giving back the color richness that flash photography so often washes out, that is unless you have the patience for constantly tweaking your flash power.  Aside from the 812 the UV protector is basically a clear protective filter.  While it obviously has advantages over clear glass, I tend not to think of it as any different.  This too is a great filter which I use about half the time because it doesn't affect color hues or change f stop values too greatly while it takes the worry out of carrying the camera around ready for any candid shots that may occur.  Finally included is the circular polarizer. This filter adjusts the amount of uv light entering the camera by spinning the filter to the direction the uv rays are entering (or turning the thingy till things look better). This lens is great for sunny days and will take surface glare off lakes and glass making them transparent again.  It also makes colors more crisp in general when photographing buildings and other large "reflective" man-made things. So things sound great so far, but now to why I only give this item 4 stars.  While Tiffen is known to be one of the best at photo and video filters, they have quality control issues that do no live up to thier reputation.  In my case the 812 filter arrived with a discoloration in the glass.  While it was didn't hurt image quality, with the flaw being towards the edge of the filter, I none the less didn't want to find a situation in which the flaw would diminish quality.  Seeing as it was not amazon's fault my first e-mail went to Tiffen for a replacement which they said they would gladly do, but only after I send them the filter and they recieve it would they ship my replacement (not an option in my circumstances).  Instead Amazon's wonderful customer service shown through again, and within 3 days they had replaced the entire set.  The second set arrivided without flaw but since my other two filters were in perfect condition I traded just the 812.  I havn't had any other issues and i'm very satisfied with my filters. The only other word of warning would be to that of the circular polorizer. While I recieved 2 that were flawless occassionally I have read in reviews customers have received ones that were assembled backwards making the lens useless. A quick way to check to see if your CP is working correctly is to hold it, thread facing yourself, and look at an LCD monitor or TV and spin it until the picture dissapears(obviously working correctly). I still wouldn't pass up this deal knowing what I do now, chances are everything will show up perfectly but none the less if you're concerned order it before you need it and check everything over carefully. Amazon is always the best for returns and will often ship a replacement the next day with overnight shipping</review_text>
This was an outstanding value.  The kit includes three often needed filters as well as an excellent filter wallet.  The wallet itself, along with the included Tiffen Booklet is an added extra value.  I found it to be a great value for the money.  You get all three for less than the price of one filter and the filter wallet is an added bonus.</review_text>
These are great filters and especially for the price!  I was looking for just one UV filter, and after stumbling upon this set which was not much more than the price of one filter, I bought it.  These are great lenses.  I especially like the polarizing filter, but all 3 are great.definitely a worthy buy</review_text>
After getting the SD600 as a gift, I knew I had to get a case for it. I really didn't like any of the cases at the store and wanted something that has a custom fit.  This case is completely solid and the camera fits snugly in it. I have no problem taking the camera in or out but it does not have any wiggle room while it is in the case. Also the case has a magnetic button close for added security. Overall, a great buy</review_text>
This camera case is exactly what I was looking for. It fits my Canon SD600 perfectly. It fits like a glove- not too big, not too snug, and it does not scratch the LCD screen. It's really cute and is a nice punch of color in contrast to the basic black that is every other camera case out there. I've gotten a lot of compliments on how cute it is. I definitely recommend this product!</review_text>
This case is perfect for carrying and protecting my camera.  Can't imagine not having it</review_text>
Just what I expected, since this is the second one I have purchased.  I have one, and bought a camera and this case for my daughter.  The case protects the camera lcd screen, but is still small enough to fit in a pocket or easily in a purse</review_text>
love it, it fits my SD450 perfectly.  it's snug and durable and fits great in my purse when i bring it with me.  i definitely recommend this!!</review_text>
I love this product! The case is slim enough to carry around in a purse without taking up all the room. The red color is fun, too!</review_text>
this case is freaking awesome. i was completely turned off by the 8 dollars shipping i had to pay, but it was definetly worth it. this case looks so nice, so sleek, so beautiful and it just feels good in your hands. u will love this case. i did. borrow a dollar from 8 ppl if u have to just for shipping</review_text>
I like the color.It fits the camera perfectly.It's really cute and not bulky.It's not just the ordinary black camera case that everyone else has.It's classy</review_text>
after searching on the internet i found amazon to be the place where this item had the lowest price. fast delivery, great product. fits great with my panasonic 6 megapixels camera. fine leather. could not be any happier with the product</review_text>
I mainly use this when taking landscape shots where I want to either make the clouds pop or liven the sky up some (remember it works best 90 degrees from the sun.)  I also put it on when shooting highly reflective vegetation or waterscapes that would otherwise cause blown-out highlights.  One other little secrete is to use this when shooting waterfalls since it will allow you to shoot at slower shutter speeds thus increasing the wispy waterfall look</review_text>
Need to clean your Digital SLR's sensor? This is the besy way to do it -- in conjunction wtih Sensor Swabs -- as canned compressed air can add "junk" which can make your sensor worse</review_text>
Great Kit, and I use it a lot.First, here's what's inside.SMALL rocket blower - great little thing, tends to whistle through the red plastic tip though.  so, it's not great in quiet places.Retractable brush - great little thing, tends to shed hairs, but not terribly.Cleaning Solution - i did notice it lifted some color off of a multicoated lens.  oddly, it only did that on one lens, and only once.  the lens looks fine, and still takes sharp pictures without any flare.  jury's out, but i still use it w/o fear.Cotton Swabs - never used em, but they look nice.Microfiber cloth - nice full sized cloth.  very soft, and great when buffing out the spots</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.</review_text>
Just use this to protect the lens.  Good cheap alternative to a scratched lens</review_text>
Beware of  assuming that  the UV filter recommended by Amazon for a particular camera with a fixed lense size that I purchased is the correct  size.  It wasn't even close.  No size was given for the lense diameter. I returned the filter for a full refund minus my shipping & all the hassel of  packaging it</review_text>
This little camera may be small (great feature) but it is loaded this goodies. This is my first adventure into digital photography and I would recomend this one to any first time user. Very easy and lots of fun to use.</review_text>
This camera is very slim like the Canon Elphs but costs much less.  It has very high resolution and is easy to use.  The battery lasts a long time and the 2.5" LCD screen is very clear and big.  It has a lot of different shooting modes, including a custom mode where you can set specific parameters like infinity lock or ISO speed.  For convenience, every time you switch modes, the screen tells you what the mode should be used for, so you don't need to carry around a manual to figure out how to shoot your pictures.</review_text>
PROS:- The picture quality is very good, but a 7.2 megapixel picture is about 3mb wich is pretty big and thats a reason you might want to buy a bigger memory card.- Big 2.5" LCD that can get you some attention from bystanders around you.- The video mode in High Quality is very good! This feature impressed me, and i use it the most ( depening on the occasion ). This camera has better resolution than my brothers sony camera recorder. For some reason my baterry seems to drain a little faster than taking pictures.( I own a 2GB Memory Stick Pro Duo, wich is enough to record and take pictures for a day, but i don't think the battery will hang in)CONS:- There isn't that many cons for me, becuase i was looking for a point and shot camera with a 2.5" LCD or 3"- The only thing i didn't like about video mode is that you can't zoom while recording, other than that this camera is a nice and great pocket camera.- Pictures come out blury at times when you are really shaky but sony does a pretty good at image stabilization.(This is also a great sport camera wich you can capture pitures of a fast moving object.</review_text>
This works just as described. As long as flash i-red beams see eachother it works fine... But radio controlled flash is much better</review_text>
I have a 580ex and it works great. I was hopeing that it would work for a studio light but nope so dont try it.  The only thing you have to be mindful of is the distince that the flash is from the subject</review_text>
We really like this camera!  It's a WHOLE lot better than our previous one, which ran off 4 AA batteries, and ran THROUGH so many AA batteries so quickly that we can't even guess how many $$ that wasted.  This Optio camera uses very nice rechargable batteries that cost $5 each through Ebay (don't buy them here on Amazon... ouch!)  We've got 3 batteries and are getting two more so that we never even have to worry about power while on a long trip.  (The really handy travel charger is also awesome... get it on Ebay for just a few bucks.)The startup time and shutter speed are very fast, so catching quick pictures is finally possible for us.  (My wife no longer threatens to go back to film after using this camera!)  Our last camera would take so long to focus that we never got the candid shots we wanted.The one and only thing that's even a slight problem with this camera is the power button being next to the shutter button.  (What clueless engineer thought THAT would be good??)  However, now that we've used it a lot, we never hit the button by accident.All other features of the camera are great.  With a 1 GB memory card, we've never ever run out of memory space, even with taking lots of short videos and many many pictures on medium quality.Great camera, worth every cent.  Buy the accessories on Ebay and you'll find that getting everything you need is not very expensive at all.  (Actually, we bought the camera on Ebay too, but these reviews are great here on Amazon.  Thanks, Amazon!</review_text>
this is a great camera for traveling, it is small enough to fit into your top pocket, so it can go anywhere. the only problem that i have is that there is no underwater housing for it, if there was i would have given it a 5*</review_text>
I have been through 6 cameras in the past 3 years, of all different kinds of brands and price. I have changed so many times because they get stolen or broken...this little pentax optio was surprising though! 3 months after having it around, i brought it to the desert and it got some sand in it, but I had it fixed. THis same camera also fell three floors down and nothing was damaged; neither the screen, the lens, nor the flash. it just got cracked a bit and twisted, and the battery/memory card  cover is completely damaged, but it still works like it should!</review_text>
I have had this camera a year now and am VERY impressed.  I have used Nikon 35mm SLR's all my life so I was a little hesitant going into digital.  Lugging around equipment became too much of a issue so I started looking.  Picture quality is great even at full optical zoom.  I very rarely use the digital zoom.  Most impressive...the camera has taken 2 direct hits on the concrete and (8 months ago) and still works perfectly!</review_text>
I hear a lot of grumbling about the camera not being "perfect."  But guess what ... in this size and form factor one should not be expecting SLR-like performance.  I just purchased this camera last week and have been busy testing it out in a variety of situations.  The "Full Auto" mode does a pretty decent job of figuring out the right settings for most situations.  If you want you can take total control and set most controls manually.  There are even a bunch of pre-programmed setting for different lighting situations and the couple that I tested worked great.  All in all, great camera for the size.  I like the fact that I can put this in my shirt pocket and forget about it and then when I suddenly need to take a picture I always have the camera handy.  I have a normal speed SD Memory card and writing out the images to the card can be painfully slow.  This is especially true when trying to take a number of quick shots in rapid succession.  The wait for the camera to become ready to take the next shot is annoying. I would highly recommend that you purchase one of the high speed SD cards (often advertised as "Ultra II" or "32X" or "High Speed."  All in all a great camera and if you are realistic with your expectations you will be very happy.  Good luck</review_text>
I bought this camera a couple months ago because I wanted a small digital camera that would be easy to carry with me. Since then, I've found the S5i to be a wonderful camera that takes clear colorful pictures and can easily fit in your pocket.Here are some praises for the S5i:1. This camera is TINY. It is smaller than my cellphone. This makes it extremely easy to bring with when going on a trip or just out for the day. I have it in my pocket at all times, ready to capture any moment. I brought it with on a recent trip and everybody thought it was great. At the end of the day we hooked it up to the TV in the hotel and watched a slide show of the day. Everyone loved it.2. The battery life in incredible. I have had this thing for a couple months and I have only charged it like 4 times. Even with extended use of the flash and screen, the battery still keeps kicking. Very different from my cellphone!3. The super macro focus setting creates beautiful photos. This was something I didn't realize the camera had until after I bought it. You can get right up to things and take these really colorful and crisp images. Flowers and plants look incredible.4. The red-eye reduction is the best I've ever seen. With the red-eye flash mode, the camera flashes once and then about a second later flashes again and takes the picture. None of my pictures suffer from red-eye anymore. The flash is also very powerful.5. It has many manual settings for more artistic pictures. I still haven't even gotten to check out all the little features this camera comes with. It has a lot of different "scene" presets and also allows you to do manual mode (with focus & exposure).Overall, this camera met and exceeded all the expectations I had. I would definitely recommend the Pentax S5i to a family member or friend.</review_text>
I've had this camera since just before Christmas 04.  I purchased from www.bhphotovideo.com for about $350.  I should have waited until after the holidays, because the price has come down.  It is great to finally have a small camera.  I often forget that I even have it with me (which I guess can be bad!).  Over all the pictures are good.  The focus is sometimes soft.  It doesn't take good night photos, but takes great daytime pics</review_text>
A very good accessory to have, protects the lens, and helps in taking very good pictures in some special situations</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid petal shapped three and three quarters inch long offers some protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. There is nothing more irritating than reviewing your images to find dust spots or other flaws. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing or replacing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 70-200mm f/2.8L IS EF lens and normally comes included with the lens when sold new. There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. Fortunately Canon provides a storage case with the lens that can be used in addition to your camera bag.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the len</review_text>
Excellent product.Works as expected. Like all lens hoods though pricey</review_text>
This bag is great for active photographers. It doesnt matter how you store your equipment because the straps are velcro, to come off for moderate adjustments. for me my lifestyle in photography leads me many times up highplaces for my photos, I have tried many different types of bags for what i needed. mainly shoulder straps and this one is the best so far it keeps the contents of the bag very well protected and has so far not been affected by snow/ice or mildew/rain i am very pleased and would recommend this bag for anyone who would want alot of room for everything they'll need and more</review_text>
I'm really pleased with this bag, it holds all my gear with room to spare. There are enough adjustable straps to fine tune the bag to your comfort level. It stays nice and tight against my back and doesn't feel like a burden at all.This is a great value compared to some of the other options.The only drawback to this bag is that there isn't a convenient way of grabbing your camera without taking the bag off and opening it up. Other than that, no faults</review_text>
This is a great back pack! If there is anything I would change it would be the logo on the front. It's brite and shinny, and I'd rather not advertise that I have a camera in there! I colored it in with a felt pen and it works great....... Overall, I love the backpack!!</review_text>
I like the bag.  Pleanty of pockets and pouches for all my little small accessories.  Just wish it were a little better suited for 2 cameras like I have.  But, everything fits...comfortable to haul around all day.  Nice pads and straps to secure it to my back.  Well padded for the equipment.I'd highly recommend it to anybody</review_text>
I love this backpack!  It is just what I needed to safely carry my camera gear and keep it organized</review_text>
I needed a camera bag with greater portability, comfort, and security for athletic venues as well as being in the outdoors (i.e. mountains, valleys, trails, etc.)  This bag delivered.  I can fit my two primary lenses, a telephoto, an external flash, a colapsing tripod and my camera with room to spare.  I can even attach my monopod to the side if needed.  I like pockets so the extra internal zipper pockets plus the exterior side and front pockets are great for tucking away all of the extras too; like lense cleaning suplies, batteries, and memory cards.The backing and shoulder straps are nicely padded so it wears comfortably as well.When I purchased the backpack I planned to only use it for more "active outings" but have since found myself using it in place of my original camera bag</review_text>
My husband and I recently bought this bag to take on a trip to Mexico. It was perfect, fit our video camera, small digital camera, Canon Digital Elph, 2 lenses and all the chargers and accessories we needed for the trip. Plus, the tripod!! Also my husband used it for his carry on bag which was helpful given how tight airport security can be these days.I totally recommend this bag to someone who travels with several different pieces of photographic equipment</review_text>
I humped this thing around DC last week for 7 hours, and not a worry to mention.  Well balanced, I had it full of a camera, 4 lenses, flash and miscellany.  I cut all the extra straps off, and just have the shoulder harness left.  And it looks good too.  Of course, it's a great advertisement for thieves so never let it out of your grip.</review_text>
this item is great.... i love it...i have my 35 mm and digital camera in it along with everything else i need..</review_text>
I am THRILLED with this lens's capabilities and the pictures it does. I test shot a corner of a window to determine if it would be good for my insect shots that I like so well.I bought this add-on converter and am thrilled to have added this and the 50mm lens of these necessary items for my set-up. I like nature photography the best and like to use my off summer days for hiking and finding photographs to take in perhaps well-known places but finding unique angles and subjects is what I like to specialize in. This lens will greatly enhance your experience in that 'little world' we commonly trod over or weed-ate away. I built a diffuser using a ping-pong ball over the flash so the lighting would work better. (Works great, btw).As usual, it's great Canon glass that does the trick.</review_text>
I've shifted from my previous Canon Powershot G2 to this wonderful DSLR, the Canon EOS 400D (or Digital Rebel XTi) and so far I have all praises. Though my G2 took great pictures, there's a mile of a difference a DSLR can deliver. The quality and clarity of each shot instantly makes your pictures look like they have been taken by a professional. The Rebel XTi's handling is deja vu for me because I used to have a Canon EOS 300 (or a Rebel). But its a big leap for me in terms of the plethora of functions and features as compared to my camera of the past. I always bring along my camera just in case I see a moment worth capturing. You can see some of my pictures at [...</review_text>
I'll keep this short,as I assume most of the tec stuff has been covered.I sold a 350D to get the 400D(XTi).The 400D focuses better,has better ergonomics,is the same size/weight,and takes GREAT photos.I tried a Nikon D80,but it loses way too much detail at iso 400 and up.Plus the Canon line of lenses fits my needs better,are cheaper,and are available.The Nikon costs $300 more (with the Canon being discounted),and the Nikon Raw converter adds another $150.So the true cost difference is $400-450.I'd buy the Canon over the Nikon at the same price due to image quality,especially if you shoot jpeg.BTW,if you can afford Canon L lenses(the 25-105L and the 70-200L-any of the 4) are amazing.One caveat,as with ANY dslr,these cameras are not p/s and do best with some post processing and with knowledge of how a camera meters/exposes,etc.I can't emphasize this enough</review_text>
I had the Rebel XT and about 8 lenses and was thinking of getting an upgraded second camera body.  So when it came out the 30D was a logical choice, but it was not really much of an upgrade from the 20D, which I resisted, so I was not really sure what to do.  Then I had all but decided to just take the plunge and get the 30D when I heard the first rumblings about the XTi.Then I started to learn the details about the XTi, more mega pixels, same auto focus, same screen, picture styles, dust cleaning!  The only areas that the 30D won in my opinion were build quality, spot meter, and estimated shutter life.  Those 3 categories were not enough to convince me that the 30D was worth $300-$400 more than the XTi especially since the XTi had won or tied in most categories.  The way I look at it is that the camera bodies are not nearly as important as the lenses, they change so fast that it is not worth it to me to spend more for longevity when it will be outdated in a year anyway.  Spend $1,500 on a lens, use it for a lifetime, spend $1,500 on a camera body, regret it in a year.  I fully expect the upgrade to the 30D to be released within a year, and now that I have saved by getting the XTi I will have all that much more to put towards it when it comes out.So basically what I am saying is that, in my opinion, the XTi is just as good, if not better than the semi-pro 30D, so why pay more?  Switching from the XT to the XTi was very simple, I can use them both now without any problems.  The batteries, battery grips, remote shutter release, and most of the other accessories are also compatible with both, which is nice to keep the amount of gear you need to carry to a minimum.Unless you want to move up to a full frame sensor, I can't see any reasons why you would not want to go with this camera.  If you read books on photography from just 1 or 2 years ago you will realize that this "entry level" camera has features that were not even available on top of the line ($5,000+) camera bodies.  With the speed that camera bodies advance you might as well buy the entry level body every year instead of making a huge investment in the pro level bodies and then being shown up by something 10% of that price in a year or two.  Not that there are not reasons to buy one of those bodies, I just don't seem have any of them</review_text>
XTi is feature laden, but takes fantastic "point and shoot" photos.  Seems to be a significant improvement on Canon's Rebel XT, a wonderful camera.  For the money, the best SLR going</review_text>
With emphasis on portability, Canon's Digital Rebel XTi is designed for first-time DSLR photographers and travel enthusiasts. Measuring 5.0" by 3.7" by 2.6" and weighing 1.1 lbs., it is about as large as the largest point & shoot cameras and one of the smallest DSLR camera bodies on the market. Its size is the source of both popularity and criticisms. If you have large hands or a heavier lens, it may feel too small. An optional battery grip can help, but some will want something more substantial. Visit a store nearby to find out for yourself.The package includes camera body with a lens cap, battery, charger, manual, catalogs, neck strap, USB and composite video cables, and CD-ROMs. You will need a lens and CompactFlash memory card. There may be some static energy in the packaging, so remove the lens cap in a dust-free environment such as the bathroom to prevent dust entering the sensor. Much promoted sensor cleaning system helps, but it's best not to get any in the first place.Canon sells 4 versions of XTi: black or silver finish and with or without EF-S 18-55mm f/3.5-5.6 lens. Black or silver is largely a personal preference, but most lenses, most accessories, and all but low-end DSLR camera bodies are black. As for the kit lens, it can be an affordable introduction to DSLR and capable if used exclusively at f/8 or f/11 apertures (soft at other apertures). In other words, the lens is not ideal for shooting under low light. If you don't have to get a zoom lens now, start with Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II. It is famous for top-notch performance at very low price. Due to XTi's APS-C image sensor (compositions are multiplied by 1.6x), this lens becomes 35mm-equivalent of 80mm.If you have the budget for a good zoom lens, at over 100 lenses, Canon has you covered. Some of Canon's popular zoom lenses include EF 28-135mm f/3.5-5.6 IS USM, EF 17-40mm f/4L USM, EF-S 17-55mm f/2.8 IS USM, and EF 24-105mm f/4L IS USM. If these are too pricey, third party vendors such as Sigma and Tamron make Canon-compatible lenses for less. Their focus is not as nice as Canon's USM but they generally outperform Canon's lower-end lenses.Tamron's SP AF 17-50mm f/2.8 Di II LD Aspherical (IF) and Sigma's 18-50mm f/2.8 EX DC and AF 17-70mm f/2.8-4.5 DC macro are popular among budget-minded photographers.With 10.1 megapixels image sensor, the XTi can benefit from sharper lenses. Although increasing the resolution over same image sensor area can increase noise, Canon has improved the sensor technology to maintain low noise floor and high dynamic range. Performance wise, there's very little to criticize. Great example of Canon's trademark smooth, high contrast, saturated, and low noise. Noise remains low even at ISO 800. It is said that shooting RAW is equivalent to getting an extra exposure (1.0 EV) and it can help you maintain usable details with acceptable noise at ISO 1600. Low noise gives XTi a bit of an excuse for missing in-body image stabilizer. According to Canon, lens is more effective location for image stabilizer, especially telephoto. That's true but I think the feature would've been nice to have. As a consolation, the XTi has mirror lockup that reduces vibration caused by the mirror movement. My sole performance criticism is the metering mode. It includes only partial and not spot metering mode (very useful when shooting high contrast scenes such as candlelit birthday cake). Perhaps more problematic is the evaluative metering mode, which occasionally underexposes images by 2/3 EV or so.Some have criticized XTi for "plasticky" build. Except for the metal lens mount, the exterior is largely made of high quality engineering plastic with rubbery paint. If you drop it, it will probably crack or break, but it's sturdy and well made. Flipping on the power lever, it starts up almost immediately ready for use. Much promoted auto sensor cleaning kicks in when powering up and down. As with most DSLRs, there's virtually no shutter lag and it focuses in a split second (especially when using a USM lens). In continuous shooting mode with a fast memory card, it can take 10 RAWs or 27 JPEGs at 3 frames per second. RAW images are 10 MB each, so get a speed 2 GB or larger memory card, such as SanDisk's Ultra II series.Replacing both 1.8" LCD and info display is 2.5" high resolution LCD with LED backlighting. It displays current camera settings, photos in memory, and menu. Thanks to greater real estate and more refined user interface, XTi is very intuitive and pleasure to use. The minus is 10% lower battery life, which was merely adequate to begin with. XTi has 95% crop 0.8x optical viewfinder that displays 9 auto focus points, shutter speed, aperture, and more, but misses ISO speed, white balance, and metering mode. Overall, XTi's viewfinder is more than adequate but pales to Nikon D80's larger and more comprehensive one.Highlights of software package are ImageBrowser (Mac OS X Universal Binary), ZoomBrowser (Windows), and Digital Photo Professional (Mac OS X Universal Binary and Windows). ImageBrowser and ZoomBrowser are easy-to-weight lightweight applications for managing JPEG and RAW. Digital Photo Professional is considerably more powerful and lets you use XTi's dust delete data feature for removing dust its sensor cleaning hardware couldn't remove</review_text>
I've considered other, higher priced digital SLRs, such as the Nikon D80 and Canon 30D.  However, I decided that I probably won't be using some of the more advanced features offered by those cameras, and would rather spend the money saved on a better lens.  In terms of picture quality, all these SLRs are capable of equivalent quality.Currently I have 3 lenses, the kit 18-55mm, the 50mm f/1.8, and the 85mm f/1.8.  I don't use the kit zoom lens anymore because I favor the faster, prime lenses.  I mostly take pictures of my children, and the 85mm f/1.8 is an excellent portrait lens.  It is sharp, fast, and produces beautiful background blur.  Zoom lenses unfortunately are not as sharp or fast, unless you're willing to pay much more than the cost of the camera body.I think all novice SLR owners should buy the cheap Canon 50mm f/1.8, to discover what a fast lens can do when you set the aperture to 1.8, and take some portraits.  You too can have professional-looking results</review_text>
I took pictures with this camera with artificial light, natural light, and when it was almost dark and all of my images came out sharp.  I'm only using the cheap 18-55mm lens, which does not have image stabilization.  As long as I use a tripod, or brace against something to hold the camera still, the images are perfect.  I shot landscapes, portraits, animals, moving traffic, the sky, the moon, and everything I could think of and it all came out right.I was going to buy a 5D, but so far I'm satisfied with this camera and the price is way lower.  Now I wonder what my pictures would be like with an IS lens... hmmmm :</review_text>
Well, I've had my Rebel Xti for about 6weeks now, and all i can say is wow!!! I did have the Rebel Xt, which was an awesome camera.  I'm not a professional, but i do take pictures of what ever it may be outside or inside, youth or adult events as a hobby.  This camera is not for the person who wants to just point and shoot or to have a camera to stuff in your pocket.  This camera is for the creative person who wants control of the pictures they are taking.  The sensor cleaner and wide LCD are just a few of the wonderful advances from the XT to the XTI. The camera for me is easy to use and takes great pictures in auto mode or in my mode.I hope this helps you in your decision whether to buy or not.</review_text>
I had this camera for about a week now. I bought an EF 28-105mm lens seperatly. I don't know why, but the auto focus did not work right away.It took some fiddling around before I was able to use the feature. I get gorgeous pictures with this camera. My one complaint is it feels small in the right hand. After 1/2 hour of shooting pictures my hand got a cramp. I have small hands and it still felt small to me. If you are considering this camera I'd go to a store see how it feels. I can't imaging being able to use it for a long time if you have a big hands.I'm still learning how to use it. But so far its meeting all my expectations.</review_text>
Amazing quality for an affordable price (still not cheap tho). This lens takes great quality photos and is my daytime/outdoor performer. Although I don't think the IS is equal to 1 f-stop when it comes to low light situations but it sure is very helpful at these high f-stop numbers</review_text>
I got this lens to complement my 10-22mm and 100-400mm lenses.  It is a great general purpose lens (not too wide, not too narrow) for everyday walk around shooting.  The image stabilization and constant aperture are nice features.  It is also weather sealed so you don't have to worry about the elements as much as with most other lenses, of course you would need a weather sealed camera body to be completely safe, but it still makes me feel a little better in sandy or snowy conditions.  I use this on the Rebel XT and Rebel XTi which are 1.6X crop bodies and make this closer to a 38-168mm which can be useful for portrait work, landscapes, large animals, or somewhat close macro.  Of course there are lenses that do all of these things better, but to get this all in one package is really valuable.  After all you are less likely to miss a shot if you have 1 versatile lens vs. 5 really great specialized lenses (not that you shouldn't get those too, but this is a good all around contender.)  I have posted a few photo examples above to show the range of colors and versatility of this lens.  It is not the sharpest lens I have, nor the fastest, but it is the one that is on my camera most often unless I am going out to shoot something specific.  If you don't want to spend quite as much, the 28-135mm is also a very good lens</review_text>
I picked up a 5D in March with a 28-135. Worked with that for 3 months and felt something was missing. I went and bit the bullet, got the 24-105 and what an amazing difference it made. Color=vivid, clarity=sharp, good walk-around lens. After 4 months, I have not one bad thing to say about this lens. My suggestion, if you are looking for a lens, would be this one</review_text>
While this review is not as technical as others all I can say is the quality of the end result is well worth the money! I shot a wedding this past weekend 2 days after receiving this lens and am just going over some of the photos and all I can say is this piece of glass has given me the razor sharpness I've been looking for. I've been hesitant into jumping into the "L" lens arena but now that I'm here I could never go back! Don't settle for less! Your photography is worth it</review_text>
My first L lens and I'm sold. While I did spend a lot of time - a lot, this isn't a small purchase - on deciding between this and the 24-70/2.8, I feel I made the right decision. First, I took into account what I actually shot. Not what I thought about shooting or wanted to shoot, but what I really spent my time shooting. Then I backed that up by looking at the past six months' worth of photos. For me, this is the right choice.The big decision wasn't over image quality - rather it was the max aperture. 2.8 vs 4.0. The 4.0 with IS won. I absolutely LOVE the IS! Even at higher speeds, IS rocks. (It also eats batteries like a Hummer guzzles gas)OK, so shooting with it is a dream. Incredibly fast focus. Wonderful fit and finish. I could gush all night.If you're spending a lot of time trying to justify it, don't. If it won't break your bank, it's well worth it. If you're trying to decide which lens, try what I did. It made all the difference to me.What's the downside? I'm ordering a 17-40 today. The L lens bug has bitten. Next will have to be the 70-200/2.8. There goes the kids college fund. :-</review_text>
This is a great range for use as an every day walk around lens. It's very versatile, light and produces great image sharpness throughout the range. There is a bit of vignetting at the wide end, which I actually like.However, being f4, this lens is simply not fast enough for me. I shoot a lot of images where I want the out of focus areas (bokeh) to be glassy smooth (for weddings, portraits and such) and you cannot get that with this lens as good as you can with the 24-70 f2.8. The 24-105 f4 lens does have image stabilization which will help you to hand hold and get the shot in lower light situations, but there is not much that can be done to get super smooth bokeh with it. If you zoom all the way in, your DOF will be low and pretty darn smooth though in my case, I just prefer the look and bokeh of the 24-70 overall rather than this lens. Although the 24-70 is super heavy in weight compared to the 24-105.But I'm a professional photographer and so while my needs and likes are geared towards preferring the 24-70 f2.8, this doesn't mean the 24-105 isn't ideal for many if not most.</review_text>
I have both lenses, the 24-105 4 L IS and the 28-135 3.5-5.6 IS. I have a 20D, but my wife and I decided we each wanted a camera to ourselves so I bought the 24-105 lens along with the 30D about 2 months ago.  I was so sure that I'd see a big difference with the L lens since my 70-200 2.8 IS L is such a superior lens. The thing is, I can't justify it.  I've set the camera on a tripod and switched the lenses back and forth taking pictures with identical light and settings on a variety of subjects.  (They both take extremely nice pictures)  Maybe with a full frame sensor the difference would be apparent.  At this point I like the extra reach of the 135mm.  I'll let my wife use the $1200 L lens. My recommendation is: for the money on a cropped sensor camera I'd stick with the 28-135 lens</review_text>
While it isn't fashionable to use anything but a zoom lens anymore, this L series 135mm fixed focus lens is the "real deal". It is superbly sharp, and fast, and easy to use. I took it to Africa with me and was astounded with its brilliant clarity. Great for portraits... and for anything requiring a mid-length telephoto. Highly recommended</review_text>
Everyone gives this lens a rave so maybe i should approach this terrific lens from a shooting POV.Shooting wide open at f2at 135 gives your pictures a distinct quality you would never get from zooms, there isn't a zoom at this focal length that is this speed either. A few primes come close but they're nowhere near as sharp wide open.the af is fast and very accurate and the lens has a great feel on a 20d/5d/10d body even wo the battery grip of the cameras.Close up magnification of .19x to.21 therabouts is a nice bonus of this lens, letting you get closer wo being too in your face for tight headshots.I always felt that photographers usually have a sweet spot when shooting certain things like some portrait photographers like the distance the 85mm gives them when approaching a subject, turns out I'm liking the 135 focal length quite a bit for headshots and the 85 for torso and head shots.One thing I like about this 135/f2 combo is that there's enough DOF to get most of the main subject in view and focus but the background will still be blurred out. It's really great when you want the subject in focus and nothing else, as opposed to the 85 1.2 parts of the subject could melt into the background resulting in images that be a little too ethreal for some tastes. Couldn't you just stop down the 85? Sure but the relationship of the foreground to background would still be different with the 135.The 135 f2 can give a result that's juuust right. The backgrounds just a little more compressed with the foreground but the foreground is sharp but the background is gone. Almost like you lurred the background in photoshop. But you'll never get the same results from blurring in photoshop, for one thing the highlights would get muddied in a blur treatment in PS while the highlights stay clean at f2.Don't just use this thing for portraits, use it the way you would use a 50mm and try and frame as such, again the focal lenth and wide aperture will give an interesting result. I basically use it for candids and portraits during a wedding.Fantastic lens, very sharp, very handholdable, the focal length is terrific for portraits and the bokeh is very beautiful, equal in sharpness to the 85 1.2 or any of Canon's $5k lenses. This is probably the best lens you can get for the price, the only lens I've used with better saturation and contrast is the 35 1.4L.Downside: Not as handholdable as the 50,35 1.4 or the 85 1.2 during low light situations due to it's focal length</review_text>
If you don't want to get hooked on canon L series lens, do not buy this one.  I made a mistake of buying one and now all I want are L canon lens.  It is super sharp, contrast and saturation is fantastic.  No need to retouch any of your photos.  So far, I've used it on candid shots of my kids and dance gigs.  f/2.0 helps a lot to get the right shutter speed to freeze action.  A very good buy.  I got mine here at Amazon</review_text>
Man. what a lens!!! It's not cheap, and I dont' find the 135mm to be a particularly useful focal length with my 20D but after seeing glowing reviews of this one both at [...], I decided to buy one and try it for myself. It's not cheap at $900, but it's worth every penny. This one is an absolute stunner. I cannot believe my eyes at the sharpness at f2 and it improves very little when stopped down. The bokeh is unbelievable!!! I dont' hesitate to shoot at f2 and I don't find it necessary to stop down just to increase sharpness. The size and build is perfect although I don't like Canon's hood design. Why can't they simply make the hood with the same crincked finish  of the lens?? Then they would not so easily scratch. It's beyond me. But that's not a problem with the lens itself and whenever I use this lens, I know I have one of the best lenses ever designed. It forces me to excel myself knowing that now,the only limitation is me, the photographer and not the camera or the lens. An absolute beauty. Go try it yourself. I try to shoot with this as much as possible and the results are stunning. I just wish it came with weather proofing and Image Stablization like Canon's modern lenses but that's just nitpicking. I love it as it is</review_text>
This is my all time favorite lense. Eat your hearts out Nikon, Olympus & Pentex, because this baby alone is reason enough to go with Canon. I cannot begin to tell you how sharp this "L" lense is. Words fail me. On second thought, no they don't. Use this lense and you'll wind up with photos shaper than an lightening blade, clearer than a ghost's eyes, crisper than a new dawn on an uncharted island.I shot the portrait on two book covers with this lense. Did the wedding photos for my best friend's wedding and every one turned out better than the ones they paid the wedding pro hundreds of dollars to do. I'm documenting the growth of my child with this lense and I've caught hundred's of my girl's smiles with it and yes, sometimes even a tear or two.You cannot go wrong with a Canon "L" lense. They are the tops, they really are.Jack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
I believe this is one of the best lens for about $1000. Forget about zoom lenses even if they are L. This lens is far better than 70-200L in my opinion. It is very sharp at f2 and even more sharp at f2.5. With zoom lenses you have to set to f/5.6 for better result and f/8 to match this lens. It is very well built but not excessive heavy, come with hood and bag, but unfortunately, Canon have decided to remove the hard cases for all the L lenses.Combined with a Tamron 1.4X teleconverter this lens provide very good optical quality on par with any zoom L lenses at 189mm focal length. Yes I know I lost the convenience of a 70-200 zoom lens. But I am really happy that I decide to change the plan of buying a 70-200IS to 135/2L+1.4X. This not only saves me the money but also let me to get better pictures, especially at wide open. Better portrait lenses, like 200/1.8 and 300/2.8, would cost several thousands of dollars. Trust me, once you play with primes, you will not like zoom anymore.I am also using a 24-70L to shoot my small kid. After using this lens, I don't like it anymore and thinking about change to primes someday, the only reason preventing me doing that is the 1.6X crop factor of digital camera. A 35mm/1.4L will become 56mm which is really not good.Order from Amazon with free shipping even though it says not in stock. They shipped mine in 2 days and this happened before even though item stated "in stock soon".Pros:Very sharp at f2 and super sharp start from f2.5.Very fast lens with f/2Very good bokeh (background blurring).Overall extremely good picture quality with good contrast/color.Smaller size, less weight and black color compare to those white 70-200s.It is a L lens: best build quality, fast/quiet ring USM AF with FTM.Cons:No hard case.No inexpensive.Effective focal length is 216mm on 10D/20D/Rebel/300D which is a little difficult to use for portrait</review_text>
This lens is the best in its class.  I wish every lens I had was this sharp.  This thing is top notch</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well.  The build is solid (metal construction).  The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation.  The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens.I got this filter for a friend of mine for his Nikon 18-70mm ED DX lens.</review_text>
I bought this to keep the dust of Iraq out of my Canon EF-S 17-85 lens. It does a fine job and I've seen no noticeable change in the quality of images that I'm capturing with my Canon 20D</review_text>
I bought this filter to put on the front of the 18-70 DX lens on my Nikon D50.  It works well and protects the front element of the lens from dust, dirt, fingerprints and whatnot.It seems to cause a little vignetting (slightly darkened corners) at extreme wide angles (~18mm) -- but from what I've seen so far it isn't terribly noticeable, 'specially for the price</review_text>
I can't help but give the lens cap 5 stars, what can I say, it fits, it covers the lens and keeps the dust out. The bad part about purchasing from this place was paying as much in postage as for the cap itself but it was hard to find elsewhere. I also could not have it delivered here on Fort Wainwright Alaska because I'm only allowed a PO Box so I had to have it shipped to my home in New York and then had them send it on to me-go figger</review_text>
The Lowepro Case 4 is a great case for a long telephoto.  It's well padded, well-built and protects the lens very well.  However, I tried to use it with a small Lowepro Rezo 190 AW and found that (even using the SlipLock attachment) it completely unbalanced the bag.  It was so uncomfortable and unpredictable, that I finally gave up and bought a Lowepro AW Magnum (where all the gear I use fits inside the bag) to replace both.  I now just use the Case 4 for storage purposes or to bring the telephoto along in the car when I'm "hand-carrying".  I believe it would work much better as an attachment on a medium size bag where another lens case could be hung on the other side of the bag to better balance the weight</review_text>
I recently purchased a used Canon 300mm f4 L and it didn't have a case.  This lightweight case was perfect for this lens.  It fits snugly, but not too tight.The case is lined with about 1/2" of high density foam.  I'm pretty sure that this case would adequately protect a heavy L series lens in a 4-5 foot fall.    The case can be used with my Tamarac MAS bag, but most of the time I sling the lens and case over my shoulder using the attached shoulder strap.This is a very secure, reasonably priced lens case that provides excellent protection for your valuable lenses.</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I searched and researched the lens to purchase with my Canon Rebel XTI for weeks because I knew that I did not want the kit lens. I also did not have the money to spend on a 5, 6, or $700 dollar lens. In the end after reading countless reviews, ones implementing professional techniques and ones using just opinion, this lens looked to be the best value. For the money I really don't think that you can beat this lens. It focuses quickly, it is really quiet while doing it, and it is sharp enough for the money. Plus it has full time manual focus, which is a really big plus for a lens in this price range. The only problem is it is a little on the narrow side with the 1.6 crop factor on the Rebel XTI, but I would much rather have to deal with that than a sub-par image. In summary I would recommend this lens in place of the kit lens to anyone who doesn't have the money to buy an "L" series lens. It is really a great value</review_text>
I'm very happy with this lens. It offer's an ample variety of options, high image quality and it is light</review_text>
While this lens is a great improvement over the kit lenses the focus is often soft in raw modes and overal just not always tight. Color accuracy is very good, not perfect but very good. Of course color accuracy is more often a result of your paper (yes really - it is) than your lens after you get to a certain point. After using this lens for 2 months and shooting perhaps 20,000 shots with it I wished I had saved my money for the inevitable l series lens. If color accuracy is your main issue, be sure to look at your photo paper too. Hp, Kodak, and even low end papers from inkpress all do strang things to color and blur your images. Try someone like MOAB paper. You will be AMAZED at how much of a difference it will make in your color accuracy and detail. I just switched to Kokapelli from MOAB for commercial prints and am amazed by the results.As is usually the case focus is softest at f3.5 though it does produce a surprisingly decent bokeh</review_text>
I bought this lens to replace the kit lens on the Rebel XT. I find this lens to be a very good value, a very good value. I also have the canon 28-135 3.5 ... And find the 28-105 lens to be a very stong lens for the price. It might even be just a notch clearer then the 28-135 but at half the price. It's size is nice and light weight and fits nice on the Rebel since it is a smaller DSLR.All in all, a great lens at a budet price but it dosn't act like it. Fast focus, fair range, nice size, easy to lug around. I would sugest this lens to any one and first on my list to someone who is not wanting to go crazy on lenses and extras for their camera, and just want to simply get some nice pics without spending all their lunch money. Also the lens takes the same size  filters as the kit lens, so if you have spent a few dollers on a few filters for the kit lens your in luck. I know I was happy to still use the 3 filters I've already got.</review_text>
This lens is truly a 'must have' if you don't have lots of cash to spend. Simply put, it is an excellent performer for the money. I recently got this lens for my Rebel XT, and noticed a HUGE improvement over the 18-55mm kit lens. Sharpness has improved considerably. The 18-55mm has some SERIOUS issues in that area. First of all, sharpness was REALLY bad at large apertures. But smaller apertures were not really much better. The 28-105mm still is not the best performer at large apertures. But it is MUCH better than the 18-55mm. However, at around f8 or higher, the 28-105mm is tack sharp. In addition, this lens does not suffer from the problem of having a clear foreground and soft background that my 18-55mm suffers from.Color accuracy has also GREATLY improved with the 28-105mm. Colors look MUCH more natural with this lens than with the 18-55mm lens. This is particularly true of lighter colors, especially when you go to increase saturation with Photoshop (or other software). Increasing saturation to improve the appearance of dark colors on a picture taken with the 18-55mm would typically make lighter colored objects look VERY unnatural. This sort of problem is MUCH reduced with the 28-105mm. I should also say that this lens appears to overexpose somewhat compared with the 18-55mm. This is more good than bad, however, as it has the effect of making the lens faster.Of course, this lens is not without its drawbacks. I mentioned the slight softness at large apertures, for instance. Also, it is not the fastest lens out there. But then again, what do you expect for the price? And finally, 28mm is not exactly wide angle on a cropped sensor digital SLR like the Rebels or the 20D. But despite these drawbacks, this lens really performs like a champ. And when used in its element (ie higher f-numbers), it works quite well. Also, since it is not an EF-S lens, it will not become a paperweight should you decide to upgrade to a 5D.</review_text>
THE BOTTOM LINE:I needed to replace the lens on my Canon Rebel XT D-SLR.  The EF-S on first glance seemed like the perfect replacement since Canon produced the EF-S series specifically for the compressed sensor D-SLR line.  After weighing the pros and cons of the two, I chose this EF lens largely on the basis of price.  It was the right choice, and I haven't found any loss of features or quality.Multiplying the range by 1.6 for a 35mm equivalence (if you have a Rebel XT, 20D or 30D), this model is really just a slightly wide angle to stronger telephoto zoom. (about 45mm-170mm if it was a 35mm film camera)  If this range suits you, then this lens is an excellent value over a EF-S wide-angle/telephoto zoom.  You'll keep all of the features, save money and have a faster lens.The EF series meshes well with the current line of Canon digital SLRs.  In addition, unlike the EF-S series, they are compatible with all of the Canon EOS products including higher-end cameras like the Mark II.SPECIFIC OBSERVATIONS FROM WEEKS OF USE:My first concern before purchasing this lens was the MINIMUM FOCUS DISTANCE of 0.5 meters, or approximately 18 inches.  I do a lot of macro work transferring images into digital, so I was a tad worried.  However, after getting the lens and zooming in, I realized that the focusing distance wasn't really an issue after all.  In most cases, I could manage to stand six or so inches further away and still get a highly magnified shot.  So that you can see that the macro function works well, I've uploaded an image of a small hamster photographed at 102mm. (The aperature is pretty big -- after all, a hamster IS a moving target)My second concern was lens QUALITY AND SHARPNESS, particularly in the wide-angle setting near the edges of the photo.  This lens exceeded my expectations.  So that you can see the quality of this lens, I've uploaded an uncropped picture of the SF Bay Bridge taken at the 28mm wide-angle setting.  You'll see that the photo is sharp all the way through the edges of the frame. (it is a web-sized jpeg, so you should take that into consideration and use it mainly to see the sharpness of the photo, particularly near the outside edges)I did get an unexpected bonus with this lens.  The MANUAL FOCUS ring is in the front.  I love it.  Disabling the auto-focus is a snap, and the position and feel of the manual focus is perfect for sports or social activities where the subject is often not the closest object.  The ring itself is ridged and made of rubber, making handling a breeze.While I hadn't expected to replace my stock lens so soon, I think it ended up for the best.  This lens is actually superior to the one that came with the XT.  I lost some wide-angle function but gained much more telephoto.  The price is excellent and the quality of the lens is high.</review_text>
I was given this lens after my Sigma 28-135mm lens broke.  While that lens has been fixed, I haven't used it since attatching the Canon lens on my camera.  The Canon 28-105mm may have a smaller zoom range, but other than that is clearly a superior lens in every respect.  It's sturdy, fast-focusing, sharp, and has good color.  In short, it's what you hope to find when purchasing a consumer grade lens.  There are other cheaper lenses on the market, like Sigma's lens or Canon's f/4-5.6, but this lens is worth the extra $100 for its reliability, sharpness and overall usability</review_text>
This timer/cable release has a lot of features. Works well. The cord is somewhat short though, and it is of cheap plastic construction. Hard to imaging that it costs this much. I think it's over priced. But it does the job.</review_text>
I've had my remote switch for almost 3 months now.  I love it.  So far the only feature I have used is the remote switch and it works flawlessly.  If you want to trip the shutter from a distance without shaking the 20D (the camera I use) this is what you need.  I use it with the extension cord since I am generally about 30 feet away from the camera.  I am very pleased with this purchase.  No complaints at this point</review_text>
I also received this remote with only the international warranty.  I called Amazon and they immediately sent me out a replacement free of charge; Yeah.  But alas, it too had the international warranty; @#$%!.  I have returned both, unopened and unused on their dime. Perhaps this is the only version they have</review_text>
Well I too have recieved a "grey market" version of the product, with an international warranty only.  As this has been mentioned before, and apparently has been rectified by Amazon, I hope I'll recieve the same treatment.  But this still troubles me.  Is Amazon continuing to sell off cheaper merchandise, only addressing the issue on an individual basis when people complain?What grey market means is that the product was originally intended for sale outside the US, but has been imported because that version of the product is cheaper than the version intended for US sale.  While it's a legitimate enough process, they should be telling us if they do it, because the warranty has been invalidated by being sold outside the boundaries of the system Canon has put in place.I'm not even touching the hardware until I find out what's going on about it, so I can't rate its quality.. but I have no doubt that it's a quality piece of hardware, I've never heard anyone have anything bad to say about it, except its price, a gripe I totally agree with.  Let's face it folks, if it wasn't a proprietary accessory to a high priced camera system, it should really cost about $20.  It's just a simple programmable timer no more sophisticated than most wristwatches</review_text>
I have had this product for over two years and used it extensively in my travels. Yes it has shortfalls and "may" be considered expensive, but for the price it is better than some other "aftermarket" designs for other Camera makes. For amature timelapse and timed exposures it works quite well. As far as a remote for instant low light or exposure shots it is expensive, get the Canon RS-80N3 Shutter releaseThe biggest complaints seems to be the limited number of shots [99] in certain modes and the shortness of the connecting cable length. Using the "continous" mode I have not failed to capture timelapse photos that filled my needs.The short connecting cable can be corrected by purchasing the Canon ET-1000N3 extension cable [33 ft]. Now that at $2.50+ a foot, is expensive! But in my persuit of remote control capability a must have.Battery life is fantastic, thousands of shots and still going strong. Of course like camera battery a spare is a blessing [and in this case cheap].I think it is a good accessory, if you enjoy time lapse and have spent the money for one of the new EOS cam's then the price is comparable to your continuing outlay for your hobby.A "gadgeteers must"..Too each their own, that is what supports "Horse Races". Enjo</review_text>
I was somewhat surprised to receive my TC80N3 with only an Canon international warranty....did anyone else receive a grey market version of this remote control? I have ordered $1000s of Canon products from Amazon.com and always received a Canon USA warranty card with the items....not sure why this item didn't carry the USA warranty.I have sent several emails to Amazon.com regarding this matter.I'll update the review when I receive an answer that is satisfactory. PLEASE NOTE: Amazon is shipping a replacement remote!  I'll amend again once the replacement is received.Control itself is a wonderful product but for this price I DID expect a Canon USA warranty card.Gar</review_text>
The ability to combine four different delay and interval modes makes this product able to accommodate almost any automatic-shooting situation.You can control the delay until the sequence starts, the delay between shots, the total shooting time, and the number of shots.That last one, however, is where the glaring flaw comes in: The controller is limited to 99 shots when you use the total-number-of-shots setting. In correspondence I've had with Canon, they have had no explanation for this asinine limitation. Even a modest CF card these days holds more than 99 shots, even in raw mode. For time lapse, 99 shots is woefully inadequate.You can work around this defect by simply letting your card fill up or by doing the math and using the total-duration setting. But sometimes you want to shoot multiple sequences on one card. If you know you want about 300 frames (for example), it's annoying to have to baby-sit the camera and stop it manually, or to do the math and figure out how many seconds total your sequence will take, convert that to minutes and seconds, and then dial that into another setting on the controller. And if you then decide to use a different interval, you get to re-do all that. Dumb, Canon.The fact is, this device shouldn't be necessary anyway.  Every camera today should come with this functionality; it's technically trivial, since every one of these digital SLRs is a computer with plenty of on-board timers and logic for this task</review_text>
I enjoy the TC80N3.You may think it's costly,but the features are out standing.I think it was worth the buy.The only disappointment I have is there is no "on,off" power switch</review_text>
This remote is a handy tool to have.  It's very basic use is as a shutter release.  It's best to use a shutter release for when your camera in on a tripod in low light situations.  Using the shutter release in this way helps to limit camera shake which improves your images.Other programmable features include a self timer, interval timer, long exposure, and exposure count.  You are permitted to use any combination all or none of these settings making the possibilities virtually limitless.I have used to self timer so that I could both take the picture, and be in it.  The self timer can be set for just shy of 100 hours if you wanted to.For time lapse, a combination of the interval timer which can be set for just shy of 100 hours and the exposure count which can be set for up to 99 shots should be set.  The self timer can be used to delay the first shot if desired.The long exposure can also be set up to just shy of 100 hours.The settings can be entered at any time without worry of inadvertent alterations.  Pressing the light button until the hold indicator is displayed will deactivate all but the light button or prevents the stop/start button from being deactivated once an operation has been started.The TC-80N3 is operated by one CR2032 battery.  I've had my remote for over 2 years and the battery is still going strong.  I'm not sure how long the battery is supposed to last, but there is an indicator in the display panel to let me know when the battery starts to get low. If the battery is fine, I don't see the indicator at all.There is a storage place on the back for your cameras RC socket cover if you have one.  I use this with a Canon 20D so it is of no use to me.  The plug connects to the camera simply by pressing the plug into the socket.  To disconnect, pinch the plug on the side and pull out.For me, this item is a must have.  I enjoy low light photography and I get plenty of use just for this reason.  It's great to have the option available for other photographic opportunities.  It is clear to me that this is a well thought out, quality product by Canon.PROS:Acts as a simple shutter releaseProgrammable options include a self timer, interval timer, long exposure, and exposure countCONS:Cable only about 34 inche</review_text>
Ok to start off I've heard different opinions about camera sensor blowers..some say it works like magic some say it can make it worse. So I gambled and bought this Giotto blower.I didn't want to buy all the cleaning swabs, liquid ect and rub it off...seemed like a annoying project. So I gave this blower a try.I never had that much dust on my sensor but when made my aperture smaller f/22 to be exact and did a picture of the blue sky I noticed a few blobs or dust spots. I wanted them off...now heres where the blower comes in. I used it a total of 3 times and it removed 98% of the dust off my sensor..thats really really good in my book for a $9 device. Now I have like 2 tiny dust spots on my sensor and I can easily live with that..or I could try to use it a few more times to completely get it off...In the meantime I'm very happy with the dust I got off it.Buy this blower....its a no brainer.</review_text>
I had some dust spots on my lenses, and on the mirrors inside. I was afraid to use the brush or cloth kits, since they could easily scratch. One of my photography books suggested I use this exact air blower, so I thought I'd give it a try. It's a simple tool, but it emits a strong amount of air and I was able to clean everything off. Even works well for keyboards or other dusty spots</review_text>
It works great - and no touching the sensor with a brush.  Great produc</review_text>
I was surprised at just how big this rubber blower is. For it's size, it doesn't blow much air out - maybe a little bit more than a rubber squeeze toy for dogs. Speaking of dog toys, this item squeaks everytime I squeeze the bulb.The bottom line is this item actually works and helps remove dust from your sensor. Because of that, it's a solid pick-up..</review_text>
I was quite annoyed when I found my D70 had come out of the box with dust on the lens. The place I bought it would only send it away to Nikon for cleaning, but a friend with the same camera advised me to get a dust blower and showed me how I should be able to blow the dust off myself.the first blower I tried didn't have enough power and the dust remained. I had almost decided to take the camera to get it cleaned when I read a review that suggested this one. I took a chance, and after about 15 minutes of trying, checking, and trying again, I finally have a dust free sensor!this is the most valuable piece of equipment that I have purchased for my camera, and I recommend this to anyone with a similar problem</review_text>
I had originally bought another brand of blower to clean my digital camera, but after using it once I ended up introducing more dirt and/or rubber bits than I care to remember.  Long story short I don't use that for my camera anymore and it took me a long time to get all of that crud out of my camera.  But then I decided to give another brand a try since so many people seemed to be able to use blower bulbs without any problems.  When I got my new blower my sensor was already fairly clean, but after using it it was a little cleaner.  You will still sometimes have those stuck on particles (I use sterile pec pads and eclipse solution to get rid of those with pretty good results, but do this at your own risk since it voids most camera manufacturers warranties.)  I also keep my blower in the original packaging to keep it as clean as possible, I guess I am a little gun shy after my first experience</review_text>
I have owned the Giottos Rocket Air Blaster for 2 weeks now and love it. I use it for blowing dust of everything: Camera lenses, computer screens and out of computer keyboards. It is made of a nice soft material that allows it to be stored flat and out of the way. Additionally, it creates sufficient pressure to force away most dust particles and of course requires no canned air, as it works as you pump it. I'll never by a can of forced air again</review_text>
I bought this gizmo to clear the CMOS detector in my digital SLR camera.  It seemed like a good alternative to using a specialized, expensive sensor wipes, and it would not invalidate the camera's warranty.The results with my camera were good but not perfect.  Many large particles of dust were blown off the detector.  However, some medium-sized particles were merely pushed to the edges.  Nonetheless, I really like having the air blaster just for my camera.Aside from my camera, I have used this on a number of other devices around my home and office.  It works particularly well at clearing dust out of the vents in my laptop and underneath the keys on my laptop's keyboard.  However, it works poorly in clearing out the dust and grime in my desktop keyboard.In summary, I would say that this is a good device for owners of digital SLR cameras, although it is not a perfect substitute for sensor wipes.  For owners of electronic equipment in general, this is a clever device that works reasonably well at cleaning dust out of some places</review_text>
One of the problems with owning a digital camera is that you'll occasionally have to clean dust off of the image sensor.  You can't use compressed air because it will freeze and destroy your sensor.  You don't really want to blow either because the moisture in your breath will damage your sensor... and make you pass out.You need "dry", relatively-high pressure air and this is what the Rocket Air is outstanding for.  Simple to use.  1-Remove your lens (on SLR), 2-put into cleaning mode, 3-hang the camera upside down (presumably, to allow dust to fall out), and 4-squeeze the Rocket Air thereby cleaning the camera.At this point, I swear by it. I'm constantly changing lenses and this helps remove spects and ghost images.  It's a must have in your Camera Kit</review_text>
The best feature of this flash is the wireless E-TTL feature.  With two 550ex's one will work as a master and one as a slave and with the ST-E2 both flashes can be off camera and fired E-TTL.  The draw backs are: price, no manual control in slave mode for greater light control, and size (this thing is big).  The plus side weighs out the negatives.  It is a great flash</review_text>
I am very happy of having gotten this flash.. it works pretty well, and I like its performance</review_text>
I just bought a digital rebel about a month ago.  Love the camera, my old 380EX speedlight integrates with the camera but just doesn't offer enough cycle speed to keep up with continuous mode on the Rebel. This flash does the job for the Rebel and the plug for the external battery pack promises even better performance once I grab that item.  Another big selling point that really makes this unit worth the cash, is that it has its own infrared focus assist lamp which the digital Rebel lacks.  When this flash is mounted on your digital rebel, you don't get that annoying set of quick flashes that the camera has to set off to focus in low light when using the built-in flash.  The Rebel body uses the infrared focus assist on the 550EX to focus the lens; this feature alone is worth the big bucks this baby costs.  The flash has tons of features that most of us might never use, but as a advanced amateur I'm glad they're there so I can play with that if I should choose to try out some fancy stuff.  The wireless slave capability is handy but you've got to have at least one more 420EX, 550EX or 580EX to use that. I like the digital readout on the back of the flash and also the two way bounce head, it's important to note that you have to press a button to make the head turn either side to side or up/down---this should make the head sturdier than I've seen on some units that get loose after awhile and drive you nuts. This unit is a HONKER--really big, and, no lightweight either.  Get yourself a big deep camera bag if you want to lug this thing around with you.  What's the difference between this and the 580EX? The 580 has very slightly faster cycle times and offers some fancy new automatic flash exposure bracketing modes, for me anyway it wasn't worth almost two hundred dollars more for the 580. All of the newer EOS camera bodies are fully supported by this unit, it also works on older EOS bodies but there are functions available on the newer ones that aren't there on older stuff.  I like this flash it covers well, cycles fast and the controls are fairly intuitive and easy to use.  When you get yours don't lose that book, Canon doesn't seem to have them online anywhere I can find and I've seen places that want to charge you 18 bucks for a new one</review_text>
This is an absolute do-everything flash, with master/slave operation, wireless control of multiple channels for slave flashes, A:B:C lighting ratio control (better than the ST-E2's mere A:B ratio), full manual or automatic operation, strobe effects at selectable Herz rates and power, and even a small panel that serves either to widen its flash coverage to 17mm or simply provide a catchlight in a model's eyes when using bounce flash.  Range is excellent, battery life is very good and can be compounded with one of the battery packs.  The light itself provides excellent color, and a red lamp near the base adds a much more accurate and less harsh focus assist lamp than most of Canon's cameras provide.If you have an SLR, you'll almost certainly want an external flash.  You can provide fill flash to reduce shadows in subjects eyes etc. during harsh daylight shots, take the flash off the camera to eliminate nasty shadows, and avoid the shadows caused by larger lenses and onboard flashes.Minor quibbles: most DSLRs have crop ratios of 1.3x or 1.6x, but don't pass this information on to the 550EX, which wouldn't care anyway.  This means the flash thinks you want greater coverage than you really need (i.e. it will give you a 50mm's angle of flash coverage, when you only need an 80mm's), so you waste a lot of flash power and don't get optimum recycling times.  Also, the interface is a little non-intuitive.If you want a slave- or onboard-only flash and don't need all the extra features, the considerably cheaper 420EX is for you.  That said, if you do want all the extra features, the 550EX is still not for you.  You want the 580EX, slated for October 2004 release, which fixes the minor issues with the 550</review_text>
This is one fantastic flash.  I had it on my Canon A2e for four years, and was ambivilent, but if you match this lens with one of Canon's newer bodies that has the funcionality to access all of the 550EX's features, you have an awesome, powerful, flexable flash that can change the way you shoot</review_text>
Top of the line.  Works as advertised.  TTL, E-TTL.  4 double AA batteries.   Tilt, Rotate head, soft lens built in.  Can control slave flash</review_text>
I got this camera back in May and lost it (but this camera seemed to be the best).  I ordered the same camera from Amazon but had to return it because one of the pixels were blown.  I got my replacement but the amount of time it takes to take a picture is an eternity.Look for some other camera.  If people are posing you better hope you get it on the 1st shot, because if you don't it takes too long to take another.</review_text>
Easy to use, including zoom and uploading to computer.  Nice clear photos when printed out</review_text>
Im a graphic design student in college, so i really needed a camera. I decided on this one and i am really glad i did. The pictures are nice and clean. The camera itslef is a very sleek looking one and is very compact. The only downfall to this is that it eats batteries pretty quick, but i just took them out when i wasnt using them. Buy this camera</review_text>
This camera is the first digital for me, and the only camera I have ever enjoyed having.  The macro setting gives amazing closeups of bugs, flowers, etc.  With the purchase of a charger and some batteries, I've kept it going for almost nothing.  Better get a big memory card, too.  The silly settings like "color swap" and "fireworks" are fun to play with.  My only complaint is it is slow to recover between shots, so you miss some action of kids, etc.  For the price, it can't be beat.gramma t</review_text>
The camera is the perfect solution for someone who does not want exchangable lensesand some items for more professional results.  Combined with a direct photo printer it is easy and fun with plenty of photo options on the dial.My only problem is that I did not receive with the camera the software to alllow me to download to the computer from the from the Memory chip itself.    Is there any way to get this software</review_text>
After hearing that Consumer Reports gave the Canon A520 a BEST BUY rating, I decided this must be a good family of cameras. It has been a joy to own and use.  Easy to take pictures, easy to work and yes, it takes great pictures.  It has more bells on it than I will ever use.  I have been very satisfied with 4 and 5 MP cameras and have not wanted to spend a fortune for more.  I just need to take pictures, review them and easily download to my computer.  This does that and much, much more</review_text>
Very quick delivery. Product was exactly as advertised. Very happy with the whole process and the product</review_text>
...in that it diffuses the light energy of the flash in different directions, essentially turning the flash into a point light source.  The light going off in different directions then bounces off nearby objects to fill in the shadow areas on the subject, making for a more pleasing softer look, especially on people.Note of caution: because this device diffuses the light from the flash, it takes much more energy per flash.  Using the Stofen will drain your battery much quicker (about 4X in my experience) and it takes the flash much longer to fully charge after each shot, say 8-10 seconds vs 2-3s.  Always keep a spare set of flash batteries with you.Another note...because it requires bouncing light of nearby objects to be effective, using this outdoors is not recommended.  You're better off removing the omni-bounce and aiming the flash directly at the subject (and living with the harsh lighting).</review_text>
I got this as much for safety as anything. If I should drop my lens, a solid lens hood will help. Plastic construction will absorb some of the impact without transmitting all of it, as a metal hood would. Hopefully it will eliminate occurances of flair, although with the Canon 50mm f1.4 lens, that's not a big issue to begin with. It also can keep dust and debris off the lens surface if you're shooting in a less-than-ideal environment.It twists on and off the lens easily. When it's on, it's very snug and secure. Kind of pricy for a piece of plastic, but Canon's in business to make money.</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I bought this camera 12/2005 for Christmas on the recommendation of Wolf Camera.  I am not a photographer or techno advanced; just a mom with 4 kids.  I love this camera.  It's great and hasn't failed me yet.  The salesman told me about the oversaturation and I adjusted it.  The battery life is amazing as I am always on the go.  It is so small I just throw it in my purse.  I have not had any problems with the lens sticking or turning on unless I turn it on.  Sounds like some of the other reviewers should go with a digital SLR.  This is an awesome point and shoot camera and I would recommend it to anyone</review_text>
This isn't a full review but some thoughts I've had after using it for a long time.Stabilization- The fact is that if this is the camera you take everywhere with you, you are going to either lose shots or have to use the flash. If flash doesn't bother you, no sweat. But I've never like the look of it.Ease-of-use- Great.Voice memo- I use this feature all the time. It would be nice if it had a pause button because without it I end up with many small files.Ex- This is where you set the exposure. Casio does a great job putting everything in one place. The only thing they should have done better is that if you have changed a selection (e.g. ISO 200 to 400) and hit the shutter release it should take the shot. Instead nothing happens. You have to click set first. It's an extra step that you have to make during a critical time</review_text>
The EXZ750 is simply a fantastic compact camera. It takes great pictures, even greater if you bother to use one of the many picture presets (scenery, portrait, macro, etc.).The pros:- picture quality is great; if you want anything better you'll probably be lugging around a DSLR- picture presets are extremely easy to use, even if you are not a techie and / or you've never handled a camera in your life (is there such a person?).- it will fit into your pocket and you'll forget it is there. This is a major advantage as the best camera is the camera you actually have with you - this one you will.- common settings (picture size, ISO, etc.) are one or two clicks away - very convenientThe cons:- the camera does take videos (at more than decent resolution) but they come out shaky even if you have pretty steady hands. Without some image stabilization in it, it is definitely not a replacement for a video camera- although the camera has ISO settings of 200 and 400 you should probably avoid them due to noiseOverall, a very positive and pleasing experience. Even having a digital SLR, I'm never giving this little puppy up</review_text>
Very small size (fits in my baggy jean pocket), fast startup, fast response when shooting picture. Much easier to carry around than my Canon G3.Does not do well indoors when flash is needed. Lots of red eye, much more than my Canon G3</review_text>
I spent a weekend researching digital cameras, exhausting and confusing, so many to choose from,  and when I was in a store looking at various cameras, a customer just started telling me how much he loved this camera he had just bought, which was this one; I assumed it was 'a sign'. And it was. Small size is fantastic, put in your shirt pocket or purse, almost weightless. Quick shutter takes the best pictures of new  baby grandchild of any camera anyone in the family has used. (others had Sony and Canon digital cameras) The movies are excellent.  The quality and color of images are perfect, not too over-digitized as some have said. Everyone in the family thinks I'm a wonderful photographer, but it's not me, it's this camera.  The battery life is really long, and it can take good pictures in multiple types of poor visibility situations. In the first month, I dropped it a few  times, once on the sidewalk and it survived which was impressive. Having a viewfinder is a big advantage in bright sunlight.After using and loving it for 9 months, the telephoto froze.  I sent it back to Casio, and they fixed it; it took 3-4 weeks, which is a little long, but did not charge me for the repair.The baby pictures are fantastic, especially because it takes the picture so fast, and the scenery pics all look like National Geographic.</review_text>
A good quality filter set at a great price. I was so happy with it I purchased sets for all my lenses and cameras! The same filters in my local camera store is more than double in price</review_text>
This lens is my favorite as I keep it on my Rebel XT at all times. I enjoy taking macro close-ups and portrait-type shots, which makes this a great lens for everyday use.  It is light-weight and not bulky.  My last SLR camera (years ago) was a Minolta with 50mm f/1.8 lens, and various other lenses that I rarely used.  I usually don't use a zoom lens due to the extra length and weight.  Also, most non-professional zoom lenses are much slower at the closest tele-position due to the higher f/stop.  With a fixed focal length of 60mm, I don't mind moving myself toward or away from the subject (not a big deal).  The pictures always appear to be sharp with good contrast and color saturation.My opinion on this lens is: "buy it ... you'll like it".I did ... and I love it.Good Luck</review_text>
the optics are the best i've ever seen. the clarity is great. the abillity to focus on small objects only 2" away allows great macro pictures. however the auto focus is much slower than most canon lenses, but i can focus manually. this is my favotite lens ever</review_text>
This lens is top notch. The quality of the photographs is the best I have ever experienced with a camera.</review_text>
If you would like a list of sites with reviews emailgumby at dontquotemeonthat dot comPros:  Very sharp, bright (fast), versatile, excellent build quality.Cons:  AF tends to be dicy in low-light conditions.Pros:  SHARP, SHARP, SHARP. No distortion, no CA, optically superb and betterCons:  EF-S mount. Had to sell it when I upgraded to the 5D.Pros:  Very solid build, Internal focusing is fantastic, Produces wonderfully saturated photos and high in contrast, Bokeh is lovely and very smooth, Auto Focus is typical ring-USM with Full Time Manual focus being excellent and smooth. f2.8 Aperture, 52mm Filter SizeCons:  I do feel Canon could reduce the price, however for this quality I don't mind paying for it.if your a newbie here's some infoA lens is "fast" when it has a low f-stop... ok so when you have a smaller number the apature is bigger which allows more light through, so this means you can up the shutter speed. and still have enough light reach the sensor.ok so lets say you have an out door shot if you have say an f/4 lens the shutter speed could be 1/250 of a second and you would get a good exposer. Now this lens can only go f/4but if you in the same outdoor setting, had an f/2.8 lens you could jump to 1/500 of a second and get the same exposer. and freeze the action mmore effectivly, this i believe is why it's a "fast" lens.ok have fun and get it done</review_text>
4 starts because otherwise 5 stars is inevitable:1) Slow autofocus (hunt at times) but is to be expected of a macro lens.2) built quality not as solid as expected at this price range.I bought this lens instead for two purpose: Macro and Portrait! I was thinking of buying the 100mm macro plus 85mm f1.8 but this lens saves me buying two lenses! I have been very happy with it as what it is. I don't do flying insects very much so it is not a problem but that said I was able to get 1:1 shot of a fly, see sample here:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_54.htmlThere are other samples in this gallery here:http://www.theteh.com/html/my_3rd_350d_xt.htmlThe large aperture (F2.8) means that one could have shallow DOF and great for low light such as this pic:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_49.htmlFor portrait, I accidentally took this photo during the London Bombing of a women 'Shocked' by the incident unfolding in the public TV display. It was a coincident that her background inmage was the winning Reuter's photo of Tsunami tragedy and the matching colour of their dresses! I was quite far away so was able to capture her from head to toe:http://www.theteh.com/html/3rd_350d_25.htmlThis illustrate the capability of both macro and normal photography using this lens. You will not regret it unless your primary aim is to shoot flying insets where longer 100mm or 150mm macro lenses may be needed in this case.</review_text>
I only wish that I had bought this lens earlier so I could have been using it longer.  I am especially pleased with the short minimum focus distance - about 3 inches.  This allows you to get very close to a small subject and to still fill the frame with the subject.I have had no problems with this lens and I love it</review_text>
The new Canon EF-S 60mm f2.8 Macro USM Digital SLR lens is designed to cover the entire field of the digital imaging sensors in Canon's digital SLR line, most notably the Canon EOS 20D. This corresponds in film to a normal lens perspective of approximately a 50mm lens. Furthermore it benefits from having Canon's USM autofocusing technology, allowing the photograher to have rapid, almost silent, autofocus, which is important when working in the field (You don't want to distract the animal you are photographing with the sound of the lens being focused.). Although this lens is not a L Series lens, the quality of its construction comes close to Canon's premium L Series professional line of lenses. Indeed, I have read elsewhere an excellent test report (I believe at Erwin Puts's website) on this lens praising its optical performance. Any Canon user of digital SLRs such as the EOS 20D who is interested in macro photography will regard this lens as absolutely essential for making great macro images</review_text>
This lens is well worth the price. The first thing you will notice is the quality when you handle the lens. It has a very solid construction. But once you mount the lens is where it REALLY shines. The clarity of focus is the best I've seen and the focus is super fast. The macro functionality is just awesome. I highly recommend this lens</review_text>
This battery works in my Canon SD550 interchangeably withthe Canon NB3L that came with it.  I get about as many shots on either one.</review_text>
I have a Canon SD-550.  This battery is works perfect with it.  I've noticed no difference in charge time and usage when compare with the original manufacterer one.  Except the price is a lot lower</review_text>
What can I say? It fits in place of the overpriced Canon NB3L battery for my SD500 and lasts longer than the OEM battery. The quality of the battery on the external is very good. No sloppy glued edges or ill-fitting parts. The battery works very well in the camera and lasts longer by one hundred or so shots. I use a gig card so I tend to shot alot at once. Even with the flash the battery life is comparable to the Canon or even longer. I bought two instead of a single Canon battery and I have not been dissappointed</review_text>
I bought this battery as an extra battery for my camera.  It is a lot lower in price than the Canon battery.  I have not used either my original or this extra battery enough to fully compare them, but they seem to work equally well so far</review_text>
The product was great! You should get it. Usually, I'm skeptical abour getting generic brands, but this works perfectly</review_text>
I purchased my 300D in May 2005, when the XT was released and this 6.3 MP model's price began falling. I'd have to really pick this camera apart to tell you the downsides of it; disregard reviews by those who think this camera is not up to par -- of course it's not comparable to the EOS 1-Series or a 5D, so don't expect the same features or capabilities. The right user, however, can get similar results.That said, unless you are a professional photographer, I cannot imagine how the Digital Rebel could be inadequate for any amateur or semi-pro shooter. It's speed and megapixels have since been passed by, but it's still, especially now, a great buy.The kit lens will perform for you just fine, although most of my shots with the kit lens are at 18mm, landscape or just wide-angle shots. The flash works very well in most situations, even in extremely dark rooms. One guy complained his AF hunted in low light situations, even with flash...of course, what do you expect in a dark room? Use manual focus and grow up.Quality is great from ISO 100-400, although 800 can be somewhat ugly at times, and 1600 is basically unusable, especially if you're not shooting at f/2.8 or bigger.My main complaints: slow start-up time compared to the newer models (XT, 20D, etc) ... camera seems to be out of breath after continuous shooting; take 8 shots quickly and you may notice the camera needs to process info before it can shoot again. 2.5 frames/second is not very fast if you're shooting any sports.Overall, this camera has been incredibly reliable for me; it's gotten me front page shots on newspapers, magazine covers, calendars and websites. I used it so much that I blew out the shutter in 10 months; Canon fixed it at no charge and it works fine since. One minor problem: very rarely, it won't turn on unless I remove the battery and re-insert it.I've found the battery life to be fantastic. I can use it all day, even with flash, and still have some life at the end of the day. A backup battery in your bag should give you more than enough insurance for a day.I've printed at 11x17 with excellent results.With some practice, it's very easy to navigate. Menus and options are simple; changing the ISO or aperture is very easy despite what some have complained about. It's very reliable in fully-auto mode as well, especially if you're shooting with flash. A memory card reader is a must when uploading images.Overall: it's old news in the world of digital SLRs, but right now, a new or used model at such a good price is really is great value</review_text>
For its time and price (at the time), a fantastic camera.  6.3 MP is more than sufficient for most amateur and semi-pro (non-studio) work, and this camera works very well with what really matters:  Canon's fantastic lenses.  Battery life on this camera is very good.  The "shutter lag" (between when you depress the button and when the camera actually takes a photo) is fairly well non-existent, and the only real lag I have is when I am shooting multiple photos in RAW format.  As most photographers know, the lens is almost more important than the body, and outside of Leica lenses, I don't think anything really competes with Canon's line.  The 18-55 lens that comes with this camera is sufficient for casual work...I used it at the beach, and on hikes with my dog, when I don't want to lug around my bigger, more expensive, higher-quality lenses.  But for $75 or so, you can have a 50mm 1.8 EOS lens, which will supplement the 18-55 nicely, particularly for night photography.My one complaint about this camera is its ability to meter light adequately in dark settings.  When I shoot RAW this isn't such a big problem, because I can fix it in Photoshop, but most everything I shoot inside, unless I manually mess with the white balance every time, has an orange tint that is interesting for the first 200 shots, and then is annoying after.  I think the more advanced EOS models that have come out since 2004 or so fix this color problem, and also help a bit with the lag between the RAW shots...but for the money, this camera is excellent, and far, far superior to, for example, Olympus' digital exquivalent (for a similar price).  The difference, as far as I'm concerned, is in the absolute advantage Canon has in lens quality.  You can use a high-end consumer body like this one, use a professional piece of Canon glass (lens) and take excellent photos.  I wouldn't invest in a system that doesn't also boast excellent lens quality</review_text>
I have had this camera a little over a year and I still can't put it down. It is wonderful. I have two little boys on the move and this camera takes their picture with hardly any delay. Just snap and go. I bought my dad the XP in March and he loves it too.</review_text>
An incredible piece of equipment at an almost give away price.  I have no complaints and this camera surpasses what I expected</review_text>
I had an Olympus 5MP point-n-shoot Camedia camera I was pretty happy with for portraits. I was annoyed w/ the fixed lens that prevented me from taking good photos of wildlife. I have hummingbird feeders in my backyard and unless you've had the opportunity to work with hummingbird families for years, the sweet, tiny animals are skittish and don't often pose for you when you get too close. When my point-n-shoot stopped focusing, I took advantage of this situation by rationalizing this bigger purchase.What a joy it has been to use this camera. The 6.3MP is a significant improvement over 5 and the ability to take photos in manual mode cannot be understated. With the fixed point-n-shoot, the camera refused to shoot if it didn't "feel" that it was in focus... so it was impossible to shoot sunsets, lightning or other natural beauties in the "infinity" range of the focal length.The Rebel makes use of Compact Flash - the oldest, yet still the best technology for taking fast, high-quality photos in digital cameras.My less than perfect rating is due to the small memory buffer. You can take up to 3fps very easily, but if you click-click-click the shutter, it doesn't matter if Bigfoot, the Loch Ness Monster and Elvis start doing a little soft-shoe right in front of you, by the time the Rebel finishes writing the recent 3 quick shots to the CF card, the shot of the century has already slithered back into the swamp by the time the camera is ready to be used again.If you're taking portraits, not a problem. A click here and there and you'll never notice the lack of memory buffer... but if you're shooting at a ball game or other quick moving objects, you're going to get frustrated very quickly.The flash is decent, but you really need a good flash like the 580 in the hot-shoe if you want a better even spread and avoidance of red-eye. A lot of folks shrug about red-eye since most affordable or free programs like iPhoto or Photoshop Elements have built-in correction for red-eye - but red-eye correction by one click is only available for humans. If you're shooting wildlife, forget about any software that has a one-click (or a million clicks!) solution for blue-eye in dogs, yellow-eye in cats, flaming-demon eye in bunnies or the variety of odd reflections you will get bouncing off retinas of various species. The best way to circumvent this problem is to avoid bouncing flash directly into the retinas of your subjects from the get-go. No more glare or odd reflections when you use a better flash.The ability to upgrade to better lenses is the crux of SLR ownership. The sky is the limit. Get a good wide-angle and a good, fast telephoto and you've got yourself set for some great shots.  This camera isn't going to take advantage of CF cards faster than 40x, so you can save money by buying the slightly slower CF cards, but I invested in the 80x cards so I can use them when I upgrade cameras.This Rebel has gotten me back into photography after a decade-long hiatus. The camera automatically detects vertical shots and turns them 90 degrees for you in the LCD window. It is quick and easy to adjust the ISO to "push" the film (so to speak) to take advantage of low-light situations, but you get the same grainy effects as you do when you push real film.With an ISO of 100 and using a 512MB CF card, you have 157 photos at your disposal - if you push it all the way to 1600, 104 shots on the same card. At 400, your shots are already compromized regarding print quality... but if Sasquatch comes-a-knockin' in the wee hours, you'll still get decent proof if you shoot at 1600.Having a background in film photography spanning 2 decades, I didn't even have to consult the manual for this camera to use it fresh out of the box. It handles in many ways like a professional film SLR, and unlike the point-n-shoots, there aren't cryptic settings that have no film parallel.For sunny days and outdoor shots, this camera is a sheer joy to use</review_text>
I have owned a Canon EOS Digital Rebel 6.3mp for several weeks now and love it. Fantastic pictures & features. I worked with SLR's for many years. Figured it was time to "move up" to the digital SLR and glad I did. This camera has plenty of features available, or you can just set it for "auto" and that works fine, too. Though an optional flash is not needed for most photography I wanted one for far shots and such. Canon makes several models dedicated to this camera, but I find them weak (220EX) or costly.  Shop carefully in trying to find a compatible flash. It needs to be "dedicated" to the digital Rebels. One that will work with AF (auto focus) or the SLR (film) Rebel may not work right.  I also received conflicting information from Ritz Camera, both on-line and in the stores. Bottom line, if you need a flash, shop carefully and ask all the right questions. Personally I have held off buying one hoping more models at a lower price come out. The camera does already have a small pop-up flash. BTW, the Tamron AF 70-300 Macro 1:2 zoom is a nice lens to buy with it, and priced nicely at Beach Camera</review_text>
This review will be really two parts: one for the amateur who has been using point and shoots, or has experience with film based SLRs; the other one for the prosumer or advanced amateur who is either going to digital from film Canon EOS bodies or is getting into pro-level digital shooting on the low end. For the former, the camera is pretty much all you need; for the latter, it is lacking key functionality, but IS workable.I'm in the latter category. I've done freelance photo work in the past, but not since the digital age began to take off in the late '90s. I've been shooting EOS cameras since the early '90s, and added medium format in the late '90s for wedding and portrait work. I'll be honest: I didn't like the idea of digital at first. Sure, the workflow improvements over film sounded great, but I wasn't seeing the quality of digital vs. film. I still am very much a believer that, at least for prints, especially big prints, film delivers a better overall picture quality. But the quality of digital SLRs since the release of the Digital Rebel is so good, the workflow advantages trump film in all but rare situations. I'll still use my medium format equipment for landscape and outdoor pics I'll print large and frame, but other than a pocket 35mm, I can't see using film much at all in that category, after seeing what I can do with the DReb.If you are primarily an amateur who is either used to using a Point and Shoot (film or digital) or who has used a consumer film SLR, you'll find this camera easy to operate and use to the extent you used your other cameras. I bought this without the lens, as I have other lenses and the packaged one didn't offer me anything, but for those without Canon glass, you get a surprisingly good lens with the kit. Remember, though, that the lens will only fit on the Digital Rebel, its successors, and possibly the 10/20D line of Canon EOS bodies.Shooting is pretty simple. Charge the battery, which is easy -- the charger blinks depending upon its charge. You can look at the charger with the battery on there and see where you are, charge wise. It doesn't take very long to charge the battery fully. Once you have the battery in the camera, you'll need a Compact Flash card. I recommend SanDisk Ultra II cards. You won't experience any write time problems over an above this camera's natural limitations. Then, set the ISO value (100-1600), set either the pre-programed mode on one side of the dial, or the traditional Program/Shutter Priority/Apeture Priority settings on the other side, and you are ready to rock. Remember that unlike many digital cameras, the LED on the back of the camers DOES NOT function as a viewfinder. Aside from displaying various camera options, it shows what you shot after shooting.If you want to use this as an advanced amateur/pro setup, you can, but know its limitations. I bought this in March and have been shooting all sports with it. I'm using a Canon L USM lens, and have gotten some terrific shots. But I've also missed some that have led me to decide to sell this camera and pick up a 20D. The problem I get into is focusing speed and zones. The 2.5 fps with only a 4 frame burst isn't as big a problem as it sounds. I can still get good action in the burst mode, but admittedly 5 fps with 22 or 25 (20D) bursts is much better. If you want to use this to shoot something like concerts or indoor events, you won't have the same focusing issues. You will have to deal with any flash limitations, but for that information, you will have to read another review. I'm not a camera flash guy under any definition.The only real problem I've had with this camera is that my shots are consistently underexposed by about .5-.7 of a stop. I shoot exclusively RAW mode (never shot JPG on this one other than first dozen or so shots) and it has been correctable when I convert the images. This is more of a minor irritation, and may not be noticable in JPEG shots. I've seen others using this camera complain of it as well.This camera is as good of a consumer camera as you will find. If a pro, or semi-pro, can make something function for his or her needs, you know the consumer can get everything they need out of this. I've been shooting since I was 8 or so, have owned umpteen cameras, and this one fills its market niche as good as any of them</review_text>
There are already tons of reviews on the EOS 300d (Digital Rebel) but I do want to share my experience with the camera, so I will keep this short. I bought this camera about 5 months ago and I am in love with. I was not new to photography or to SLR's, but new to the world of digital SLR. I had previously used an ancient Minolta x-570, a "pro-sumer" 35mm film slr with a Vivitar 35-105 standard zoom lens. First and foremost this camera takes excellent pictures, very high quality and no distortion that I have seen. This camera is particularly good as a beginner's dSLR because there are so many options to use and learn. But until you are ready to take advantage of all the featues, you can use this just like a point and shoot. Battery life has been excellent so far: thought I would suggest getting an extra to have as  a backup for long days of taking photos.  I have also been quite happy with the kit lens, which I wasn't sure I would like since it is not as versatile as the lens I had been using on my Minolta. But the kit lens has proved to be a great learning tool: I have been able to take some great shots, while also learning what kinds of other, better lenses I would like to add to my setup.**The only issue I have had was a problem with a Sandisk 2gb CF card. After about 300 shots, the camera froze and stopped responding to that card. I was able to salvage most of the photos after the fact, but don't risk it. If you're serious enough to spend this kind of money on a camera, spend a little extra money on the Sandisk Ultra II line of high-speed cards.</review_text>
Manufactured of a soft gray felt like material, a tough leather bottom, and draw string closure at the top, this lens pouch helps protect your lens from dust and the elements.  I store my lenses in a camera bag, and these cases fit nicely around the lens taking up little precious space.This case is meant for use with the Canon EF 135mm f/2L USM, EF 24-70mm f/2.8L USM, EF 24-105mm f/4.0L USM, EF 28-70 F/2.8 L, EF 50 F/1.0 L USM, EF 85mm f/1.2L USM lenses. These L lenses normally come with the case when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.  However if your case is worn, replacing it to protect your lens is recommended.PROS:Protects your glass investmentCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
I purchased a D-30 from Amazon last year and I previously had been using a Digital Nikon. The improvement was monumental in all aspects. I subsequently drowned my camera, and I am getting ready to repurchase another D30. They are not ready for water yet? I have taken approximately 5000 pictures and saved them all in the most usable format and I will continue to do the same. The Photoshop software that comes with the camera is very user friendly, I am sure there are many features yet to learn, but I have been extremely happy with what I have already used. I hesitate to say mastered</review_text>
I've owned one of these cameras for about four years now, and I have been very pleased with it. It is light, small and easy to carry. It takes beautiful pictures--very sharp, and with good colors. The pictures look good even when you blow them up so big you can see the individual pixels.It was actually my second camera like this. The first had a problem with the USB port on the side of the camera, and I took it back to the store and traded it for a new one. This camera also had a problem too, after about two years, the button on the back that is needed for making settings stopped working properly.But still, considering the cost of the camera and the quality of the pictures, I will be buying another one. It's worth it.</review_text>
This camera is great for photographing artwork. It's the only camera I could find that doesn't bow the edges of paintings or watercolors (I think a lot of cameras have a lens that distors things, but you can't tell until you photograph something that is supposed to be rectangular).The color reproduction is also good.If you want a camera that takes good pictures of distant objects, or one with higher than 2mp resolution, look for another camera.</review_text>
This camera is designed to be an entry-level snapshot camera and it is very good at being just that.  It takes decent photos and is very easy to use.  As other reviewers have indicated, it does tend to chew through the batteries, but I just buy AAs cheap at Sam's and don't worry about it.  It works especially well in outdoor situtions.  It performs less well in low light.  Due to this limitation, it is just about useless as a webcam.  Even with all the lights on in the room, the webcam image is almost totally black.  The flash and the lens are less than an inch apart, so this camera is very prone to redeye.  There is a redeye reduction mode to the flash that works okay, but doesn't totally fix the problem.  All-in-all, for an entry-level camera, the A200 is quite usable.  Just be aware of what it is and don't expect it to do more.</review_text>
I had and tried several digit-cams and can say that you cannot find a better camera for this price.Pros:+ Great value, low price+ Easy handling+ Portability, light weight+ Great Fuji colours, good auto white balance+ Fast shutter response, close to film cameras+ Control over exposure, flash and pre-programmed white balance+ It uses AA's, great battery life+ Changig between images in playback mode doesn't take hours+ Excellent prints from the photosCons:- Images noisier than competition (but they are more expensive also)- Images too much compressed, therefore less detail, no control over jpeg compression (but this is the same with most Fuji models unfortunately)- No control over ISO- Low resolution LCD, too dark in low-light- No optical zoom (but at this price it's ok)- The camera has a cheap feel to it (but again, at this price it's ok)- Weak flash for outdoor night shots, but enough for smaller room shots- Flash recharge time takes a few seconds, camera freezes (but this is the same with most Fuji models unfortunately)- It uses expensive XD-cards- Sluggish zooming and panning in playback mode- No sound in videoI highly recommend this camera for beginners or to those who doesn't want to spend more on a digital camera.I've read many negative reviews due to it's bad photo indoors. Okay, it's not a Canon G3. At first I thought the same, but then set the controls to manual, set the exposure up to the highest value and then shot the picture. The end result was much better than in full auto mode. So my advice is indoors and in low-light set the exposure manually, you'll be glad you did I promise.The colours are well balanced, and the prints come out great, no matter how noisy the images are, you won't notice that on the photo paper.This model is now out of sale, but if you can find a second-hand one at a good price don't be afraid to buy it, it's an excellent buy</review_text>
I got this camera for my 17th birthday last summer, and it's great. As much as I'd love to have a Canon Powershot, it's a bit out of my price range. All the people who think that using the LCD screen runs out the batteries after &quot;2-4 pictures&quot; are lying to you. I bought rechargable batteries from radioshack, and I've taken up to 400 picture without the batteries needing to be changed. This is a good camera with good quality in good lighting. In dark or overcast situations, it can look a bit grainy, but that's easily photoshopped. I recommend that when uploading, plug it into the wall with a digital camera adapter, because uploading sucks all battery power right out. I recommend this for someone who hasn't owned a digital camera before, or for someone that wants good quality at a not-so-crazy price</review_text>
This is a very nice starter camera that is easy to use.  The batteries run out kind of fast, but once I bought rechargeable batteries it solved that problem! Surprising good quality for the small amount of money I paid for it</review_text>
I sold my Nikon stuff for Canon, I was using the Sigma 70-200 f/2.8 which was very nice. When I moved to canon I was going to get the Sigma lens again (shooting soccer) I wasn't having any luck finding a used one reasonably priced.  I researched the Canon 200mm f/2.8 and decided to try it.  I couldn't be happier. The AF is faster and more accurate.  It is very easily hand held(I usually put the Sigma on a monopod) I love this lens</review_text>
There is nothing like a telephoto to bring boats at anchor up close when you're halfway up a mountain. I got a great shot in Tahiti just that way with just this lense and a friend of mine used it on the cover of her romance novel. It's true the lense is heavy. Canon says it weighs 1.7 pounds, but it seems heavier. No matter though, because you won't have to go to the gym if you heft this baby around for awhile, and as a side benifit, you'll get crisper, sharper photos then you would with any other 200mm out there today. Just think of it as body building and photo shooting both at the same time. Also this one won't break your wallet.Serously, this is one darned fine piece of glass, you just simply cannot go wrong with a Canon "L" lense, just can'tJack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
Canon L lenses are known for their great optics and priceyness.  This fast tele is an excellent value.  The only thing that would improve this lens would be the addition of the image stabilizion feature found on a few Canon optics.  Of course, the advantage of large aperature lenses is that you can set a fast shutter speed and still have enough light for a shot.  This lens is surprisingly compact, (as long focal length teles go).  The autofocus is very fast and quiet.  Comes with a hood, too.</review_text>
I got this lens with my 300D (Digital Rebel) kit and have enjoyed it ever since. Solid, durable, reliable, good in most light situations. Lots of success in wide-angle landscape photos. I'm typically using this at the 18mm end and it's produced beautiful images, especially at sunset and indoors with flash. Also very light and small, I just toss it in my bag and I'm set. Pretty decent for close-up stuff as well like flowers, etc. Overall it's a good starter lens if you're getting it with a kit, but you could probably grab it used for $60 I would guess if you're just looking for a good all-around lens</review_text>
I am a portrait professional photographer for over 40 years.  I needed a wide angle lens for weddings and wanted to know the quality of the kit lens.  I did a test using the Rebel XT kit lens and a Canon 16-35mm lens which costs somewhere around $1,500.  I set both cameras at 18mm focal length on a tripod.  I took shots outdoors and indoors.  The images were done exactly the same.  The outdoor shots show objects at infinity as well as 10' away. I made 8x10 prints and showed them to my fellow professional photographers.  Nobody could identify which lens took which.  This is a real world scenario</review_text>
This lens is great for those indoor regular nothing fancy shots.  I recently used mine indoors at a restaurant and the distance or close up range was perfect.</review_text>
Many people think this is the kit lens.  It is not!The numbers do match, but the kit lens is not USM and worth about 1/2 the price.  Go to the Canon web site and take a look at the Lens Chart.  This lens is much faster and has better glass than the kit lens.</review_text>
This is the standard kit lens that comes with the Rebel and 20D. This lens is most definitely built to a budget. And does it ever show! Completely inexcusable is the lack of numbering of ANY kind on the focusing ring. This is VERY frustrating when it comes to taking pictures of distant objects, since you cannot simply set it to infinity. Also, because it goes into macro mode beyond infinity, you cannot simply crank it all the way to one side! Of course, you can always use the autofocus if you wish. But this doesn't work for night photography. In fact, you might as well forget about doing ANY night photography with this lens due to the inability to focus it based on estimation of distance (and the fact that the autofocus doesn't work in the dark).Besides this nagging problem, the lens just is not very sharp. When I first got my Rebel, I was VERY impressed with the pictures it took, since all I had to compare it to were pictures taken by point-and-shoots. But after taking several hundred pictures with it, I find that in most cases, the pictures are VERY much on the soft side. This is a particular problem with distant objects. Even when focused on those distant objects, they never appear really sharp, although objects of intermediate distance (~100ft) seem to be okay. Let's face it. This lens just doesn't have it. Unless you are REALLY hard up for cash, steer clear</review_text>
This lens works really fast. It is a great lens. Captures the color in real depth and detail with my Canon 20D camera</review_text>
I chose to purchase this lens over the standard 18-55 that comes with the kit XT. It functions smoothly and seems to be worth the difference and is definitely an upgrade.</review_text>
Pros: Excellent picture quality, great zoom, nice panoramic feature, SD card, great video and sound quality for a picture camera, the best that you can by for this money and the LCD can rotate in any angle.Cons: Flash does not pop up automatically; just 16mb SD card in the box.PD: this camera size is not a pocket one but the size is good enough to shoot with one hand.Advice: use rechargeable batteries and a large SD card (2 or 4 Gb) cause the video is so good that you will love shooting. Also, must of the times you will need the flash indoor other way you will have bad pics; with flash results will amazed you.</review_text>
I initially had a canon S1IS (just 3MP, 10x optical, CF card) and needed an upgrade for the same as I was visiting Disney, LA.  The S3IS (6 MP, SD card) delivered with gusto with its image stabilization and higher ISO modes. I have a full video and reasonably good snaps of the Disney parade during the evening darkness (switch to highest ISO with the dedicated ISO button) with:1. Amazingly low jerkiness due to the image stabilization. The IS here is of course better than the S1IS.2. The snaps came allright even with the maximum zoom - if there are slight blurs, you can maybe use software like coral to adjust.  As others have said here, yes, a tripod is the best, but who has the time or the patience to set it up.3. Even many of the disney fireworks snaps came out ok in the night mode with the maximum ISO setting - though of course a tripod would have helped in the darkness here, for sure :)4. Best value for price.  In Nov 2006, a nice deal would be getting this camera within 350$ as in Amazon.Two things here:1. I would not be buying a videocam as I had planned earlier, the S3IS vidoes suffice for most situations - sending videos to AFV for instance.2. For the last point, I would recommend waiting for 3-4 months till the 4GB SD cards come into the 50$ range.  But as others have mentioned before, please have at least a 2GB card.  Look in Amazon or in Fry's as I did for 35-40$ deals on 2+ GB cards</review_text>
Am very pleased with all aspects of the camera except one.  I do not like that the viewfinder is no longer operational once you flip open the LCD screen.  Sometimes I like to verify my shot with both</review_text>
Great camera, easy to use after reading the manual.Light, easy to handle. Unfortunately a little pricey</review_text>
This is my second Canon. There is a lot of whistles and bells on this camera that will take time for the novice to figure out. My biggest complaint is trying to remember to take off the lense cap before turning it on. My other cameras did not have the cap. All in all it takes excellent quality photos, so you will not be disappointed</review_text>
Works great as point-and-shoot in auto mode. Camera has just enough advanced features to keep the novice photographer happy for a long time. Battery life is great if you purchase top quality rechargables. A large, at least 1G SD card, should be used. Image stabilization works well. Tripod is necessary if using camera at full zoom</review_text>
This is a great camera for those who need more than a point and shoot but do not want to carry a bag full of lenses.  Also, with a large SD card (1 to 4 GB) this camera will replace your video camera.  One thing to note, when you take pictures while recording video, it stops recording a second or two while it processes your picture.  This is very obvious when watching your video</review_text>
Over the last 50 years, I have purchased four film cameras and five digital cameras. By far, the Canon S3 IS is the best camera I have owned. And most of the cameras I have bought cost more that the S3. I returned recently from a three-week trip to Scandinavia and St. Petersburg, Russia. During the trip, I took almost 2500 photos with the S3. The photo quality was excellent, the camera controls were easy to use, and the camera performance was outstanding. I expect to use the S3 for many years.</review_text>
I bought one when it first came on the market back in May. Half a year and 5,000 pictures later, here are some of my comments:- It is a GREAT digital camera in its own class. By "class" I mean one should not compare it with a dSLR because the S3 is not one. So do not expect it to overcome "shutter lag" easily, although among other DC (digital camera) I have used, shutter lag on S3 is greatly improved--to a degree that I feel comfortable taking photos in very fast pace, e.g., catching flying birds. (However, only good dSLR can completely eliminate shutter lag and S3 is not a dSLR.) One also should not compare the S3 with the "small" point-'n-shoot DCs. S3 is not as small as those--it won't easily slide into your pocket, unless your pocket is relatively big and loose (like mine). But the slightly larger body brings great features none of the small DC can offer.- Big optical zoom (12X) and IS. 12X is GREAT and combined with Canon's Imagine Stabilization, S3 turns into a powerful large zoom camera with superb imagine quality. My recent trips included shooting (with cameras in case you wonder) wild wolf at Yellowstone National Park. And this little S3 came out as the only one that can capture the animals at great distance, along with other "big guns" the professionals carry. The IS feature eliminates hand shake with great effect and I could shoot at 12X with low light and still get quality photos. I also highly recommend the "TC-DC58B Tele Converter Lens" for the S3 (or S2) which gives you another 1.5 zoom that effectively make S3 18X zoom (equivalent to a 600mm lens). Check how much those big telephoto lens cost (close to 10K) ...- Excellent video shooting. Again a feaure one almost never finds on any other DC or dSLR. The S3 takes DVD quality video in stereo sound, not just video clips that most DC can do. This little (almost) pocket-size camera now forces our digital videocam into an early retirement.- Many other great features. However those are more or less standard and one can always try to argue some other DC may have similar or better features. I won't comment on those.In summary, the S3 is a great small-size DC. Its superb lens offers big 12X zoom and IS, two technology of Canon's pride. It also offers DVD video shoot with stereo sound--this feature alone can save you a digital vidoecam.One suggestion--do get a big SD card if you want to shoot video too. I have a 4G SD card and I think 2G is a must. Also battery life is excellent. It uses 4 AA-battery, which seems a lot odd at the beginning. But it comes in handy because as long as you can get AA battery you never worry about power. With typical dSLR, if the battery is out you are done for the day unless you find a power outlet to recharge (and have your charger with you).I do have one small complain. The Menu button at the back of the camera is at the location where my palm presses the body. Sometimes I raise the S3 and I see the menu in viewfinder because my palm has pressed it strong enough to trigger it. Another press is needed and I lost several shots because of this.I have other dSLR with quality lens. But I always take the S3 with me on any trip</review_text>
I highly recommend the Raynox DCR 1540Pro Teleconverter for the Canon S2 instead of the Canon branded one.   Hoya makes a 67mm UV filter for this and both are available at Lensmate.com.   The Canon WC-DC58A wide angle converter however is really good.  Tiffen made a better one but it seems to not be available anymore.By the way, the function that the S2 provides for settings using the lens adaptors and teleconvertors are to adjust for the AutoFocus function of the camera and are necessary unless you wish to try to focus yourself using the manual focus which, in my mind, because of the LCD both in the screen as well as in the viewfinder with a lower resolution than an optical viewfinder, is iffy at best.   Trust the camera.....it really does an excellent job.   One final note, I would recommend using the Focus Bracketing option in lower light situations as the Auto Focus is weak in those situations.</review_text>
Fairly decent.  Produces pictures with optical blur on the edges if you use zoom.  Leaves black semicircle on pictures taken with a flash about 1/5 the way up from the bottom on the picture because the flash isn't tall enough to miss the wide lens.  Other than that.. it does capture a few more degrees.  If you are going to pick this or the telephoto attachment, get this.</review_text>
This lens does exactly what it should. The overall quality is extremely good. Take a look at my photos:- First photo is without the lens- Second photo is with the lens and flash- Third photo is with the lens and without flashThere are a few things to note about the photos:- There is a substantial amount of barrel distortion. This is normal. Try not to have straight lines near the borders of the photo to make it less obvious.- Fringing is exaggerated. You notice fringing (purple or blue tints) along high contrast edges of objects that are near the borders. You can see this on regular shots but is more exaggerated with the wide angle lens.- The lens makes a shadow when using the built-in flash. You can see the shadow in the photo with the flash. In a darker environment, it is very obvious. The external flash is the only way to fix this.A couple details:- You can get an extender that is a nice brushed aluminum here:http://www.lensmateonline.com/S2.html- The camera has a setting (Converter) to indicate that you have the lens attached. It's not obvious what it does but it is indicated by a change in the image stabilization icon so I assume that it affects the way that image stabilization works.Overall, I recommend this lens</review_text>
I had no investment in a DSLR but narrowed my choices to the Canon 30D and the Nikon D200. I had always wanted a Nikon. The D200 is definitely a joy to hold and it did take good pictures (I tried both at a camera store before I bought the 30D). I did a lot of research (more than I care to admit!) and there was no conclusive evidence that one camera had a clear edge over the other. Depending on your specific needs, one camera may be "slightly better" than the other.After trying out both cameras, I was convinced the 30D was as good a fit for my needs as the D200. For "value for money" the 30D was a clear winner over the D200 (I got mine when Canon had the Cash in with Canon promotion going). Also, as a beginner to SLR I found the 30D with its fully automatic and scene modes easy to start out with. I don't expect to use the scene modes or the full auto mode after a week or two. I expect to quickly graduate to the creative control zones. But to use as a family camera, the quick scene modes are very helpful. If you expect to use it more on a professional basis it'd probably not matter.Additionally, when I checked it out at the store, I noticed the Canon 30D focused sharply almost every time. The D200 did not at least a few times. I'd take this with a grain of salt though since it was a brief trial at a store. But I thought I'd share my experience. It may have just been an anomaly with the actual equipment I tried out.Do I still find the Nikon D200 to be a great camera? Absolutely! Do I regret having bought a Canon 30D? Absolutely not! The decision swinger in my case was really the "money factor". I was more than willing to spend up to $300 more for the Nikon D200. But when the difference became $550 it no longer became justifiable for my Christmas gift to myself:-)My purchases included the Canon 30D [...], Canon 17-85mm EF-S IS USM lens [...], and a SanDisk Extreme III 2GB compact flash card [...]I plan to add an external flash to this soon, and will consider eventual lenses after I determine that the camera is a long-term keeper.</review_text>
My 2 year old is really active and my point and shoot camera cannot keep up with him.  And I also don't like the washout look when I uses flash.  So I researched about which SLR will best meet my needs, mainly catching fast action, candid moments and low light photos without flash.  The Canon 30D comes up top on the list.  It has the best high ISO performance in its class (better than Nikon and Sony).  And when I combine the 30D with the fast zoom lens EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS, the result is amazing.  I can stop any action in daylight, capture every candid expression of my 2 yr old with the fast burst mode, and take indoor or night photos without using flash or tripod.  Portraits are also excellent with sharp image and beautifully blurred background (bokeh).  Even the dimly-lit decors of the Disneyland Haunted Mansion came out superb when we went there for the Halloween party at night, without flash or tripod.  This is really an important factor for me to buy this camera, as taking pictures with a tripod is not an option when your subject is an active 2 yr old.  But you will need a good lens to make this work well.  If you use a cheap kit lens, then it will probably not matter which camera you pick.  Remember that these 3 are all very good cameras and the small differences in image quality you see in reviews are apparent only when they use the best prime lens (not the kit lens)and crop the pictures to magnify the details.  The Sony is a very good choice if you are on a budget and don't need low light performance (use flash and save money).  The Nikon has more custom function than Canon, and it is really as good as Canon.  They both have their strength and weakness.  Canon just happens to have slightly better high ISO performance and that suits my need better than Nikon.  To be fair, I should mention that the Nikon D200 tops most reviews as the camera of the year, beating the Canon 30D overall.  But the D200 is a bit too advanced for an amateur like me, better suits someone more serious about photography.  The D80 is like a "mini" D200, but slower.  So it really boils down to what you really need and how much you want to spend.  Shooting in low light without flash will need good high ISO performance, a good fast lens (with wide aperture, usually expensive), and image stabilization.  If that's what you want, the Canon 30D with the EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS will not disappoint you</review_text>
I compared a number of pro-sumer cameras and became firmly convinced this was the best camera for the money. Although Nikon at one time was considered the premier camera for the professional, they now take second stage to Canon not only for engineering, but for the quality of the lens, innovative and user-friendly design, and overall quality. I have used the camera for approximately one month and have been delighted. Having talken pictures for over 35 years - including professional - and always using Minolta equipment for all of those years, I am truly enamored with this Canon camera</review_text>
I am so pleased with this camera! There's really nothing negative I can think to say about it! I also own the Cannon XT. I use both for wedding photography as well as family portraits and I am so impressed with the color quality of the D30! Well done CANNON</review_text>
This camera is incredible. I ordered it for my husbands birthday and he is just begining to figure it all out. There are so many great features. One of the best is how quickly you can take digital pictures. Our other digital cameras have a lag time between shots, but not this one. The pictures are crisp and it is easy for even a novice like me to use. I highly recommend this camera if you want to take digital photography to the next level. It is one of the best</review_text>
This can be a very easy to use camera. Simply by using the auto mode and composing your pictures properly you can get very good JPEG images. It also can be about as complicated as you want to make it. It has many advanced features on it. I have been shooting 35mm for about 32 years. My most recent before this one being an Elan II E about 7 years ago. It's still working also. The 30d is my first digital and I absolutely love the camera. I generally work in the aperture priority mode with a tripod at 100 ISO when shooting landscape. But, the camera is very capable in auto mode as well without the tripod. I like to shoot RAW so that I can tweek things a bit, but the JPEG images are very acceptable. It also works extremely well for portraits. It actually is better than the 35mm to me because it has very low noise even at higher ISOs. 1600 looks about like 800 film to me. This is a very good value for the money in my opinion</review_text>
I have had my Canon Eos 30D for about a week and after 500 shutter actuations I am completely addicted to photography.  I bought the 17-85mm Canon lens and it takes phenomenal pics especially using the software and post-processing in RAW.  I also have a 70-300mm lens for sports/outdoors/nature and bursts of 5fps are a beautiful sound.  I bought the Camera through Dell and with rebates currently this is the best deal out there!  Strongly recommend.  Pay the extra $$$ and get this over the Rebel XTI.  You won't be disappointed</review_text>
For those who truly know digital cameras, having more than perhaps 8 megapixels is important only if you plan on blowing your images up to "poster size", or if you are a pro who knows how to use all those pixels. And truthfully, how many of you really plan to do that type of stuff? To say that the Rebel XTi is better than the 30D because it "has more megapixels" and is "smaller" is not the best advice. Any Canon DSLR is going to give you great images, if know how to use it.  For those of you who are trying to decide which camera to buy, you really need to go to a camera store and ask to handle each camera. While you're at it, ask yourself how it feels in your hands.  Is it too bulky?  Is it too small and hard to handle?  Does it have the features you want such as spot metering, which the Rebel XTi does not have? The 30D is a terrific DSLR. It has all the features 99% of us need. There is a reason why it costs more than the Rebel.  The 30D is a better camera overall.</review_text>
I upgraded from the Canon Digital Rebel (grey body) to this because I was ready to take my photography to a new level. One thing I like most about this camera is it's flash compenstation. I purchased the 430ex flash with it because I was tired of having to use the built in flash and always getting those hard shadows on the wall</review_text>
Though I am not qualified to write about the quality of the filters, they seem to be doing the job pretty well. The finish is good and they fit well with the 58 mm Canon lense for my Rebel XT. The lense cap goes right over it so it is doubly protected. The small pouch to hold the three filters is also of big help to keep them safe and easily accessable</review_text>
These are the second set of filters I have purchased and I am absolutely love it.  I have to buy a new set because my other lense is 62mm and these are for 58mm.  It produced outstanding colors and great quality filters.  I would recommend it, and for the price, that's how much you would have to pay for the polarizer filter alone</review_text>
I purchased the filter kit for my Sony Camera. The price is considerably cheaper than Sony's and the quality is great! I'm looking into other items offered at a good price from Opteka</review_text>
Good fit, works as advertised, stores on lens.  Helps keep night dew off the lens as well as unwanted light out during the day</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid petal shaped offers limited protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Being shallow and petal shaped, this type of protection is also limited. Even if the protection is limited, replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing the lens and easier to replace.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 28-135mm f/3.5-5.6 IS EF and normally is not included with the lens when sold new.  Amazon often suggests purchasing one with your lens, and is worth considering.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. This lens itself isn't unusually wide so the extra inch may not be a problem.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood.  Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityReduces lens flare problemsOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the lens</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
I was really pleased with my item!  Amazon shipped in phenomenal packaging!  thanks...</review_text>
Excellent product works well.  Made for the Canon EF28-135mm Lense. Reasonable price</review_text>
I'm still learning to use this camera and all the features. So far it is amazing. I've been taking pictures of the kids and it looks like a pro did the shots. I use the auto mode a lot and it works great. The zoom is amazing. I love that it tells me when I am focused. Also it has great battery life. I'm very happy with this camera</review_text>
This camera has lot of modes that you can use. It has very good resolution and optical zoom. With 12x optical zoom you can click awesome pictures, specially in live performances and sightseeing trips. 5 MP resolution is more than enough, otherwise the pics become just too big to fit in one screenshot. You can also panoramic pictures with it. Another big advantage is that Windows recognized this camera as soon as I connected it using the USB cable that comes with it, transferring pics to PC becomes very simple. The only two complaints are - flash recycling time should have been lesser, and the SD card that comes with it is only 16 MB, which is hardly enough for 7-8 pics. You will have to buy a 512 MB or 1 GB SD card separately. Also, the batteries that come with it are not rechargeable, so you will have to buy charger and batteries as well, which are not so expensive. But these drawbacks are there in S3IS also. Overall, this camera gives very clear pictures and is worth buying if you happen to get it at a decent price.</review_text>
This is a great camera, easy to use, love the quality and even best, got this quick as can be with Amazon PRime.  HIghly recommen</review_text>
When I first got the camera I was nervous about whether or not I'd be able to use & understand it well since I usually buy point & shoot type camera. I was pleasantly surprised on how easy it is to use & all the functions it really has.The pictures are really high quality & the video is crystal clear.The camera's lightweight & perfect to grab on the go or to capture any occasion. I like the design of it & I love the fact that I can get professional looking pictures time & time again...</review_text>
I got this Canon camera back in May for my birthday from my husband. Once I got it home it was very easy to learn and use. I have actually not even used all the features yet...because there are so many. This is my 3rd digital camera and 1st canon...I have to say that I will stick with canon for now on...I use to always like Kodak but canon is much better. I print off the pictures using my Kodak printer and everything still looks great!I love canon so much that I just bought a Canon Camcorder ...and I hope that it is just as nice as their digital cameras.I highly recommend this camera for families...I have used it in live action and after you get the hang of the image stabilizer everything turns out well.....I feel that I will use this camera for a while and when it's time to upgrade to another camera I will stick w/ Canon..</review_text>
I bought the Canon PowerShot S2 IS about a year ago, and have taken about 2,500 photos and about 15 video clips with it. Overall, I am very happy with it, and if I were buying a new camera today, I probably would get the S2 or S3.Things I like about the S2:* Extended zoom (12x). I use it often.* Image stabilization. Particularly helpful when using a high zoom factor, or when shooting in low light with a low ISO setting. It makes handheld shots at slow shutter speeds possible.* Electronic viewfinder means "what you see is what you get", just like an SLR. While not as sharp as an optical viewfinder, the ability to frame the picture without worrying about parallax more than makes up for it. In fact, one advantage over an SLR is that there is no mirror for it to move out of the way, therefore there is no mirror noise when taking a picture; if you turn off the electronic sound effects, it is very quiet indeed (although not completely silent).* The screen moves and rotates. I like that it can be closed (turned in toward the camera) and thus protected from scratches. I have used it folded out and rotated forward in order to see myself in a self-timer photo. I have used it to take "clandestine" pictures--holding the camera down near my waist, I can still see the screen if I rotate it towards me. I have also used it to take pictures while holding the camera above my head--above a crowd, for instance, or over a wall.* Multiple-picture mode. Similar to a motor drive in film cameras, this allows me to take several pictures in quick succession by holding down the shutter release button--about 2 pictures per second. And unlike some cameras, the only limit to the number of pictures is the amount of available memory.* It can be used in all-automatic mode, all-manual mode, or just about any combination in between. Even in near-automatic mode, several exposure settings can be adjusted.* Very good movie mode. It will shoot a VGA-quality picture (640x480) at 30fps. While the results are not as good as my 3-CCD DV video camera, I am much more likely to have this camera with me than the video camera, and I really like the option of taking a reasonably high quality video. I have used it several times.* Stereo microphones. Decent sound for video. Can also be used for adding a sound memo to a still picture (e.g. "this is at such-and-such a place, blah blah blah"), or just for recording sounds unrelated to any picture. I have used this a couple of times to record a "sound memory" of a place; one was at a botanical garden at a spot where the scenery wasn't especially pretty, but the sounds the frogs made were like nothing we had heard before!* Separate buttons for still pictures and movies. Easy to remember which is which.* Manual pop-up flash. Some people don't like that the flash doesn't pop up automatically when needed. I actually like this feature, because often I want to shoot without a flash when the camera thinks I need to use the flash. And of course I can force the flash to fire even in bright daylight when the camera thinks it is not necessary--although for a while I kept forgetting how to turn on that feature on, even though it's pretty obvious (there's a button right next to the flash!).Things I don't like about it:* Poor low-light performance. More precisely, poor performance at high ISO settings. The camera will do fine in low light if you leave the shutter open long enough, or use a flash. But if you kick up the ISO to 200 or 400 (equivalent to a "fast" film) so that you can take indoor shots without a flash, you end up with very noticeable graininess in the pictures. This is my number one disappointment with the camera. However, I don't know of a comparable camera that does better (and from the sample pictures I have seen, the S3 isn't any better; I don't know why they bothered to add an ISO 800 setting--it seems completely useless to me). I know there are cameras that do, but they cost a lot more. I saw pictures taken indoors with a Canon 20D SLR that were phenomenal. But besides the added expense, a camera like that is also bigger and heavier, and therefore less convenient.* The camera is too big for a pocket. I would love to have a camera as capable as this that would fit in my shirt pocket, or at least my coat pocket or a smallish holster. I would take it more places if it wasn't so big.* And yet, at the same time, it's a little too small for my hand. The grip just doesn't feel right. The grip on the 20D felt GREAT! However, it's just about right for a woman's hand--my wife likes it fine.* No filter threads in the standard configuration. A big lens like that is practically begging for fingerprints or scratches. I solved that by adding the conversion lens adapter, which does have filter threads (more about this below).* Lens cap is held on by friction. This is both a pro and a con. It's good because the lens extends when the camera is turned on; if the lens cap is attached the lens will simply push it off. It's bad because the cap could come off when you don't want it to. This is a moot point with the conversion lens adapter, as the standard lens cap will no longer fit.* The default exposure is too bright. Not every review mentions this, but apparently it is fairly common for Canon cameras. Fortunately, this is easily fixed by setting the exposure adjustment (I set mine to -2/3 stop). I haven't figured out how to adjust the exposure for movies, though. I need to look in the manual to see if it's possible!If you buy the S2 (or S3), I'd suggest also considering:* Canon LAH-DC20 Lens Adapter and Hood Set. As I mentioned above, this allows you to add a filter to protect the lens. Currently $37.10 at Amazon.* A 58mm skylight or UV filter to screw on to the lens adapter.* A 58mm lens cap to cover the adapter/filter. Canon's 58mm Snap-On Lens Cap is currently $9.99 at Amazon.* A high-speed SD card, at least 512MB, but 1GB or 2GB would give more space for movies. (I use a SanDisk Ultra II Plus, which has the added benefit of being able to directly plug into a standard USB port without an adapter.)* Rechargeable NiMH batteries. I don't have any yet, but this is the next thing on my list. I've gone through way too many AA batteries!A nice option available for this camera is the TC-DC58B Tele Converter Lens. This gives you a maximum zoom equivalent to 648mm on a 35mm camera. Amazing! I have not purchased it yet because so far the built-in zoom has been sufficient for my needs. There is also the WC-DC58A Wide Converter Lens for taking extra-wide-angle pictures.After you get the camera, you'll probably want a case of some type for it. There are *lots* of cases to choose from. After trying a few and looking at a lot more, I finally settled on the Tamrac Velocity 4. It may or may not be what you need in a case, but there it is FYI</review_text>
Are accessories like the lens converters, the wide angle and long angle lenses, and the filters that I purchased for the Canon Powershot S1 IS compatible with the Canon Powershot S2 IS or the Canon Powershot S3 IS?  I am looking to updgrade, and I want to know what costs I will have other than the camera itself and the memory (since the S1 IS used Compact Flash memory).  Thanks</review_text>
I started looking for the earlier version of this flash and when I saw the upgrades on the 430EX I didn't hesitate to order it. It's what I've needed to take my photos to a higher level. I shoot for two magazines and now instead of taking my studio light into every shoot, I still carry it with me, I use this flash instead and it makes a world of difference</review_text>
I purchased this along with my new Canon 30D DSLR. I mainly use it for fills in outside sunny days, but it has been used to light up the situation. I'm personally still learning about how to best angle the light to get the best outcome, but I don't think it'll take long</review_text>
Excellent addition for Rebel XT.  Tried lower cost generic flash units.  My only regret is that I waited so long to get the 430EX</review_text>
This is a very nice flash unit that integrates well with the PowerShot Pro1 camera.  I appreciate the zooming strobe tube to match the lens focal length as well as the ability to bounce the flash off the ceiling for softer effects.  I should have purchased this flash when I first got the Pro1 camera</review_text>
Does the job and the Canon E-TTL II is a nice feature but I wish they would provide a battery indicator like on the Canon DSLR cameras</review_text>
I am very pleased with this product...Shoots well in all types of different light conditions,even when it is pitch black the 430EX takes a decent shotat close range...430EX adds a deeper color and warmth to pictures inconditions where light is lacking...I am a graphic designer and need great photo'swhen I begin work and the 430EX helps with theprocess of a more clear and colorful photo when shootingwith my Rebel EOS XT Digital Camera...</review_text>
This is a great unit.  Works great for the purpose for which it was made.  I'm going to eventually get the 580 so I can use it as a slave unit (with the wireless option) for a wraparound lighting system.I would recommend a diffuser so that the light can be subdued especially when you wish to brighten the fleshtones of the people in the photo with golden light so they are presented in their best image.  Blue spectrum light does not present us in the best way</review_text>
it works great, there are just two issues.  when you lock it on the hot shoe, it can be very, very difficult to unlock (you twist a wheel to tighten it on) and when the batteries in my camera are low, the camera and the flash start having computer problems and act very strange (i have a cannon digital rebel xt).  other than those towo issues, which in comparison seem very small to me, the flash is fantastic! lightweight and easy to use</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I bought this lens to replace an EF 100-300mm (USM) that we had from my wife's film shooting days (not a common lens to have, apparently; the 75-300mm seems to be more widespread).  That older lens produced some surprisingly good pictures (quite sharp), but handheld shots were hard to get right at long focal lengths.The image stabilization feature of this lens works remarkably well, but it's quite a bit noisier than that of the EF-S 17-85mm IS (my first IS lens; you hardly hear the IS gyrations at all on that one).  The sharpness is quite good (probably a tad better than that of the EF 100-300mm, although it's not a foremost strength of this lens in my opinion). I was surprised by how much faster I can acquire focus with this lens, even though reviews suggested that it still falls short of L-series lenses (see e.g. the "flying gull" shot I uploaded to the "customer images" set).If you want to shoot hand-held at 150mm+, I don't think this lens has much competition under $1000 for Canon EOS users</review_text>
Great company - delivered product on time. Tested out the lens in Mexico, Brazil, and Canada. When the automatic settings on camera (Canon 10D) were selected and pictures were taken outdoors with a lot of daylight, the background is overexposed. This results in things like clouds not being included in the picture. Manual settings and adjustments within the camera will remedy the problem. However, there is an expectation that lens from Canon should take quality pictures from the automatic setting. Otherwise the lens works great</review_text>
This is a terrific lens, my new favorite.  IS is an excellent feature; I wish all my lenses had it.  Even with a 2X Teleconverter on, it is rock steady viewing and shooting. My images are sharp as a tack with great contrast and color.  I'd have to pay three times this much to get any better telephoto images</review_text>
The Canon EF 70-300mm f4-5.6 IS USM telephoto zoom lens replaces the first Image Stabilizer lens of its kind, the Canon 75-300mm f4-5.6 telephoto zoom lens. It offers now up to three - as opposed to two - apertures in image stabilizing mode, as well as slightly wider focal length. The current June 2006 Popular Photography issue has a fine test report on this lens, showing that it is capable of excellent contrast and resolution in the range from 70mm to 200mm; at 300mm, both contrast and resolution decline slightly to very good, but still an excellent result for a zoom lens in this class. It is also fully compatible with Canon's digital SLR cameras (112-480mm equivalent), with improved lens coatings optimised for digital sensors. Without question this is an excellent lens for the Canon photographer interested in excellent nature and landscape photography, without resorting to a sturdy tripod to hold both the camera and lens; thus it is also quite suitable for handhold panning shots at most outdoor sporting events held under good weather conditions</review_text>
This is a good zoo lens.  It is not as heavy or noticeable as something like the 100-400 L lens.  Also, with the 3 stop IS and smaller size and weight this makes a great backup lens to the 100-400 on trips or when I just don't feel like carrying around a 3+ pound lens all day.  So if you don't want to have to deal with the cost or size of an L series lens this is one of the next best options</review_text>
After debating between this and the 70-200 L series I decided to purchase this lens.  I have been pleasantly surprised by the results.  I also own the 17-85 and the 50mm 1.8 lenses and I have found that I have gotten the "most pleasing" results from this lens.  The pictures have been very sharp from my 20D - even in the 200mm - 300mm range.  I've also been happy with the quality of the bokeh.The primary drawback I see is that the AF tends to hunt a fair amount when confronted with low contrast images.  That being said, I used it for some flying bird shooting at the wildlife refuge and was surprised to see how many of the shots were in sharp focus.  However, it was a little bit of all or nothing.  Several shots were also wildly out of focus.  Since the lens is fairly slow to focus, you never know what you're gonna get with such a fast moving object against the distant sky.I had much more consistent results when shooting soccer, softball and football in the park.  The AF speed did not present an issue for any of these activities and the results were excellent.I wish the lens were a little less expensive but I the prints I have gotten from my 13 X 19 printer have been worth the extra money</review_text>
This Canon Lens upholds the tradition of fine products from the Canon line of photographic accessories. It takes very clear, sharp, hand held pictures with the Image Stabilizer capability activated. It negates the necessity of carrying a tripod every time one wants to take long telephoto shots. It should be a must for any serious photographer that wanders the countryside, taking candid pictures, and wants to lighten the load of equipment carried</review_text>
I am lifelong photographer and I purchased this camera in January. I have taken it on several major trips. It is an wonderful performer. I have many 11x14 enlargements that I have received terrific feedback on. The quality of this camera and the Cannon optics will not disappoint. The price is right now that the replacement is out.</review_text>
Wonderful camera. Very flexiable, very versitile. Can be the most wonderful creation device in someone whom is capable. Def a good buy now that the 30D is out.I've had this camera for over a year and I STILL love it</review_text>
Excellent Camera with high end capabilities. Easy to use and intuitive system controls</review_text>
I am just a hobbyist.  This was a big purchase and a big step for me to get into this level of camera.  I still haven't mastered using it yet, and I've had it for a few months.It does a wonderful job of taking pictures.  If you have the right lenses, it can take some of the most beautiful pictures you've ever seen.  Again, I'm just a hobbyist/enthusiast.  I use it to take pictures for work, too.I highly recommend getting a couple of VERY good lenses to go with it.  Don't go with the cheap lenses that Canon, Tamron, Sigma, etc. make for this camera.  Do yourself a favor and get a nice zoom - spend some bucks.  You'll be happy you did.The camera itself is pretty easy to use if you leave it on auto, but that's like buying a race car and never shifting out of first gear.  The auto settings are great, and they do a wonderful job, but you can do so much more if you learn to use the camera in Manual, Av, Tv, or P mode.  It allows you so much more creativity that you'll be amazed at the difference.The 30D came out right before I bought the 20D, and I would probably buy it for the price now, but I'm very happy with my 20D</review_text>
Impressive feature list wih affordable price, for the serious ameteur. i've been using the 20D with 18-55, 50mm 1.8, 35-80, 80-200 and 500/1000mm lenses. i am not disappointed. i am planning to upgrade to the L series lenses but slowly.i do not mean to be over entusiastic about canon, but i am yet to see a Nikon camera with the same specs at the same or ever a near equal price. i've got the FM10 for film photography. i love both my cameras.Impressive features include:Mirror lockupISO 3200 with noise reduction18 custom functionsaccepts the entire series of canon lens.heavy metal body (no cheap plastic feel</review_text>
This camera is amazing, I couldn't have asked for more. Just be warned that the manual is pretty terrible. It's best to just play around with the camera until you figure it out, rather than wasting time trying to decipher the manual</review_text>
My kids are in competitive Tae Kwon Do. I have now used the camera my wife gave me one year ago at several tournaments. It is able to stop action and take great shots even in low lighting. Now, we tried it when we went skiing and it also worked great in the glare conditions of the snow. I bought a monopod that worked real well to stabalize and I use software called PhotoFinale to crop and share the photos.One year into the usage I am still looking forward to each chance I get to play with this "toy".Next options: battery grip, flash diffuser, extra remote flash..</review_text>
I bought this camera about 2 months before my son was born.  I knew little about Digital SLRs, but after research I found that this was the one for me.  This camera is well constructed and durable.  The pictures are excellent.  I have blown a few of my pictures up to 11X17 without any problem.  Also, if you are going to be doing any editing of photos on your computer, this camera would be great.  I would recommend purchasing the newest version of Photoshop or Photoshop elements (when I bought mine it only came with Elements 2.0 and 3.0 was already on the market).  Also, if you want your pictures to turn out, you MUST purchase a larger flash.  The onboard flash is weak, will leave shadows and it does not allow you to do any type of "bounce" flash.  On the whole, this is the best camera I have ever had in my life and it would be great for anyone who has previous experience with SLR cameras.</review_text>
Works well on a normal cameraTried it with adapter on S3 IS and adapter does not fit robustly.Filter is O</review_text>
I was concerned when I ordered this filter about the previous problems reported here.  But, I was in a hurry and needed two of these for vacation.   There was absolutely no problem with the product.  Both filters were sealed and in perfect condition.  Could have been packed a little better in the shipping box, but arrived in good condition.  No problems with photos taken with this product</review_text>
I took a few identical photos with and without this filter, and saw no difference in sharpness nor contrast. So, if you're looking to save damage to your lense, this is the way to go. I like being able  to clean this filter quickly. Otherwize I would spend 10-20 minutes cleaning the lense being so very carefull not to scratch it. Also, it can minimize UV haze... but I havn't compared with/without for that type of situation. (PLEASE COMMENT IF YOU HAVE A DIFFERENT OPINION ... (BRAND)</review_text>
Ordered one in March and its came in fine (not used or abused like others have mentioned).Amazon.com was the retailer.I use it mostly for the lens protection aspect and it works great, in fact I'm ordering another right now</review_text>
I never take my UV filter off of my lens unless I am going to immediately put on a different filter.  There are basically two camps out there, those that feel you should always use a UV filter to protect your lens from dirt and scratches and those that feel it is a waste of time and only degrades your image.  Well, I tried going without one for awhile and then dirt started to build up on the front element of my very expense lens.  And although you can clean the front element of a lens, I feel much, much safer wiping my comparatively cheap UV filter time and time again rather than chancing any actual lens damage.  I think for the nearly unquantifiable loss in image quality you may suffer by having a UV filter on, it is well worth the extra piece of mind it gives me</review_text>
I was looking for a medium range zoom for my D-70s that was reasonably fast and sharp throughout the zoom range. This lens is a first class winner in all areas. It is my first VR lens (vibration resistance) and that alone makes it worth the cost. No more tripods! It is smooth in operation and feels very solid (if not a little heavy) to use. The f/2.8 speed coupled with 8 aperture leaves gives a velvety smooth bokeh (desirable soft blurred background) that makes your subject snap right out of the shot. The len is razor sharp from 70mm to 200mm. If there is any distortion, I haven't seen it. With a lens this long, ghosting might show up if you shoot almost directly into the sun. The huge HB-29 lens hood helps a lot. Again, I have not seen any ghosting yet. This is definately a pro/pro-sumer len and its price tag alone re-enforces that fact. If you can afford it, remember the golden rule...it is the lens that makes the picture not the camera. All the pixels in the world can't make up for a poor lens. If you are ready to play with the big boys, then this belongs in your bag</review_text>
This lens is superb.  It feels like a high quality pro lens (not surprisingly).  The shots are just stunning; fantastic color, razor sharp, beautiful bokeh etc etc.  I initially considered the 18-200(VR) until I saw comments about this lens.  Look into it, from what I can tell there is very little (real) comparison between the two.  I believe you will forget how much you paid as soon as you see the results.  Did I mention this lens is superb....?</review_text>
This lens has so many uses.  Anytime I can position myself where my subject is more than five feet away, this is my lens of choice.  I have the kit 18-70mm that came with the D70 and a 50mm prime (I have the 18-200 VR is on order, and if Nikon can ever get around to catching up with demand, that lens might surpass this one, due to the smaller weight - plus it is a lot cheaper).I took every lens I own with the D70 to the British Museum in London. Shooting handheld in available light (I never used the flash) with many of the Egyptian and Greek artifacts over fifty feet away, I got outstanding results with this lens. The VR technology is amazing.  Having a constant 2.8 aperture was also a major advantage.  I'll grant you my arm felt like a rubber hose after four hours of site seeing, but it was worth it!  I have had similar satisfaction using the lens outdoors for wildlife photography. I have even used the TC-20EII teleconverter with the lens, to shoot hummingbirds at great distance. I would have no reservations about recommending the lens, until Nikon announced the 18-200 VR. This new lens has a much broader focal length on the low end, and focuses much closer (around a foot, compared to five feet for 70-200).  The 18-200 does not provide a constant 2.8 aperture across it's focal length, so the 70-200 would be better at long distances in low light.  But at less than half the price, and I think less than half the size, this new lens clearly will have a premier spot in my bag.  Will it totally replace the 70-200VR?  I'll update my review when I finally get to try the lens on the block. Until then, the 70-200mm VR is the champ</review_text>
This is it.  I upgraded from the Sigma EX f2.8 80-200.  I should have spent the money for the Nikon the first time.  The Sigma is a very nice lens for less, and a good alternative, but if you want it all, go for the Nikon.  Leave your tripod at home when you get this glass.  I don't know how this compares, but I'm shooting hand held with 1/30s shutter at full zoom (35mm equivalent of 300mm).  The VR is phenomenal, the wide aperature delivers beautiful blur, and the overall fit and construction is flawless.  Tack sharp images too</review_text>
I love this lens. This is an excellent complement to my Nikon 28-70 2.8. It is well balanced on D200 and F100 (with MB Grip). Just last weekend used in a Family Wedding. It is really not a lens for casual photography. If you are not willing to tolerate heavy equipment, sincerely, you will take much better pictures with PS digital cameras, as I sometimes do. After all taking pictures is about capturing moments and if this lens will get into your way, it has no use.I personally only prefer fixed 2.8 apertures across the zoom range. This is very important for me since I like to use mostly Aperture Priority especially taking people's pictures. That is why I love this lens. This is a very expensive lens. If VR is not important to you, go with more reasonably priced with almost identical optical qualities Nikon 80-200 2.8. To me VR is very important since I cannot afford to use Tripods when I am moving around and taking pictures of my kids or friends.If you could afford it, it is a great lens that you will never regret. If you cannot afford it just you are thinking on purchasin expensive Camera Body, don't waste your time on camera specs, D70 vs D200 vs D2Xs etc. Buy cheaper camera, but still buy this lens as long as you are willing to carry heavy equipment around and comitted to take pictures with such heavy equipment.Bokeh is amazing, rich contrast, creamy blurring behind a subject with 2.8 is simply delicate and delicious</review_text>
Yes, this lens is already legend, and no, it's not just a bunch of people trying to justify spending a whole lot of cash on a lens. Make no mistake, this lens is BIG and expensive. It's not fitting into your travel bag nor is it at home at a friend's party. For that bring the 18-70mm, 28-200G or just bring a cheaper P&S type camera in case you spill beer on it!The 70-200 VR is a pro level lens that gets almost everything right. It's size is the byproduct of an optical design that really makes few, if any compromises. This lens is SHARP...as sharp as my 50mm prime and sharper wide open that you might believe or expect. On a D70 the focus is lightening fast and quite exact. Color rendition is the best I've seen. I do much less post processing when this baby is on the D70.On the problematic side, this lens is BIG. It's heavy and in the way, though reasonably easy to grasp. I added a Harbortronics portrait grip and the handling/balance is improved. It needs a big bag and focuses down to a bit under 5 feet. While it's a fantastic portrait lens, you need room to get the most out of it. My first shots with this lens put my more experienced lenses to shame. The bokeh, or quality of out-of-focus areas were creamy and pleasing. Subjects had a 3D quality to them.The VR system is exactly what you'd expect. I sat on my couch, framed the text on my DVD player about 8 feet away and shot at F/2.8 ISO 200 for a 1/2 second exposure. At 200mm (300mm on the D70) the image was sharp. Without VR I got a big blur.The real question is: Do you need a 1700 dollar lens?Answer: Only if you want it. The quality is all there at a level that has people talking about this lens like it's magic. I have friends who shoot pro with Canon and Nikon. Even the Canon users say the 70-200VR is the best of it's kind. Sell a kidney and buy one</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well.  The build is solid (metal construction).  The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation.  The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens.</review_text>
Filter works good for general use and protects against some of the light relection. I would purchase it again</review_text>
I buy this UV filter to protect my kit lens(18-55mm), so far so good. I am using a canon rebel xd. If you just want to get a cheap UV to protect your lens, buy this one</review_text>
It is better to save the camera's real lens which can be replaced with this filter being broken than the expensive lens behind it.  This is a real "lens saver"</review_text>
I get at least a UV filter for all my lenses. That's the cheapest insurance you can get for you lense. Protect it from possible scratches and banging against objects. Haven't really seen a major difference between the brand filter and the Tiffen filter. I would just go with the cheapest filter to be found for you lens</review_text>
After overpaying at a fancy camera store, I was happy to purchase an identical filter from amazon for a fraction of the price. These filters give you piece of mind, protection from sand, fingerprints and baby spittle</review_text>
very happy with the quality of the pics but most of it...it's size..it is really really small one...but really powerful for it's size...overall performance is pretty good..had it for a week . everything looks good till now..except for the sd card provided with it..it's practically useless.You can take only 8-9 pics at full resolution.Would definately suggest everyone to buy atleast a 512 mb card but overall i m satisfied with the purchase and Amazon's service is as usual "A" rate</review_text>
I bought this camera about 6 mos. ago for a trip to Europe.  It is great, the photos come out crisp and clear, the optical zoom is great, and there are several manual features, although this is not the camera for those who enjoy extensive custom settings.  For what I wanted, a small poin-and-shoot digital camera, this fits the bill.  There are some areas for improvement that Canon can continue to work on.  While I am glad that they left the viewfinder in this model as the LCD is a bit difficult to see during really sunny days.  Whenever I connect the USB cable to the camera, I am afraid I am going to break off the little cover to the USB port on the camera.  Finally, I know the lithium ion battery enables the case to be smaller, but I really wish I could grab a battery off the shelf in the supermarket</review_text>
This is a very good compact camera, but there are a few things that make some pictures a problem. When shooting in low light conditions there seem to be a lot of problems with the flash, especially if I take pictures of kids. Flash makes the person/object way too light, no matter what kind of flash I use auto/on/red eye etc. If I try not to use the flash, then there is a lot of blur. When outside in the bright sun most images are way too light. I will be very grateful to anyone who knows how to resolve these problems. It can be a little frustrating. I tried every possible setting, but so far no luck</review_text>
I am only giving 4 stars, because i just receive it through mail a couple days ago. So i still haven't get a chance to fully try out everything. But I can tell you this camera is very handy, it's very small that i can throw it in my small purse (my purse usually don't have much room, b/c i would already had so much stuff in it, like my PDA, i-pod, cell phone, wallet, keys, a pack of tissue and et.c) and take it with me to anywhere. I love the design of this camera, it's very cool. Pictures are pretty clear, even the one taking during the nights. Another thing that i love about this camera is that it's not noisy, and it's very quick (i have no patience, so it's good for me that i can snap pictures crazy quickly). Overall, I find this camera pretty good.</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera and it is very easy to use and takes nice pictures.  I bought a case to put it in so I could keep the screen from getting scratched.  Go out and find a generic camera bag that will fit it.  They are so much cheaper than Canon's camera bags.  The only thing about this camera that I would like to change is that I wish it had a battery life indicator.</review_text>
This camera fits easily in my pocket and takes fantastic pictures for an ultra compact. It is easy to use and I have had no problems with it</review_text>
I like Canon's digital camera because it is everything an average person may want. It is light, with great design, works incredibly good and I can make hundreds of pictures. Isn't is a dream come true? Highest recommendation</review_text>
This tripod was a total shock! I was amazed at the quality, stability and portability. The heavy duty denier carrying case is a great bonus. The level and quick release were also a welcome surprise. This was the best $9.00 I ever spent for photography accessories.</review_text>
I have a Nikon D50, and when attaching the camera, the tilting base of the tripod needs a little compensation for the camera weight. Hence, I haven't found any use for the libelle on the tripod. I have to look through the wiev finder to see if my set-up is level or not.Overall though, it's not a big problem, and hey, with the price of the tripod, I'll live with it</review_text>
I have a very small camera (a Canon SD450) and find this tripod to be a perfect match.  It is light and small and easy to carry with the included canvas case. It has a few nice features that I didn't expect (even though I read the text!) like the bubble level on the platform.This product is an excellent value.  However, the shipping cost as much as the tripod.  Of course, that is not the tripod's fault.</review_text>
I really looked hard at the various light (sub-3 lb) tripod options to use with my Canon Powershot S2 IS.  Lighter the better, but I also really wanted a 3-way pan head and all of the little nice extras that I could get: bubble level, quick set-up/tear-down, fits inside of carry-on luggage, good build quality, comes with a bag, good hand crank, etc.It definitely fit the bill perfectly, and was ONLY 2 lbs!  Of course you don't get super strong wind-proof stability at that weight, but I was really quite happy with the overall stability on my recent vacation.  When there was a strong wind, I leaned a bag, backpack, or beach towel around one of the legs and that gave me more piece of mind... but I think it probably would have been fine... especially when not fully extended to max height.Before buying it, the max height was actually my only real concern -- would it be tall enough to take good people pictures/outdoor portraits while I was on my vacation?  My experience says -- Yes, great people shots (and so much better than the typical shot you get by asking a passing by stranger to take a photo for you)!Don't hesitate, just buy this one!</review_text>
I received this tripod for Christmas and I am totally delighted with it!  It comes with a case and is small and light enough for me to carry.  In just a few days use, it has made a difference on my low light level and non-flash photos</review_text>
The previous review is not completely correct. The problem is not with the product but with the description what amazon.com put up for the Canon CPM-E3 Battery Magazine. It is a battery magazine for the Canon Compact Battery Pack CP-E3 and not for the camera battery grip. I think the product itself is a great thing, it lets you switch the whole magazine with 8 preloaded batteries instead replacing the batteries in the Canon Compact Battery Pack CP-E3.The previous reviewer should not judge a product by the incorrect infromation given by a retailer</review_text>
This stuff worth for your small money, useful for your precious cameras</review_text>
It seems unfair to compare this camera to a 10D (or 20D or 30D), either favorably or unfavorably. These instruments are good in their own right, but hardly  are in the same league as the 1DS Mark II. I have used all three of the xxD's, and an original 1ds body as well. It occurs to me that the folks who are interested in shelling out over 5 grand for a camera already have an idea about what they want, and that some of them are asking if they should trade in their 1ds body for a mark ii. It is to them that I am adressing this review. The remarks, I think will help those who have less experience with the line. Bear with me for the technical jargon and the emphais on Mark I vs II comparison. I want to help the buyer to decide if there really is a reason to spend this kind of money.First, regarding resolution: you probably won't be able to tell the difference between Mark I and Mark II unless you are doing studio work. An 8x10 image is virtually indistinguishable. Most of us shoot in .jpg mode, and we don't mess with RAW. If you are doing a 17x20 wedding portrait and are working with uncompressed files, the Mark II is superior. I do outdoor work, so 11.6 megapixels is plenty. Finallyl, the quality of the glass makes a big difference (much more than the sensor resolution), so if you are a little strapped for cash, buy a 5D and spend the difference on "L" series lenses, or a used 1DS (Mark I).Second: Ergonomics. I like the histogram on the Mark II better than the older camera, and appreciate the improved burst performance, and storage times. Small but significant differences. The battery life is way better, and I like that. I can get 700 frames out of a charge in the Mark II and only 200 from the Mark II. Thank you, Canon. Maybe in the next iteration they will do something with the black brick of a charger. I can only hope.Third: Sensor noise. Most ofthe high-end cameras are CMOS now, and each time we look at a new generation of pictures we are wowed by the decrease in sensor noise at high ISO's. I remember that the we praised the Mark I for the low noise up to ASA 400. For the uninitiated, sensor noise is the random firing of a sensor due to quantum effects, and manifests as sparkle or random changes in pixel color. It is more prominent in low light and high ASA. The Mark I is great up to ASA 400, good up to 800 and needs some digital filtering at 1200. The Mark II is really good up to ASA 1600, and with a Photoshop filter is good to 3200. If you shoot in low light, the Mark II is for you.Fourth: Color balance. I always loved the warm, saturated pictures that the Mark I gives, so don't get me wrong - better color rendition is not a reason to sell it for a new model. The Mark II, though, improves on it and gives beautiful color saturation with some improvement in the range of highligts. Digital photo buffs will know what I mean: if you take a picture with broad highlights, like a sky, the foreground objecst will be underexposed. and the highlights clear. Set the exposrue to the foreground, and the sky will be a burnt-out white. The Mark II has improved this much, but it still needs some work by Canon. For now, it helps to have taken a large number of pictures to get an idea as to how to set the exposure.Fifth: Accuracy of the exposure. The Mark I had an annoying tendancy to overexpose by about a stop. I got used to turning down the exposure 1-2 stops, exposing on the highlights, and using Photoshop to correct the exposure. The Mark II is more accurate, and the Manual exposure is close to the metered exposure.Sixth: The FF/1.6 business. I really don't see any reason that a 30D is a better camera because a 50mm lens gives an image analagous an 85mm lens in a full frame camera. Be advised, though, that lens evaluations depend on this distinction. Edge performance and flair may be more obvious on a full frame instrument. Both the 1DS and the 1DS Mark II tend to challenge lenses more because they work the full range of the lens from side to side and through the apertures. My 35-135 IS Canon lens gave great pictures on the 10D, but looks washed out on both of the 1Ds's. Before giving the 1DS Mark II a bum rap for less than perfect pictures, ask what lens was used.Seventh: Price. Presently, a non-grey-market 1DS Mark II sells for around $6899 from reputable dealers. A used Mark I is around half that. I would take a half star away from Canon for the pounding my pocketbook is taking, but I understand that a Mark I was just about the same price when it was released. The price gradient presently would be tolerable for those shooting in low light, or for RAW studio work. Personally, I would buy a Mark I over a 5D for the improved construction.Finally, some general remarks. I would have liked to compare this fine camera to the comparable Nikon. Unfortunately, I cannot, because all my glass is Canon, and I have no money left for a mult-thousand buck purchase of a Nikon. Maybe someone else would write a review.My only beefs with Canon have to do with sensor dust, that seems to appear by spontaneous generation, and the steep learning curve that I had with my first use. (Plan on a night or two reading the manual) I guess I can forgive them for not putting a flash in it. Add a couple of hundred to the price for the purchase of a 580EX. Canon service has been terrific. If you have the bucks, quit complaining about the price and get one if you are a serious photographer. Look at the images in dpreview.com (and the long, thoughtful review there), and at fredmiranda.com - they will leave you breathless. This is a serious instrument for serious photographers and far be it from me to give it less than 5 stars for my petty complaints</review_text>
Ive gotten used to the disposable kodaks i got from the checkout isle at walmart. The problem with those, though, is that they run out of pictures pretty quick. The last straw was when we ran out of film at the family reunion just as cousin billy was about to show us how to catch a lizard with a rubber band and a twinky. At that point I knew I needed an upgrade.I ordered the Canon EOS-1Ds Mark II the next day, for [...] The feature that first caught my attention was the powerful zoom. Now when I take a family picture, I like to step back about a mile or two, then zoom in and snap that high-resolution masterpeice. My wife always complains that i zoom too close into the big pores on her nose, to which i respond by suggesting she use clean and clear pore cleansing strips (watch for her upcoming review of those soon).Another useful feature of this camera is the continuous shooting mode. This is where the camera automatically takes pictures in rapid succession, about 5 per second. The other day I set the camera on the dresser, turned on the macarena, and got wild. I then took the individual pictures and strung them together into an animated flipbook. Now watching myself do the macarena is a mere flip of the book away. Man i can dance.To summarize, you will have a lot of fun with this cam like i did. Definitely worth the [...] ! But remember, there is a [...] that comes with it; so make sure you fill in the item number clearly on the [...] card, and make sure you stay within the space alloted on the form otherwise the [...] wont go through</review_text>
First, the Canon 1Ds Mark II is an awesome professional camera.This review is about the completely misleading Amazon offer of 42% off.  This is the biggest joke imaginable.  The Amazon website shows the list price as $11,999.99.  When Canon launched this camera the MSRP wasn't that high.  It was $7,999.  Methinks someone with a calculator got carried away.Anyway, after adding it to my cart to see the unbelievable low price it turns out its within about $100 of what every other reputable online shop is selling it for.I expected more from Amazon.  This behavior is reprehensible</review_text>
The Canon 1Ds Mark II does not list for $11,999. Body only it lists for around $7,500</review_text>
i think this is the BEST buy anyone can do, is superfast, flexible (50-3200 asa) interchangeble lenses, long last battery, all excellent, the only bad thing is the high price but it worth it, its like having a ferrari, almost you want to keep it at home in case that something bad happens like being stolen or damaged even do that some people say that the big size is an inconvinencie i personally would not like a tiny camera as a professional photographer it woud look ridicoulous, so the size is a good thing also, when people that even dont know the camera are impressed by the stuff it has</review_text>
This camera has the potential for pictures with amazing clarity and colors but not straight out of the camera.I too was disappointed after converting the RAW files with C1 Pro and ACR. Was it possible that my D-Rebel would be better than this monster that gives me neck pains and has made my right arm to start looking like Swartzenegger's arm? Even with L glass the results were dissapointing.The problem is not with the camera but with the workflow. After using it for 2 months I am getting used to a workflow that will give me the results I am looking for. I had to realize that this camera does not perform any processing enhancements in camera because the pros need to do it themselves. Once I got over the fact that I would have to sharpen and saturate colors a lot more than before I was content and have never touched the D-Rebel ever since.PS Beware of the severe neck pains when attaching any L zoom lens. Buy the hand strap or a better neck strap.Some photo samples can be found here:http://www.trekearth.com/members/nbournas/photos</review_text>
I have been shooting digital for four years now mostly with the Kodak DCS cameras(660 through DCSPro). Being a life long Nikon guy it was a big decision to make the switch to Canon and the 1DS MK2. This camera is light years ahead of any Kodak digital slr. I use this camera for studio product, models, location, low light, you name it. The Canon has never produced anything but astounding images for me. All image parameters including sharpness are far superior to any of the old images I have from my Kodak days. Yes it is pricey but if you are working with this camera you will pay for easily long before it's useful days are over.</review_text>
I purchased this camera online one month ago from amazon here[...]And I have taken pictures from Alaska to Florida and in Washington I love how the Mark II captures images IMHO more clearly than any film SLR could ever take.Best Camera I have every use</review_text>
I am a Pro Photographer who formerly used Medium Format. I wanted to get a digital SLR with better than film quality. The EOS 1Ds MK II is it!It is weather/dust resistant (to a point) when combined with Canon's "L" series lenses, and if you own this body, those lenses are a must-have. The controls are easier to master than I first thought. It is fast, no shutter lag and fast write to card. The colors and details in shadow/highlights are amazing! Truly a joy to hold!If you want the best, this is it</review_text>
This hood comes with the 70-200 lens and my local shop didn't stock it.  They said it was a special order part and that it would take a week for it to come in.  I ordered it on a friday, and received it on a Wednesday.  Not bad.  Thanks Amazon</review_text>
This cleaning pen is just as advertised.  I have used it on a daily basis since I got it, and it has never failed to do a great job.  I use this with the VisibleDust Huricane blower, and the combo is unbeatable.  Great value for the price</review_text>
Practical and essential for SLR photography.Specially usefull to carry with your equipment</review_text>
Lens pens don't do a perfect job, but they do a better job than anything thing else I have found.  It is a "must have" product for anyone with a camera!  And the Nikon lens pen has worked well for me</review_text>
I was skeptical when I ordered the pen because I wasn't too sure how clean it would really keep my lens.Last week I traveled through out Mexico and visited some beautiful places, along with seeing a lot of family members. With all these family members around, a few accidently touched my lenses. I decided it would be a perfect time to test my new pen. End Result? PERFECTION! The lenses looked like thru were brand new!I used to carry little paper whipes designed for lenses, but now I use the Nikon Lens Pen and I don't need to worry about carrying whipes and throwing them away</review_text>
I bought this for the convience of keeping my lenses clean durring fast & furious wedding shoots.  It has worked beautifully.  It works great for taking off fingerprints and wiping away dust.</review_text>
I bought this pen for my boyfriend for his new Canon Digital Rebel SLR, but you could use it for almost anything with a lens.  It's got a small brush on one end to swipe away big stuff, and a round felt tip on the other for cleaning smudges.  He finds it very useful and it fits right in hiw camera bag</review_text>
When it comes to cleaning my digital camera lenses, i'm very afraid of damaging something, so this little and cheap product takes away all the fear, and all the dust from my lenses.---Cuando se trata de limpiar los lentes de mi camara, me da mucho miedo que se dae, entonces con este pequeo y barato producto, fuera miedo y fuera polvo</review_text>
Easy, fast and serius tool, for cleaning your optics.  The easy use is discribe in the manual that is very clear to understand.  Cleaning is fast with the Nikon lens pen, cuase it has the necesary to do the job well done, as any profesional tool.  Now I have 2 of them, for my two camera bags.</review_text>
I purchased the Canon Off Camera Shoe Cord to use with the Canon EX 580 for weddings.  I needed the cord to use the flash on a braket to avoid red eye.  It does what it's supposed to. No complaints.</review_text>
Other reviewers have complained about the plastic foot on the flash-bracket end cracking or breaking off. The solution is a metal "sacrificial foot" that screws into the 1/4"-20 threads on the bottom. Bogen/Manfrotto 3298 (BO3298) works perfectly. No Amazon vendor carries it as of this date, but you can find it at bhphotovideo.com. Their listing says it's for Nikon, but it works for the Canon Off Camera Shoe Cord 2 as well</review_text>
I got this cord mainly for Macro work so that I could use long Macro lenses along with my flash without having to deal with the lens shadow in the picture.  It is also very nice to be able to control the direction of the lighting by placing the flash above, below, or beside the subject.  Red eye can also be almost entirely reduced by moving the flash further away from the camera body, so this cord is helpful for portrait work.  It could be a little longer, but the longer it gets the more difficult it would be to pack it small spaces, so all-in-all I think they did a pretty good job.  It works fine, if you want all of your flash's functionally, but don't want it in the hotshoe, this is a good choice</review_text>
This camera cord shoe works well.  However, it  can break relatively easily so I suggest having two at any given time.  Also, the cord length can be too short at times and two long depending on your needs</review_text>
There is not much to say about this, since there were no other alternatives for me. Simply stated, I went for the lowest price I could find.</review_text>
Only problem is I live in Holland and have to have things sent to my daughter in the US and then forwarded since you don't ship overseas. Any hope that may change in the future</review_text>
The Canon 250D and 500D are doublet type close-up lenses which are corrected for chromatic abberation ("achromat"). They offer better performance than the less expensive singlet type lens. I have been happy with the performance of these lenses used on an EF 100mm/2.0, even when used stacked together for higher power (which Canon does not recommend)</review_text>
This was my first digital camera that I have ever bought, and I am completely satisfied with it. Talk abt the resolution or the camera's feature. All of it is packed into one small sleek camera. I recommend this digital camera to everybody. And I would say if I would decided later in future to get another one. I would alwayz go for Canon. They are the best in making Digital Cameras</review_text>
I needed to replace a lost S4oo we had for about a year. Looked at the SD series and thought them too small for comfort. There is such a thing as too thin to handle comfortably. The S500 is, like the S400, just right in size. Big area on back for thumb so you an even one-hand hold it. Try that with any SD. Pictures are excellent for a hand-held. Not Nikon N70 film SLR good, but plenty good enough for any snapshot purpose. Bought one of last new S500's available at NewEgg abd very, very happy with it</review_text>
After owning three other Canon cameras I am through with Canon. All my other cameras were fine. This cameras LCD broke within the first month of normal use. Never dropped! All of my other Digital cameras held up for years. Ive had two powershot s50s 1 lost and 1 stolen. Never had a problem and those were both dropped numbers of times.This is a product defect/design flaw and Canon will not cover it under warranty. $150.00 to get it repaired and It will happen again, or you may start getting the E18 errors. This is a expensive paperweight!Poor design. Very dissapointed. I will never buy another Canon product again</review_text>
This pouch is a Godsend so I bought 2. I use them for my EFS 60-mm and EFS 85-mm Lenses. The base feels firm so the lens sitting inside is protected and won't go anywhere and is made out of a strong naugahide. The pouch itself is thick felt and the rope pulls are made of heavy nylon twine that feels silky in your hand. The whole pouch is well built to protect but can be handled roughly and still protect the contents, your precious lenses</review_text>
I used this SB-600 on my Fuji S3 digital camera for a friend's wedding.  I found that you do need a diffuser (such as an omni bounce), otherwise you get shadows.  And it works great bouncing off the ceiling to fill the whole room. This flash is easy to use, reliable and the batteries didn't die until picture #637. I had no instances of it not going off when I took a picture ever</review_text>
This flash preforms with excellence ! All Nikon products I have are of pro grade. This flash recycles fast and is ready when I need the extra light for fill and main light. I purchased the SB-600 for the D-200 and am very happy with it. I have used it for the last six weddings this year and for shooting action shots of skate boarding compitions.         R.Wolf, Atl.GA</review_text>
I purchased my SB-600 a day before my granddaughter's birthday party at our local skating rink.  With very little time to test the unit prior to the party, I dove right in.  I was amazed at the exposures from very close shots to, believe it or not, the entire length of the skating rink.  The auto-zoom is a really cool feature that changes to match your lense setting from wide to telephoto.  I made about a 150 shots the first time out using NiMH batteries with no significant drain.  At this time, I have found absolutely no negative points.  I may even purchase a couple more and replace my portable Photogenic studio lights</review_text>
This flash is unbelievable, most the time I use the built-in filter because it is so powerful, great value for the money. Just takes some practice getting it adjusted correctly as I said before it really throws the light out there. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED</review_text>
I've been quite satisfied with my Nikon D50 and I've been using the built-in flash occasionally to get evenly lit images and balanced exposed shots.  But the built-in flash just doesn't cut it.  I made the huge mistake of taking pics at my cousin's wedding reception in a huge hall thinking that a tripod, high ISO settings, and the built-in flash will suffice.  I was wrong.  I borrowed a fellow photographer's spare speedlight (SB-600) and when I downloaded the pics to my computer for some fine tuning, I noticed the HUGE difference between the built-in flash.  The speedlight gave me more area to be covered by the flash.  For roughly under $200+, this is quite the bargain.  I'd recommend rechargeable AA batteries.  The recycle time for the flash is FAST.</review_text>
Great flash, all the good qualities of the SB800 but less of the data dump and decision quagmire! It has the built in flash disperser, its lighter than the 800, so unless you're into more info than you need, go with the SB600. Oh, it has a shorter recycle time too.</review_text>
Well priced and works beautifully. No complaints - does exactly what it said on the tin.</review_text>
Finally was able to put some money aside and get a new flash for my D50. I looked at the less expensive Sigma flashes, but in the end I decided to go with the Nikon. I figured I spend the money on the camera, I'm going to get the better flash.Used it the other day and took some great portraits of my daughter. The flash worked like a charm. It is better than the on camera pop-up flash. The pop-up flash comes in handy if you can't or forget to bring the main flash, but it is really nice to have the extra power of the SB-600. If you think your going to do a lot of indoor photography (birthdays, holidays, etc..) this is a great flash.If you have children, the best bet for portrait photos,,, the Nikon D50, Nikkor 50mm 1.8 and the SB-600 flash. Great combination for a very good price.  We haven't had to take the kids to have their pictures taken at a studio. With this set-up, you can take great portraits of your kids in their own environment at a more convenient time that you and the kids decide. And no traveling in nice cloths to worry about</review_text>
I bought this flash for use on my Nikon D200 and it works better than I had hoped. You can fine tune it for your own personal liking and it has more options than I am currently smart enough to use. But don't worry, you don't have to be a super camera geek to get great results right off the bat. This thing has great "reach" as it actually zooms right along with your lens to pinpoint your subject. It's just audible enough to let you know it's doing that. I'm definitely glad I bought this thing. MUCH better than the small pop-up flash</review_text>
This camera looks amazing, not that I will ever have the money for it.I am impressed that this camera was the choice to shoot a feature film! It was used to shoot Tim Burton's Corpse Bride</review_text>
I had been waiting 3 years for any manufacturer to market a camera similar in specification to the Canon EOS1. As exploration Health, Safety & Environment advisor, work takes me to middle of the desert or the oceans. The wait was for 35mm film quality, with speed of picture taking (5 frames per second is barely enough to capture dolphins - hence the 8 + fps of the EOS 1 was desired). There was a parallel wait for an Image Stabilised 28-300 zoom lens.Let's cut the story short. If I want a camera to bring on holiday, it would not be this one - the battery and charger are too heavy and bulky; instead I would choose the EOS20D without hesitation.But having hundreds of failed 35mm film frames I decided not to wait any longer but to buy the EOS1D Mark II because the 1Ds Mark II is not fast enough at 4 frames a second.With 35mm cameras, after a few seconds on the shooting, I would have to run back inside to the cabin (of a ship) to change film. If there is large enough memory card in the EOS1DII, there is no need. This camera is built with seals against the environment (and so does the 28-300mm lens). Instead of being scared of running out of film, now it is easy to keep the shutter button pressed while panning (and hoping) the dolphins do their jumps into the air.With the 28-300mm lens attached, there is no need to change lenses either. Dolphins riding the bow wave of the ship could be captured at 28mm while those further away could be caught with 300mm setting.It is a disappointment that the battery is not LiOn but the older NiMH. But as with any photo gear requiring a battery it is wise to have a spare, whatever the substance. I just wish Canon package a small travel size charger instead of the standard one which is very bulky. It has connections for two batteries (yet it could only charge one following the other) but most people would be happy using one battery while the other one is being charged. You just try to convince some airport officials to let you on the plane with the above kit, binoculars, laptop, mobile phone, GPS.......ext. hard disk....as hand luggage.For work, I am committed and therefore bear the weight and troubles of hauling the hardware. But for holidays, I would choose the EOS20D with built-in flash because who would want to lug around 3 kilos all day plus flash gun and possibly a tripod?The camera gets 4.5 stars but the battery and charger lets it down. Why just 4.5 stars ? One of the beauties I had thought with digital SLR was not having to do anything in processing, just transfer the images to the computer. Wrong. The .jpg straight out of the camera is not sharp enough. Post processing is required. Why ? Why is that necessary when the Canon S60 (which I use for different assignments (with underwater housing)) doesn't need to ? That defeats the point of having a .jpg file at 5.5 Meg when the 1.5 Meg of the S60 looks sharper straight out of the camera ? Still, there is RAW if the standard output is not suficient.Incidentally, the EOS1DsII also produces 5.5 Meg .jpg and those also require post processing. For those of us who are not interested in working longer than necessary (me) 16.7 Million Pixels would seem a bit wasted.I am still waiting for the camera which produces sharp .jpg files in-camera without having to post process, and can shoot at 8+ fps with a sensor size equivalent to 35mm film. Meantime I shall have to learn to shoot with RAW files and post process.Also incidentally, the sensor size of the EOS20D is smaller, which means although itself is lighter than the EOS1D series camera, having to carry around an extrawide lens is not my idea of fun on holiday. The magnification ratio for the EOS1DII is 1.3 whereas the EOS20D is 1.6. This means I could still travel reasonably light (compromise) with the 1DII and 28-135mm IS lens attached. Sure it is possible to use stitching but that is more time spent at the computer and time is precious.Any regrets ? None what-so-ever. It is state of the technology at the moment. Another benefit of using digital is that, it doesn't matter if you had been shooting ISO 100 all day. come the night if you want to shoot the rig with a moon as backdrop, just change to ISO 1600 without having to bother about "pushing2 the film in developing. It's a beauty when an IS L lens is attached. You'd need IS when there is machinery vibrations and the ship is moving with the swell ! Good job Canon. Now you need to shoe horn in a more capable CPU (to process the images in-camera), fit the 1DsII sensor into this one or this motordrive into the 1DsII and you may persuade me to part with more cash.</review_text>
I just upgraded from a 20D, and the speed just blows the 20D out of the way!! Image quality runs about the same for both cameras since they're both 8.2MP, but how the camera gets you those images is simply amazing. Fastest shutter out there, low noise, consistent color, spot metering, multiple spot metering, weather sealing, the list goes on and on!! This camera demands the best glass, but you won't be sorry.If your serious about photography in any field, this camera won't disappoint!! A bit pricey, but believe me, it's worth every penny!!!!See some of my work at (...</review_text>
eos-1d mark II digital this camera  i use two months a little hard  to use because it has a lot of things.i am not a proffecianal  but i liked very muchthe pictures is the best like any camera i had.</review_text>
I'm a recreational photographer, and I love this camera. This is my 7th month with the beast -- since I pre-ordered it early from Amazon by MISTAKE. (Long story)Before buying the 1D Mii, you should know a few things:1. It's easy to overlook the spec that the camera's USB connection is 1.1 not 2.0. This is 40 times slower, and Canon clearly intended the Mark II to be connected via firewire. That said, I occasionally use it with my laptop on the road, which only has a USB connection. It's convenient that the port is there, but my 1GB CF card takes a good half hour to empty.2. By the time you've attached a solid L series or comparable lens to this camera, it weighs enough that lugging it around on your shoulder, even without a camera bag full of tricks, is quite a burden. Also, I was talking to a professional photographer who wouldn't buy the model just because cameras this heavy give her wrist trouble. If you've NEVER held a camera this size in your hand, I recommend borrowing one first or checking our your local camera store, even if you do ultimately buy from Amazon.3. The camera conveniently supports both SD and CF cards. Unfortunately there's no way to copy between the two cards using the camera. It's not a gigantic deal, but there were times I had to wait to get home from a trip to free up the SD card when I didn't have a camera cable, but just an external CF reader.Those are really the only 3 things I wish I'd known before I bought the camera...but would they have affected my purchase? Probably not! As I said, I bought the camera by mistake.  Has it been loads of fun? Definitely. I have prints almost as good as medium format - at 100 times the convenience.</review_text>
I cannot say enough about this camera!  From the moment you pick up the box, you know you have quality.  The construction and materials used is top notched.  Contents of the box can be found elsewhere, so I won't bother with the details.Charging of the battery to full takes 2hrs.  If you have memory on the battery from repeated charges without complete depletion, you can recondition the battery with the included charger.  It just takes 8hrs.  While many lament the fact that no Li-ion battery was included, Canon seems to have anticipated the needs of professionals in the field.One also has the option of being plugged into the AC outlet and not dependent on batteries.Reading the manual takes a bit of time.  The camera has endless customizable functions which can be overwhelming at times.  Not that it should deter you, but one will rarely need all those functions anyway.Using the camera did not seem too difficult.  Many functions need the use of two buttons, which may take some getting used to.  Navigating through the menu was confusing initally, but improved as time goes on.Autofocus speed is responsive and sharp.  Shooting at high ISO's (&#62;1000) had minimal noise.  Looking at some of my pictures taken with 1 fluorescent light in the room and an ISO of 1600, appeared as if a flash was used.  Photos of my black lab was incredible considering the ambient light and high ISO.The camera is always ready to go.  If you are in the manipulating within the depths of the menu heirarchy, and want to suddenly take a shot, just press on the shutter button, compose, focus, and shoot.  Its quick and responsive.  Incredible...!Some may be wondering the sizes of the pictures.  JPEG's have 4 sizes and range from 1 - 2.8 MB; RAW files are 8.4MB.One can take an average of 800 - 1200 shots on a full battery charge--assuming one has the capacity to hold it.Prints on my i9900 are outstanding.Cost is a pretty penny and then some.  Also consider that Amazon is an authorized Canon reseller.  Many of the rebates require that you purchase from an authorized reseller to be eligible for the rebates.  Also, some of the internet deals for the camera are not from authorized resellers.Overall, a very impressive camera.  The cost for many may be prohibitive for many.  The EOS 20D may be a more cost effective alternative, but I do NOT regret my decision one bit</review_text>
This tool transforms my DRebel XT's tiny little viewfinder into a usable one.At it's 1.25x setting it shows a clear picture with 100% coverage of what the viewfinder shows. At 2.5x, the coverage is much less but that setting is very handy for very critical manual focussing jobs.Remember to set your camera's diopter to it's default factory setting. Otherwise, flipping the angle finder between 1.25x and 2.5x magnification requires re-adjustment of the finder's diopter.Another big advantage of this little device is that it gives you the freedom to try exciting angles (hey, they don't call it the Angle Finder for nothing) without breaking your neck.The only minor downside is the initial learning curve in getting adjusted to the image shown by the finder.</review_text>
This is a great tool for those shots where you want to get down low.  Macro work and landscape/waterscape shots near the ground are so much easier with the angle finder on than without.  I have also used it when doing portrait work to get a more flattering angle without having to kneel or stoop over the whole time.Now for the negative.  It fogs up much easier than the normal eyepiece, which makes seeing anything a challenge under some conditions.  And the big one for me, especially with macro work, you loose some light when using the angle finder.  So if you are already working in a low-light situation, this only makes matters worse.But in well-lit conditions where fogging is not an issue and you want to shoot low, this is an amazing accessory, thus the 4 out of 5 stars</review_text>
Hi Canon lover,It is perfect and professional for users who love to capture excellent image. Do not wait longer buy as soon as you can and you will not lose anything.Keep it up and have a wonderful day with Canon products.Best wishes,Appreciation Canon Product</review_text>
This what i discovered when i've used my brand new 1D markIINWell, I have to say that I am truly impressed with this camera. A friend of mine got his about a month ago, so I have played with it a little bit, but since I got mine on thursday, I have really gotten to explore the many features and performance differences beween this camera and the 20D that I upgraded from.Having used a few original 1D cameras, a 1D mark II, the 20D with battery grip and a 5D, the size and weight of this camera really doesnt bother me (I have heard so many people complain about the size and weight before...) I actually really like the feel of the 1D mark II N. There is only a slight difference between the original 1D Mark II's feel and the N, but if you hold them side by side you notice it.The autofocus is absolutely stunning. Having used a 20D for a year and a half, I had forgotten how nice it is to have those 45 highly sensitive autofocus points! As soon as you pick up this camera and hold that shutter button half way down, you realize why this is the #1 choice of many of the best photojournalists.The body construction is the highest quality I have ever seen in a camera, but of course is very similar, if not identical to the other 1D series cameras. Compared to the 20D and 5D though, this thing just feels solid.Another stunning feature is, of course, the speed at which the 1D Mark II N can capture images... 8.5 frames per second! Just as the 1D and 1D Mark II have done for the past few years, this camera holds its own to all other cameras in its class, with 22 frame raw bursts at 8.5 frames per second. I hardly ever shoot jpeg, but i did test it and found the 48 frame buffer to be quite impressive. Packing two 2 gig Sandisk Ultra II cards (a CF and an SD) I have the capacity for about 450 total shots.The screen, of course, is fantastic, and blows any Nikon camera's menu and image review quality out of the water.The 1.3x crop factor is certainly an improvement over the 20D's 1.6x, and the bigger sensor definitely yields better image quality in low light due to the lower signal-to-noise ratio. Overall, color reproduction, metering, exposure and sharpness are all much better than the 20D.since i love wildlife photography I have been able to get 75% more caption information than I ever did with my pervious camerasThe camera performs great in the studio, and images are beautiful, as would be expected. I have yet to make any photographic prints from this camera, but I'm sure they will look stunning.</review_text>
This is an excellent camera!  I purchased mine in Feb. '06 and have used it continually for 2+ months before I decided to write this review.  First, I am an avid amateur photographer, and I wondered if this camera would be worth the expense, for a non-pro.  I've found that I do not regret this purchase in any way.  I researched it for several months and even bought the Digital Rebel XT first, thinking I'd rather not spend so much for a camera (I like the Rebel XT and it is a fun back up camera)....and I was confused as to which camera to choose.  Most official reviewers either did not review it, because there was not "much" difference btw. it and the ID Mark II or simply said that if you wanted to shoot sports or fast action, then the 1D Mark II N was the way to go.  I don't shoot those...I'm a wedding/portrait person.  However, I do also shoot landscapes and fast moving animals as well and wanted the weather proofing and speed that comes with the Mark II N.  So choosing between the 5 D, the (at the time) upcoming 30D and the 1D Mark II N was very difficult.One pro review site said that the Mark II N was a needless upgrade to the Mark II.  I found that an odd remark because Canon changed almost everything that they didn't like in the Mark II.  You can record both in RAW and JPEG at the same time, on different cards.  A 2.5" LCD that can be magnified from any point, to check the sharpness, there is a definite absence of noise in shadowed areas and you do not have to pair this with an L lense to get excellent photos.  Aside from my L lenses, I use the 50mm 1.4, the 70-300 DO and the 85mm 1.8 with excellent image quality across the board.I am a small woman and found that the camera's weight takes some time to get used to.  However, the camera itself is so fast that it compensated any camera shake I might have had, due to the weight, by it's speed.  And, now that I am used to it, I hardly notice it.The multitude of control buttons can be confusing, but if you are used to the 1D Mark II, it's not a difficult switch.  If you are used to the Rebel XT, keep the manual handy for your first few times out.Whether you shoot in JPEG or RAW, the photos manipulate well in photoshop and you don't lose any quality (in my opinion) for not having the 12 megapixels of the 5D (which was 1 of only 2 reasons why I considered the 5D).  Large enlargments (16x20) print up quite excellently and again, you have the speed to NEVER miss a shot.  I've found that in shooting portraits with difficult to shoot subjects (children, pets, someone who DOESN'T want to sit for a portrait but his wife is making him...), SPEED does matter and often it's saved me from a failed shoot!The 1.3x FOV crop factor (vs. the full frame 5D) is definitely a factor to be weighed.  Frankly, I use the 17-40L and get excellent landscape photos.  As wide (at 22mm) as I could ever wish, and not get "fish-eye".  So, I don't find the crop factor to be a personal issue but it was something I had to take into consideration in my choice.  While it limits my 24-70L and my 24-105L to only 31.2mm at wide angle, it gives my 70-300 DO IS that "just enough" extra zoom boost (to 390mm) that I don't have to buy yet another expensive lens.I've been trying to think of the negatives of this camera, in order to give a balanced review.  As I said, initially the weight was an issue as well as learning the controls.  Both were quickly overcome.  The cost is definitely a factor, but especially for anyone who does this for a living, it is definitely worth the $.  I like everything about this camera (and I've gone through several others to get here).  When I don't have it with me, and find myself with my A620 (my "in the purse" emergency camera) I get so frustrated that the A620 won't do anything even close to what I've now come to expect as the standard for all cameras.  So I guess that's the one downside, because it's a large SLR, I don't carry it absolutely (though almost!) everywhere.  However, overall, unless you want to pay close to $7K for the Ds and the extra megapixels, I don't believe there's a better camera on the market.  I realize that while this review doesn't cover all the technical specs (you can get that on either cnet.com or the-digital-picture.com) I hope it helps someone like me who had a really difficult time making the ultimate decision</review_text>
The Canon 1D Mk IIN is the bomb. I opted for this camera over the cheaper and higher megapixel camera, the 5D. It is rare that you need more than 8M pixels and the sharpness and speed of this camera is nothing short of amazing especially when comparing to my other digital slr, the Canon 20D. This is a camera that I will enjoy for many year</review_text>
Very solid camera, but a bit heavy.  Good battery life.  It is a very professional camera</review_text>
Canon has three digital cameras for $2,500+. The 1DS Mark II, the 1D Mark IIN and the relatively new 5D. I chose Canon over Nikon (which I've shot most of my photographic life) because of Canon's more impressive suite of lenses. Here's the decision process I went through. As with most products, it comes down to how you'll use it. All of them have tradeoffs.1. Megapixels. More pixels - with a few caveats - translates into an image that can be enlarged (and cropped more tightly)with less deterioration. The 1DS is the market leader at 16.7MP, the 5D comes in at 12.7MP and the 1D at 8.2MP. If you're a commercial art or magazine photographer the 1DS probably makes sense. If you're a wedding photographer, the 5D is probably the sweet spot. In practice, however, the difference in pixels between these cameras will not make an appreciable difference for most people. At 8.2MP, you can make an 11x17 print at 200 pixels/inch without any enlargement beyond the camera's native resolution. Up to that size, you certainly won't see much difference in prints from the three cameras. That said, the higher megapixels of the other cameras gives you more extreme cropping lattitude.2. Full frame. The 1DS and 5D are full frame - that means the sensor in the camera will capture the view of the scene that you're accustomed to seeing with your 35 mm film camera. The 1D and most digital cameras have what is called a field of view crop factor (FOVCF). For the 1D, it's 1.3X. What that means is that both the viewfinder and the image sensor don't capture everying the lens is "seeing" - it crops the view in a little tighter. The result: your lenses are effectively 1.3X longer. A 70 mm lens becomes a 91 mm lens and so on. Because the camera is effectively "cropping" the edges of the image that the lens produces, it also tends to eliminate the softness or vignetting that appears at the edges of some lenses. Whatever camera you use, what you see in the viewfinder is still what you get, and it doesn't affect the pixel resolution of the image. My 300 mm lens with a 1.4X extender and a 1.3X FOVCF is effectively a 546 mm lens - getting into birding territory. (If you're switching from film to digital, some of your lenses may may no longer fit your needs with the FOCVF. Your 35 mm lens is no longer really a wide angle at 45 mm.)3. Durability. This was most important to me, though it may not be for someone who doesn't shoot in extreme conditions or expects to replace their camera in two years. Both the 1Ds and 1D sport complete metal bodies, sealed against the weather with a shutter that will last at least 200,000 cycles. The 5D - a very solid camera - is designed for 100,000, is not weather sealed and has more plastic components.4. Weight/size. What a solid, metal body giveth in durability it taketh away in weight. For those who prefer a camera with heft, these have it. For many people, this is a big drawback. The 1DS and 1D are 43 oz., or almost three pounds for just the body, without the big battery. Add the battery and you're at 54 oz. The 5D is just 29 oz. and 31 oz. with battery. The 1DS and 1D, with built-in vertical grips, are also more than 2 inches taller. If you're looking for something less obtrusive and easier to carry around, the 5D is it.5. Speed. There's a reason the 1D is the camera of choice for photojournalists, sports and many bird photographers. It shoots at a smooth 8.5 frames per second, compared to 4 fps for the 1DS and 3 fps for the 5D. For most day-to-day uses, 3 fps is more than adequate. From using both, I'd say the 1D autofocuses a bit faster, too. The 1D has 45 autofocus points, compared to nine for the 5D.6. Price. Give or take a hundred here or there, the 1DS is about $7,200; the 1D about $3,900; and the 5D about $3,000. Price will determine whether you get the 1DS or not. If you can afford it, go for it. Otherwise, other features - or the possiblity of buying more lenses instead of more camera - will make your decision.What did I decide? First, I looked at how I'd use the camera: photojournalism, travel and wildlife photography. The higher FPS was not as important to me as durability and autofocus speed, so either the 1D or 1DS would do. In the end, I decided I'd rather spend the money on lenses that would not be obsolete with the next new and improved camera. (I bought the 300 f/2.8 IS for close to the difference in price.)So, I went with the 1D Mark IIN. If my camera was generating some good cash flow or my wife didn't need a new car, I'd probably have gone with the 1DS. I'm VERY happing with the decision and the camera.For most people and most uses - general portrait, landscape and travel photography - the 5D is probably the way to go. (Or perhaps the next greatest camera that Canon will announce later this year.</review_text>
With a wicked 8.5 frames per second, this is a sports/action/photojournalists dream camera. If you need the speed this is the one. Aimed squarely at sports shooters and photojournalists, Canon has done it. If you are looking for more of a portrait/art/wedding camera get the Canon 5D</review_text>
Can someone make sense of this for me please?  """The smaller the maximum aperture, the smaller and lighter the lens.""" WTF?Anyway... it's an affordable range for those of us in the real world to explore.  It gets 4 stars for price Vs usability for the Joe Soaps and the Jane Does like me out there</review_text>
So this is a great starter lens, it came with my canon body when I got my camera, and I've used it tons.  It is light, smooth, fast to focus, and cheap.  My only problem was the number of times I found myself stepping back because the 35mm end of the zoom wasn't wide enough.  I now carry a 22-55 instead and love that lens (come on Amazon - get it in stock).   If you're on a budget then this lens is great.  If you can afford the little extra go for the 28-80 instead</review_text>
This was my first digital camera. I received it as an anniversary present; My Fiance thankfully has *Great* taste.Anyhow, This particular camera took by far the best photos I have ever seen! The pictures were EXTREMELY crisp.I thought the camera was very user friendly and a lot of fun to use. I used it for 13 months without a single problem. Until it was stolen. :(So now I have decided to upgrade to the Canon SD700. By the way, I have tried out all of my friend's and family's digital cameras just to compare theirs to my canon and not a single one of theirs could compare to the pictures that my canon A520 took...So try it out, you won't be disappointed!!!</review_text>
Since this is my first digital camera, I really can't compair it to others out there.  However, it does everything I need it to do and has more features than I make use of!  I've never had a problem with it</review_text>
I have developed a dimple in my right retina that places a blur in the center of my field of view.  I am right handed so my right eye is my "sighting eye".  this device gives me the clearance to use my left eye to focus and compose my shots.  I love it</review_text>
These are my experiences with the extender mounted to my EOS 10D. I'm currently debating whether or not to buy it for my new 30D, but it looks like I don't want to risk wasting my money. Let me explain:Let me start by saying that the only reason I gave this 2 stars instead of 1 is because it did prevent my nose from smudging the LCD screen. I shoot events at nightclubs a lot, so I'm always (a) running around to get shots, causing me to sweat, which causes a sweaty and oily nose tip and (b) I always show the subjects their photos after I take them, so having a smudgy screen can be kind of annoying. For further clarification, I'm Asian, so my nose is not as defined or long as other ethnicities.I run around a lot when I shoot. So the constant activity eventually led the extender to naturally fall off. I got lucky once, and found it in the general vicinity of where I was, but the second time, I wasn't so lucky. So what did I do? I purchased another one. Not only did I have to purchase the extender, I had to purchase the viewfinder replacement (the piece with the soft rubber) because that was attached to the lost extender. Another 2 weeks in, and again, same problem. I didn't even bother buying any replacements, as by this time, I upgraded to the 30D.If you don't plan on doing a lot of running around, then this piece may be okay for you. However, please take into consideration that this piece also fell off for me while putting my camera back in my Canon Backpack. For some reason, the piece didn't fit tightly with the mount on the camera.Another problem, as most people mentioned, is that images are very noticeably smaller through this extender, so be prepared to have strained eyes if you plan on using your camera all day.I guess I'll check it out at my local camera shop and see how it fits with the 30D; I'll be sure to write another review if the results are different than with the 10D</review_text>
Yep, it extends the eyepiece out a little bit ... which helps those of us with noses not smudge the lcd display ... but it also distorts the view in an annoying way.I use mine on occasion ... but not all the time</review_text>
I purchased this extender so that I could be more comfortable looking through the viewfinder. 5/8ths of an inch doesn't seem like a big difference, but it is enough to put some space between your face and the camera.Having your face pressed against the camera is a good thing, as it helps to stabilize the camera reducing camera shake.  However I find the 20D very uncomfortable without the extender.  My discomfort comes more from how the eyepiece cushion rests on the eye and not so much from a smashed nose.  The extender doesn't prevent the camera from pressing against my nose, although it clearly doesn't press as much.  My face still is in contact with the back of the camera.  The eyepiece cushion feels more comfortable pressed against the eye with the extender in place.To install, you remove the eyepiece cushion from the camera, slip on the extender and then reattach the eyepiece cushion to the extender.The extender does reduce the magnification in the viewfinder, but not enough to be an issue for me.  The extenders can be purchased with your eye glass prescription strength in mind so one doesn't need to wear their glasses when using the camera. This particular extender does not correct vision.This extender stays on my camera at all times.PROS:Gives your nose some breathing room.Adds comfortCONS:Reduces magnification in the viewfinder</review_text>
As an eyeglass wearer, I suffered needlessly for years</review_text>
My take on this lens is that it is an "L" quality optic in a fine, non "L" package. There is nothing else on the market to compete with it (nothing at all), and it produces supurb images. It isn't an f/2.8 lens, but it is close enough for most uses. The competition from Tamron is a full stop slower, not as sharp, and is awful in dim light compared to the Canon 10-22 lens (sorry, Tamron fans, but the Tamron lens isn't even playing in the same ballpark).I use this lens on a 30D body, and I always keep it on hand if I'm doing any indoor, or tight group photography. It is the perfect solution to the perennial problem of not having enough room to capture all the kids at a birthday party in one shot because your back is up against a wall. This lens will just about get your toes into the picture at the widest setting, yet delivers tack sharp, colorful, and contrasty images. The auto focus is spot on, silent, and fast. It is a must have lens for the active amateur, or any pro using a 1.6 crop factor camera. You simply can't beat this lens with anything available on the market today.That beng said, do not try to convince yourself that this will make a good "walkaround" lens. It isn't. Even at max length, it is far too short to live on your camera as a standard lens. You need this lens, even if you don't know it yet, but it should not be your first lens, as it will only be used 15 to 20 percent of the time. At those times, it's performance simply cannot be equaled by any other zoom lens on a 1.6 crop factor camera. You will be amazed by the quality of this lens. It rivals the performance of modern prime lenses, presents a bright viewfinder image, and delivers the goods in tight situations.This is not a casual assessment, nor a Canon "feel good" moment on my part. I developed my first B&W contact prints in 1964, in my own darkroom at the age of 9 (my parents were concerned:)), and have been an avid photographer ever since. Small, medium, and large format cameras and lenses have passed through my hands over the years, and Canon has become my favorite small format brand. Still, Canon builds some trash lenses that should be avoided. The 10-22 USM is not one of them :).Before you go out and buy this lens, you should already own the EF-S 17-55mm IS f/2.8 lens. That is the king of 1.6 crop factor standard lenses, and includes the awesome Canon IS feature. It will end up being mounted on your camera 80% of the time, and keep you smiling after every shoot. Get that lens first. Then, get the 10-22mm lens. Then, let your imagination run wild, and plan on serious telephoto lenses for the future. Trust me or not, the two lenses mentioned above will provide you with photographic tools that will astound you. Get them in your kit as soon as you can afford them.A little warning about either lens.... Some here will argue the point, but with either lens, get a GOOD quality UV filter that is multi-coated on both sides, and built extra thin to avoid vignetting at wide lens settings. A good filter will cost a little less than one hundred Dollars, and can cost up to one hundred forty Dollars. The minimum brand would be Hoya Pro 1 multi coated filters, and the ante goes up from there.Everything else is garbage, including the Canon "sharp cut" filter that costs less than fifty bucks. No kidding, no conjecture. If you use cheap filters, you will never see what your lens can really do. Ever. No doubt that many will respond with claims that their twenty Dollar filter works just fine, but they simply don't know any better, and have never used their expensive equipment to it's full potential. It's akin to a Chevy owner passing judgement on a Mercedes Benz. The Chevy might feel real good, but until you own the Mercedes, you just have no clue.Bottom line.... Make sure that the quality of your filters exceed the quality of your lenses. Yes, at a hundred bucks a pop for a 77mm filter, it hurts, but you will never regret it. Also, Amazon does not stock lens hoods for all non L Canon lenses. The price is stupid high for those hoods, but they make a night and day difference in in picture quality. Whenever you order a non L Canon lens, find a web seller who has the hood in stock, and get it right now. Again, you will never regret owning it.That's it for my review/rant. Buy this lens. Buy the 17-55 IS f/2,8 first. Buy the lens hoods for both. Toss any "kit" lenses that came with the camera in the trash bin (where they belong), and be very happy.</review_text>
This is a great lens for any user, professional or amateur.  This lens offers incredibly wide focal lengths all while giving very impressive/clean results.  A slight distortion is noticeable when shooting at 10mm (16mm cropped) but this is easily correctable with software.  In addition, the very fast and absolutely silent USM is a huge plus.  I highly recommend this lens to anyone wanting great landscapes or great in door/architecture shots (especially realtors)</review_text>
Technical details on this lens can be found in abundance elsewhere, so I'll leave that to the experts and simply say: This is my favorite lens. I love this lens SO much. I have half a dozen other medium to high-end lenses, and this is the one I keep on the camera 90% of the time</review_text>
Many great things have already been said about this lens, and I will support them!My copy delivers outstanding sharpness (nearly on par with my 24-70L) even *wide open* (rare for a wide angle of all but the finest German manufacturers), great color, very little distortion (many objective tests have revealed that it's probably the "best of breed" ultra wide angle), and impressive contrast. Surprisingly, the build quality is not bad: tight fitting mount, damped rings, and no jiggles or rattles.If I were forced to offer a (slight) negative, it would be the bokeh of the lens is somewhat "marbly"...However, when shooting a subject with an OOF area differential high enough to make bokeh a component of the frame, then the subject is likely going to demand far more attention than the bokeh! ;)A fine lens, Canon: definitely worth the premium over the Sigma and Tokina rivals (both of which I sampled before purchasing this optic)</review_text>
I had the Tokina 12-24 f4 and it was a great sharp lens. This Canon focuses faster and is wider. If you're worried about full frame in the future don't be. Just buy this lens and enjoy the ultra wide images. It light, fast and sharp. "L" quality pictures. The build could be better but I don't see any problems down the road.</review_text>
The Canon EF-S 10-22mm f/3.5-4.5 USM SLR Lens for Canon EF-S SLRs (like the 20D and 30D) is a good all round lens though it can be soft at 10mm. It only works with EF-S compatable cameras which presently have 1.6x multipliers so the lens is effectively a 16mm to 35mm. If you need to shoot in cramped spaces, or you shoot lots of interiors and you need a wide angle, and have an EF-S SLR this lens is required equipment</review_text>
I highly recommend this super wide angle lens for anyone wanting to take landscape pictures, buildings or lots of other stuff!It is so different than the standard kit lens (18-55). You won't be sorry when you start learning all the possibilities of the extraordinary lens</review_text>
When digital cameras first came out, I, like many people swore I'd always be loyal to film. Digital could never take the place of film. I'm not convinced that it has replaced film completely. There's still something I love about putting a roll of film in the camera, shooting away, sending the film to be processed, and seeing the results. I also know it's a bit expensive. I know that the argument about quality has always been paramount in the discussion, but digital cameras are improving in this regard, and most manufacturers are assuring users that while the technology will always be improving, we are at a point where a good investment can be made in a digital SLR and it will not be outdated as soon as the buyer purchases the camera. So I figured now is the time to get a digital SLR.I have been a loyal Nikon user for nearly ten years, and have owned the Nikon N60, N70, and N80. My first love was, and still is the N70 (I've been told by the person who sold me the camera he thought I was the only person who loved the N70).  I purchased the N80 only after my N70 cost too much to repair, but I've enjoyed the way my various Nikon cameras have handled all sorts of situations and the fact that they can be as simple to use as a point and shoot if I don't have the time to use specific controls, but it also has options for more creative and artistic purposes. My Nikon cameras have allowed me to capture family moments with ease and majestic landscapes, wildlife shots and all sorts of other things I can't resist to capture forever.I decided to purchase the D70 since it was close to what I've already experienced with Nikon. In many ways it works in a similar way to the N70 and 80, except it's a digital rather than film version. Like the film versions of the midrange Nikon SLR's, it has a dial that allows an automatic setting,  portrait, landscape, sports, close-up, nightscape, and night portrait modes, the ability to select aperture, shutter speed or manual controls. The camera has auto and manual focus abilities. Photos can be as easy or technical as the photographer desires. The controls are easy to use, though it takes practice to be comfortable. On a personal level, the camera has passed the Halloween test, niece's birthday test, and fall foliage in New England test and favorite scenic spots test. The only real difficulty I've had with the camera is trying to capture stained glass windows in a dark setting. Auto focus has not worked at all and I'm not thrilled with the manual focus of these shots, but at this point I'm sure it's the photographer and not the camera.I do have one suggestion for anyone who purchases this camera. The manual is very confusing. It uses all sorts of symbols and can be more of a distraction than anything else. I've had luck with the "Magic Lantern Guides" with my other cameras, but have not as of yet used it for this camera. I did purchase the NIKON D70 FIELD GUIDE (David Busch, Wiley Publishing) which has been helpful. It can be a quick reference for anyone already familiar with Nikon and photography in general but it also provides and introduction for the novice to photography.</review_text>
I've had my D70s for about a year now, haven't regretted it for a second.The controls are laid out logically, with everything to hand. The dual control wheels make adjustments fast and accurate. I personally love the optional grid overlay, I have no excuses for horizons that aren't horizontal. The wireless flash system is great, though you have to buy an SB-600 or SB-800 to get the full benefit. This camera is bigger and heavier than the D50 and D80, which in my opinion is a positive thing.</review_text>
I do weddings, portrait, and outdoor photography and I don't see any reason why I'd ever switch from the D70 (other than the D80 :).  This camera is professional grade at the consumer price point.  Don't be scared by the 6.1 MP.  I print at 20x30 all the time w/ out any problems.  I'd recommend reading Thom Hogans manual</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
This is a quality piece and can take good close-up pictures of still objects.  I was looking for something to capture moving/flying insects, this is not what I needed.  My fault not the lense.</review_text>
I'm looking for a closeup lens for my Canon EOS Rebel XT.  But before buying I wish I can see some pictures taken using this lens</review_text>
This lens does ok at magnifying about 2x max.  On full zoom, the magnification was not as sharp as without the close-up lens</review_text>
This is an excellent add-on close-up lens, not to be confused with the relatively inexpensive 1-2-4 sets sold as aftermarket accessories.  This is a double-element achromatic (color-corrected) lens made by Canon and recommended for lenses in the range of 50-135mm focal length.  It is very sharp and clear with no color fringing.  The "250" indicates the maximum distance to the subject is about 250mm with the main lens focussed at infinity.  The actual lens power is about 4.0 diopters (+4).  It has a 58mm outer thread so you can add a clear filter (UV or Skylight) to protect the lens surface.  I am using it with a Canon A620 and the required adapter, and it produces outstanding pictures with excellent detail and sharpness.</review_text>
I bought the 250D lens to use with my Sony DSC-F717 and it is just wonderful. I can also use it with my Canon G3 because I bought a Canon LADC58B Conversion Lens Adapter (which is required and is inexpensive).I had been hearing a lot of good things about this lens in digital photography forums and I have seen many wonderful examples of its use.I recommend this lens to anyone who wants to make their "macro" photography shine. Get one!Just be clear that there is the 52mm and the 58mm and don't be confused as to which one will fit your camera.Edit:Just a clarification:This one 'is' the "58mm" even though above (on this page) when you click the links "See More Technical Details" and "See all Product Description" it mentions "52mm". This is misleading and confusing. At the very very top of this page it says "58mm". Let me just assure you that this particular one 'is' the "58mm" and 'is not' the "52mm".late edit (Aug 04, 06):Well, it looks as if Amazon finally corrected that misleading info I mentioned just above in my clarification</review_text>
Don't be disappointed because this isn't a lithium ion battery. This battery kicks butt!! It lasted me 3 days of non stop shooting. I started to think that the battery was never going to die! Of course reality set in and had to eventually charge it, but it lasted forever!! The only drawback is that it takes about 2 hours to charge:( Other than that, it will lasts you all day and night</review_text>
This is just a plain sweetheart of a lens.  It covers the useful 18-35 mm range (which is 27-52mm on a Nikon digital SLR, which is a VERY useful range).  This lens costs less than half the price of the (expensive) professional Nikon 17-35, and does almost as nice a job. Sufficiently nice, in fact, that most amateurs will not discern much, if any, difference.   While not built like a tank, I think that the quality of construction on this one is excellent, and more than adequate for enthusiastic amateurs and even some pros.On a Nikon digital SLR, which will use the center portion of this lens (due to the size of the sensor in the SLR) you can expect excellent, even spectacular results.  This is a fabulous lens for landscape and nature shots, portraits, or just plain walking around taking pictures.  Someone who only wanted one lens that was not a telephoto could do much worse than to select this excellent, versatile lens.  This one is great for parties, vacations, and the works.The images I have shot with this lens have all featured superb contrast, are very sharp, and have beautiful color rendition.  There just is not a lot not to like about this lens. I give it 4 stars for overall performance, but 5 stars for value and price/performance.  Some lenses just get it all together and work and become keepers.  This is one of those</review_text>
I got this lens to go wider on a 20D. I wanted to go wider so I got a 5D. Started shooting events with this lens and I learned that the 580ex couldn't give me enough light in the dark. Used the lens during the day. Terrible problems with lensflare. The hood showed up on the edges of pictures (wide). Went back to the 24-70L as my primary lens. When this lens works and circumstances are right, the results are stunning. I'm trying to use two flashes to get the power to use it at night, again terrible flare problems. Whenever it matters I have to go back to the 24-70L. I just don't have all these problems with it.The problems with the 16-35 lens appear at the wide end. At 35 the lens operates well but that's not what I bought the lens for.I love the lens but it's the lens that gives me the most frustration and worry. Wish it had cost less but what can you do</review_text>
I got this lens because I didn't really own anything close to this range except for the kit lens (good but not great and not f/2.8).  I do own a 15mm Canon Fisheye but it does distort quite a bit even on the 20D and I don't like to have to correct in Photoshop each time and I wanted a wide lens.  I wanted something wider, that could capture lots of light (I do allot of ambient and low light photowork) and I wanted something versatile (on a 20D this is really a 24mm to 56mm --- great working range).Pros:1) With the 1.6x crop factor of my 20D this is really a 24 to 56mm lens.  This makes it quite a bit less of a wide angle and more of a midrange lens.  Consequently, it stays on my camera all the time and covers most of my daily needs.  I bought this lens fully expecting it to be 24 to 56 as I wanted it to be multi purpose and at 24mm its still pretty wide.2) I try to avoid flash as much as possible given the type of photography I do and at f/2.8 I can take some great ambient light pictures that I would not be able to do otherwise3) At f/2.8, I can also blow the backgrounds and foregrounds out of focus.  The out of focus areas are gorgeously buttery and the blokeh is very nice given the 7 blades of the shutter.4) The color saturation is like nothing I've ever seen before except with my 70-200mm Canon "L".  I was literally floored at some baby pictures I took where the colors were in two words "mind blowing".  I knew the color would be great but "WOW!" With Photoshop CS2 I can "fake" saturation but its just not quite the same as the color that came out of this lens straight out of the box.  Zero photoshop touchup needed.5) Its sharp!  This lens takes some amazingly sharp pictures into what I would classify as amazing.  I've received numerous positive comments on the sharpness of this lens.  I've tried looking at the edges to see if there's any CA or less sharpness and couldn't really find any.  Maybe on a full size sensor you can tell more but I couldn't really on a 20D.  I do notice that the plane of focus at f/2.8 is narrow (which is good) and I have to make sure that everything I want in focus is.  The blokeh is very buttery at f/2.8.  I like it quite a bit.6) Its built like a tank.  Black metal shell.  Metal EF mount.  Smooth manual focusing.  Sturdy recessed switches.  The red stripe catches the eye of photographers who know....easy to strike up conversations and learn.7) It was surprisingly smaller and lighter than I thought it would be.  About half the size of my 70-200mm Canon "L".  I was expecting it to be bigger and am much happier that it wasn't.  Its on my camera all the time and not a chore to carry around at all.  Unless you're a very petite person.8) Internal focusing.  So the lens size doesn't change in size or turn when focusing.  This is very useful when you put filters on or when you're focusing in close.9) USM Motor.  Its whisper quiet and it focuses super fast.  Faster than my 70-200mm....something I'd expect but wow its fast and silent.10) It focuses pretty close 12 inches or so.  You can get close to your subject.  Its not a macro lens but you can get some dramatic wide angle shots with its close focusing.11) Its TTL2 so works very nice with my 580EX flash.12) EF mount will grow with you.  If you upgrade your camera body to a full frame camera with an EF mount, this lens will fit your new camera and you can continue to enjoy your lens investment.Cons:1) On a 1.6x frame size, it doesn't get into "amazing" wide category but that's not the fault of the lens.  I'm marking this down as a Con but you can take it several ways.  If you want to get ultra-wide on a small frame camera, you won't with this lens (although 24mm is pretty darn wide) and about your only Canon options are the 15mm fisheye which I own and think is a great specialty lens, the 10-22mm EFS Canon, and the 14mm L. The 10-22 I hear is very good but its EFS (and won't fit the full frame cameras - less upgradable I think) and its not an L lens although for a non-L the 10-22 I hear is exceptional.  The 14mm EF L will run you almost as much as this 16-35mm zoom.  The 15mm EF Fisheye is wonderful but it is designed to distort and the distortion is visible on the 20D and even more so on full frame cameras and you need Photoshop to fix. On this 16-35mm L, if you want the f/2.8 and are ok with something like 24-56, then you won't find better for small-sensor cameras.  I'm very glad I got it and, if you already have a full frame camera or upgrade at some point, you can enjoy 16mm "WOW" wide.  I can only imagine the coverage I'd get on a full frame camera.2) The hood is massive...wide but not very deep...so its a shallow hood (It has to be with the wide angle I guess).  I never take it off -- it keeps stray light out and is a secondary protection for the lens.  I have had zero problems with lens flare.3) The front lens element does sink in and out inside the tube (exposed  but the lens case doesn't change in size).  There is no protective filter to protect that front element.  I bought a UV/Haze filter ($26 from Amazon) and I highly recommend you do as well to protect your investment.  With the UV/Haze filter, the lens is very self contained.4) Oh the cost....my oh my.  Expensive as heck.  Cost as much as my camera body --- worth every penny.  If its any consolation, these lenses are very hard to make and they keep their value.  Your camera body might drop in value as new technology arrives but this lens will hold its value if you take care of it.Differences, Notes, Things I've heard:1) I have no experience with non canon lenses so I can't compare but this 16-35 is amazing.2) Compared to other "L" lenses, it holds up and the quality is amazing when it comes to color, performance, lens construction.3) I hear there is some Chromatic Aberation at the edges of these wide lenses (well more than the 70-200mm) but that's to be expected when you're gathering light from such wide angles and focusing it....that's got to be hard.  Wide angles exhibit more CA than long telephotos. On my 16-35mm it wasn't visible to me.  I imagine a Pro's pro might notice care.  Anybody with less stringent requirements than a Pro's pro or extremely saavy person, couldn't even notice or care.  Besides, CA on this lens is orders of magnitude less than almost any other lens.4) I bought directly from Amazon.  Ordered on a Monday got the lens the next day on Tuesday.  Amazing service.  Great store.</review_text>
I shoot with a Canon 20D and have used the Canon EF 28-135mm f/3.5-5.6 IS USM lens as my wide angle option. When preparing for an extended stay in Budapest, I decided it was time to invest in a faster, better quality WA lens. I reviewed the lens lineup at the Canon website and decided on the Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L. As an L lens owner, I was confident this lens would be a great addition to my lens lineup.Being an L lens, this is a serious lens meant for serious photographers. The sturdy construction consists of three aspherical elements and Canon's UD glass which largely eliminate the secondary spectrum. Weather-resistant construction at lens mount, zoom & focus rings and switch panel helps protect the lens from the elements. This lens is not compatible with the 1.4x II and 2x II extenders. The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L lens weighs in at about 1.3 lbs/600g, and accepts 77mm filters or holds gel filters. Be sure to get a good quality UV haze filter to protect the front lens element. Not only do I see this as a good practice, Canon recommends doing so on their site as well.The focus type is the standard twist zoom, and permits for auto or manual focus depending on how the switch is set. In addition, the lens has a USM drive mechanism for optimum AF performance.Included with this lens are the front and rear lens caps, lens hood, soft storage case, and a US one year warranty. The case is a pull string soft case (LZ1319) that can also be purchased separately. The lens hood (EW-83E) is used to reduce lens flare and can protect the front element in certain situations.I have to admit I was disappointed by this lens while in Budapest. I found that for wide angle scenes with the focused subject at a distance, the images were soft. This is precisely the type of images I wanted to use this lens for. Just because this is a fast lens, it doesn't mean I shoot everything at f/2.8 either as some may claim. I have a good understanding of exposure and know how to use the aperture setting to my advantage. It didn't matter what aperture I used, distant subjects were soft in my eyes.I wondered if the lens needed adjusting or calibrating after hearing all the great things people say. I lent the lens to a friend who loved the quality and sharpness while taking close up shots. I then began to wonder if I was doing something wrong. After testing the lens, I've concluded that this is not the lens for distant wide angle shots like suggested on the Canon website. When the subject matter is much closer, like the other side of a room or several feet away, this is an awesomely sharp lens.The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L lens is too different to compare to the Canon EF 28-135mm. The clarity and sharpness is incredible on close-up shots, and the auto-focus is quiet and quick. Even though this lens didn't fit my original purpose, it has found a place in my lens collection. I don't foresee this lens being one of my most used options though. The Canon EF 16-35mm f/2.8L comes at a price, but it is worth every penny when used for its strengths.PROS:Incredible clarity and sharpness on close-up shotsQuiet and quick auto-focusCONS:Heavy and bulky (This should be expected with these types of lenses)Distant subjects come out soft</review_text>
Well, besides a whole bucket full of money, one of them lets you take photos in lower light, okay, that's obvious. The 16-35mm is a bit heavier, but not so you'd notice, unless maybe you were carrying it around all day, without eating and you're a bit over the hill. So why pay the extra money, unless, of course, you do a lot of shooting in the early morning and late evening?Maybe you shouldn't, because I've been doing a lot of photo taking with both, film and digital, and as one would expect from the "L" lenses, the photos are crisp and sharp. In fact I keep I the 17-40 on the camera I carry around all day, you know, the one I might leave on the table in a restaurant when I got to the restroom. It's a lot less money to lose to someone looking for a five finger discount. However, my gal pal Sara and I take a lot of early morning photos. She shoots old houses, and she never, ever goes out without the 16-35mm. She swears by it, loves it, sometimes I think better than me.So there is a difference, I'm the kind of person that could happily live with less expensive lense, Sara is not. However they both deliver gorgeous photos. You can't go wrong if the lense has that red circle around it.Jack Priest, Sailor Home from the Se</review_text>
Having received some Christmas cash, I put it to good use with the purchase of this lens.  It works great with my Digital Rebel and certainly is a fine choice for any of the EOS Canons.  Sure, it is pricey and a little heavy, but if you want a fast, wide-angle zoom lens, there is little else that is equivalent.  The zoom range takes you from wide scenics to excellent indoor flash shots at 35mm (with a Canon Speedlite EX accessory).  The USM focusing motor is quiet and very quick.  Comes with a Canon lens hood.  Don't forget to add a 77mm UV filter to protect the optics full time!</review_text>
We dedicated a thumb drive to use with the digital photo frame that we download our digital pictures to from a computer. Then we simply plug the thumb drive into the USB port of the digital photo frame and follow the menu instructions to select the USB port thumb drive by pushing a couple of buttons on the digital photo frame.  The slide show of the pictures we view from approximately ten feet away have very good resolution.  It's great for family gatherings and have received many positive comments from our guests.</review_text>
This item shows all of your digital photos in bright, vivid colors. Set up a slide show and play directly from a memory card. The frame is light, portable and easy to use. A great companion for your digital camera and is an excellent way to show off your pictures to friends and family. Just pop in the memory card from your digital camera and your ready to show off all of your precious memories.Features* Bright 5.6" Active Color Screen* Auto Start Slide show function* Supports Photos up to 12M pixels* Includes AC Adapter and Quick Start Guide* No Computer Required, plays directly from memory cards* Brilliant Color Display with adjustable contrast and brightness* Automatic Slide show, Full-Screen Browse, and Thumbnail Browse Display modes* Compatible with major memory cards (CF/SD/MD/MMC and MemoryStick</review_text>
Excellent product. Easy to get it started. Great features, clear pictures.  Everyone that sees it wants it</review_text>
The Digital Photo Frame was easy to use and the software was excellent. I gave the item as a 50th birthday gift and set it up at a very large party. The frame showed a slide show of about 65 pictures and became a focal point for the guests. Everyone spent time looking at the pictures of the family from throughout the 50 years. Many asked where to get the frame. It was a hit and it worked as described</review_text>
The picture quality is better than I expected.  You still can't see the picture from the sides, but straight on it's good.  The interface to load my pictures was very simple.  I would like to have a few more options available, but for simplicity purposes, it works great</review_text>
I almost didn't buy this camera simply because of the plastic body (I'm used to a Praktica MTL3 film camera, which is built like a tank).  However, I'm glad I overlooked that because the camera is top-notch in terms of robust features and the quality it provides.  Startup time is very quick and making adjustments to shutter speed and aperture is intuitive.If you get the bundle with the kit lens, I highly recommend complimenting it with the very affordable Canon EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens, especially if you are a big fan of DOF and do a lot of available-light / low-light photography.</review_text>
I am 67 years old and started out in photography as a kid with a contact printer and a box camera. I have had all types of cameras over the years, mostly 35mm film Canon slr's. I too bought all sorts of these 5-7 MP point and shoot digital cameras before returning to my true love, SLR's. I have had my digital Canon Rebel XT about a month now and I can't keep my hands off of it. It lacks nothing. Although the kit lense is good, I bought a 28-135 Canon zoom lense with image stabilizion and have produced stunning photo's with it. I love the way you can use the 7 points to focus, I mainly use only the center point with focus lock and never get an out of focus picture. I guess the nicest thing for me is that I now don't have the urge to buy every point and shoot camera that is paraded out on QVC or HSN that has a "wonderful" new feature like "low light or non-shake." This Canon has every good feature in the known universe and you can't outgrow it. Its a camera that will let you be as good as you can be, it won't hold you back. The battery life is great, the built in flash is good but I bought a 430EX and that's even better. I never figure I'm wasting money buying accessories for this camera as it will be my main squeeze for many years to come. I always missed my 35mm Canon slr's and now feel that I have an old friend back again, only much much better. Believe me, you can't go wrong getting this camera, its beyond description...</review_text>
This Camera is excellent one!! really when you compare its price and its results and the level of quality you get  you will know why this is the best in its category, I'm getting a very professional results using it with a lot of styles.. Highly recommended</review_text>
I love the new digital Canon. The only problem is it's not nearly as tough as it's film twin.  I had the camera less than a month when the pop-up flash quit working.  The Canon people have been great, and very helpful, but I'd rather not have had to send a brand new camera back to the factory.  The photos, however, are wonderful.  Film quality for the most part - printable and enlargable.  (It would probably be better to use the camera with a tripod when using the 300mm telephoto but I hike with it, so just remember to steady it before taking wildlife photos.</review_text>
It is extremely easy to use.  Hard to figure out the menu, but once that is done there is no problem. Takes beautiful pictures.  Great for action shots as well.  Seldom find a blurry photo as it has a stabelizer built in</review_text>
When I bought this camera the sales people tried to get me to buy another battery.  They said the one that came with it would only be good for about 20 minutes.  Now I have bought alot of items in my lifetime, a 20 min battery on a camera just doesnt seem like a very good "business" choice.  So I said no.  So I got the camera, charged the battery until the light went green (which sucked because I wanted to play with it right when i got it) and started taking pictures (oh I also got a 2G CF) worked great....so I planned to go up a mountain and take soem scenery shots.  Keeping in mind what the sales person had told me I pocketed the charger just incase.  Well, 6000', 300 pictures, and 5 hours later the camera is still running strong, still have 200 shots left for the trip home, battery life indicator hasnt budged off of the full button.  So all in all, I think the battery life is great, now i can see if your taking say thousands of pictures all in a row you may need another but for just going on a trip and shooting a few pictures at every stop point, the original will work fine.  as for the quality of photos.....i love them</review_text>
I'm really impressed, I bought the SD-110 a year ago as a quick small digital for trips. I was never planning to take it diving. The housing is really impressive, I've done 4 dives in the month I have had the waterproof case (WP-DC10) and it works great.I was so excited to try it out I went in the water with a full memory card. I got down to about 35ft and took my first picture and "Memory card full". It was easy to navigate all the buttons and I was able to delete while following my buddy. Taking pictures of fast moving fish doesn't work out and the range of the flash is 1-3ft.  My deepest dive so far was 109ft off the Monterey coast, and I worked as if it were in 10ft of water</review_text>
If you swim in the ocean, lake, or just like to be around water and want to take pictures, this is the thing to have, it's worth every penny!! The only thing you can't do when it is in the case is upload pictures to your computer, change out memory cards and charge the battery. It is truly amazing. I've had my eye on this for a very long time and with a cruise coming up I knew I had to get it. I'm a snorkeling enthusist and this is definatly the thing to have. Instead of those silly disposable cameras that limit you to only 27 pictures, and you haven't got a clue of exactly what you've taken a picture of, you can take as many as your memory card will allow you. There is also a filter for the flash you can slide into place to help dispurse the light to get that ideal picture underwater!</review_text>
I bought the SD110 camera, and since I live in Hawaii, I HAD to have the underwater housing for it.  This housing is great, because it allows you to use all the function buttons while the camera is protected in the housing.You can power up the camera, shoot, zoom, change modes and do everything but change the battery, change the memory card and upload your pics onto a computer while the camera is sealed up.I was able to take lots and lots of underwater and surf pictures and movies with this camera.  And I was very happy with the results.I treat my gear pretty rough, I was in the water almost every day, not cleaning it all the time and although the housing did get scratched and a little banged up, it still worked great, and it didn't affect the quality of my photos.Then one day while rescuing a swimmer in distress, the camera was knocked off my kayak into the ocean.  I went back a few minutes later to search for it.  But was unable to find it....I was really bummed.Four months later, a friend of a friend is diving in the same area that I lost the camera, and saw something wedged in the reef, encrusted with coral and alge.  He pulled it out and took it back up on the boat-it was a digital camera in the housing.  When he opened up the housing and took out the camera.....it powered right up !!!!So he took a few shots on the boat and then took the camera home.  He showed it to his friend, and they flipped through the pictures as he told him the story of finding it.  One of the pictures that I had taken on the day I lost it, was an underwater self portrait.  When my friend saw that: he knew who's camera it was !!!So he calls me...and tells me the story.  I was amazed.  We figured that the camera and housing had been lying on the bottom for four months in over twenty feet of water, and there had been a few storms that had produced some very large surf in that area, so it had likely taken a beating.  But it still maintained its water tight integrity.  We were all very amazed at how durable it turned out to be !!I had already replaced the camera with the Canon S500 and it's dedicated housing (mostly so I could get higher resolution photos).  After uploading the photos onto my computer, I let the guy who found it keep it.  He has cleaned up the housing, and it stays still water tight, the only thing wrong with it (besides a little surface crud on the exterior of the casing), is that a few of the buttons are jammed and so they do not work (the zoom, shutter and power buttons are fine).  But not bad at all for a camera that had been on the bottom of the ocean for several months</review_text>
Having recently picked up the hobby of digital photography I was not aware of the nuances and the importance of some of the accessories.  Back in "the day" when shooting 35mm film I could barely afford the cost of processing - let alone what I thought were fancy accessories.  Well - some reading and a trip to Alaska with my Canon Digital Rebel XT - I learned, and appreciate, the importance of a lens hood.  I bought a rubber lens hood (not lens specific) at a local camera store that was totally unacceptable - then bought the lens hood for my Canon lens from Amazon.  It works great - no flare - no vignetting - and it makes the lens look pretty cool too! I would suggest having a hood for all your lenses and never shooting without - along with the obvious - it saves the front of the lens from bumping damage which is important with longer lenses or tight quarters like shooting on a photo excursion boat full of other people all jockeying for a shot!  Amazon service and prices - as usual - were fantastic and although I HATE to wait for things - I am usually happy I do when I order from here.  Happy snapping!!</review_text>
The lens hood performs as it should by limiting stray light but it is a little sloppy and comes off easily if bumped. It is easy to attach and reverses quickly for easy storage. Pretty much a no brainer but for the money I'd like a little better fit</review_text>
Easily snaps in place and does the job.  Considerably less expensive than the local retail outlet - and delivery was quick as well</review_text>
Nice hood. It's designed for the Canon EF-S 17-85mm lens and therefore does what it's supposed to.</review_text>
when the hood is reversed on the lens, it blocks the zoom ring tremendously when at 17mm's.  it's not the end of the world, but you're probably better off storing this in a bag, and not on the lens itself when not in use</review_text>
The 10D is an outstanding digital camera. I have been using both of mine for over a year now and they have done everything I needed, when I needed it, wthout a single flaw. I really use the 10D. I have taken over 30,000 pictures with it. I use the optional 2 battery Bg-Ed on the 10D which gives me an easy 400 pictures. The 17-40 Canon Zoom Lens  has worked spotlessly as well. Pictures are crisp. Easy manual focus and the auto focus works well even in low light. I like the solid feel of the 10D, especially with the 2 battery pack, and 550EX flash. I shoot exclusively on manual mode so I can't comment on the other settings. Adjusting the flash output, ISO etc are all easy and quick. I have found this to be a very intuitive camera. The viewing screen on the back of the camera is clear and gives me good feedback for adjusting my flashes or hot lights.  I use Lexar 1GB CompactFlash cards. And I carry an Epson P-2000 Multimedia Storage Viewer for my back up.  The only drawback that I have found has been with a couple of my women friends who have found it a bit heavy. I have not only gotten use to its weight but have come to really appreciate the "feel" of the camera. I can tell you that I will NEVER use film again. With an Epson Photo 2200 printer, iPhoto and my own digital darkroom thanks to Photoshop CS I have everything I need right here at home. For downloading the pictures to my MacIntosh G4 or Powerbook I use a firewire SanDisk Reader. It too works perfectly. So if you don't need the increased megapixal of the 20D I would suggest you consider the 10D. One great camera.</review_text>
The controls are a little complicated to get used to, especially the all-manual settings -- which should by definition be easy to use -- but overall this camera is very rugged and very capable.  After I bought it, I took the D10 to Budapest, Hungary.  I had a great view of the Danube and set my camera up for night shots.  It did a brilliant job.  How about this:  take a digital night shot (use the largest image size possible), use a 300mm lense and blow the results up to 24x30 through Shutterfly.com. Image remained amazingly sharp. Colors were fantastic.  The camera made it easy to look like a pro. The only gripe I have with this camera is that I wish it had a black and white setting like other less expensive Canon digitals, but this can be overcome with software so it's not a huge issue.  The price is great, it has a magnesium body (vs. the Rebel's plastic body).  You get a lot of the D1/D20/D30, without the cost</review_text>
Since there are tons of rave reviews about the features of this camera, I won't bother you with the details. Instead, I will tell you about the one HUGE letdown of this camera and the likes (Rebel, 20D): the 1.6x focal length factor. This means my dear 28-105 lens is now a sorry 45-170. To recoup the loss I'd have to spend $700 on a 17-40 4.0 lens. This is a consequence of using a small CCD. Cameras like the 1D with full-size 35mm CCD sell for over $4,000. I cannot wait for that price to go down. I also cannot help to wonder whether the focal reading of the Speedlite flashes will be correct (I own a 540EZ and discovered with dismay that it doesn't work in these cameras).I look at my A2 (still infatuated with it) and I wonder if I did the right thing. I think I will keep it around for a while, just in case..</review_text>
This is one of the four cameras, the only digital camera, I used to learn portrait photography.  The class was on how to take portraits not how to use the camera. I wanted to graduate from the point and shoot but had to consider my budget because I wanted an SLR film camera also.  I got the Canon Rebel Ti packed with two lenses. It made sense to me to purchase a Canon digital to interchange lenses. My original choice was the Canon Digital Rebel, however, in my  WEB search, I found the EOS 10D for $750 with no catch.  There were no required additional purchases scam when I called.  This allowed me to spend the extra money I would have spent on the camera on accessories.Since it's digital, I am not shy about trying out the features.     When I first got the camera, some of the photos were dark or very light. After tinkering around and learning what the sensor-indicators means I don't get that anymore.The 10D is more camera than I need that I'm sure I will have it for a long time.</review_text>
I've used the Canon EOS 10D for 5 months now and I'm absolutely thrilled with it. The EOS cameras are extremely comfortable to hold and handle. In auto mode, the camera produces correctly exposed, sharp photos. Unlike my Canon Powershot, the camera takes the picture with very little delay after depressing the shutter button.In the creative zones, you can set aperture priority to take, for example, selective focus shots, or use shutter speed priority and set a slow shutter speed to take some good blurring shots.The auto focus is quick and accurate, though how much of that is the camera and how much is the lens I do not know. I never use the manual focus mode. The pop-up flash works great for lighting subject that are in shadows or back lit.I now find it a bit frustrating to use my film camera; I'm addicted to viewing my shots on the spot.I have a Canon EOS A2 film camera that I purchased in 1995. Since I'm familiar with the EOS system and have Canon system lenses, I chose the 10D over the similarly priced Nikon prosumer digital camera.I like my Canon cameras so well that I bought the Canon digital Elf for my sister and the Canon Powershot A80 for my mother. Both have reportedly been excellent cameras.With the 10D, I've used a Canon 50mm/compact macro, a Tamron 28-200mm and a Canon 15mm fisheye lens. Because of the difference in the way a film camera and this digital camera operate, you multiply the focal length of the lens by 1.6 to figure the effective focal length when used with a digital camera. So, for example, the 15mm fisheye lens is effectively a 24mm lens on the 10D.I bought a 1 gig IMB microdrive storage card and that allows me to take 400 high res jpg or about 160 raw format files. If you shoot in auto mode, the camera will only capture in jpg format. If you shoot in manual mode, you can select jpg or raw format.If shooting raw format, ensure you have a software program, such as Photoshop CS, that will open raw files. And know that not all developing and printing shops will accept raw format. But many of the image libraries will ONLY accept raw files (or a high resolution tif scanned from a slide).With the raw format files, I've found that many of my shots require a bit of exposure adjustment, but this is simply a matter of moving a slider bar in Photoshop CS. When you first open a raw file, you get an adjustment window allowing you to play with exposure, tint, saturation, white balance and more. You can even simulate warmup filters and such. Very cool stuff!I bought an extra battery to take along on trips. One battery typically lasts me for 2 days of shooting, as long as I don't do much reviewing of my shots through the camera monitor.Unless you need the quality of the 1Ds immediately I would recommend getting the 10D because technology is moving so fast that the quality of the 1Ds will be available for the current price of the 10D in the near future</review_text>
This camera is everything I desired in a digital camera and so much more.  While other kids played baseball and football I grew up with a Pentax MX strapped around my neck.  Photography was and is my passion.  This camera allows me the expression I always dreamed of.  Combined with Adobe Photoshop, this is the best camera/darkroom setup I've ever worked with</review_text>
I had this camera for years before it was stolen and I replaced it with a digital Canon SLR.  I am still amazed at the abuse I put my Rebel 2000 through.  It has a nice light body, a great auto feature, and easy-enough to use manual functions.  And because of the popularity (and rightly so) of digital these days, you can pick one up for a fantastic price, even brand spanking new</review_text>
I have had this camera for about 4 yrs now - I take it on all my business travels.Whenever I get a chance to go out on on the weekends, I take this camera and my Sony camcorder in my backpack, roam the streets of the new city and shoot pictures.  The pictures that I shoot from this camera are just awesome - no matter whatever experiment I do with it.Most useful features:1. Aperture control with Depth of field preview- Lets to focus the foreground and blur the background2. Shutter speed control upto infinity- Lets you control the amount of time for which the shutter can be kept open3. It is pretty rugged, dont try dropping it :) I have used it to shoot pics from 'Maid of the mist' in Niagara falls and I almost thought that I was going to lose it.  But it worked liked a charmNegatives- Bulky, but you will get used to it, it always gets attention- Cost of developing film - What I do these days is to just get the photos on a CD, then develop only those photographs that are good.Why is this camera better than a Digital Camera ?- If you are spending $200 on a Digital Camera, I feel that the SLR is way far too ahead of any Digital camera in that price range- If you are spending $1000 on a Digital Camera, a Digital SLRs are very mature today - worth buying.Ideally, I would buy this SLR, take this whenever I really want to take good photographs, then I would also want to have a $100 Kodak Digital Camera for casual shots.  This would mean an ideal combination.If you are buying this SLR, you can also consider buying a Film/Photo scanners (available for less than $150 now) - which lets you scan the negatives/positives without even going for a cheap CD print.  From the reviews what I read on amazon, these scanners must be amazing</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife for Christmas 04' I thought I ordered it too late for it to arrive on time for Christmas, but these people are great! they got it to me on time and we love this camera we use it all the time - we have several accs. item for it and the quality of the picture are wonderful . Thanks Mark Christian</review_text>
I started off with a fully manual camera that I used for my photography classes a few years ago.  Once I was ready to upgrade, I came across this camera and fell in love with it.  There are enough manual settings to keep me challenged, but the easy automatic settings make this camera perfect for all of my everyday shots.I have taken wonderful, professional quality shots without even changing the settings, and my 14 year old sister found the camera easy to use even though she has almost no knowledge of cameras.  This camera is great for photographers in all stages and learning levels, because the pictures turn out great every time and it has enough range to get a great shot no matter what mode you use it in.I really don't think I could ever say enough about this camera to acurately describe it, so my best advice is GO OUT AND GET ONE!  You will not regret it</review_text>
This is the first SLR camera that I have ever owned.  I bought it because I was going on a trip around the world, wanted a nice camera, and had it recommended by a camera shop owner.   It is extremely easy to use, so easy that I could hand the camera to someone in one of the countries I visited, point to the button they needed to push and I ended up with a great picture.  I didn't need to explain a thing.  I also didn't mind carrying it around all day, it is very light for its size.I have owned the camera for four years now and it still takes beautiful pictures.  I have taken all sorts of pictures with this camera, from landscapes to action shots and they all turn out great.  The action shots are never blurry!  The only complaint that I have is that the autofocus does not work well in low lighting, sometimes it is slow and sometimes it won't work at all.  In these cases I just turn on the manual focus option.All the options that the camera has are great, but to be honest I rarely use them.  I've found that it is often easier to use manual focus than to adjust the camera so it will autofocus off center.  If I know that I'm going to be taking action shots or landscapes I will set the camera to that mode, but often I forget and my pictures still look great.I think that this is an excellent camera, especially for someone that is used to a point and shoot but wants the extra quality that a SLR camera can give them.  There are also many choices when it comes to additional lenses, so when the photography bug gets you, this camera can stay with you</review_text>
I am a ameture photographer and I love my new camera, I also enjoy my low price Amazon Your the Best! Im so happy that I finally found a price I can Afford!! Thank You!</review_text>
Item was exactly as described. Works perfectly and helped make some great shots at Yosemite</review_text>
ive used this product about twice and dont really have any major complaints. my pictures came out great. i used it at a drag strip and needed it for taking pictures of the cars flying by at nighttime and i was able to capture them nicely due to no camera shake (using a tripod of course as well). the only thing i dont particularly like is that it goes into the lock position quite easily taking extra pictures that arent needed, and also the small hole for the wire to be inserted in for packing doesnt really hold it that well and the wire just kinda unravels, but i would recommend it to anyone who has a need for it</review_text>
The Canon RS-60E3 is all that Canon says it is....it is a simple one handed operation switch that can open the flash, focus, then release the shutter once, a multiple of times, or hold it open for bulb exposure.  Although the cord is not long enough to include the photographer in the picture, it was simple enough to make an "extension" that allows for very remote exposures</review_text>
I don't know how I ever did without this little item. Its indispensable for taking pictures with a tripod. It works easily and efficiently exactly as describe</review_text>
I wish I'd bought this a LOOOONG time ago!  It is so helpful, esp. with macro shots.  Highly recommend</review_text>
Worked well while I took pictures of fireworks over Lake Tahoe on the 4th of July.  Only wish camera accessories with Canon logo weren't so expensive.</review_text>
Using photoshop, and being a big fan of bulb exposures the RS60 E3 is a must have accesory.  You can use it just as you would the shutter button on the Digital rebel, as well as lock the shutter open, which is very good for painting with a small flashlight, etc.My only qualm with the switch is the shortness of the cord, but if you're trying to take a self portrait with the remote, then you need to get the Infrared remote.  The two of those combined makes for a perfect pair of tools for any remote picture taking needs</review_text>
It does what it says it'll do, and while it's pricey for a couple of contact switches in a plastic handle, considering the cost of parts and my time to make something similar, it's a bargain.  I would have liked more heavy duty construction, and the contacts to have more definite tactile feedback for the focus vs shoot position, but it works just fine, and it lets me take pictures while talking more easily to the subject, in addition to the obvious vibration reduction</review_text>
I purchased this Canon Remote Switch about 4 months ago and I use it almost constantly. This is one of the most useful camera accessories that I have purchased. Every photographer should have one in his/her toolbox.A remote switch is essential if you do photos in low light or macro photography. The slightest movement of your camera when you press the shutter release could cause your photo to be ruined.  This switch eliminates "camera shake."Before I purchased this switch, I had to use the self-timer feature on my camera and the time delay was very inconvenient.There have been a few reviews saying that the Canon Remote Switch is over-priced and cheaply made. I don't think that is true at all!  I would definitely buy this accessory again.</review_text>
Made of a durable nylon outer shell and a soft lining in the interior, this soft case offers the ability to protect your lens.  The double front zipper easily opens to reveal easy access to the lens cavity.  The top of the zippered flap is secured in place with Velcro for a solid seal.  Securely attached to the sides of the case are D rings.  These rings are used to snap the quarter inch thin shoulder strap in place for carrying the case and lens around.  If this carrying option doesn't appeal to you, a belt loop is included on the back of the strap for carrying the case and lens attached to your belt, or possible your camera bag if it accepts attachments.  The bottom of the case features a cardboard lined fake leather surface allowing the lens to rest standing on solid surfaces such as a table.This case is meant for use with the 180mm f/3.5L, 70-200mm f/2.8L, 80-200mm f/2.8L & 100-400mm f/4.5-5.6L EF lenses.  These L lenses normally come with the case when sold new.  There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.  However if your case is worn, replacing it to protect your lens is recommended.PROS:Protects your glass investmentDurable constructionBuilt for mobility outside of your camera bagCONS:I cannot think of an</review_text>
The Canon EF 85mm f1.2L lens has earned ample praise from photographers and critics alike as one of the finest portrait (medium telephoto) lenses available. It is the only one currently produced with a maxium aperture of f1.2 (About a decade ago Carl Zeiss introduced a special, limited edition 85mm f1.2 Planar for its Contax manual focus 35mm SLR system; this lens is alleged to be optically superior to Canon's.). This new improved version of the 85mm f1.2 can autofocus 1.8x faster than its predecessor, via a USM motor for relatively whisper-quiet operation. A fine optic for working under low-light conditions, the lens is now better due to its improved optical design and faster autofocusing. Without question it has been one of the finest L series Canon lenses available; these new improvements will only enhance its reputation. If I owned Canon equipment and had to choose between the Canon EF 85mm f1.2L II USM lens or its illustrious predecessor, then without question I would be willing to acquire this fine new lens</review_text>
I bought this lens as I was walking out to Africa for a month and a half safari.  I didn't own a true wide angle lens and I had just spent most of my budget on a 70-200mm USM "L" lens and a 1.4x extension.I wanted to get the widest lens I could get but I didn't have the big bucks to get the 16-35L or the 14mm L so I got this lens figuring I could correct in Photoshop CS2 later.This is what I found:1) I have a 20D and it doesn't barrel distort anywhere near as bad as I had thought it would....I imagine it distorts quite a bit more on a 5D or other full frame sensor but on the 20D, 10D, 30D, or Rebel it is not that bad.2) It does distort enough even on the 20D that its noticable on every single inside shot and on many panoramic shots....to the experienced professional, you'd notice it even in panoramas.3) For the computer person:  I find it very easy to correct the barrel distortion in Photoshop CS2 very easily....I use a plugin (there are several on the web)4) I tend to like the barrel distortion look on some of my pictures.Pros1) Image Quality is superb.  For not being an L lens, this lens has some amazing color, sharpness, and saturation.  They spared very little in grinding this lens.  Some of my best African pictures, daytime and nightime were taken with this lens and they were fabulous.2) Build pretty well, metal mount, metal integrated hood...but not up to L standards by any means....to its credit, it survived 14 days by vibration ridden truck treking across the Kalahari desert with all its dust, mokoro canoeing in the okavango delta for over a week, hiking, elephant riding, and the five diamond resort at victoria falls (the last one was easy for the fisheye)...3) It is a Fisheye lens and if used properly, it can create some amazing pictures and views...for example In Botswana in the Okavango, I knelt down next to a Gigantic Baobab tree and pointed it up towards the sky, The fisheye captured not only Rex the guide standing next to the tree but the entire massive trunk of the Baobab AND ALL of the canopy of the tree way above.  Everything!  I know of few lenses that would let me do that.  It was an amazing shot only possible with a Fisheye.4) It focuses to about 12inches.5) f/2.8 makes it very good in low light situation.6) The integrated hood comes complete with a nice metal cover.Cons1) Its not built like an L:a) no USM motor so you can hear the whir as it tries to focusb) no moisture seals etcc) It does have a metal mount2) It is a fisheye lens -- I found out after a month and a half what this meant....it doesn't stay on my camera much.  I take it out when I need a certain effect or when I plan to retouch in Photoshop.  It distorts visibly on a 20D and I imagine quite a bit more on a full frame.3) Integrated Hood...can't put screw on filters...but it does have a gel filter holder.4) No bag.My veredict:1) I've purchased a 16-35mm Canon "L" and that lens stays in camera most of the time when I want wide-angle but when I need a special look or I really want to capture everything, I bring out my 15mm Fisheye.  I won't sell it, I don't regret buying it.  I learned what a specialty Fisheye lens is and its staying in my arsenal for those special shots.2) I can't compare against non-canon lenses but I can say that Canon quality here is extraordinary.  I would knock them on the construction but the lens is built well enough and the "glass" itself is spectacular so 5 stars.3) I ordered from Amazon 3 days before my trip --- it arrived the next day.  Great Service.  Thx Amazon.</review_text>
For anyone who wants to make their photos different, this is the lens!  With 180 degree capacity and fabulous auto focus capability, this lens takes an ordinary photo and turns it into something extraoridinary.  I shoot for magazines and many of the photos that are selected for publication are taken with the lens.  It's an expensive toy, but worth the money when you see the results.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
The fisheye lens is a lot of fun, and I enjoy using mine.  However, I find that the practicality of the lens is minimal.  I don't usually want my "serious" photographs to have fisheye distortion.I don't tend to like the 1.6x crop on Canon's lower-end digital SLR cameras, but with the fisheye this has an interesting benefit:  it's reasonably easy to use the fisheye as a standard wide-angle lens, since most of the distortion is removed by the 1.6x crop.  You can still get distortion, but it's a lot easier to compose a shot without it using a 1.6x camera than a full-frame camera.Either way, lots of fun.  Buy one for the enjoyment, or even for professional assignments if your work calls for it, but think about if you really want the distortion before getting one of these</review_text>
Let me first start off by saying - long time canon user. I own 6 or 7 lenses, including three L series lenses, and this is by far one of my favorites - if not my absolute favorite.I shoot mostly glamour and erotica type work on a 20D. So right there, this lens is not a true 15mm for me - but 1.6x15mm.It's sharp as a tack. It's light weight. It's very short (I call it the nub lens). And it's autofocus is amazing.Very little barrel distortion...and highly recommended. This lens is probably as sharp (if not sharper) than my 24-70 2.8L or my 17-40 4.0L lens.</review_text>
Bought these for my Nikon D200 about 3 months ago. Never having used Tiffen before I took a chance on a recommendation. Vignetting can be an issue for polarizing filters and the vignetting on this one is the worse I've seen. Build quality of all the filters is really not very good. Going to go back to Hoya's which are much better</review_text>
I feel that these filters are not required if you have digital camera the coze you you can do what ever you like by computer graphics programs only  the UV protector is important</review_text>
Excellent performance, at a reasonable price.  Highly recomend this product</review_text>
I have found that Tiffen filters offer unlimited possibilites.  With this kit you get three great filters.  Most important being the Circular Polarizer.  If you are shooting outdoors it is a must have.  You also get the 812 warming filter which I have found to bring great depths of warmth to photographs.  Filters protect lenses and Tiffen I have found to be great quality and this is a great value</review_text>
First, let me cover the most important point: Does it work? Yes.The praise that most users express for this item is well merited. I purchased this because, like everyone else, normal batteries just did not last. Ten or fifteen photos in, especially if you used flash, and they'd be ready for a change; even the so-called "Heavy Duty" or those marketed as "Digital Camera" didn't make a difference.Well, both of those terms should be reserved for these power cells; they really are less like a battery and more like a power pack. On my first charge up, which took only 3 hours and 6 minutes - I timed it - I wanted to actually test how many photos one could get.On my smaller camera, a 3MP Fujifilm Finepix S3100, I got 52 photos, some with flash, most without. Not random snaps to see how many it could record, but actually taking the time to frame them, select composition, etc.The camera stayed on the entire time using the full LCD rather than viewfinder, took all photos on highest-resolution setting, transferred between auto, manual, and situational modes, charged full flash about 8 times, and went into preview mode. Three hours, 47 minutes later, I got a "low battery" warning - not depleted - low. I stopped then, sure that I had not overpaid.**Note: These power cells will likely last much longer than 3h47m. Lower resolution may result in more photos. These numbers simply represent an unscientific but strenuous personal test to see what the product would do.Other notes about the product:- All parts except for door are made of hard, impact resistant plastic.- Fold away plug in back makes charger easier to store.- Red and Green LEDs are very bright, no mistake between charge and full mode.- Has two "channels", A and B. Seems to charge sets of batteries best; this may have been an issue with another reviewer who reported issues with using one battery at a time.- Black (body back), silver (body front) and blue (door) looks nice.I have one complaint, though perhaps it's only one founded in pure puzzlement. The door flips open...to the right. When holding the unit in your hand, with the Monster logo at the top and the LED at the bottom, the door flips open to the right. My guess is that this decision was made so that the door didn't close on your hand when loading, because most people will tilt it in their left hand so that it's facing away from them at about 45 degrees; I know I do.My final review: 5 out of 5</review_text>
Monster is a little pricey, as everyone knows, but it's good stuff.  This unit is attractive, works well and is nicely designed.  Only one very small drawback: unless you have small pointy fingers, the first battery is a little hard to remove.  I use a little plastic relay tool to lever it out, which I store right in the charger.  But I stayed with 5 stars for this one</review_text>
After reading the reviews, just bought the charger. The first charge took about 3 hours, then the led turned green. I accidentally disconnected the power, when I plug it again, the led turns orange, and start charging again. Will this hurt the battery</review_text>
Compact Design....bought it since 2002.....still going strong...went to soo many trips wit me...and easily fit in ur luggage....now i use that for my Travel only and use Powerex MH-C204 F for my daily use...can take at least 2 hours of pics wit my Minolta Z</review_text>
2 years of HEAVY use - not even one little bitty problem.  They've traveled well under harsh conditions, and they still function wonderfully.  There you go</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
The leather, design, craftmanship all exceed my expectation.Instead of velcro, it replaced with magnetic button, which is a plus.It also included a matching leather wrist strap with Canon logo, another plus.My Canon sd40 can also fit into nicely, although leave some room on the side</review_text>
Very impressed with the prompt service and delivery of said product. It is perfect for our new canon camera. Congratulations</review_text>
Fits my Canon SD550 perfectly and no complains abt that. The quality of the product is pretty good. When used with the belt clip, its easy to open and easy to put the camera back.  Camera seems very secured when used with the belt clip.</review_text>
I'm the owner of Canon SD630.This case fit very good to my camera and it is very good kind of leather</review_text>
Quality leather case is great for the Canon Elph digital cameras.  The only negative is that there is no place to store extra battery or memory card</review_text>
I have the cannon SD600 and i've been pleased with my carrying case, it takes a beating but protects my camera nicely. Highly recommend both the camera and this case</review_text>
I received case quickly and love it! It is a perfect fit for the sd700IS and protects it nicely.  It is also a nice quality leather that looks nice as well</review_text>
I had originally bought a case from walmart but it just wasnt working out.What a difference this one made. Fits like a glove and well worth the few extra dollars this one cost in comparison to the ill fitting one.I highly  recomend this for your canon sd630Plus the service and delivery were excellent</review_text>
I wish there was also a photo that showed the backside of this camera case. If there was I would have known that this excellent quality case unfortunately does not have a belt loop which is what I was looking for in this product. Great quality nevertheless</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
I am a technology guru and this camera is simple to use and has great results. The touch screen is awesome!!! Battery life is so much better than other cameras i have owned. I think this one will outlast and perform any of them. BUY IT NOW if you want a quality camera that will make you happy!!</review_text>
I am not the most experienced photographer, but this camera takes terrific pictures, in my opinion.  Nice big LCD screen and the touch screen is a great feature</review_text>
Quick, compact, light and brilliant pictures but lacking veiw finder and "anti-shake" syste</review_text>
Camera works great for us so far... we had a 3 year old digital camera so this was an upgrade to better technology... takes much better pictures than our old one... the video is great (except in very low light)... we've taken a lot of short video clips of our kids for grandma (etc)... nobody in our family wants to watch more than about 5 minutes of any one home video anyway... so this camera saves us from having to buy a camcorder... (although with our 1GB card we could take 45 minutes or so of continuous video at the medium setting)... the touch screen is great and simple... the camera has quick response time and the indoor and action pictures are again great for pictures of our kids running around or birthday parties... I took about 92 minutes of video and 55 pictures (plus sharing images and videos with others) before the battery ran out for the first time (a couple of weeks of shooting in our family).  I guess everyone has their own needs when picking a digital camera, but this one works great for ours</review_text>
WOW!!!  This is my 4th Sony, I keep trading up and I am so impressed.  There is no delay on the shutter speed,  great pictures and enough special effects to be fun, but not enough that you need a PHD to operate</review_text>
I have been using my Sony Cybershot DSCN1 8.1MP for about a month now. It's so easy to use.  And, I love how you can easily delete picture via the touch screen.  The only issue I have with it, is that I can't use the Memory Pro Stick with my Sony photo printer (a 5 year old model), because the stick is not compatible.ps: don't forget to buy a memory stick pro if you purchase this camera. you're gonna need it.</review_text>
In the never ending race for larger and larger megapixel counts, the D70s has fallen behind the pack.  (However, if that's the only measure by which you're judging a digital camera - you really should consider further research before plunking down several hundred dollars.)  Nevertheless, it's quite a good camera.What I like about it most:- It looks and feels solid.  Some of the reviewers that pan this camera for feeling flimsy and plasticky are apparently still stuck in the realm of pro cameras that cost several thousand dollars.  It's not a bulletproof titanium box that you can back a Hummer over, but it certainly seems to outdo DSLRs in it's category.- Very good battery life.- Backwards compatibility with decade's worth of Nikon SLR lenses.My gripes:- The latch that keeps the pop-up flash in place broke in less than a week.- Inability to meter through older manual focus lenses.- Lack of full functionality with flashes other than the SB-600 and SB-800.- Nikon's RAW software and control software aren't included with the camera, and are IMHO overpriced.  (...and on top of that, Nikon has split what used to be one overpriced software package into two overpriced software packages...)What would improve this camera the most:- ISO 100 and ISO 3200+- Ability to store multiple custom white balance presets, and then pull them up on the fly.- Replacing the "idiot modes" (i.e. "portrait", "landscape", etc.) with modes that you could customize</review_text>
When digital cameras first came out, I, like many people swore I'd always be loyal to film. Digital could never take the place of film. I'm not convinced that it has replaced film completely. There's still something I love about putting a roll of film in the camera, shooting away, sending the film to be processed, and seeing the results. I also know it's a bit expensive. I know that the argument about quality has always been paramount in the discussion, but digital cameras are improving in this regard, and most manufacturers are assuring users that while the technology will always be improving, we are at a point where a good investment can be made in a digital SLR and it will not be outdated as soon as the buyer purchases the camera. So I figured now is the time to get a digital SLR.I have been a loyal Nikon user for nearly ten years, and have owned the Nikon N60, N70, and N80. My first love was, and still is the N70 (I've been told by the person who sold me the camera he thought I was the only person who loved the N70).  I purchased the N80 only after my N70 cost too much to repair, but I've enjoyed the way my various Nikon cameras have handled all sorts of situations and the fact that they can be as simple to use as a point and shoot if I don't have the time to use specific controls, but it also has options for more creative and artistic purposes. My Nikon cameras have allowed me to capture family moments with ease and majestic landscapes, wildlife shots and all sorts of other things I can't resist to capture forever.I decided to purchase the D70 since it was close to what I've already experienced with Nikon. In many ways it works in a similar way to the N70 and 80, except it's a digital rather than film version. Like the film versions of the midrange Nikon SLR's, it has a dial that allows an automatic setting,  portrait, landscape, sports, close-up, nightscape, and night portrait modes, the ability to select aperture, shutter speed or manual controls. The camera has auto and manual focus abilities. Photos can be as easy or technical as the photographer desires. The controls are easy to use, though it takes practice to be comfortable. On a personal level, the camera has passed the Halloween test, niece's birthday test, and fall foliage in New England test and favorite scenic spots test. The only real difficulty I've had with the camera is trying to capture stained glass windows in a dark setting. Auto focus has not worked at all and I'm not thrilled with the manual focus of these shots, but at this point I'm sure it's the photographer and not the camera.I do have one suggestion for anyone who purchases this camera. The manual is very confusing. It uses all sorts of symbols and can be more of a distraction than anything else. I've had luck with the "Magic Lantern Guides" with my other cameras, but have not as of yet used it for this camera. I did purchase the NIKON D70 FIELD GUIDE (David Busch, Wiley Publishing) which has been helpful. It can be a quick reference for anyone already familiar with Nikon and photography in general but it also provides and introduction for the novice to photography.</review_text>
I am a professional photographer, and I have owned this camera for nearly two years.  I also have a D70 for backup.  The batteries go forever, it is very quick to respond, the images are beautiful, and it has the typical Nikon durability and reliability.  If you are already a Nikon user, the controls will fall easily to hand.That having been said, the computer software with this camera is a joke.  For the best image quality shoot RAW files, color balance with a grey card, and render the images with software like Capture One LE.  The uselessness of the included software is the only reason that this camera gets four instead of five stars.  Come on, Nikon, be real!!!Shortly after I got my first D70, I shot a model for a small photo for a side bar in a catalog.  I got an ugly feeling in my gut when I was told that the designer had taken a shot that was 3/4 figure, cropped to the head and shoulders, and enlarged the image for the cover of the 8.5 x 11 in catalog.  By the time I found out, it was already at the printer.  As it turned out, I was pleasantly surprised: the cover shot looked great.  After that incident, I have trusted this camera and have always been pleased with the results.This camera is better than 35 mm in every way except response to the shutter button.  In resolution and color reproduction it is more comparable to a medium format film camera.  It is imperative to shoot RAW and process the files properly to get the most out of this camera.I can't wait to try the D80</review_text>
The D70s is a minor update of the original D70 introduced in 2004, with a few new features and a slightly larger LCD.  It's still a great camera, but expect it to be replaced by the new D80, which has 40 percent more pixels, a 2.5-inch LCD, and additional useful features at the old price of the D70s.So, you can probably save a little money and still purchase a sophisticated digital SLR if you wait until prices of the D70s stabilize at a new, lower level.  At, say, $600, this camera would be an incredible bargain.The D70s has shined as one of the best cameras in its class since its introduction.  For example, it has a 1/500th second flash synch speed (found in no other camera but the D50) so you can keep ambient light under control and avoid ghost images. Its autofocus is fast and accurate, and features both single-autofocus, continuous-autofocus (for tracking action), and a novel "automatic" autofocus mode that switches between AF-S and AF-C as required.If you have no Nikon lenses, get this camera with the 18-70mm kit lens, which is very sharp and versatile, rather than the more limited 18-55 lens.  You won't regret it</review_text>
Excellent camera kit. Versatile. I have a lot to learn about the camera, though, as it is no simple point-and-shoot. However, in Auto mode, it takes great point-and-shoot pictures. I look forward to learning how to use it fully. Lenses came with warranty cards, but the camera itself did not. I bought the SB-600 flash as well and another battery and two 1 GB compact flash cards to round out the kit. Camera with lens attached is large, which I underestimated. $80 camera bag is too small for it all. Great camera, though. Price was the best I could find anywhere</review_text>
It has a learning curve, that's for sure, but WOW!  This camera is worht every penny, far more stable then the comparable Canon Rebel, and the product comes with better lenses.  The quality of glass DOES matter</review_text>
Though the lenses for my Nikon D50 were not as expensive as some can be they still were several hundred dollars and having this UV Protection Filter protecting the lens glass made a whole lot of sense. I feel less stress when I clean the filter lens than if I was wiping dust and dirt from the actual lens glass. This size, 52mm, was what was specified for my D50 and it fits perfectly, as it should. I have no complaints at all with the manufacturer or the seller. If you are new to digital SLR's like I was then get this filter to protect your lens. And spend your time worrying about the sensor when you need to switch out your lens.</review_text>
This filter is a must have for photographers that care about their gear. It remains a cost effective tool for protecting the camera lens while serving as a great every day filter.</review_text>
Just what I needed with out having to spend a fortune on a glass filter to protect my expensive Nikon Lenses.  I bought one for each of my different lenses because I would rather break the filter than the glass on the lens</review_text>
This filter is fine for normal shooting, but if you do low-light work, beware; you will see bad internal reflections on night shots, and will need to remove the filter</review_text>
A basic protection item you should have.  Does not appear to be multi-coated, as the more expensive Hoya filters are, but clearly worth it.  Fits the Nikon 18-55mm ED perfectly and allows the Nikon lens hood to fit well</review_text>
The filter is decent. I paid only $3 with free shipping so im not expecting much out of this filter. I bought it for protection and it does that perfectly. Not the best for night shots obviously but overall a good buy</review_text>
I have had this camera for several months now and could not be happier.  I'll preface this posting by saying that I always do meticulous research (borderline a%$l retentive) before making purchases over $400.  This camera was no exception.I was using a "credit card" camera before and was often disappointed with the results.  This camera has corrected that in a big way.  The pictures are crisp and the video files are very good (although they do hog a lot of memory).  You must upgrade the memory card that is provided.  The battery life for me has been equal to the credit card camera I had in the past.  If you take a lot of videos battery life will shorten.  I carry extras in my case.Having always been an amateur "photog" this camera is an excellent upgrade.  The weight and feel of the camera is perfect for me.  I have friend who has a Nikon.  The only real difference that I can see is that he can change lens for various situations, oh and about 500 bucks.  Overall this is a very good camera.</review_text>
Great product for people that want more out of their digital camera. Not so easy to operate at the beginning, but learning is quick and the results are extremely satisfying. With a little dedication, you will be able manipulate the secrets of high end photography. Best buy for the buck</review_text>
As an early adopter of digital, dating from 1999 and the Agfa ePhoto 1280 and 1680 to the current iteration of the Nikon family, I can attest that this camera is as flexible as any of my film cameras that I use for studio and location work. Fujifilm has migrated the best features of a mecanical film camera over to this model.From a hot shoe for external mounted flash and a sync terminal for off camera flash, to the cable release socket on the shutter button, Fuji has melded the best of the analog with the best of the digital.With 9 mega pixel resolution, ISO from 80 to 1600, shutter speeds from 30 seconds to 1/4000, a 1.6 inch CCD sensor, Fujinon 28 to 300 mm (135 equivalent) zoom, tilting LCD monitor (if you use those things), RAW file format support, real time histogram display, eleven shooting modes, movie recording, AF assist illuminator and full manual control when needed, Nikon, Canon, Olympus, et al have a lot of catching up to do.No need to change lenses means a sealed camera and that equates to the sensor staying spring time fresh in the body. No dust getting in every time a lens is swapped (although, I still miss all that Nikon glass).All this for less than $ 600.0</review_text>
I bought this camera based on several online reviews, including Steve's Digicams, and couldn't be more pleased. I've been using it since last Christmas (bought it as a present to myself after six months of looking at various brands and models). Aside from image quality (which it has plenty of) I insisted on at least an LCD viewfinder (EVF) as well as screen, a real filter ring (no adapters, please!) easy basic controls, long optical zoom, CF card, hot shoe and the ability to use ordinary AA batteries in a pinch. Also had to fit my hand and feel natural.This had all that, plus an actual cable release socket in the shutter button! (Thus I can easily use my cable and bulb releases, as well as a long-duration timer I have in my 35mm kit.) It also has a standard pc socket for more flash options than the built in flash or hot shoe.The heft is good, but not very heavy. You can carry it for a long time without fatigue, but it has enough mass to steady your hand, and enough size for easy gripping. I find it very instinctive to point and shoot with it. Most of the basic control locations are convenient and easily remembered. (Zoom is manual only, but that suits me. I don't like waiting for motorized zooms to get where I want, especially with a zoom range this long.)I'll leave it to the pro reviewers to discuss the image merits, but I will say that for me they seem perfectly sharp with very good color even at the default settings. In addition, I've gotten very good results shooting at night with very long exposures. (Starry sky, clouds backlit by the moon, streets under moonlight and streetlamps, etc.) Much less noise and "grain" than I've experienced with other cameras. So far it's the closest to film I've found in such situations - at any price I can afford, at least.The electronic viewfinder (EVF) is bright and sharp and performs well in low light. I don't miss an optical viewfinder much at all. There's a diopter adjustment to accomodate most people's visiion. (Stops just short of enough for my worst eye - comes closer than most, though - but I find I can use the EFV with my glasses on if I want).One accessory I strongly recommend is a soft rubber, wide angle, lens shade (for a 58mm filter ring). They can be found cheap (I paid $7 at a local store) and will protect the rim of the lens when you set down the camera in addition to shading the lens. There is an included hard-plastic lens shade that clips on the outside of the lens's rim, but t's "notched" and I worry about catching it on things - I like the soft rubber ones better (they look more "pro" too).  It may interfere with the supplemental illumination lamp for focussing, so you'll want to remove it when shooting close to mid-range photos in dim light</review_text>
I spent a lot of time reading reviews and posts, finally I bought it, it is the best camera I have used, I went from an old Konica 35mm film camera to a Sony Cybershot 2 mp and then to not having a camera for a while later I had a Kodak P850 (great camera also, but slow to my taste) and finally this S9000, belive me this is a great choice it is the only camera that I have found that is positivly compared to DLSR and still being a prosumer camera, that tells a lot.The lack of picture stabilization is not a big deal, it has the anti blur mode which is almost the same, and have a full array of controls and manual settings that will help and please from amateurs to not so ameteurs.It also has the first steps os face detection in it's multifocus mode, which focuses most of the times in subjects faces where ever they are on the frame (not necesary centered), I have to mention it has its limitations and you have to know how to compose your shot.The User guide is easy to read, understand and follow, you don't have to know nothing about photografy with this manul you will use most of the functions in a few hours with easy.Summary: 5 of 5!!!Nice camera</review_text>
Many of the options on this camera are mechanically on the body of the camera rather than on an internal menu so wanting a change in focusing method etc is easy!  Shaking is no problem with the 10.7x optical zoom and warning icons appear if it may be a problem.  Icons appear if the subject isn't focused warning you to change the focusing method.  Automatic power turnoff to save batteries after two or five minutes, your choice.  You can set the camera to take instant pictures; again, your choice.  This camera allows you to set your options rather than have the camera go to default after power off and having to change it back to your option.  That was a problem I had with my previous camera.  Maybe a little pricey, but the results are great!</review_text>
(Wife of account holder)I knew before I bought this camera it was just what I needed!  I am a semi-pro-am that does photography as a hobby and a job.  I knew I didn't need the $5K camera we have at work, but wanted something more than my $200 point and shoot.  This is it!  Out of the box, it took about 15 min to take my first pic.  Hardest part was threading the camera strap with the lens cap holder - a nice little detail.  The main selling point for me was the "Natural Light" mode.  Tried with flash and without in N mode and the quality is amazing.  My little P&S didn't do any good in low light without flash, this camera gets an A+.A few minor notes I wanted to make before I was lovestruck: The LCD screen has no protection, just kind of out there in the open.  A cover or even just that little plastic stick-on most low end cameras come with would be enough to make me feel like it isn't going to bust.  The viewfinder is really just a mini-LCD screen, which I imagine does a bit of a number on the batteries, though not as much as the full size LCD on the back.  The menu looks pretty extensive, but fairly easy to navigate once it becomes a little more familiar.  So far, I love it, but took off one star because of the LCD issue.  Maybe I can find a cover or something for it to help me feel better about it.Other than that, I can already tell this camera will do everything I need to take great pics and get creative with some manual settings and exposure manipulation.  Love that it takes xD and CF cards - and both can be in the camera at the same time!  Save movies to one, pics to the other!  It feels pretty solid, and takes super inexpensive AA batteries - another selling point for me, as were the hot shoe and sync capabilities.  If you are looking to go SLR, but can't fork out the dough, this is a perfect alternative.  (Though check around for price - with [...] rebate, I got mine for less than [...]!!</review_text>
Good price for a 9MP camera with 10x zoom.Image quality is good.  I'm still shooting mainly on the 3MP and 5MP with good results.  The spot metering works really well, especially while shooting on a bright day with the objects sitting under an umbrella.The Macro works nicely.  I still yet to find a good use for the Super Macro.The camera recycles between shots pretty quick.  The anti-blur mode (using higher ISO rate) works well.Controls/menu make sense.  Although I wish the memory switch feature is not buried too deep in the menu.  That's another good feature.  You can have 2 memory cards in the camera and with the xD being so cheap.  You can combined the capacity instead of having to buy a bigger and more expensive card.I especially like how the menu is displayed even inside the viewfinder (it's an exact copy of the LCD).  That way, I don't have to take my eyes off of my object while cycling through the menu.I wish the battery life could be better.  In effort to conserve battery power, I shoot mainly using the viewfinder and avoid using the flash by using the anti-blur mode.But on the bright side, one can just carry more high-capacity, rechargeable  AA's.  It just takes a while to get used to the battery consumption rate.  I carry a 2 sets of backups where the third one is Alkaline</review_text>
I love the capacity of these batteries.  Use them for my handheld GPS, digital cameras, 35MM cameras, flashes, and everything else that I can.  The car power adaptor is really nice for road trips!  The charger can recharge 4 batteries at a time (either AA or AAA), and can charge even the 2100 mAH batteries in under 75 minutes (under an hour for "typical" rechargeables of 1600 or fewer mAH).  I do not like leaving the charger plugged in, because I can hear it clicking when there are no batteries in it (but I hear lots of things that wouldn't bother a normal person).  Also, the price is pretty high.  I have succesfully used other batteries in the charger (it comes with 8 2100 mAH NiMH batteries that do seem to last longer than other brands of rechargeable).  Ask for it for Christmas...hope for a discount (which appears to be pretty rare for MonsterCable products)</review_text>
I paid $225 out the door for this camera and it competes with cameras almost twice that price!  On the automatic setting, it takes incredible photos, but has the capability to go manual if you are so inclined.  For the price, there is nothing on the market that comes close.  The macro on this camera is great and the close ups I have taken even on the automatic setting are unbelievable.  If you are looking for something that is SLR like, but not the SLR price, this comes close.  Of course, the SLR's will take better photos if you are an expert, but if you are an amateur or intermediate photographer and want something that gets the job done, put this one on your list...taking the price into consideration this thing doesnt disappoint.  You will be glad you purchased this one!</review_text>
I am pleased with this camera.  Its pretty easy to use.  I have virtually no camera experience, save for breaking them.  This camera is easy to operate and is pretty fun to fool around with.  I have used the aperture setting several times to get different focus points on the pics.  The instructions were easy to comprehend.  I have taken quite a bit of Sports photos and I have noticed its extremely difficult to get shots inside a gymnasium.  The shots are usually very blurry and the color just isn't right most of the time.  Fluorescent modes on the camera are helpful, but do not fix the problem.  It could just be me though</review_text>
i like this camera very much is easy to use and gets good result</review_text>
Reviewed most digital cameras on the market today to replace a worn Olympus.  Decided that this camera fitted my needs even though I had never purchased a Fuji camera before.  I bought it before I made a two-week vacation to Greece.  WOW.  I was stunned by the quality of my pictures.  Colors were unbelievably true to nature.  I love to take low level lighting pictures like at sunset, sunrise, etc.  I couldn't believethe outcome.  It gave me some of the most beautiful shots I have ever madewith high priced film cameras.  And I did this on automatic.  No more worries about f stops, speed, etc. for me</review_text>
I gave this to my wife for her birthday, and so far no complaints at all.The camera has plenty of functions that you can play with, but it can also work in point and shoot situations.Good quality pictures, and it looks and feels top notch</review_text>
Wonderful camara, excellent characteristics, has an ample selection of accessories available and protected by one of you lead in manufacture of camaras and lenses</review_text>
I will not repeat what other reviews have stated already, all the reviews below are pretty much correct with this camera being a high quality and easy to use etc etc.The only issue is focusing on a small target such as a name brand logo inside a Rolex watch.  It is HARD even in Manual mode (and I actually have alot of digital camera experience).  Forget trying to focus in AUTO mode, it won't happen.. at least not without alot of tinkering and stress.If you need to take alot of close up pictures of small detailed items (jewelery, insects, etc.) then I recommend buying a digital SLR camera, Nikon D50 is a good one!  This Fuji you are looking at here is perfect for taking pictures of normal things like people, cars, buildings, sites, etc</review_text>
It seems surprising that Canon would make a product out of anything but the best materials.  Lensmate makes a superior product out of aluminum in black and silver</review_text>
The black color of the adapter and hood are a nice match for the gunmetal finish of the S3. The fit is good and they do what they are supposed to.I noticed that the hood tends to "lock" to the adapter if you accidently squeeze it when unscrewing it -- probably because the plastic bends a little. Use a lighter touch and it unscrews right off.The one off-putting thing to me is the price of these two inexpensive pieces of plastic. I know they may be precision-engineered plastic with a nice finish, but please, over 15 dollars each for the two pieces? They're plastic!I know corporations supposedly owe it to stockholders to maximize profits, but perhaps these could have been included with S2/S3 as standard equipment. Or sold for a price more in line with the construction material</review_text>
I purchased this for my S2 IS instead of a third-party adapter.  The only issue I have is that it's black instead of silver (doesn't match the camera).  I also had to make sure I purchased the correct camera bag to hold the camera with the lens adapter attached</review_text>
The black of this is the same as on my camera, and with all the parts together, this is one professional looking set up!I am not sure if this hood cuts down on glare/reflection, as I have not used it on a sunny day, but I don't see why it shouldn't.And as cheap as this little product is, it is pretty much a must have with this camera! (S3 IS)One last side note, should you alreay own a extra lens or two. And they happen to be metal, be VERY carful about screwing them into this plastic adaptor! I made that mistake and had to put the whole thing in the fridge for an hour, so the metal would shrink, and I could get the pieces apart</review_text>
Very important to shade the camera lenses and avoid flairs. It doesn't fit in the carrier bag designed for Canon S2, S3, though, which is a big time bummer. However, I would recommend it anyways, because the quality of the pictures and the protection of your lenses are worth carrying a different bag for the rest of your stuff</review_text>
Works great on my S2IS, clicked on silver on main page but switched to black on order form, didn't notice this but I like the black anyway. Looks good with acc</review_text>
Nikon Coolpix is a cool digital camera. Its one of the cheapest digital cameras available (120 $ at the time of purchase). The photos are really good and it has lots of settings like Sunset, Night, Beach, Fireworks, etc. Video recording is also possible. One of the best cost-effective digital cameras</review_text>
It is a great camera. It has a small size, good optical zoom and Excellent quality. I love it too much and I take it anywhere and carrying it in it's Nikon small case</review_text>
I bought this camera because of the small size, megapixles and zoom + digital zoom.  I wanted something to take outdoors into the wilderness and not worry about hurting it.  Price wise I feel this camera offers pleanty of featrues at a very reasonable price</review_text>
What a wonderful camera.  The photos come out sharp and clear.  The small size makes it very handy to carry around with you at all times.  The photos   load very quickly on to the computer.  For the price I would rate this a "best buy".  I found only one drawback which I feel is minor.  In very bright sunlight it is difficult to see the object on the screen unless it is shaded by a hand or a piece of paper or cardboard.  But this minor problem would not stop me from purchasing a second Coolpix L4.  You can purchase a 512 or l Meg memory card for very little money.  Check Amazon for Kingston or SanDisk.  I have both and they are great.</review_text>
I am not a photographer, but the pictures I take look great.  It feels great to know that I can capture memories in vivid color too. (that's the setting I always use.)On the other hand though, there is a long wait time to use the camera again after a picture was taken using the camera flash.  I don't quite know why but it seems that if you have to take many pictures in quick succession then using the cameras's flash is not the best way to go!All in all, for the price i paid the quality is quite suitable.If you don't have any experience in photography, buy this one</review_text>
This is an excellent pocket camera and it lives up to the Nikon reputation for quality. While it lacks some controls seen on more sophisticated models the pictures will please the most demanding for this class camera. I liked it so well I bought two, one for myself and one as a gift to a budding photographer</review_text>
I simply love this camera, it's very tiny in size and takes great pictures and you can buy rechargable batteries or regular batteries if you should choose. it is simple to use, didn't even have to read the manuel. for a starter camera or advance user, get this one, you will love it !!!</review_text>
The Coolpix L4 is a great camara. Love the night modes, portrait.  Takes great pictures, took it on our honeymoon, and all pictures came out great.  It also takes very good movies, I thought it wouldn't and that is why I didn't go for the one with speaker, but seeing the cuality of both pictures and video, I should have gone for the one with mic, that's the L3</review_text>
I bought this camera for my sister, as an early Christmas present, thinking I would need some time to set it up for her, well in less then 30 minutes I was ready, It's a awesome camera, I was impressed, of the ease from set up to formatting the 512 SD card. I have sent the site to another sister whom is interested. It is the easiest camera to use and has features that will impress anyone, Great photos from very close to far away. I would recommend this camera to anyone</review_text>
Okay, first off, I'd like to say that this is my first AF SLR--I stepped up from my dinosaur of a camera, Canon AE-1 manual focus, and right now I am quite overwhelmed by all the features in this little thing.  I'm still in the learning stages of all this technology but let me tell you this, I am having fun!  It amazes me that Canon can offer quite an impressive camera for the price.I just received my first few rolls from the developer and the pictures came out amazing--so clear and the colors are very vibrant.  Just to let you know, I'm using the 28-105mm f/3.5-4.5 USM lens.  I took the suggestions of many and passed up on the "kit" lens and I'm sure glad I did so.  I would highly recommend the f/3.5-4.5 lens, but unfortunately for the rest of you, Amazon has discontinued it.  But you could order it from one of the many other photo shops (B&H, Adorama, etc).Do I have any regrets on this purchase?  Absolutely not!  I love this camera and even though I've owned it for less than a month, I'm actually thinking about stepping up to the EOS 3 and using this as a backpacking/hiking body.  Hmm...what to do, what to do?  Do I purchase another body or start a collection of L-series glass?  ...that is the question.</review_text>
Seems a little much to pay for an "extension cord" but upon receipt I see it is of very high quality and nice build on the connectors. Plus, its a brand item from Canon, so what can you do</review_text>
The item was exactly as expected.The packaging for shipment, along with the other item I ordered, was unacceptable. A child could have done better</review_text>
If your camera spends any amount of time connected to your computer--either copying pictures, or using the remote capture program--you should have this AC adapter.  It is also obviously handy to have if you do a lot of shooting from a fixed location--for instance: a tripod.The adaptor is an ingenious little contraption.  There is the normal AC line that runs to the power adapter, but instead of running the DC output to a dedicated jack on the camera body, the connector is in the shape of the normal battery pack.  If you look closely at your camera, you will see a little grove at the bottom of the battery compartment providing enough room for a wire to exit.Now for the surprise.  I'm planning a trip to Europe.  I knew the battery charger that came with the camera, and this AC adapter both support 100-240 volts AC, 50-60 Hz input.  Which covers all the worlds power supplies.  But the battery charger included with the camera only came with the US power cord.  I've been looking for various European cords that would fit the charger so I could keep my batteries topped off overseas.  What should I find when I open the box to this adaptor?  A complete collection of all the worlds cords, which also happen to fit the charger.  What a win, now I can run my camera on AC, and stay charged while I'm on vacation</review_text>
Hoods offer several benefits to the photographer. Primarily the hood shades the lens from stray light that may result in an unwanted discoloration or hazing of the image, or the appearance of lens flare. Shading your lens helps improve contrast and image quality. A hood is not required to eliminate these problems, as any item used to shade the lens will provide the same protection from stray light. The hood is convenient in that it is built to offer protection while ensuring that it will not inadvertently find its way into your image.Photographers often state the protective abilities of a hood as a reason to have one. This hood being a solid petal shaped one and three quarters inch long offers limited protection from keeping moisture and wind blown debris off the from lens element. When in place, the hood can protect the lens from impacting solid objects. Being so shallow and petal shaped, even this type of protection is limited. Even if the protection is limited, replacing a damaged hood is usually cheaper than repairing an expensive L lens.This hood is manufactured for the Canon 16-35mm f/2.8L EF and normally comes included with the lens when sold new. There is no need to buy one as Amazon often suggests.Since the hood is wider than the lens; it can easily be stored attached in a reverse position. This doesn't add to the length of the lens, but does make it wider by about an inch. An inch may not seem like a lot, but in a tightly packed camera bag, it is huge. This lens isn't unusually wide so the extra inch may not be a problem.While the protective benefits exist, they are secondary and limited. I find the impact the hood has on my image quality to be the more convincing reason to use a hood. Considering the impact on image quality and the low cost as compared to my other camera equipment (except for a lens case), purchasing a hood is money well spent.PROS:Improves contrast and image qualityReduces lens flare problemsOffers limited protection to the lensCONS:Takes up more space in your camera bag to store with the lens</review_text>
Pros:- Reduces flare and ghosting when shooting in bright light.- Helps protect your lens from dirt and scratches.- Somewhat protects the lens in case of a fall.  Better to break the hood than the front element.- Makes you look more like you know what you are doing and helps to keep others from carelessly walking in front of you.Cons:- Will increase lens movement in windy situations, kind of like a sail on a boat.- Takes up more room in your bag, even when reversed they still add to the diameter of the lens.- People take more notice of you, will help to blow your cover if you are trying to keep a low profile</review_text>
I'm using this hood for the Canon EF-S 10-22mm lens on a 20D. It's a bit shocking how big this hood is until you realize it's really necessary for the very wide field of view. On the Canon 20D, the lens is equivalent to the EF 16-35mm f2.8, only it's f3.5-4.5. Bottom line is that it does the trick and is made to the same good quality as the rest of Canon's stuff</review_text>
Using either on EF 16-35mm lenses or EF-S 10-22mm lenses (on 20D or Rebel bodies with 1.6x crop factor) this hood helps to eliminate (I mean reduce a lot) the flare on sunny days or certain lightning conditions..... highly recommended for those who like to shot at the lower end (16mm) of these lenses.</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This lens provides the best bang for your buck!  The build quality is average, but optically it's a dream!  The images that this lens produces is almost L quality.  Not to mention having f1.8 on such a cheap lens.  I've owned 2 of these so far (the first died when it fell out of my bag), and if my 2nd ever dies, I'll buy another!  It's great for both beginners and pros</review_text>
This lens is a must have for all beginner photographers. Excellent sharpness and a really fast lens.   I know I've heard many complain about the cheap feel of it but at less than $100 you can't beat it.  Yes it does have a plastic mount, yes the focus ring is small but the quality of it's pictures and price make it a definite winner until you decide to move up to the much higher priced L's.</review_text>
I purchased this lense for the novelty of having an inexpensive 1.8 lense. I use this in low light sport situations like basketball or volleyball - and especially gymnastics where flash is not allowed.I'm not a huge fan of being locked into a focal length, but for anything under 2.8 you don't have a choice.This is definitely not a primary lense for indoor sport shooting, but it's a fun companion when you need the speed of a 1.8 indoors</review_text>
For the money, you absolutely can't beat this lens.  It's very fast and sharp.  Not fast to focus, but what do you expect at $70?  I have four lenses , some costing 4x's as much as this one...yet I use this one the most.  Anyone looking to step up from the kit lens, or anyone looking to buy a camera body w/out the kits lens should look to buy this lens</review_text>
This lens takes very sharp pics. Works great in low light. A true value for the price</review_text>
Very happy with the lens, and the price is definately right for an amateur like myself</review_text>
Awesome lens, especially for the price.  It's very fast and 50mm even at 1.6x mag of my Rebel XT is easily manageable</review_text>
This is a good prime lens, although not perfect for the Rebel XT. Sharp throughout most of the range, and good for low-light shots. Overall, a solid buy</review_text>
First of all, I am an amature photographer, still on a learning curve.  I was an avid film SLR (Minolta XG1) user until I bought this camera.  After extensive research, I finially purchased a D50.  Over one year later, and over 15,000 shots, I couldn't be happier.  The pictures are just amazing.  The camera is quick and does what you want it to do.  If you are a point and shooter, or someone who does not like to make adjustments for the optimal picture, this camera is not for you.  I believe that most people's problems come from lack of experience, bad lens, or in rare situations, a bad camera.  You must have patience with this camera to get the best out of your pictures.PROS::::*Sharp, sharp, sharp - always depends on your lens - I shoot with a Nikon 18-200 VR, and even get wonderful pictures off of a Sigma 70-300*Instant start up*Instant pictures - press the button and picture is taken immediately*All of the manual control you could want*Great autofocus and metering, once you learn how to use it - I shoot in Aperture priority with autofocus*Great pictures stright out of the camera - I rarely post-process*SD cards - I love the small size and quick write and read speed.  Plus the price keeps dropping*Nice LCD - large, and gives an idea of what the photo looks like, but do not trust it (as with any LCD)*Absolutely amazing battery life - I have taken over 300 pictures (without flash) with the battery still reading at full strengthCONS::::*Not ideal for indoor/very low light situations.  Bad noise at high ISO, and poor built in flash*No light on the top LCD screen*I don't really care for the "dummy" scene modes - this just may be due to the fact that I haven't used them extensively*It was hard to get used to the small viewfinder when compared to film viewfinders.  But I did eventually get used to it*May be too small for big handsWith the low light problems, I am looking into a Fuji F30, since most of my low light pictures is with friends and I don't want to carry around a bulky DSLR!Overall, I couldn't be happier!  It may be cheaper than most of the other DSLR's, but the power lays in the lens and the photographer.  It is an awesome camera that I have learned so much from.  Hopefully I will have this gem for a while to come</review_text>
The other day I used a friend's standard digital camera for a little while. The whole time I found myself missing the manual zoom, instant response and convient manual buttons on my D50. This camera takes amazing pictures. As an dSLR beginner I used the camera in Auto mode for the first several weeks, now after reading some books on photography I'm slowing starting to use the manual features. The D50 lets me choose the level of control that I'm comfortable with, from full manual to full automatic; and both options are just a turn of the dial away.The body of this camera is built like a tank. Metal and high quality plastics abound. The buttons provide good feedback and the switches feel solid and durable. It is a beautiful piece of precision engineering</review_text>
As an amatuer photographer this gives me the what I need at a price I can afford. It has many features that I am still learning how to use. The difference between the pictures that the D50 takes as a DSLR compared to cheap digital camera is like night and day. I am really happy with this camera and the lens combination I purchased. I can do anything from a macro of a spider to a zoom-in of a squirrel sitting in a tree. The battery has a good life span and I rarely have to change it for my spare while shooting. Remember to puchase seperately your memory card as it is not part of the purchase. I'd recommend at least a 2GB card, which can also be purchased at amazon. I was able to catch a squirrel jumping between trees because of the number of frames you can take each second. It is also so easy to take photos indoors without using flash and being obtrusive during the event you are photographing. I also recommend purchasing 52mm lens filters, to keep your nikkor lenses free of fingerprints, etc.</review_text>
Nikon D50 is an absolutely fantastic camera.If you are moving from point and Shoot, you will jump to a completely new leage of photography.Pros:1. Noise extremely low at ISO 800, and highly usable at 1600.2. Camera control is good, you get 2.5 frame per second, more than enough for non-professionals.3. Flash sync is 1/500 sec, one of the best in market.4. Image quality (IQ) is excellent.Cons:1. LCD screen is small.2. Top LCD has no back light.3. No depth of field review button.Regards,csoura</review_text>
I felt the price was very competitive and it was received within the time frame the seller told me it would be. The camera is very easy to handle and has so far taken wonderful shots.  It was just what I was hoping it would be</review_text>
As a long time film person, I really wanted to find a digital slr that could surpase the feel and quality of film without the guess.  other digital cameras were basically point and shoot versions.  with two children in athletics year round, the d50 does it all.  we've shot over 3000 pictures in the past three months just of soccer and softball.  the nikon software makes converting and storing a breeze.  the only thing missing was a protector for the viewfinder, it's standard on the d70 and now the d80.  there is an aftermarket available that does fine in that dept.  I have recommended the d70 to so many people that nikon must put me on their marketing team</review_text>
Not much to add to the other positive reviews posted, other than I am another user that loves my D50. Have had it for a year now and shot over 10,000 photos with excellent results (mostly landscape and wildlife).  Excellent image quality and the hand grip fits perfectly to both my hand and my husbands.The only CON I can think of at this time is that there is no backlight on the top panel - this makes it difficult to adjust settings in low/ no light situations. Also, for people that are used to the little compact point & shoot cameras this might seem a little overwhelming at first and bulky to carry around (which is why I have a little pocket camera for my purse). I also got the 18-200 lens and love it - perfect walk around lens</review_text>
The Nikon D50 is my fourth digital camera, and my first SLR camera. I don't know why I didn't try SLR earlier, but now I have decided that I will never go back to non-SLR cameras (well, I still have my other 3 point and shoot digital cameras which sometime is more convenient to carry.) I guess I'm just trying to show how much I like the SLR camera.Now back about the D50. Unless you are shooting sports/actions professionaly (which then you will want to buy the D2H or D2X for faster focusing processor, faster frames per second and larger memory buffer), the D50 is pretty much all you will need (equipped with several lenses of course).The D50 has all the pre-configured settings for the casual photographers ("child" mode is also added for the D50, night landscape mode is not available), and it has the usual P,S,A,M mode for the more serious/advance photographer. I have stopped using the pre-set mode now and strictly uses the aperture priority and the shutter priority mode (as far as the manual mode, I'm not there yet). This shows that this camera is versatile and suitable for all ranges of skills.Comparing with its siblings (D70s, D80, D200), I think whichever you want to buy is fine. They are all great cameras. It comes down to your budget. And comparing to other brand like the canon (Rebel XT or the 30D),or pentax or sony, it will be just brand preference (and what lenses that you already have). Moreover, If you come from a point and shoot camera user, any SLR brand you buy I don't think you will be dissapointed (just the fact that SLR performs better in most important aspect of photography)Image quality of the D50 is good which is #1 factor that I look for in a digital camera.Here are the pros and cons of the D50 in my opinion:Pros:1. Nice out of the camera result picture quality (on Auto setting, and pre-programmed setting)2. Fit perfectly on my hand (grip nicely)3. Instant on and can take picture right away4. 2.5 frames per second5. large 2 inch LCD6. Battery life (will take 400-2000 shots on a single charge depend on how often you use the full power flash)7. Uses SD card8. Fast USB2 connection9. capability to copy and re-size pictures to small size (great for email)10. repeating #1 again. Great image qualityCons (which are mostly minor):1. No backlight on top panel2. No Black and White picture mode3. No night landscape mode4. No ISO 100 (and on ISO 1600 the picture is grainy though still usable)5. No depth-of-field preview button6. No front command dial7. 1/4000 max shutter speedI started using this camera for landscape and portrait, but later on I started shooting sports/action and night (low light) settings, hence I added the Nikon 50mm f/1.8 AF-D which is a great prime lens and I'm recommending to everyone to get this "fast" lens. I'm also recommending you to get the Nikon 70-300M f/4-5.6 AF G, which is a nice (for the price) zoom lens. If you have the budget then go for the Nikon 70-200mm f/2.8 VR AF-S which I think the best zoom lens that nikon currently have. (The VR really works especially for stationary object. If the object you want to photograph is moving and in low light situation/indoor then you will need a "fast" lens, i.e. lens with large aperture such as f/2.8, f/1.8, or f/1.4 etc)Happy Photographing!</review_text>
Make sure to check the compatibility charts to verify that your lenses will work with this before buying it since only a handful of L series lenses are compatible.  If you do already have one or more of these lenses though this is a nice addition.  The AF only works with lenses f/4 and faster on most camera bodies.  You do also give up a little image quality by putting this between your lens and camera body, but the extra reach is really nice</review_text>
I have used the 1.4x II extender for over a year. It gives me amazing detail with my 70-200L f/4 lens on a 20D. I use it mostly for wildlife and butterflies. Contrast is good with colors that pop. When shooting on a sunny day the shutter speeds are still quick with the f/5.6 and the background is blurred beautifully. In shade areas and low light a tripod is a must! There hasn't been any sacrifice in subject detail. I can see individual hairs on butterfly bodies even when shooting wide open. This is a great way to get closer without paying a significant amount for a supertelephoto lens</review_text>
The 1.4X II teleconverter is a modest update to Canon's earlier 1.4X TC.  The mark II allows this extender to be stacked with another of Canon's extenders (either another 1.4X II or the 2X II) without having to separate the two with an extension tube (although the loss of sharpness from stacking extenders may not be acceptable to you).  Otherwise, the quality of the newer 1.4X II is supposed to be very similar to the older model, which I've never owned.The 1.4X II is a great way to extend the reach of compatible lenses.  Note that not every Canon lens is compatible with this extender.  The following is from Canon's Web site: "This tele extender can be used with fixed focal length lenses 135mm and longer (except the 135mm f/2.8 Softfocus lens), and the EF 70-200 f/2.8L, 70-200 f/2.8L IS, 70-200 f/4.0L, and 100-400 f/4.5-5.6L IS zoom lenses."I use it frequently with my Canon 70-200mm f/2.8L IS, which turns it into a 98-280mm zoom.  The extra reach it adds is not tremendous, but it's very welcome when I just need a little more than what the lens alone can give me.I've found no appreciable loss in sharpness from using the 1.4X.  Of course, any extender is going to reduce sharpness to some degree, but with normal examination, I can't distinguish photos taken with the 70-200mm that use the 1.4X from those that don't.  The fact that the 70-200mm f/2.8L is a very sharp lens to begin with helps in this department.Using the 1.4X decreases your lens' widest aperture 'capability' by one stop.  With some lenses, that can be more significant than it appears on the surface; when using a non-pro Canon body (such as my 20D) the lens must have a minimum wide-open aperture 'capability' of f/5.6 for autofocus to work.  The lens doesn't have to be set at f/5.6, it just has to be 'capable' of at least f/5.6 after adjusting for the one stop loss from the 1.4X.  That means with some camera/lens combinations, adding the 1.4X will force you to focus all of your shots manually.  (Note: There is a known 'fix' for this that restores autofocus.  I've never needed to try it, but it involves taping over some connector pins on the 1.4X to fool the camera body.  Proceed with caution if you try this, and do a Google search to learn how to do it right before attempting it.)The 1.4X also reduces focus speed very slightly.  I've only used it on my 70-200mm IS, which has Canon's USM and is a fast-focusing lens to begin with, but the decrease in speed is so slight I really don't notice it.  And it does not affect IS (Image Stabilization) at all.The 1.4X is built to the quality of Canon's L-series lenses, which means that it is weather sealed and will keep a Canon pro body and L-series lens weather sealed when used with them.If you're considering this extender, you're probably also considering Canon's 2X II teleconverter.  I do not own the 2X but did a lot of research on it before ultimately deciding to go with the 1.4X.  The 2X decreases your aperture by two stops, and is reported to have a noticable decrease in sharpness--more than some photographers are willing to live with.  On the other hand, I've never read a review that complained about the loss of sharpness from the 1.4X.If you've already invested a lot of money in telephoto lenses, the 1.4X II is a relatively inexpensive way to get even more reach (and value) out of your investment while adding only a modest amount of bulk to your camera bag.  Highly recommended</review_text>
I was able to use the Canon EF 1.4X II Extender for some nature photography recently in Wyoming.  I shot elk in low light conditions so I was shooting pretty much wide open.  The extender did not compromise the inherent sharpness of the lens at all.  You could see the hairs on the animals heads.  It's fantastic</review_text>
I've had my Canon A510 for over a year and I still love it.  I've taken it on vacation with me several times, including one trip to Yellowstone Park, where I took about 1000 pictures.  It's great.  It's small and light and I like the way it fits my hand.  It's fast. I never have to spend time waiting on it.  It takes great pictures!  It uses 2 batteries and the batteries last longer than my last camera lasted using 4.  The only problem I've had is that occassionally the lens cover will stick and not completely open.  I can just barely touch it with my finger and it unsticks and opens the rest of the way so that's not a major issue</review_text>
My mom & I have each have one of these cameras.  Neither, one of us has had any problems until recently.  I dropped mine while taking pictures with the timer. The drop on my tile floor smashed the telescoping lens out of alignment and wouldn't close and gave a E8 error on the screen. I contacted the canon US website then, I sent it into the canon repair center in IL. It cost $87 to have it repaired and shipped back.  It took about a week and a half to have it returned to me.The only thing I would improve about this camera is the speed, I had trouble taking pictures of my son on the merry go round(but it could be that I need to change settings). It has many features on it and accessories to add on.  Since, I am learning more about digital photography this is a great little starter camera to have with many features that canon is known for.  Also recently I've been looking at some of the newer canon models, their casing/ bodies look/feel really cheap to me.  It may make them lighter but it makes me really afraid that I would break them</review_text>
It does what it's supposed to do. Nothing more, nothing less. If it were a little cheaper, I would have given it 5 stars.</review_text>
I initially bought this switch to be able to take fireworks pictures with my 30D on a tripod.  It worked well for this application.  Got some GREAT shots of the fireworks.  Have since used it for some wildlife photos and it works well in this application also.  The cord from the camera to the switch is only about two feet long.  Sufficient for use on a tripod, but perhaps just a little short for any other application for the switch.I consider it "overpriced" for what it is, but if you need a manually operated remote switch, it performs this function well.  The release button has an option where you can lock-it "ON".  It's useful if you what to leave your camera's shutter open for a long exposure.I didn't research any other brands of remote switches for my Canon 30D.  There may be others, but I was in a hurry to have something before the 4th of July, and just ordered it, since I knew is was suppose to work with my camera.It performs it's intended design function.  It's overpriced, in my estimation, but if you need one, this one will perform the job.</review_text>
Typically fine original design by Canon. I have a "Chinese" copy - it really is - and it works but it's not the same as having the mfr's own.</review_text>
This is a good tool, does the job well, and serves the purpose, but is a little overpriced and Canon keeps changing connectors, forcing us to buy new accessories which is a wrong practice against the consumer.I give a 4 Star because of Canon, not because of the product.If you are willing to pay for it, it's a good product.</review_text>
The RS-80N3 works as advertized. The cable could have been longer but other than that I am totally pleased</review_text>
This camera is pretty good, it's very fast, the photo quality is excellent, video recording mode is awesome, and is perfect to carry everywhere since it's pretty small, but after several months of normal use, the metal case begins to look pretty rusted, that's why i dont give this camera a 5 star rating.But check the flickr photos, you will see examples of the great photo quality of the camera</review_text>
I just finished a semester in Brisbane, Australia. I must say, in retrospect, the best thing I took with me on this trip was this camera. She is a champ, definitely an adventurous camera. The thing is cute as hell yet solid like a rock. I cannot remember the amount of times I dropped it in the sand, with no negative consequences whatsoever. I even dipped it in the ocean by mistake once (not encouraged) and the thing still works like a charm.It also has features like Sepia and a weird flash that makes lights do something funny, making the pictures wicked cool.The outer covering has shown wear, but it only helps to acknowledge that this camera can take rough handling. People even comment on this on a positive light, it has become a part of my travelling gear.It is also great for scenic shots, and has the panorama option.In retrospect, it was an amazing buy, and so affordable (I'm on a backpackers' budget)!Only because I have seen amazing skies and breathtaking scenery would I consider upgrading to a camera with better pixelage. But if you are staying in hole-in-the-wall hostels or sleeping on the beach, you don't want to have an expensive camera on you.This thing is great. The battery life is also great (for the sake of topping off the cake)</review_text>
Hello All,Lens hoods are pretty much a necessity, but this has to be the mostly poorly made hood I've ever used. Unlike other hoods that screw on, this one requires you to press to opposing clips and then slide the hood one, and release the clips. This leads to problems of alignment, meaning both sides of the clip need to be perfectly aligned in order for the hood to fit right. Although it's a pain and I hate...I don't really have another alternative. Either go w/o a hood, or take this one. Either way, guess I'd rather have a hood on the lense than not having one</review_text>
I own this hood and Canon Digital Rebel XT.I like the hood. It works well limiting stray light as well as protecting the lens.As you will hear from many experienced photographers (I'm an amateur), they would never shoot pictures without the hood on the lens so why would you?All hoods are expensive for what they are, a piece of plastic, but they serve a necessary function.Get the hood if you want the best from your lenses, including this lens the 50mm f1.8 II.I would give it 5 stars but it is pricey</review_text>
I needed a lens hood for my 50mm lens and paying $25 for a hood on a $75 lens might seem ridiculous. However, that might be because the $75 lens is so inexpensive. If the lens was $250 then paying an extra 10% might not seem too bad.  I just saw the total cost of the lens and hood for $100 and that's good for a terrific prime lens and its hood.However, please note: the lens hood is rather shallow (1 star reduction) and it is a screw-on two piece kit (1 star reduction). One piece is the adaptor that screws-on where the filters normally go (UV Filter) in front of the lens and is intended to be a permanent integral part of the lens and the second piece is the hood that snaps on and off this adaptor. The adaptor ring retains the same 52mm rim size so your protective filter can go before or after the adaptor.(1 Bonus Star) Because $100 is still a bargain for a 50mm, f1.8, super fast, super sharp, super clear, light weight beginner lens and hood kit!I hope this helps rather than confuse. :)</review_text>
It works great with my EF 50mm f/1.8 II lens.  The price of this hood with ring seems pricy compare to the lens price, but it does the job when it's really needed.</review_text>
Wow... Now if you really want to see a rip-off, here it is. Not to be damaging to Amazon.com but hey for the 50mm just get some carboard and tape it to the front to shield it from the sun. The hood is definitely not worth it</review_text>
First off this is a very nice lens for the money. I have had mine now for about three months and love it. It is a great walk around lens the 28-135 is just right for most pictures of kids and landscape pictures. It has a fast focus and sharp clear pictures clear up to the 125 range gets a little soft at 135 but easily fixed with a little post editing. I have taken most of my pictures hand held and the IS works great. I even recommended it to a friend. I am using it on the 30D and it spends most of its time there. I am not sorry I purchased this lens and will be taking a lot more pictures with it in the future.</review_text>
I use this all the time at my son's soccer games and get great shots. It's a little on the bigger side, but isn't too heavy and image stabilization really helps out</review_text>
I have always used third party lenses before but after trying this Canon I have to say I am impressed with the quality, it feels like a solid piece of equipment rather than a hunk of lightweight plastic.I find my photos to be much sharper due to the IS and the lens itself. I have tremors in my hands and so was having a difficult time with a normal lens but the IS has helped tremendously for that.I like the range of zoom as it is pretty much all purpose for me( have used the kit lens only once since i got this lens when i needed a wider angle). I could occasionally/rarely use a little more distance but nothing is perfect.My only complaint is that the lens is heavy and pretty much doubles the weight of my camera( Rebel xt). You know it's around your neck after a few hours shooting.I haven't had any focus hunting problems,which i had constantly with the 3rd party lenses. and the lens is very quiet which is imo a good thing.For a reasonably priced lens it is well worth the money</review_text>
This can be a great 'only lens' for the day.  Good weight vs capability for handing most photo opportunities you'll come across.  Good price for the versatility the IS function provides</review_text>
This is a great lens that can be used for almost everything.  It is great if you only want to take one lens with you.  Pictures are very sharp and the color is good</review_text>
I originally purchased a 30D with the low-end kit lens - to me the pricing didn't really make sense to get either the body or the higher-end IS kit lens. I was looking for a good all-purpose zoom with full-size sensor covereage in case I move up the Canon ranks to a new pro-level model in the future.The 28-135 fits the bill nicely. Although it is fairly heavy, the difference in build and image quality between the 18-55 kit lens is incomparable. This lens takes beautiful pictures and operates flawlessly. I highly recommend it as a day-to-day lens, and the IS is a nice feature for extending the range down a few stops without moving up to the much more expensive faster lenses</review_text>
I bought the Rebel XT w/ the 18-55 lens exactly 18 hours before the XTI was introduced, but that's another story. As this is my first DSLR, I was blown away by the results. But after the initial euphoria, there is always room for improvement. My first choice was the 28-200, favoring the longer zoom over the IS, but I found this one used at Penn Camera and got a deal on it and a 380EX flash, so the decision was made for me.I like the zoom range, it's great for framng portraits. If I need wider angle, I still have the kit lens.I won't make the usual complaints about the herky-jerky zoom ring or the rackety extension tubes, as I was prepared for this by these reviews before I ever saw the lens.I'm no expert on sharpness, and still trying to get myself dialed in, but my shots so far look pretty sharp to me. I have no "L" lenses to compare to, nor would I make the comparison if I did.In my somewhat uninformed opinion, this is a great step up from the kit lens. This is a lens a working guy can afford and most likely get great results with. Being a working guy, I'm extremely happy with it so far, and glad I made the purchase.</review_text>
This is a cheap lens - old design, very plastic - that can prove terribly useful for those on a budget who want a wider perspective, especially on 1.6x crop factor dSLRs.I learned about "cheap" with this lens - broke the focus ring the day after delivery.  But I blame myself too, and the replacement's given me no trouble, though I think my first one was a bit sharper than the second.By many standards, this lens will match or exceed zoom lens of comparable price (as a prime lens should).  Autofocus is a little buzzy, but the main time you'll notice is when it loses its bearing and suddenly lurches way off target.  Mostly, focuses quickly enough and well.  Some chromatic aberration in worst-case scenarios, but nothing awful or unexpected.  Vignetting, even on a 1.6x crop, can be noticeable, mainly in sky shots, but gradual rather than sudden.  (Might be unacceptably worse on a full-frame camera.)  Undue distortion seems minimal - haven't really checked but also haven't really noticed, if you see what I mean.  Flare seems average, perhaps better than one would expect from such wide glass.  Bokeh is nonchalant, not dreamy but never intrusive.But at the price, the positives make up for the negative and "average" tendencies.  It's vibrantly colorful and contrasty almost to a fault.  Hard light is a little more challenging with this lens, a little more tricky to balance exposure between highlights and shadows.  It's softish wide-open, but very unobjectionably - have yet to regret shooting at f/2.8.  My main lens is a 50mm f/1.4, and switching back and forth on the same aperture setting is perfectly functional in practice.  Lose a little crisp for taking in four times as much space, and that's a trade-off I can run with.  (Their filter threads match too.)  At f/4 and higher, I get "plenty sharp," though I've never seen "unreal sharp" from this glass (as I have from the 50mm)."Crop factor" over-simplifies the effect of mounting a wide-angle lens on a 1.6x camera.  Yes, the field of view will match 40mm on a full-frame, but the perspective will not, because you'll be closer to your subjects.  Shooting live subjects (like bands, models, or street life) will require a learning curve, so beware mission critical work before you've broken yourself in so you can anticipate its exagerations.That said, I bought this lens primarily for "head-to-toe" model shooting in my modest studio, and it's been a real asset.  Interestingly, it tends toward a very useful "slimming effect" that makes hippy girls look more slender and shorter girls more ambiguous in height (at least at the "head-to-toe" distance from them).  Disconcerting at first but terribly useful once you've gotten the hang of it.  (Beware chicken legs or the reverse from dramatic perspectives.)I read every review I could find before purchase, and this lens seemed to be a magic middle between the higher cost clarity of the 20mm and the cheaper lesser sharpness of the 28mm.  Near as I can tell, I nailed it.  This is not a spectacular lens, but a very very functional one if you need an affordable wider angle that generally won't let you down</review_text>
My existing battery aged and I started to look forward a replacement. After I read several reviews, I preferred to choose the original one, because of heating and performance problems. Therefore, I found a good bundle price If I'd selected the cord, battery and case for my sd100 camera. By the way, I did not have a good case as this new one. I rated 4 stars, because I preferred to stay with the original cord</review_text>
It would cost you more to buy these separately.  The battery alone could cost this much.  The rest of the accessories have come in handy.  I originally wanted this only for the battery, but now, I have options.Great value.  Buy it</review_text>
I am am very happy with this package. The only issue, the thick stainless steel neck strap. I had no use for it and I have never seen anyone using it. I would prefer to have another extra battery or have the existing battery be an extended life one.Overall, for the price you cannot get a leather case and battery combo from somewhere else for the same price at Amazon. I consider the neck strap an unnecessary component as the one that comes with the camera is lighter and more flexible. it is also more elegant.</review_text>
If you've bought the Sd550, this is a great addition, the case has saved my camera a couple of times already from scratches and dings (especially with little kids around), the extra camera chord is long and durable (coated metal link chain) and the extra battery of course is invaluable.  I'd give it 5 stars, if I didn't feel that these items should come standard with the camera. :</review_text>
After researching numerous websites looking for a Canon fitted case for my new camera, I again turned to Amazon and found just what I was looking for at the lowest price.  The leather case fits well and isn't bulky, just protective.  Now I don't have to worry about  damaging the camera by dumping it in my purse with everything else so it can always be handy for impromptu shots.  The neat, comfortable neck strap was just an added bonus</review_text>
I rated accessory kit 3 as well.  Gave Kit 3 a 3 star.  I gave kit 2 to my mom who just got a SD550.  Great camera from what I can tell.  This kit however needs major improvements.  Going from the best about kit 2, to the worst about it, we will be starting with a review of the battery pack.Battery...Uhhh, not much to say here. Spare battery that to use as a hot spare out there if your running low after taking too many shots.  Mine from kit 3 is great and I still use it to this day. I swap the active battery each time I charge.  This is what gave this product as many stars as I have given it.Final decision (Battery): WONDERFULNeck Strap...  (Taken from Kit 3 and added improvements)If your moving around this thing is WAY to long or way to short. It's too short to strap across you chest. It's way to long because if it hangs in front of you, your precious camera you just paid a couple to a few hundred for is now freely bouncing around. NOT good.  My mom is really short and this is just too short for her to use as well.  Not as much of a bouncing issue as me but still not useful enough for her.   Her comment was, "This strap is either too short or too long.  Doesn't fit me at all." Cracks me up because I never told her my personal opinion of the matter and she came up with the same results.Final Decision (Neck Strap): use it for a jump drive that you use often or anything else. Just not your precious camera.Case...They screwed up on Kit 3, and this kit is still screwed up (managed to be even worse than kit 3).  Velcro is fine for most usage so I can't knock that.  Belt clip is fine and dandy.  Case is pretty darn good at keeping the camera safe from outside elements and harm.  Hole in center is useless as heck just like kit 3 (mom came to same conclusion). Here's where they REALLY screwed up.Stitching in this case is worse than kit 3.  In kit 3, you only had to worry about stitching screwing up your screen in the back of the case.  In this case, you have stiching in the back AND the front.  Unlike kit 3 which had a magnetic clasp where the stitching or any attachment to the case was hidden behind a soft cloth, this one is velcro and the stitching for that is on the inside front.  The belt clasp has stiching on the other side.  No escape in this kit.  I HIGHLY advise for you to get a screen protector if using this case.  Poor design and shame on the people who manufacture this case.Final Decision (Case): "Move along people... nothing to see here."  Seriously... don't bother using this case without a screen protector.COMPLETE DECISION:  I wouldn't buy this kit again at all.  It's great that there's an extra battery but I don't think anything else is worth a penny more in this kit.  Better off buying everything seprate.  Going to lower my rating to 2 stars</review_text>
Although this is a good batch of accessories, the camera case itself is a little unhandy at times.  It has no carry strap -- the camera strap sticks out through a slit in the top.  So, if you want to carry the case by a strap and you decide to take a picture, you must open the case, pull the camera's strap through the slit, then lift the camera out.  It would not keep me from buying this but it does make it unhandy</review_text>
I have been working for a major daily newspaper in Baltimore for 2 decades. Perhaps that will qualify me as an expert in photography. I have been shooting digital imagery since the late 1990s. Maybe that qualifies me as an expert in digital photography. This may be long- winded, but it's extensive and can be useful.I received the Nikon D2H camera -- 2 bodies total -- over one year ago. I think I got them shortly after the D2H system was released in 2003. Since then, I have used them to shoot images of all types -- documentary, sports, daytime, available light, flash, and dead- of- night -- for the paper I work for. This is the only camera I work with.First, please read the manual. There is a ton of information there, and the information is terrific to begin with. The D2H is highly- configurable, with screen after screen that you can set for your own specific use (resist lending the camera to anyone for a long period of time, for your camera may be returned with many of your settings changed so much that it acts like a thoroughly different camera).I'll just punch right in to the way it feels. The camera is a rather heavy beast, and for some, there can be an amount of shoulder or neck fatigue when using it for hours per day, like I do. But the camera feels well in hand and the controls are easy to move through. I've long since given up using any camera bag. All I have are a fanny pack for a 14mm, 55mm, teleconverters and 2 extra camera batteries and flashes clipped to its belt. And the D2H's hold the 17-35mm Nikon and the 80-200mm Nikon one- touch or the Sigma 120-300mm 2- touch.Shooting is a breeze. The batteries let you shoot long before the need to recharge. I have my D2H set on ISO 200 or 400 most of the time and sacrifice shutter speed for lower ISO as often as I can, because the higher ISOs bring digital noise and a loss in color saturation. Just today, I purchased digital noise plug ins for Photoshop to limit this, and that's a wonderful thing to invest in with this camera when you must shoot action photography with no flash at ISO 800 and above.I now have little problems with capturing images in even barely- limited lighting. I recently shot stars and a plane wing from my seat of an Airbus at 36,000 feet over the Pacific at 30 seconds wide open @ f/ 2.8, and it looks tons better than night shots via the D1H, which lacked the internal digital noise filter. That filter kicks in at around 1/2 second and longer exposures, and can make you wait as long as your image you've shot to strip your long exposure of much of the digital noise. When you shoot this way (and in general), don't simply react by cranking up ISO because you will not be happy with your results.The camera can be loud. At over 7 frames per second, it can make you obvious in a quiet room. Shooting sensitive situations can be testy, so limit your shooting to single frames. I wish this camera had an option to silence this camera, but since the mirror has to raise and lower, there's no chance to do this.Am I happy with the D2H? Definitely, yes. Are there improvements that can be made? Yes. But the benefits outweigh the drawbacks. People have been bailing out of using the Nikon system and going Canon, which has some incredible gear, I won't deny that. But instead of simply giving up on your system of equipment, learn how to use the D2H well and you'll be much happier than ever. And that means you should push its qualities to the max while respecting its limitations.For instance, white balance. This can be the best thing for you, or the worst thing you've ever dealt with, depending upon how you approach it. Daylight, grey skies, dusk and dawn are easy, because you can set the camera to daylight, flash, shadow (for dusk and dawn times) and even the fluorescent and incandescent tend to be right in the ballpark. But the horrible mixed light or the street lamps that glow blue/green or orange- red from mercury vapor can be the death of an image if you don't properly use white balance. Preset white balance is king, here. I can get grey, black and white when I preset in mercury vapor light. And I used the preset for any light that the auto white balance setting can't figure. There is also a setting to dial in kelvin temps as well! If you do this (and I can go on for miles here), you're on your way. So, with trying this D2H, or considering it, read through some of the digital D2H forums and ignore the posts that slam the camera without giving instances. Generally, those who pan the camera have not tried to understand it. I can bang off images to disprove where they suggest this camera will fail. When you have decent light, you'll have a decent image. But when you try to use it without learning how you can maximize the system, you will come about shooting images that are terrible and unprintable.In closing, I have not been paid by anyone, I have no Nikon stock and have no outside interest in writing this except that I'm giving the D2H credit where it's long overdue</review_text>
I ordered this camera in December, have had it since then, and it an amazing camera. First time I have ever had professional camera, and it takes time to learn how to use it. It is not a point and shoot camera. If you want large pictures and like to crop, this may not be the camera for you. However if you want the ability to take great pictures, and learn how to use a professional camera at a great price this is the one to buy.Ability to have custom curves, which means to have predetermined parameters for different conditions. Ability to chage ISO at random for different conditions.  You can pay five thousand dollars for its successor, the Dx2, however for $2000 this is a bargin that you will never find again.Jim Comfor</review_text>
I bought the battery grip, based on the fact that my Rebel XT  is a small camera, when using it at my last model shoot, someone mentioned it looked like a tourist camerawhich is pretty depressing, since adding the grip not only do I have more than enough battery life to my camera , it also has that pro look that people recognize, and even though I still believe that it's not the camera, it's the eye behind it that counts, having a good looking camera is always welcome</review_text>
Now that i have had this on my camera for a while now, my camera feels so weird with it off, i love the grip it gives and the extra battery life is great for those all day shooting events that i go to. I wish the buttons were the same plastic/chrome color as the ones on the camera but its a well built product and works fine so i cant complain</review_text>
I tried this product out at local camera store before I was sold on the idea. The two main things I was concerned about were how does it attach and does it add too much weight to the camera.The attaching to the camera was a little concerning, I was worried that it may damage the camera. But, after watching the guy at our local camera shop put one on a Rebel I was sold. Basically you remove the door to the battery compartment. Which comes off a lot easier than I anticipated. The grip slides in like a battery and you screw it on the bottom of the camera. Don't worry their is another hole on the bottom of the grip for the tripod.The grip does add weight but its not that significant and I noticed it adds a lot of stability while holding it. Since the grip adds height to the camera its easier to hold the camera in one hand. Much like holding one of the more expensive models. It also adds battery life since the grip holds two batteries.If you hold the new grip to take pictures with the camera on its side. You will be pleasantly surprised to see a duplicate set of buttons and the scroll wheel added on the new grip just for that purpose. It is now a permanent attachment and I am glad I decided to buy it. The buttons work just as well as the camera even at 3fps.Another note is that the quality of the Canon grip is much better than the cheaper version.</review_text>
Don't be mislead, this is an ab-so-lu-te-ly great product REGARDLESS if you have big or small hands. And it fits the new Rebel XTi (400D) too!!My hands are small, but before the BG-E3 grip I had no real use for the fifth and fourth fingers (except tucking them underneath the XT's small body.) With the BG-E3,  the hand grip is firm and the whole hand grabs the camera. This gives you an extra feeling of pleasing assurance, not an unnecessary sensation.Better still, the front panel of the BG-E3 is rubberized so the bottom half of your hand won't slip away (Canon should have covered the camera's own grip with that material instead of using the average plastic that makes the body mould.)Having a little extra weight is NOT a problem, rather it always comes handy as a counterbalance for you zoom lenses (say in the 300mm range).In short, this accessory gives the Rebel camera user a welcome feeling of overall control and the sensation of having a more professional gear in your hand. The extra slot for a second battery, of course is a plus.I'm selling my XT as soon as the new XTi is available, and it's nice to know the investment I made not long ago with this Grip, will prove to be useful when I switch.  Now, if only the future  40D (who knows) were to have the same compatibility...</review_text>
I bought this for a trip and not only did it fit my purpose but it makes the camera look even cooler than it already looks.  I had several people stop me and ask me what it was so I got a chance to explain how it benefited me</review_text>
I've used a battery grip on almost every Canon camera I've owned since 1980. This Rebal XT battery life seems to be almost forever and with the battery grip, that gets doubled.The grip also allows you to use regular batteries so you could use them should the rechargables ever die on you and need to keep shooting.It adds another shutter release button for turning the camera 90 degrees.Larger hands would probably find the camera more comfortable with more grip area.It adds more mass which can be a pro (a little more stability) or a con (heavier to carry around).It would have been nice if Canon could have slightly remolded it to stand the camera up. As it is, the camera will lean forward on it lense.Bottom Line: I'm glad I purchased but think it could have been much cheaper. When you consider (way back when) these types of devices added a motor winder (standard on modern film SLRs and not used on digital cameras) along with added battery capacity. All this adds is additonal battery capacity.The price is the reason for 4 stars instead of 5. Of course most businesses don't care as long as people are buying.Mark</review_text>
A neccesary add to the Cannon Rebel. A Good product. Too bad it doesn't come with the camera</review_text>
I took the plunge and bought the BG-E3 Battery Grip from Canon.  After reading the reviews of the off-brand model and deciding that I didn't want any 'button' problems, I got the Canon.  I'm VERY happy with it, (not from the standpoint of having the extra battery capacity because I have 2 batteries at all times anyway) but because I like the 'look and feel' of having the additional weight and fit for my large male hands.  I felt that without it, I might drop the camera at any time and while it's safely suspended about my neck, I don't like that feeling.I also like being able to spin the camera for portrait or landscape shots very quickly and cleanly and having that extra set of buttons available to change the Tv and Av settings for various effects.  I got some exceptionally nice photos of a waterfall and this made it easy to use.  If you're thinking about buying it, it's worth every hard-earned penny and should significantly enhance both professional and amateur uses</review_text>
Canon's BG-E3 battery grip is one awesome extra you cannot be without.  I found the extra weight and size NOT to be even a minor burden.   I rec'd product 2 days after initial receiving date/17th St Photo did a fantastic job (once again)</review_text>
If you're serious about photography, get this accessory.  With the second battery, I get plenty of juice for any event (even with my zoom lens using Image Stabilization).  Gives a solid grip for taking vertical (portrait) pictures while still having access to the controls you need.  I can't imagine being without it now (in spite of the additional weight).</review_text>
I had no investment in a DSLR but narrowed my choices to the Canon 30D and the Nikon D200. I had always wanted a Nikon. The D200 is definitely a joy to hold and it did take good pictures (I tried both at a camera store before I bought the 30D). I did a lot of research (more than I care to admit!) and there was no conclusive evidence that one camera had a clear edge over the other. Depending on your specific needs, one camera may be "slightly better" than the other.After trying out both cameras, I was convinced the 30D was as good a fit for my needs as the D200. For "value for money" the 30D was a clear winner over the D200 (I got mine when Canon had the Cash in with Canon promotion going). Also, as a beginner to SLR I found the 30D with its fully automatic and scene modes easy to start out with. I don't expect to use the scene modes or the full auto mode after a week or two. I expect to quickly graduate to the creative control zones. But to use as a family camera, the quick scene modes are very helpful. If you expect to use it more on a professional basis it'd probably not matter.Additionally, when I checked it out at the store, I noticed the Canon 30D focused sharply almost every time. The D200 did not at least a few times. I'd take this with a grain of salt though since it was a brief trial at a store. But I thought I'd share my experience. It may have just been an anomaly with the actual equipment I tried out.Do I still find the Nikon D200 to be a great camera? Absolutely! Do I regret having bought a Canon 30D? Absolutely not! The decision swinger in my case was really the "money factor". I was more than willing to spend up to $300 more for the Nikon D200. But when the difference became $550 it no longer became justifiable for my Christmas gift to myself:-)My purchases included the Canon 30D [...], Canon 17-85mm EF-S IS USM lens [...], and a SanDisk Extreme III 2GB compact flash card [...]I plan to add an external flash to this soon, and will consider eventual lenses after I determine that the camera is a long-term keeper.</review_text>
My 2 year old is really active and my point and shoot camera cannot keep up with him.  And I also don't like the washout look when I uses flash.  So I researched about which SLR will best meet my needs, mainly catching fast action, candid moments and low light photos without flash.  The Canon 30D comes up top on the list.  It has the best high ISO performance in its class (better than Nikon and Sony).  And when I combine the 30D with the fast zoom lens EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS, the result is amazing.  I can stop any action in daylight, capture every candid expression of my 2 yr old with the fast burst mode, and take indoor or night photos without using flash or tripod.  Portraits are also excellent with sharp image and beautifully blurred background (bokeh).  Even the dimly-lit decors of the Disneyland Haunted Mansion came out superb when we went there for the Halloween party at night, without flash or tripod.  This is really an important factor for me to buy this camera, as taking pictures with a tripod is not an option when your subject is an active 2 yr old.  But you will need a good lens to make this work well.  If you use a cheap kit lens, then it will probably not matter which camera you pick.  Remember that these 3 are all very good cameras and the small differences in image quality you see in reviews are apparent only when they use the best prime lens (not the kit lens)and crop the pictures to magnify the details.  The Sony is a very good choice if you are on a budget and don't need low light performance (use flash and save money).  The Nikon has more custom function than Canon, and it is really as good as Canon.  They both have their strength and weakness.  Canon just happens to have slightly better high ISO performance and that suits my need better than Nikon.  To be fair, I should mention that the Nikon D200 tops most reviews as the camera of the year, beating the Canon 30D overall.  But the D200 is a bit too advanced for an amateur like me, better suits someone more serious about photography.  The D80 is like a "mini" D200, but slower.  So it really boils down to what you really need and how much you want to spend.  Shooting in low light without flash will need good high ISO performance, a good fast lens (with wide aperture, usually expensive), and image stabilization.  If that's what you want, the Canon 30D with the EF-S 17-55 mm f/2.8 IS will not disappoint you</review_text>
I compared a number of pro-sumer cameras and became firmly convinced this was the best camera for the money. Although Nikon at one time was considered the premier camera for the professional, they now take second stage to Canon not only for engineering, but for the quality of the lens, innovative and user-friendly design, and overall quality. I have used the camera for approximately one month and have been delighted. Having talken pictures for over 35 years - including professional - and always using Minolta equipment for all of those years, I am truly enamored with this Canon camera</review_text>
I am so pleased with this camera! There's really nothing negative I can think to say about it! I also own the Cannon XT. I use both for wedding photography as well as family portraits and I am so impressed with the color quality of the D30! Well done CANNON</review_text>
This camera is incredible. I ordered it for my husbands birthday and he is just begining to figure it all out. There are so many great features. One of the best is how quickly you can take digital pictures. Our other digital cameras have a lag time between shots, but not this one. The pictures are crisp and it is easy for even a novice like me to use. I highly recommend this camera if you want to take digital photography to the next level. It is one of the best</review_text>
This can be a very easy to use camera. Simply by using the auto mode and composing your pictures properly you can get very good JPEG images. It also can be about as complicated as you want to make it. It has many advanced features on it. I have been shooting 35mm for about 32 years. My most recent before this one being an Elan II E about 7 years ago. It's still working also. The 30d is my first digital and I absolutely love the camera. I generally work in the aperture priority mode with a tripod at 100 ISO when shooting landscape. But, the camera is very capable in auto mode as well without the tripod. I like to shoot RAW so that I can tweek things a bit, but the JPEG images are very acceptable. It also works extremely well for portraits. It actually is better than the 35mm to me because it has very low noise even at higher ISOs. 1600 looks about like 800 film to me. This is a very good value for the money in my opinion</review_text>
For those who truly know digital cameras, having more than perhaps 8 megapixels is important only if you plan on blowing your images up to "poster size", or if you are a pro who knows how to use all those pixels. And truthfully, how many of you really plan to do that type of stuff? To say that the Rebel XTi is better than the 30D because it "has more megapixels" and is "smaller" is not the best advice. Any Canon DSLR is going to give you great images, if know how to use it.  For those of you who are trying to decide which camera to buy, you really need to go to a camera store and ask to handle each camera. While you're at it, ask yourself how it feels in your hands.  Is it too bulky?  Is it too small and hard to handle?  Does it have the features you want such as spot metering, which the Rebel XTi does not have? The 30D is a terrific DSLR. It has all the features 99% of us need. There is a reason why it costs more than the Rebel.  The 30D is a better camera overall.</review_text>
This was a great purchase at $150.  I bought it to shoot amateur pictures of family at youth football games.  The images are sharp across the football field on a sunny day, I use the Canon monopod and recommend it.  It's 75-300mm so I have to switch out lenses to take pictures of people standing close to me.  There was a 28-200mm lens but it was much more expensive and I like having the extra zoom</review_text>
This lens works very well for two amateur photographers like my wife and I. We take photos of our kids in their sports activities. Even though the lens is a little on the heavy side and feels like we are shaking a little when we snap a picture, none of our shots have come out blurry. I am pleasantly surprised by this. We feel it was well worth the price we paid.(under $100</review_text>
This lens is a wonderful starter lens. A professional might want a little upgrade, but this is just right for someone starting out.</review_text>
Be careful when you use this lens because it does not have IS (image stabilizer) so if you have shaky hands and the exposure is any more than 1/8 of a second you are going to going to get some blur. This is why the lens is so cheap. This is especially bad when you are at the far end spectrum of this lens. If you are really zoomed in and it's cloudy then you should know to use a tripod just in case. This goes for any lens, but if you will be using the 300-mm end of this then use a tripod.It's common sense, but I've loaned out this lens and they complained to me afterwards</review_text>
The Canon EF 75-300mm is a Excellent product, I own the expensive USM version and this lense doesn't have nothing to be jealous about it, it's speed to focus is excellent,the main reason i bougth it is for my wildlife photography while kayaking, I wouln't take the USM version on my kayak, to expensive to get it wet, they both perform excellent, but the cheap price of this lense make it affordable and risk proof for your pocket, it's a little noisy but nothing that will affect it's use, plus it is a intimidating peace of equipment, that will make any person think you are a professional photographe</review_text>
I have been trying to find a way to easily carry a lot of camera equipment for quite some time. I have tried backpacks, shoulder bags, duffel bags, but none of them really worked all that well. Then I saw the Lowepro Street and Field system with completely customizable pouches, vests, belts, and accessories. It works great, you only get the pouches you need so there is no waisted space and you can organize them however you want according to how often they are used (put frequently used items in easier to access places.)The variety alone of this system is worth the investment, but the quality and ease of use is also very high which is a big plus. You can get a case for any lens, camera body, or accessory you have. I even have cases for my cell phone and water bottle. One word of caution, be sure to measure your lens with the lens hood on backwards if you use them to make sure that the entire thing will fit into the pouch, because sometimes the lens will fit, but then the lens with the lens hood will not. I often carry 5-6 lenses, extension tubes, teleconverters, extra memory cards and batteries, and a bunch of cleaning supplies and other gadgets, which weights a ton. But when they are evenly distributed on this vest/belt Lowepro system it is actually very manageable.The only down side is that everyone will be staring at you because you have thousands of dollars of camera equipment strapped to your body. But if you can overlook that, this is the way to go. I have used this system at many zoos without ever having problems, in fact just unzipping a single lens and switching seems safer to me than opening an entire bag of equipment every time you want to switch lenses. Many of the cases also come with a built in rain/snow cover so if the weather changes all of your equipment is not destroyed. You can also put just a few pouches on a normal belt when you are just going to take photos in the back yard or don't need to take all of your equipment, which is nice. I really can't say enough about how much easier this makes traveling with a lot of equipment, if you have been hopelessly searching for a better solution, consider this, you won't regret it.</review_text>
Do yourself a favor and leave this camera in its nuclear blast proof packaging.  If you do choose to release it, you will become the proud owner of a "camera" whose most noteworthy attribute is its ability to drain batteries despite showing no other sign of actually functioning.  And if you try to load the included software onto your computer, you will be left with a smoking remnant of a formally functioning hard drive that will require incredible luck or all the computer expertise of Silicone Valley to recover.  Whatever you do, don't expect to get any help from the technical support phone number provided with the camera software.  Apparently, they are overwhelmed with customer complaints, and advise calling back "later" for assistance.  Fat chance.  Their camera destroyed itself, their software nearly destroyed my computer, and I refuse to give their telephone assistance the chance to take out my phone system.  Treat anything from this company like it's a live virus.  Keep your kids, your computer and yourself far, far away.</review_text>
My 6 year old boys each got a camera for Christmas.  They were so excited and had sooo much fun taking pictures.  We went to download the pictures and they weren't in the camera.  I figured the boys deleted the pictures by mistake, so I took pictures and immediately tried to download them and still got the message that there were no pictures in the camera.  I didn't expect great quality pictures, but I did expect that my kids would've gotten to see the pitcures they took!  What a piece of JUNK!  My boys were so dissappointed.  The cameras are both in the trash....what a waste of money.  DO NOT BUY THIS CAMERA if you actually want pictures.</review_text>
Everything went as expected. Price was correct, delivery on time. No problems. Product was exactly as described and expected</review_text>
This is the best batery for your casi.... do not try anything else.... you will regreat</review_text>
This is the original battery for my camera.  If fits perfectly unlike the clone battery I purchased elsewhere. I think that for a digital camera, always buy the original battery. Go for the real deal.</review_text>
I bought two of these for my wife for Christmas and she absolutely loves them! I am extremely impressed by the brightness and clarity of the LCD. I also love how easy it is to load up new pictures - just save .JPGs onto a supported memory card and pop the card in the frame. It couldn't be easier. Great way for family members to share photos! My wife loves loading up memory cards (which are so inexpensive these days) with photos of our son and sending them out to family members and friends across the country</review_text>
I bought one for myself and love it. Just bought a second and third for gifts for family memebers. Easy to use and great way to enjoy those pictures you otherwise leave on a disc or in a box. The quality is great</review_text>
Digital picture frames must have been one of the hottest Christmas gifts in 2006 as I couldn't find one anywhere and had to give an IOU. Having just purchased and received the Philips frame, it was well worth the wait</review_text>
I just received this as a birthday present, and am very happy with the display.  I had seen some Digital Photo frames during Black Friday sales, but all of them had very lousy displays with images that looked very pixelated.  This one looks great.  The 720x480 resolution is very suitable, and the 6.5" diagonal size is perfect for a desktop frame, although it's a bit small if you wanted to hang it on the wall.There are two areas for improvement.  First is in Mac support.  I'm a Mac user, and while it shows up on the desktop as a USB drive allowing pictures to be dragged and dropped to it, it would be nice to see some iPhoto integration.  Specifically, I'd like to see a custom export plugin where I simply select photos or an album in iPhoto, and then it would automatically scale them down to 720x480 and copy them onto the internal storage of the frame.  The documentation doesn't even make mention of Mac support at all, they should at least state that it can be used with a Mac and document the alternatives for getting your pictures displayed, even if they don't provide any software.Secondly, the controls on the frame itself are a bit awkward.  I think some work with some human-computer interaction experts coud have improved the interface.  I was able to accomplish what I needed to do, but there were definite areas for improvemnt.With the real differentiator these days being the display quality, I would definitely recommend this product to others that I've looked at.  The Mac support and frame controls are a minor inconvenience, at best</review_text>
I did my research before purchasing this particular frame and found a lot of praise for the Philips brand of digital frames.  I've not been dissapointed AT ALL!  It's REALLY easy to set up and the photo resolution is incredible.  I actually bought a Kodak version originally, and returned it because it seemed low quality.  The Philips is a major upgrade from the Kodak</review_text>
I ordered this for my parents, so they can watch their first grandchild all day long :)  I haven't spent a lot of time with it because I won't be keeping it, but I used it enough to load a bunch of pictures on it for them and found it to be very easy to use, with a great picture</review_text>
I am delighted with this product. I am really grateful to all of the reviewers of this and other similar products. The image on this unit is fabulous! I have not had any problems with it whatsoever. One improvement I would like to see is in the stand that helps the unit to prop itself up. It would benefit from having a more secure attachment to the picture frame so that when you pick up the frame, the stand comes with it. This isn't any kind of a major issue and so long as you know how it works, you just pick up the frame and the stand at the same time. I would HIGHLY recommend this product for the price.</review_text>
The life on this battery is so much longer than my stock battery for my camcorder (Canon ZR70), I no longer have to worry about keeping it charged. I can also use my viewscreen more often instead of doing everything through the eyepiece. My camcorder experience is improved because of it and I can focus on the video and not worry if my battery starts to run out.</review_text>
does a decent job especially for the price I like the sd card I have a reader on my PC and just plug them in not a 500 dollar unit but I have filmed our racecar with it and burned it to a cd and it looks about like tv good enough for a memory booste</review_text>
I've been using a Sony Cybershot 2.1 Megapixel for the past few years and except for the BATTERY DRAIN I've been very pleased with it as I am only interested in my camera for snap shots.  I bought my DXG-301 (New) off ebay for $76 delivered and they even threw in a 128 MB SD Card!  FIRST of all, I read the owners manual (many don't seem to) and then spent an hour "playing" with the Still picture functions (not interested in video).  What was I looking for in a digital camera?A CCD rather than a CMOS sensor, the sensitivity of the CCD (ISO 100-400) does much better than the CMOS with normal indoor lighting WITHOUT the flash (battery drain!).  The DXG-301 meets these requirements.A minimum of 3 megapixel (recommended) resolution in case I ever wish to print out any of my pictures (rare).  The DXG meets that requirement.An optical zoom of at least 6X.  Not with the DXG301V, it only has a 4X digial zoom, nothing is perfect I guess.LONG battery life!  The DXG301 comes through with flying colors.  Using rechargeable batteries I played with the camera for over an hour with and without the flash. Their was little battery drain and it only took about 4-5 seconds to recharge the flash.  OUTSTANDING!Software.  Looked OK but I'll use the photo editor I already have on my PC.Small, handy size,  With my bifocals I had some difficulty reading the control button labels but the LCD Screen gave no problems. I think it's just a question of my becoming more familiar with the contols.The manual ajustments for the various settings are a major plus.  I'll "perfect" my settings in due course after additional experience.In short I'm VERY pleased with the DXG301 as a STILL picture camera. Does it rival a $500 mini camera? Nope but the DXG301V will go places I wouldn't risk an expensive camera. It will "get the job done" for me.  The video part is an "extra" I probably won't use unless I see a flying saucer. I'd gladly pay $100+ for this camera .</review_text>
camera works great, took it on my vacation and used it , videos cme out great !!!!!</review_text>
I purchased the DC DXG-301V Digital Video Recorder for my son who will be graduating this year from high school and he thought it would be fun to record his last few months with his friends. It's easy to use and very compact and if you're like me, if your child is happy then you're happy</review_text>
This camera is outstanding for the price. Features are mimimal but if you just want to take email quality and archival videos, you'll be fine. Batteries run down quickly but check this out:YOU CAN GO ON EBAY AND GET NOKIA CELL PHONE BATTERIES FOR 5.00 WHICH ARE THE SAME AS THE ADVERTISED BATTERIES WHICH COST 30-50$ I recharge it using my DELL PDA charger and it holds a charge for several hours of taping. Hope this helps</review_text>
This is a great digital camera. I have no problems with it. i got it for my 1st anniversary 2 yrs ago. Its great! You can take pictures, and put xmas, valentines or birthday borders around them b4 you take the picture. It does video too, you can play back the video, but there is no sound because there is no speaker on the camera, there is a mic thuigh. So when you download the video, it will play the sound too. The camera has survivied being dropped many times. I would like to take long videos, so I am going to purchase a 4gb sd card. I feel sorry for all the people i saw complaining about the camera because i have no problems for 2 years now. The only thing is that the  batteries die quickly ( using the flash really drains the battery), so I went and bought high quality rechargable batteries, or the disposable duracell meant for digital cameras. also to the people who complained about blurry pictures, it depends what setting you have the camera on. I do not like all those different setings, they just mess up the pic. And do not use the auto feature I always use the non auto, egulr pic, with flash. All those other settings are confusing . Oh yes and great self timer for when you have noone to hold the camera</review_text>
I have no complaints. I have had this camera for over a year and a half and it has been reliable, fast, and gives me crisp, quality photos! The only option I wish this camera had was a better stabilization mode to prevent blurred pictures, but the software edits the blur without reducing the quality. Blurry pictures are not a problem as long as you know how to aim and shoot. Everyone loves playing with my camera because it has many cool features to make your photos fun! I highly recommend this camera (especially to beginners or for those who just want a simple camera that can capture those precious moments, with high quality photos). Excellent camera overall! ;</review_text>
So this was my first digital camera, got it last july for my birthday. I go to a lot of concerts, so i needed a camera that could take pictures in not good light and take pics of moving subjects. Well, two days after i got it, i was at a festivale watching my fav band perform and the the screen went white. It would still take pics, only you couldnt see them. After changing the batteries and turnign it off and on, it went back to normal. Alarmed, i called Samsung and they told me the couldnt do anythign until it was white again. It only did it a couple of times after that so i never called again.But that was only one thing wrong with it. This is a horrible camera for concerts, the pictures are always blurry. Shoot, even when im at my house the pics still come out blurry sometimes. Tuesday i went to see my fav band again, and the dumb thing goes white. It woudnt stop, no matter how many times i turned it off and on again. Now the flash is broke and i'm ready to throw it against the wall. You can't trust this camera. You never know when it will take good pics or bad pics.I wouldnt even consider buying this camera for a minute!</review_text>
I was extremely impressed with this camera; I felt the only not exceptional feature was its nonwithstanding aptitude for steady shots. Other than that, I felt it was fantastic, and exceeded all expectations</review_text>
great size and shape for taking along places. feels good in your hand. boots up pretty quick. like the color. impressed with features. takes decent pictures. has internal memory, as well as taking a memory card. i suggest getting a set of good rechargable batteries.</review_text>
I owned one of the previous models that was originally sold throughWallgreens as a returnable "one-time use" video camera.The theory was that you didn't actually "own" the camera.You would pay $30 for it; shoot some videos;then return it to the store and get a DVD of your videos.But of course, people figured out how to hack the camerato add a USB cable and download the videos, so you didn't needto return the camera to get the videos.So this new PSV-351 looks like the "legit" model that Pure Digitalcame out with to satisfy the demand of all the people buying theolder models and never returning them. Smart move! Instead of complaining,give pople what they want. If you can't beat 'em join 'em.Even at three times the price of what I paid for my hacked versionI would easily buy another legit one.I loved my hacked PSV. I kept telling people that "Pure Digitalshould sell these!" It's a very simple camera. It doesn't tryto pretend to be more than it is. It has very few features.But what it does do it does well. You push the big red button and it records good quality video (quality is impressive for the price).I'm a big fan of simple products that  work well -- like a Nintendo or an iPod.This camera looks a bit like a toy, but it's durable.This would actually make a good toy for a kid or an adult.The ergonomics are nice. It's comfortable to hold.The quality of construction is very good.I like the fact that it runs on two ordinary AA batteries, soyou don't need a charger.I would buy another one of these -- or maybe even a few of them.Buy a bunch of them and pass them out at a wedding.Duct tape one to your motorcycle helmet. Tie one to a kite</review_text>
I bought this on a lark, it just seemed like such fun and though I bought it back in Dec, I finally really used it today at a wedding, and I was shocked! It took great video inside the church where my (low end) digital camera could not. I wasn't sure how the video would actually turn out, but it was GREAT considering by the time things were done I paid $[...] for it. The built in software is wonderful (though i wish I could download it to the computer) and I made a "movie mix" of the wedding with the camcorders software and how fun is that! Shoot, for the $[...] if all I got was the wedding video it was worth it. I really couldn't believe how clear the video was with this little "toy!" I don't understand any negative reviews, it's cheap, it's fun and it does a heck of a lot for [...] bucks. Pure Digital Inc. has a $[...] rebate on their website. Buy it, use it, have fun!</review_text>
First off, this camera is simple to use, and is a very convenient size (about the size of a fat ipod).  The video quality is pretty decent, i use it to upload to youtube and myspace videos.  I would recommend it for just that, if you're looking to uploading videos to the internet.  Videos can be saved really easily (and the usb port being directly on the unit is so handy) and can be edited/spliced with microsoft movie maker.  (using this program also cuts the MB size considerably!)My only complaint is the so-called 30 minute recording capability.  I had a 3 minute video on my card and it said i only had 21 minutes left of recording.  After i filled the card i noticed i did not have a full 30 minutes, maybe 18-20.Oh, and the audio is a bit on the funky side, mainly because it tends to give a lisp to any 'ch' and 's' sounds.  Look this camera up on youtube to see examples</review_text>
As a Mac user who favors still photography, I do like to take bits of video here and there, and this fits the bill perfectly.  Have only taken video indoors so far and I've found the video quality to be perfectly adequate (no faces hidden in the shadows).  Sound is fine, too.  The software included functions fine on my Mac (although I think you have to have the camera plugged in to see video you've stored on your computer).  Have also imported the AVI files into iMovie easily</review_text>
The camera works fine and I record performances of the various bands I play with. The sound is ok (just remember to keep your fingers away from the mike), and it records fairly well in most nightclub situations, but if it's dark, the video will be dark as well. The USB connection is a great thing, but remember that it needs to be disconnected via the software before you jerk the camera away from the computer. I damaged the hard drive with my very first use, and now I can only record 16min. of video before I'm full. It was MY fault</review_text>
Because of its shirt-pocket size, this digital camcorder is easy to bring along on family outings and such. I originally bought it because I plan on attending my sister's graduation and didn't want to bring on the plane both my very large semi-pro Canon digital camcorder and my digital still camera with all its lenses. I took the Pure Digital on a business trip by plane just to check it out and it was great fun. Simple to operate, and the results were surprisingly sharp. The only two drawbacks: 1) like any small device, could be easy to drop it, and 2) it seemed like the batteries were getting kind of low, and boot-up time was getting longer and longer, after about 40 or so minutes of recording. I recorded about 55 minutes, and it was still working. but, if you need to be quick about capturing precious/important moments, might want to carry a spare set of batterie</review_text>
We love this camcorder!  We bought it because our other bulky, digital video that uses tapes, which we would have to copy onto VHS/DVD, stopped working.  We didn't want to spend a lot of money.  We loved the idea that it was easier to carry in my purse and you could download it straight to the computer or burn it (which is very simple to do, and you do not have to download any software.)  I have to admit I was a little reluctant that the quality of the picture would be less than great, and only 60 minutes concerned me, but the pictures is great and I haven't ran out of time yet.  We have used this indoors, outdoors and have no problems.  We have recorded our son's basketball games and it worked great.  We read where the batteries didn't last very long, but we have been using rechargeable batteries and have been impressed with lifetime they have.  This is a must for those who have children or grandchildren</review_text>
I was tired of trying to keep up with the tapes, charging, carrying, etc. of my old (2001) video camera.  Whenever we wanted to use our old video camera, it was such a hassle and it was heavy!A friend showed me her PSV-352 and I was instantly hooked.  It is soooooooo easy and tiny that I just throw it in my purse or backpack for the kids and we're off.  We keep it in a basket on the counter so it's accessible at a moment's notice.  Downloading the 60 minutes of video onto a CD is easy because the software is on the camera itself and it automatically loads.  The video quality is amazing, plus, it runs on 2 AA batteries so no charging!!!!  It's been great to tape the kids singing Happy Birthday to Grandma and Grandpa and send it to them via an email birthday card.  You just scroll through each video to view and the kids love seeing themselves instantly and are more eager to "perform."  As a busy working mother of two, this has been a joy to use and I highly recommend it.  :</review_text>
I actually bought this case to house my Canon Elura 100, and it's a perfect fit.  I really like the belt loop although having a video camera on your hip is a little bulky.My one complaint:  Some of the trim on this case is pink.  Now, I'm not the most macho guy on earth, but it seems to me tht Sony could have gone with a little more neutral tone.  In the end though it's a very minor complaint</review_text>
This bag is light and small but it's very convenient if you just carry the video camera and memory stick. I definitely enjoy it</review_text>
The camera and one extra tape fit PERFECTLY in this case.  AND the strap is nice and long so you can carry it across your body if you want.</review_text>
Forget about packing any accessories--there's no room to spare.  Think of this one more as a "holster" to keep the camera at your fingertips without having to lug around a full-sized camera bag.  I own both, but the big one stays at home or in the car most of the time.  The integral wide belt loop allows me to mount it on my fanny pack's waist belt for hiking, and I especially like the gussets, which hold the camera securely while opening or closing the zippers.  A shoulder strap is also provided if you prefer.  Although not listed, the DCR-HC96 also fits, albeit snugly</review_text>
this case is really handy for the appropriate camcorders, used it in new york this summer and was not bulky, however it won't hold any accessorie</review_text>
The product is suitable for bringing camera wherever you need, small and practical.Also Amazon services are great on time and transaction.Thanks</review_text>
This case is very designed to fit in the camcorder perfectly. But it would have been nice if there was little more space to keep things like remote and a spare cassette atleast.The case has god cushion on all sides which keeps the camcorder pretty safe</review_text>
This carrying case is ideal for carrying your DCRHC/42 to all your family events.  It fits great around your shoulder, uses little space, and enhances the maneuverability of all your basic equipment when in body movement.  In fact, I have two cases:  a bigger one for storing all the accessories and this one to take wherever I go.  It is very comfortable and, more importantly, keeps your handycam very secure.  The light gray color is nice.  My wife loves it.  And me, too</review_text>
I purchased these because I don't like taking my $100 binoculars to football games and rock concerts. These are perfect. The optics are a little cheap, but at $20, I think it's a steal</review_text>
these glasses are small, protable and good for concerts and quick bird work. I keep a set in the car, but they do not replace my larger busnells for birding. please don't expect to do more than a little backyard birding with these, and i am now adjusted to my larger set, so i use those in the yard. You get what you pay for</review_text>
I actually purchased 2 of these for Christmas presents.  I gave one pair to my son at a "early christmas" gathering & my husband was so enthused by the quality, I ordered another pair for him....AND received them before Christmas!  Per my husband:  "Very good quality...and compact so that they take up very little room in the glove box of my car!</review_text>
One of the reviews I read before purchasing these suggested that the reviewer should've had them for her Celine Dion concert.  I took the suggestion and they were perfect!  They fit nicely in my evening bag and brought Celine closer to me as I sat in the Second Mezzanine at Caesar's Palace!  Not only that - but the price was right! I couldn't be happier!  Plus, now I have them for our next trip to Rocky Mountain Park to get up close and personal to some wildlife</review_text>
The Bushnell Powerview 12x25 is a fine, small pocket-sized binocular.  Since my wife is an avid bird watcher, we already have several binoculars of various sizes and viewing power.  Our grandson accidentally broke her small 10x25 Bushnell that we used for trips, so I researched, then bought this one from Amazon for her birthday.  She loves it.  The viewing power is a bit greater than the other and is every bit as compact, which makes it easy to pack for vacations, yet provides for a good viewing experience when enjoying the various bird populations around the country.  We both highly recommend this, and other Bushnell products</review_text>
Used this on a trip to Hawaii - brought the lava much closer (looked great at night). It's not difficult to focus, and provides clear images. I was not disappointed in the least.Compact size makes it pocketable - perfect for any traveler/casual user.Recommende</review_text>
These are great little binoculars that I use quite often.  They are so compact and lightweight that I grab them whenever I leave the house - whether it be for a boat ride around the lake or just a quick ride.  I don't see quite as well when I leave my eyeglasses on and it does take a little bit more adjusting to get the focus right with eyeglasses, but they are a great pair of binoculars for the price.  I am very impressed with the quality of them.</review_text>
I am very pleased with the performance of the rechargable battery pack. I have not yet had to recharge it, and I have taken numerous pictures and a few videos. I would have had to replace alkaline batteries at least twice by this time. These should pay for themselves in no time. Why did I wait so long?!</review_text>
I got this battery with my Kodak digital camera.  I use the camera at least 5 times a week, and recharge the battery at least once a day -I have been doing this for over 2 years.  The battery is definitely losing it's charge now -it only stays charged for 100 photos (which is good anyway)... but the battery instructions say it will last 1000 charges and I have had far, FAR more than that out of it, it is excellent value for money</review_text>
Battery works great. Have always enjoyed shopping at Amazon for items that Ebay does not have. Would buy here again.Thanks, Derric</review_text>
Just got the camera and from what I've seen so far it is a wonderful piece of equipment.  My only complaint is that Amazon misrepresented the battery type saying it is, "powered by EN-EL3a or EN-EL3" which is not true and disappointing to anyone who is upgrading from a camera that does use those batteries (ie D70)  The D200 uses the EN-EL3e which doesn't have the same fit as the EN-EL3a or EN-EL3.Be aware of this if you are upgrading</review_text>
This is my 2nd Digtial SLR.  In the film days, I was using Nikon products.  In my initial foray into digital photography, I switched to Canon (10D) just to see what's on the other side of the fence.  After about three years, I switched back to Nikon because the Nikon products suits me better.No, this is not a "Canon sucks, Nikon rules" review.  One thing I learned about digital photography is that you should really decide not on the camera body itself, but on the whole lineup...including the lenses and accessories.  For me, the Nikon lens line-up works for me better, not because Canon has worse line-up...I'm sure a lot of photographers find the Canon line-up much more sensible.Now, on to the camera itself: I've own this camera for over a year and has sold a number of stock images using this camera.  Suffice to say, I'm very satisfied with its performance; I'm not going to re-iterate the praises that's been said in the previous reviews.What I am compelled to say are the not-so-great characteristics of this camera: in ISO400 and above, it is not very forgiving to underexposure.  if you did not nail the exposure, even in RAW you will see noise in the shadow area when you try to correct the exposure in the RAW software converter.  This is why you hear a lot of whining from D200 owners regarding "noise."  Most of them don't nail exposure the first time and try to adjust in RAW converter...and then BAM! noise in the shadows.Auto White balance becomes iffy as well in underexposure; everything becomes biased to magenta in underexposure; and this is very hard to correct even in post-processing.The Nikon Creative Lighting System is I believe the feature that makes Nikon a little better than Canon in artificial lighting exposure.  Basically, Nikon has designed their flash system with multiple flashes in mind.The Nikon auto-focus engine is better than most Canon folks tend to evangelize.  With AFS lenses I'm positive it's as fast as any Canons.  If there's one thing I would like to change in future iterations of this product: I NEED MORE THAN ONE CROSS-TYPE AF POINTS!  The newer Pentax DSLR has NINE out of its 11 AF points!  This is beneficial to a more accurate focus.So my recommendation...if you already have Nikon lenses, and thinking if it's worth the price difference to jump from a D40/D50/D70.  It's unequivocably a "YES."  If you're just starting with a DSLR system, I say look closely on what Nikon/Canon/Pentax/Olympus/Leica/Sigma has to offer as a whole system then decide.  IF you decide on Nikon, you won't be yearning to own a higher D2-series model with this camera; it's almost the same feature set at a lower price</review_text>
A great choice for first time buyers. This camera is easy to learn and it has advanced features that you can learn as you go... and when you master these you will realize that you are shooting like a pro.The vast array of nikon lenses and accessories were a big selling point for me as was the ability to control Nikon speedlights remotely via the camera for some really great shooting setups.The D200 is my dream come true. It provides all the professional features that an amateur would want at a price that is affordable.The D200 incorporates most of the latest enhancements available in digital imaging including a 10 megapixel censor, MATRIX II metering, detailed battery indicator, large buffer for continuous shoots and much much more.Buy this Nikon</review_text>
The Nikon D200 is an amazing camera. This review is about Amazon packing procedures.This review is to alert prospective buyers that Amazon does not pack these cameras well. I just purchased one and it came packed like a book, with very little padding. I called Nikon and their recommendation was to return the item pronto. I have returned the camera (with much trepidation)and will purchase from another trusted source. Just wanted to give you all a heads up</review_text>
The ergonomics: Perfect. The D200 is not completely rubber-encased. There's rubber where your hands need to hold it, and plastic where your hands rarely touch it. The hand grip is comfortable and nicely concave where the tips of your fingers can dig in.The battery door and the memory card door are made of plastic, and hinge-pinned. A simple slide latch opens the battery door....and some have warned the latch could be easily (accidentally) tripped. The memory card door latch, however, uses a more secure 45 degree pivoting latch.USB 2 and Video Out/DC-in doors are made of flexible rubber, and these doors extend into the body of the camera as the hinges themselves.The English language operating manual is a work of art. Each operating concept is alpha' & numerically numbered at the pictoral diagram, and to the page where the function is explained in perfect English. The reader will quickly catch on to how this well thought out manual is organized.I like the depth of field preview, the mirror lock-up, and the multiple-exposure capability.The continuous servo autofocus does a better job than any human at following and focusing on any moving object.If you have the old manual-focus, film-based Nikon SLR lenses from the '70's and '80's, except for a few rare exceptions, will fit on the D200.All these positive attributes remind me of the best, most highly-evolved film camera SLR's. No wonder so many photographers have been won over to digital media.</review_text>
I have been waiting for an affordable Nikon digital SLR on which I could use my older Nikon lenses (AI, Series E, etc.).  I know, I could have spent thousands on a D2, but that would have been overkill for me.  Suffice to say, the D200 is a joy to use.  It is fast, solid, and intuitive.  For those owners of Nikon film SLRs who are considering a D200, to me it "feels" just like a Nikon film SLR.  I have previously owned several high-end digital point and shoot cameras, and the D200 blows them away in terms of its capabilities, the degree of control it offers, and the resulting quality of the pictures you can take with it.  It has all the features an advanced amateur photographer could possibly want.  I'll probably never even scratch the surface of all of its features, but its nice to know they're there if I want or need them.  I highly recommend the D200 to anyone who, like me, has been waiting for the right digital SLR to come along</review_text>
Nikon has always been the leader in photography/ camera/ lenses.  Others have nobly tried but a Nikon remains the high bar that others only hope to reach.When the shift from film to digital began, there was some speculation if Nikon could keep up with the competition.  Well, rest assure that not only have they kept up, they continue to lead the way.  The latest example of this is the D200.Like the D70/ D80 - this is a solid piece of equipment.  Just the feel of it tells you that you are holding an excellent piece of technology.  But the proof will always be in the end results and again, the combination of the Nikon know-how and Nikon lenses lead even a beginner to come up with excellent pictures.Gone is the "lag between shots".  You can fire up and shoot multiple pictures in seconds so action shots are all yours.  Without even "tweaking" a picture with a computer program, you can print top of the line photos at home.People have cited the cons:  Expensive.  Yes.  The camera does come with a hefty price tag but it should be kept in mind that this is a piece of machinery intended for serious photographers.  If you are a "vacation and holiday" picture taker, then you should elect to buy a cheaper camera.  The same is true with the difficulty of the multitude of small buttons, dials and switches.  There are too many and they can be overwhelming but only to someone who is in the "point and shoot" school of picture taking.  Anyone else will relish the options that Nikon has provided us with on the D200.Room for improvement?  Well, the battery life is nowhere near as good as the D70 which I upgraded from but that is a weak complaint as you can still get hundreds of shots on one charge.  Also, it would be a boon if the flash would automatically pop up when needed like in former models.So if you are serious about photography and always have one at the ready, this is the one for you</review_text>
My first professional digital SLR was the Nikon D1X.  I got great pictures with it but it was too large and heavy to lug around for extended periods.  I also had some issues with its operation.  But now, Nikon seems to have solved my issues with the D200.  I purchased the dedicated SB-800 flash and 18-200 lens recommended in the D200's manual.  The whole system is much improved over my other digital SLR.  Both focus and metering seem to work more reliably.  It works better in available light.  The optical anti-vibration aids in overall picture sharpness (plus for those of us who are not rock-steady).  I am getting use to the button sequence required to enlarge the picture preview and really like the amount of magnification possible.  The menuing system seems quite extensive and well-organized.  I would like more latitude in the picture quality settings (e.g. contract, saturation, and sharpness).  The help screens really tell me something when I'm confused.  I appreciate the "modeling" feature.  It is useful when attempting to compose in a dark situation.  It also lets me see reflections BEFORE they are committed to the picture.  Unfortunately this feature does not work using the built-in flash.  I wish Nikon could add some type of lock on the continuous-single-manual focus selector on the front of the camera.  My finger seems to move that switch unknowingly.  I would appreciate a battery charger with a built in plug rather than the detachable cord.  As a person who still wears thick glasses, I wish Nikon could make the viewfinder more like the one on their old N8008.  Or maybe it's time to do away with pentaprisoms and mechanical mirrors  and give us a truly pro camera that mimics the high-end pro-sumer models with electronic viewfinders and adjustable view screens</review_text>
I think the point a lot of people are not mentioning about the d200 is quite obvious.  Let me be the first to say that the main reason I bought the d200 over the d80 was to increase my credibility and prestige as an amateur photographer, make other photographers jealous of my kit, and to brag about the obscene amount of money I spend on camera equipment while my co-workers can't even pay their rent.  I bought the grip because I thought it looked really cool, and it increased the size and visibility of my camera to other people.  The question that really sold me on the d200 was: will strangers that I might want to photograph be more likely to say yes standing on the other side of a d80 or a d200?  Will people have less doubts about me holding this thing opposed to a smaller model?  Which one looks cooler?If I was completely loaded would I buy the D2Xs? Without a second thought.Of course I talked to a lot of camera people making minimum wage hoping that they would have some technical insight about purchasing a Nikon or other camera.  Of course they let me down and said a lot of bogus things to me most saying something like: "the d200 is way to much camera for me."  None of them knew how to change the exposure settings, they were contented with the wheel and "child mode," on top of the d80 and recited this to me several times as if I looked like a soccer mom.  As usual I was offended by the human experience of buying in the real world, especially the atrocious mark up of several hundred dollars, I refused to help pay those employees wages.  The breaking point I think was the time an associate instructed me to buy one camera over the other because, "when she dropped this camera it broke and the other one didn't."  So I turned to the internet where I only have to say hi to the UPS man as he leaves.I studied and studied all things technical, sometimes just staring at pictures of cameras for long periods of time without blinking.  I poured over thousands of photographs taken by all kinds of cameras and amassed a photographic library while I decided.  Basically I went way overboard and let the decision of buying a camera engulf my life until I was dreaming about it.So one night I just bought the d200 after being on the fence over the d80 or the d200.  And after two days it arrived and I was impressed with it.  The thing is literally a cold hard photographic machine.After being broken in on the d50 I was firstly impressed with the size, and then secondly all of the dials and switches to change things that I used to have to dig through the menu to get to.  Thirdly I liked the blazing fast 2 frame rate.When I go out at night I snap the 50mm f/1.8 onto it and crank the iso up.  A lot of people in the forms were complaining about the noise in the high iso of the d200 but I thought it was fine.  I feel most people from that camp want perfect clarity all the way up into the highest isos but I think that is artistically limiting.  I read one scathing review written by a veteran film user saying that basically high iso in digital has a lot less graininess than film basically saying that the d200 is a step up but some people still want to complain.  As far as the d200 goes versus the d50 at iso 1600 it is leaps and bounds better in my opinion.  The noise is way reduced without NR and there isn't that pixel chunkiness I found in the d50 at high isos.Another thing that stands out on the d200 is the enhanced colors.  In reality the ultra vivid setting on the d200 makes a lot of things look sort of fake, but it does make people who don't have a sun tan look like they have one which is a plus in my opinion.  It can make your dull green lawn look like a lush paradise, skies are ultra blue, and reds are spectacular.  I remember when I used the d50 I would steer away from photographing violets and red roses because it would blow them out, not so with the d200.  For some reason coming from point and shoot it always used to annoy my that the d50 didn't have b&w or sepia.  The d200 has b&w but no sepia.  The nerds in the forums would just say, "use cs2, or a photo editor," but I say no because I should be able to do everything in camera.The viewfinder is so awesome.  I literally hated electronic viewfinders and the d50's viewfinder was so small that it hindered my framing at times.  The d200 has a big bright viewfinder and a huge lcd that sucks down batteries like nothing.  As far as my evolution goes in photography sometimes I feel like I can literally climb into the viewfinder because its so big compared to what I was used to.Like I said the grip is awesome and I really like it.  I kind of like having as many accessories as possible and that kind of steered me away from the D2Xs into the d200.  Watching the percentage marks count down as the batteries drain is always fun.  The best thing about the d200 is little things like that because they make me feel like I have greater control over my pictures because I know exactly how many I can take.In conclusion buy the d200 over the d80 I am really happy with it and I am not happy with anything.  If you're having trouble considering what you want photographically try and pull yourself away from forums and outside sources and really consider what got you into photography in the first place and where you intend to go with it, I think that is the important part.  Advertising and gear collecting never made anyone a better artist</review_text>
I bought this camera as a back-up to my D2X and so I wouldn't have to change lenses as much on a trip I'm taking to Alaska this summer. Well let me tell you, the D200 with the 18-200mm VR lens is incredible. It is fast, quiet and a pleasure to use. I've read in forums that the 18-200 is a little soft. So far I totally disagree, the pictures I've taken have been very sharp. I wish this would have been available when I bought my D2X. If it had, I would own two D200's instead of one of each. Highly recommended !!</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera when my venerable Nikormat EL-W developed shutter timing issues during my Photo 1 class.This camera reasonably priced has preformed flawlessly thus far. I have shot multiple rolls of Ilford HP5 plus film through this camera and have yet to have an exposure not come out due to the camera. After reading the manual I was able to easily understand the different modes and how to change the user controlled settings. The on camera flash leaves a little to be desired as it rather harsh and its range is somewhat limited, an accessory flash will overcome this and there are other flashes that will operate with this camera not just Canon.I have not had the opportunity of shooting color film through this camera yet when I do I will update this review.The only thing I dislike about this camera is that there is no provision for a remote shutter release. The Rebel K2 with date is the only version of this camera that can use a remote shutter release, why Canon removed this feature from this model is unknown a remote release is very handy when photographing nature or when used with the timer for self portraits.If you have any plans for infrared photography do not buy a EOS Canon, the Frame counter uses an infrared sensor that will cause fogging on your infrared film</review_text>
it looks good takes great pics and the ease of use is good for a film camer</review_text>
I bought this a year ago and have taken many great pictures with it. It's light, has many features and can be used as an automatic when all you want to do is point and click. I can't recommend it enough.</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera. I especially like the light meter that tells you how many apertures you are away from the correct exposure. I am using this for my photo class and is easy to use</review_text>
The photos are exceptional. It was very easy to learn how to use the features. I have taken some great photos with it, much better than my digital. I have not encountered any problems.  I took it on a long (over a month) trip where it was subjected to rough treatment and extreme weather.  It came through with flying colors.  Rock solid</review_text>
Soy un principiante en esto de la fotografia, esta ha sido mi primera camara slr, por lo tanto me ha tocado experimentar con ella para obtener las mejores tomas posibles a la vez que han aumentado mis conocimientos en el area, el desempeo es excelente tanto en tomas fijas como las que he realizado a objetos en movimiento,tanto sus funciones automaticas como las profesionales ofrecen un desempeo excelente, he tomado mas de 300 fotos en poco menos de cuatro meses, el zoom que tiene es rapido, los botones tienen una disposicion excelente para manejarla con una sola mano, lo unico que necesita es un flash de la serie speedlite, tuve oportunidad de conseguir uno prestado de un amigo y el cambio fue estupendo ya que este tiene mas alcance para el lente que la camara trae,ya que el flash que trae carece de potencia el cual ofrece su mejor desempeo en los 28mm del lente(no le podemos pedir mas a un flash integrado),  por ultimo les dijo que posee el mejor sistema de medicion de luz que existe en el mercado (E-TTL)y esta disponible tanto con flash integrado como con el flash externo</review_text>
On a snorkeling trip we used this camera both in and out of water, and the results were terrific. It produced some hysterical pictures of my husband and I underwater!  The fish turned out well, as did the coral. We looked like dorks! It was fun and easy to use</review_text>
The figi underwater camera out ranks  many others due to the fact after going through the beefed up security scans when developed it has bright color and clarity. others turn dark</review_text>
We used this camera on our honeymoon for snorkling and it was great! The pictures were a little grainy, although I credit that to the silt in the water more than the camera quality since the out of water shots came out great too.  The lever on the front was much easier to use than a push button and the strap was perfect.  We bought a Kodak in Hawaii when these were used up and the picture quality was significantly worse than the Fuji.  We would definitely use these again</review_text>
I purchassed this camera for my first ever snorkling trip when I went on a Bahama cruise.  Overall, I was VERY pleased.  The pictures came out clear and the camera was easy to use even under water.  The only issue I had with it was almost to the end of the roll of film the turn wheel jammed and ceased to work.  I lost the last two pictures.  I'm not sure if it was a defect in the camera, or if I was over zealous in turning the wheel in my excitment of the event.  Considering the quality of the developed pictures, I would certainly try this camera again.</review_text>
This is a great buy if you are just wanting to have some fun, with no real investment.  Although it does go beyond 17 feet, and that is not as far as you may think.  But, I used it while snorkeling and the pictures turned out great, and i am sure a few were more than 17 feet.</review_text>
If you are reluctant to invest $$$ in a 'real' underwater camera, this will do fine as a temporary solution.I realize it's not rated to go beyond 17 feet but I took two of them to 90 feet and had no problems whatsoever - all seals held and I could wind the film just fine.Only slight critizism is that the pictures come out more blue compared to the Kodak MAX (which I used at the same dive site a year earlier).  But hey, if you're going way beyond the manufacturers specs, you're not really allowed to complain...For snorkeling (down to 30 feet), the pictures come out real nice</review_text>
Like others I have compared it in a SCUBA diving trip to the Kodak Max Sport and this one had a few advantages:1. Film winded at greater depth.2. The pictures came out clearer - not grainy and with better colors.Don't expect too much of it at depths below 8 meters since light won't be enough (I used it on a bright summer day in the red sea). Even at shallower depths colors turn blue/green without use of flash.I have taken it down to depth of 35 meters and the camera was fine, but wouldn't take pictures at depths below 20 meters.The pictures I took at shallow depth came out excellent</review_text>
SONY has manufactured their cord with a propreitary connection so that you have to order directly from them. Most cords can be purchased for about $7 locally in stores but SONY's has to be ordered. Amazon had the best price on this item and it works great but it is annoying that you have to purchase a SONY original part</review_text>
This cable works fine for my Sony DCR-DVD403 Handycam. I can play and record in S-Video with this cable. The key is to change the setting in the camera so that it uses S-Video instead of the default composite video connection. I found this in my Handycam's user manual.It works exactly as it should. Perhaps this is not the case for all Sony Handycams</review_text>
To the previous poster, the manual tells you what is accepted and what is not.</review_text>
Unlike the rest of the reviewers here, I bought this camcorder at a STORE in Singapore. This gave me a HUGE advantage to try out the camera BEFORE I bought it! I paid about US$450.00 for the CA6 [which included all the required cables, 2 CD-ROMs of software, carrying case, 2 batteries {one 1.5-hour and one 3-hour battery}, 4GB Ultra High-Speed SD card, 2 tripod mounts {no charge}, Multi-port USB hub for 4 different types of SD cards, power cords and adapter for U.S. and Singapore voltages].After reading all the reviews here I can agree with SOME of the "Cons" comments.Yes, it does NOT come with a tripod mount hole. However, the salesperson gave me two black plastic tripod mounts for FREE. It fits like a glove--no problems. Sorry,  I don't know where to find these in the U.S. but I'm sure they're out there somewhere.Yes, the hand strap is useless. Seriously, throw it away! It's not worth the effort. My wife gave me her camera strap to use and it can be fed through the bottom ring and that works much better.The only way to protect the LCD screen and camera lens is to keep it in the carrying case when not in use. This case was a real convenience with the metal ring that could attach to the belt loop of my shorts or pants.A lot of people are complaining about low light situations. I haven't noticed too much of this. The salesperson told me that this was a "Sports" model version. I was shown several other models by Sanyo that were similar to the CA6. This gave me the impression that the CA6 was geared more towards outdoor use and it has proved itself worthy.It IS a small camcorder so it took a few days to get used to filming with it. PLUS, I'm LEFT-HANDED and used it like a stubborn left-hander in my left hand--but I finally got used to it. I know it wasn't designed with this in mind. However, I think it gave me an advantage over right-handers with bigger fingers. I didn't have to worry about using all the buttons and hold the camcorder at the same time. I know this sounds funny but if you're a left-hander you might appreciate this info. Yes, I AM one of those who has to use TWO hands to dial a phone number or play games on my little cellphone, hehe.Oh, and using the highest quality DVD setting for video gives you about 2 hours and 45 minutes with the 4GB SD card.Be sure to get some type of camera strap for this device--not the one provided [I think this was an Sanyo afterthought]. I realized this one day as I was 100 feet up in a skyride in Singapore. As I was dangling my feet, I wondered how awful it would be for the CA6 to slip out of my hand and watch it shatter into a 1,000 pieces below me.</review_text>
Just purchased a couple of weeks ago and have used a couple of times recording grandchild's sports events.  Excellent quality video.  I am still figuring out how to take the best photos but really got the camera for video purposes anyway.  It is so small and compact - very easy to carry in my purse but I got a small carry case so I won't scratch the screen or lens. Easy to connect to my computer to download and burning to DVD.  You should order an extra battery to have handy although the one included lasts quite a long time</review_text>
Previously I bought several 'no name 12Mpixel' camcorders that whould produce great stills but left a lot to be desired when taking movies. The Sanyo does it all, excellently. With an excellent mic and image stabilization this camera is well worth the price</review_text>
The CA6 was not available in any local stores so I researched the smack out of this video camera on the web before I bought it from Amazon. I thought I knew exactly what I was getting but the box contained a big surprise. I was expecting something small and utilitarian. Instead, I got a beautiful little jewel. It is delightful to look at and fun to hold. Grant you I am always fascinated with unusual design and shape.The camera was a Christmas gift for my wife and I wanted to set it up before Christmas day so she could unwrap it and start filming (film?). The Instruction book is as impressive as the camera itself. Not for design but for its volume and it is all in English. I still haven't managed to digest but a few sections.Video quality is excellent for our purpose. There are six different video resolutions and a variety of photo resolutions available in the easy to use menu system. The SHQ TV resolution is really stunning when you consider the miniscule sized gizmo that created it. We took the camera to Key West last week and recorded in SHQ WEB (320x240 / 30fps) resolution (perfect for making videos for sharing on the web). Every time you start and stop recording, a new MPEG4 file is created on the SD memory card. Using the photo function creates a high resolution JPEG file. At the end of the trip we had a couple of hundred files to download onto the Mac. We are currently editing the files into a movie with iMovie.  At the smaller video resolution I was able to get about three hours of MPEG4 files and forty-two high resolution JPEG (2816x2112) files on less than half of the 2gb SD card.  The same memory card holds about an hour and a half of video at the highest resolution setting (640x480 / 30fps at minimum compression).Image stabilization works well enough for moderate hand movement but it didn't keep up with rough water on a sailboat around Key West. I wish the zoom range had more field of view on the wide end but it is tighter than I expected on the telephoto end. This is not a camera for long distance tight shots of wild animals or beach bunnies. It has no tripod mount so the telephoto power is just long enough for the image stabilizer to cope with when hand holding the camera on steady ground.My hands are really too large for the controls but I found ways to adapt. It fits my wife perfectly. The CA6 is supplied with a hand strap to keep the camera tethered to your body and supply leverage for one handed use.  I use the strap mostly for accident prevention and use my left hand to stabilize the camera by holding the outside of the frame of the view screen while delicately mashing the controls with my fat thumb on my right hand. Even with the hand tether attached to the camera we easily carried the camera and tether in our pockets without any problems and I was able to do some incognito filming on Duval Street.  The relatively large (and very bright) view screen can be folded back against the camera while recording (folding the view screen back to the camera while not recording or reviewing shuts the camera off) for "shoot from the hip" filming.Along with a small carrying pouch and a 2 or 4gb High Speed SD memory card, I recommend an additional battery as a necessary accessory. The tiny battery powers the camera in video mode for an hour or so but using the built in flash for photos knocks the small cell down in hurray. Reviewing and messing with the menu also cuts into battery duration.  The lithium ion battery is physically smaller than my cell phone battery and recharges in less than two hours. In use it is completely enclosed inside the camera.  The Sanyo OEM battery is easy to find on the web and there are a number of less expensive, alternative brands made to fit the Xacti cameras. Also, gentle use of an absorbent lens cloth will keep the view screen and the lens window clean.The CA6 lacks convenience features that would make it larger and susceptible to problems from dirt and water. There are no ports, jacks or connections on the outside of the camera. The Battery, memory card and USB port access are located under a well designed, seal tight door on the bottom of the camera. A minimal control panel increases durability but somewhat limits easy access to the many system features. All adjustments are made by navigating through the menu on the view screen via the use of your right thumb and the tiniest joystick I have ever seen. It turned out to be much easier to use than I though it would and there is a provision to program favorite settings into some "short-cut" moves on the control stick.  Above the menu control is a button for starting and stopping the video recording and another for making photos. A half-inch space and small ridge separates the two controls.  Between the exposure / record buttons and the menu control are tiny buttons that activate the menu system and select the mode (puts the camera in record or playback).Considerations for design and purpose aside, I have some issues that Sanyo should consider.  The camera needs an accessory cradle of some sort that would allow it to be placed on a mounting thread. There are a number of features offered on the camera that are next too useless unless I innovate some method of remotely stabilizing it.  Gaffers tape works for fastening it on a mounting clamp, monopod or walking staff but I hate putting anything sticky on the beautiful little frame. While Sanyo designs a mounting system they should also make a remote control.Focusing and exposure are controlled by a sophisticated, multi-pattern, through-the-lens computer program that works well with a polarizing filter (I used my sun glasses) for enhanced image quality.  So why is there no provision to thread a small diameter filter over the round lens window opening?The sound recording quality is very good and the selectable noise filters work better than I expected but I don't see the point to using up the data space for stereo sound when the separation between the left and right channel microphones is a few millimeters.  I haven't digested all 166 pages of the instruction book but so far I can't find any provision for recording in mono sound mode. Finally, motor noise from the zoom lens is noticeable in low noise situations.  Even though I seldom use the zoom function while recording and I realize this is a common issue in small video cameras but it still bugs me.  We usually strip away most the recorded sound and replace it with music or dubbing when editing videos anyway.Brandishing the CA6 in a crowd will attract attention.  As soon as people realize it is a video camera they are on it like flies on poop.  My wife likes the attention but I prefer to be unhampered with other people's curiosity.Sanyo supplies a suite of video/photo editing and DVD burning software for PC users.  The CA6 lacks FireWire connectivity for live editing on Macs and there is no Mac compatible software supplied but the camera syncs well as a card reader with my Mac through the USB port for downloading the files to the hard drive.  Any Mac owner savvy enough to edit video files and burn DVD's already has the software to accomplish the task. The camera also possesses surprisingly extensive onboard-editing capability through the viewing screen or on your television. Sanyo supplies a cord that plugs into the USB connection and provides a composite video and stereo sound output for your television system where you can view and edit your video and photo files utilizing the camera's amazing menu array. I have no idea about battery duration for this purpose and there is no external power input to the camera (the battery has an external charging cradle). Be aware that lower resolution video file settings look fine on a computer but they are nasty on your television.Overall the camera is beautiful, reliable and fun to use with lots of features.  It is tiny, easy to hide, fast starting, durable, water and dirt resistant.  The images are very good.  I am delighted with the Exacti CA6 so far (when I can get it away from my wife)</review_text>
We bought this camera right before going on vacation and found it extremely handy and convenient.  We took great video and great pictures with it.  Here are some advantages and disadvantages we found:Advantages:1. Very small and compact - had it in a small camera bag attached on my belt.  It was ready in a moments notice to take video and pictures.  I was able to take it places that a regular camera would likely not go (roller coaster ride, water ride).  Having it at all times on my hip was very handy, and it never got in the way.2. Water resistant - Our last camera went dead because of humidity and water.  I took this camera on a water ride with my son, filmed the whole thing, got soaked, and no problems with the camera.3. Great outdoor pictures - excellent looking pictures outdoors.  In doors was good if there was enough light. Flash is very poor and does not go very far (understandable given the small compact battery).4. Lots of settings - even with this small camera, there were plenty of settings (wind reduction, noise reduction, image stabilization, ISO settings, exposure, flash, white balance, etc.)5. Video compression - I found the video compression not as good as a miniDV tape, but still extremely good, given that I could record 1.5 to 2 hours of video on my single 2GB SD card (we also bought exta, which easily fit in the bag)6. Battery - With the small battery, the total time did not last long (1 hour), but we could carry several other batteries in our bag (same one attached to my hip) and never lost out because of battery failure (we had 4)7. Flip screen - all you do is flip the screen out, and the camera is on, ready to go with pictures or video.  Can do it with one hand. Same for shutting it off.Disadvantages:1. No view finder - only the screen to see what you were videoing, however I was amazed at how well I could see the screen even in direct sunlight.2. Low light pictures - like I said, the flash is poor and does not put out much power.  There is a "candle" setting that helps take pictures in dark places, but you have to keep the camera very steady because it keeps the aperture open longer.3. Cables - one more cable to add to my stash.  It is a type that has USB on one end (for the computer) and a new plug (not sure what it is called) that is used for both video out put and USB output.  However, I never had to use this given that my laptop has an SD slot so all I had to do was remove the card and slip it into the laptop to download everything.4. Pistol grip - at first this was way awkward, but with time I learned to hold it very comfortably and still operate everything just fine.  Got to keep tabs on your index finger as it is easy to place it over the lense.  I held it much more comfortably after I began using the strap, which I put over my hand, and in more questionable situations, I strapped it over my wrist.5. Zoom - only 5x zoom, and it was a little slow in zooming, but actually made the playback look smoother, so pick your poison.6. Photos while video shooting - While you can take a photo during video recording, it does freeze the video for a few seconds while it records the picture.  Nice to have, but I thought the video would still be seemless.  I usually don't use this feature, but it has turned out handy.7. Non-swivel screen - the screen flips out, but does not swivel in any other direction. Open or closed (and in closed position, the screen is visible and open to possible damage.  This made it a little harder to film things at times where I wasn't directly behind the camera.We love the camera, and are so glad we have it.  Quality is near miniDV, and the software we use (Nero 7) works great with MP4 and is a snap to turn into a DVD.  The only reason we gave it a 4 rating instead of a 5 is due to the few small disadvantages it had and for the plain and simple fact that the camera features do not replace all the features you would find on a dedicated digital camera.  But you bought it for video, right? So how can I complain about the 80% excellent quality I got from the pictures I did take?  Hence the 4 out of 5.In the end, we got more video footage than we would have with a larger video camera for the simple fact of its wonderfully small size</review_text>
I got this filter kit today. First impression was not very promising when I saw "made in the USA" printed on the package. I said, well it would be nice if these filters were made in Japan but I decided to give it a chance. Second impression was even worse, since these filters were dirty with some fingerprints on it, clearly indicating that the product is not brand new. Apart from that I didn't like the quality of the metal rings. It just didn't fit well with my DMC-FZ50. I cannot speak of the functionality because I didn't actually try to use it but judging by the overall quality I don't expect much</review_text>
The filters included have dramatically helped in getting me that one special shot I was looking for.  I had been troubled by glare in such in daylight and looking for a way to bring out the colors. Someone told me to try a filter and I couldn't be happier for this brand. My pictures now come out with the right color balance and have been great to look out</review_text>
There is a reason why some things are cheap, and it's because they are...ummm...cheap. Bad frame, uneven color on the glass. Polarizing filter aside from having AIR BUBBLES on front glass, almost falls apart. Screwing and unscrewing them is a pain. If you are even a little bit serious about photography, don't waste your money on this set. Get yourself at least a set of HOYA filters</review_text>
The filters by Tiffen are good quality filters.  This pack of filters provides one with a great range of filters that will allow you to extend your camera's capabilties</review_text>
Filters were just as expected. High enough quality optics for the price, one of the better deals for consumers looking to enjoy the range of photo's they can give you.Great value. Just try to find something comparable without spending a ton more cash</review_text>
Where else can you get three filters essentially for the price of one.  Have tried them all, work great</review_text>
I use the UV filter as my lense insurance policy. The polarizer really makes a difference in highlighting sky/horizon shots. Here in the southwest the warming filter adds a really nice touch to a lot of my nature shots. Very nice package overall and the price is a hit versus buying all three individually. The fold up case also comes in handy</review_text>
I bought this camera 6 months ago to replace an older Sony camera that had no optical zoom. I chose another Sony because they accept AA batteries (incredibly convenient for those who like to take pictures away from home), because the flash is powerful enough to make pictures taken in complete darkness look like they were taken during daytime, and because my first Sony camera was very good quality. I immediately fell in love with the S600, until a few weeks ago. At least every other time I turned the camera on, the lens wouldn't extend and the camera would tell me to turn the power off and on again. I would and then it would work. But in the past few days, I have to turn it on and off several times before the lens will extend properly, and the camera makes an ugly buzzing sound when zooming in and out. It seems like the motor that powers the lens is wearing out. I have only taken about 400 pictures with this camera...the motor should not be wearing out already! It's a great camera - if you buy it, make sure to keep your receipt so you can send it back to Sony for repairs. I didn't keep my receipt and now am going to buy a new camera, but not a Sony</review_text>
This is a point and shoot, so don't expect it to act like a DSLR or even an ultra zoom, but for what it is, it's a fantastic camera.It starts up quickly and focuses very, very quickly.  An AF assist lamp helps with this.  The flash is strong and the image quality is very good.   The LCD is smaller than most of the competitors in the upper range of the price bracket, but the screen is sharp and very clear.  The AA batteries are great because they're cheap and easy to find.  I hate it when I'm on a trip and want to shoot a lot, but have to be tethered to a wall socket to charge a battery.  The movie mode is wonderful.  TRUE 640x480 resolution at 30fps (only with the Pro Duo card) to the limit of the card. I like to take my movies, edit them with a program and burn them to DVD.  480 lines of resolution is TV quality and it looks GOOD.  The only real downside to this camera is its bland styling.  Other companies are making hot, slim, metal cameras that look good and are difficult to hold, but this camera's plastic body is sturdy and easy to carry in one hand.  It has a pleasant weight to it, even if it's a little too wide to fit in a shirt pocket.There are several websites dedicated to reviewing digital cameras in depth and they can give you technical numbers to compare with other cameras.  Since I'm just a guy that occasionally takes photos, I can only talk about my experiences.  I like the photos that this takes, I like the way it holds and functions and I like the clarity and smoothness of the movie mode...you really can't compare Sony camera movies to other companies' movie clips; Sony wins, hands down.  Sony knows how to cater to their consumers and this camera won't disappoint!I highly recommend it</review_text>
I rarely post reviews, but I will for this product. It is an honest 6 megapixel camera on deep discount. Why? Poor user reviews.Somebody compained of access -- Yeah, when the batteries go dead, there is no "Hey loser, the batteries are dead" icon that pops up. Solution: Put in new batteries.Somebody complained of "red-eye" -- Yeah, that's what Photoshop Elements is for. Solution: This is a digital camera, there are automatic fixes.Thanks for all the crummy reviews, I picked up a great camera at deep discount. Why? Fast image transfer, great photos, lots of control and you can get a GPS recording device that works with this camera that stamps images with an exact geographical location of the shot and the time</review_text>
I've had this camera for about 4 months now and I am very pleased with it.  The pictures are clear, focus is quick and the options endless. This is my 7th digital camera and I have purchased 2 close up lenses and a T-con 1.7x for it which has really made it versital. The large manual zoom and anti-shake are the best part of the camera.  It is a very clear lens and I like that when the focus is on manual it gives a zoomed in look at what you are shooting. The FZ-50 is as close to a DSLR as you can get without all the expensive lenses to drag along.  The manual settings let you set-up the camera for you personnel needs.  I'm really enjoying this camera.</review_text>
What a steal this camera was! Just got it in the mail this week, and it's proven itself to be well worth buying. I love pretty much everything about it. Pictures, even in auto mode, are crisp and detailed. If you like the photography side, aperture, shutter, and focus settings are VERY comprehensive.I have never had a "real" camera before other than a cheap 35mm one, and haven't taken any photography classes or learned anything about photography. I only read a little bit online about the basics, and within 2 days I was adjusting the settings for the scene's needs and WOW the pictures turned out great. If you are interested in photography, this is DEFINITELY the camera for you.One thing to mention, however, is that the SD cards are really fast while in the camera, but once you connect the camera to a PC via USB, the pictures take a while to load in order to edit (with Photoshop). I highly recommend a fast SD card, like the SanDisk SD Extreme III.Battery life is pretty good, even when doing video. Videos look and sound great, and you can take pictures while you record video. I had been looking at this camera for 2 months and finally bought it, and it's well worth it.  If you're on the fence about this or a more expensive Canon or Nikon, I'd go with this unless you're super hardcore.5/5 Stars for an excellent product at an incredible price.</review_text>
I just received this camera as a gift.I love the idiot-proof menu.The instruction guide was actually readable.It feels like a film SLR, and the size is perfect for smaller hands (my boyfriend finds the buttons and controls a bit too cramped).Image quality is great, though I've not used it in a wide variety of settings (yet).Another feature which I LOVE about this camera is the flip screen. This appears to be the most "advanced" digital camera with this feature. As an artist and model, I shoot myself alot. The flexible flip-screen allows me to get odd angles and self portraits.My only complaint is that the auto-release is a maximum of 10 seconds (making complex self-portaits difficult). I got the remote shutter accessory, so hopefully this won't pose too much of a challenge in my self-portraiture</review_text>
I'm not entirely new to photography.  I had two canon pocket cameras (35mm) and a Sony digital pocket camera, so I had some expectations about what could be done.  I have to say that the FZ50 has blown me away.  In the automatic mode, it's great for point and shoot.  I doubt I'll ever use it for video clips, but I've been able to include pictures in my power point presentations that have been very helpful.  I have been slowly acquainting myself with the various modes and capabilities, such as the macros for closeups.  This process will take several months at least.  Well worth the price.Quality is outstanding and everything works as it should.  I'm not sure that the extra memory (10.1 MP) is actually necessary, and if you could get a FZ30 for less, that would actually be a better deal for most folks.</review_text>
this camera takes great pictures for travel and outdoors.  If you intend to take family photo's indoors you will need a large room for group shots as it's 35-420 zoom.  Having said that I am very happy with this camera and it's long list of functions.  The software is better than some I've seen.  The camera is easy to use right out of the box.  Make sure you buy a memory card.  The battery ahs a very long life but I bought a spare so I wouldn't be caught without my camera. My only complaint is photo's load slowly to my computer compared to other cameras</review_text>
Seems Panasonic has finally dropped the hammer on the pseudo DSLR market, with 420mm at 12x or 749mm - 21.4x at 3mp is outstanding especially with OIS. excellent pictures out of the box, menu operations are plentiful, NR can be reduced and the jog dials front and back for Aperture or shutter is very professional.Leica lens is crisp and sharp, I shoot in Aperture priority with NR at minimal and the pictures even in Jpeg look like they have been post processed, simply amazing.After experiencing this camera I sold my Nikon D80, attachment lens and soft pictures Nikon was giving me is unacceptable, i went thru every menu option including using the much hyped RGB3 which by the way gives cartoon colors has no comparison to the Panasonic.High speed USB is my only complaint for data transfers, Noise reduction for higher ISO noise is a bit over powering but acceptable but controllable at your liking, a 3" ,screen would be nice but maybe on the next model.BTW, moon shots with the Raynox 2020 at 3mp give a zoom of 47.08x optical or 1647 mm optical, hand held shots with OIS (image stabilization) enabled gives jaw dropping pictures, you actually have a telescope with OIS at your reach, simply amazing.100% satisfied.</review_text>
i love this camera. so far its the best digital camera i've owned. the only problem with this camera is that it eats the batteries like crazy. Its best to buy rechargable batteries so that you dont spend so much money</review_text>
This camera is great, easy to use with clear results. We replaced a cheap digital camera that was not near as nice as this one. We are not professional photographers but wanted a good quality, easy to use camera for family photos and work needs as well. We love it. Its not one of those extraordinary cameras with all the doodads but if you are looking for straight forward, clear pictures, its great</review_text>
It's a good camera for its price.The pictures do display a little bit dark on the camera but when its loaded to a pc it comes out ok</review_text>
bought this a year or two ago and have had nothing but excellent pictures.  i even took it to europe in a backpack where it got a bit of beating up while backpacking and i have yet to have it break down on me.  i live in the mountains and we get our fare share of snow.  ocassionally i leave it in the car where the temp gets down to freezing and have never had it have any problems.  all in all... BUY IT!!  absolutely a great buy</review_text>
I am happy to have this camera. Only it's little bit outdated. But prce - performance ratio is great</review_text>
I WAS HAPPY TO RECEIVE MY CAMERA,FAST AND EXACTLY WHAT I ORDERED,,...GREAT SHIPPER...</review_text>
This was my first purchase of a digital camera. The features are pretty standard. The pictures I am able to take are either very good or fuzzy. The fuzziness applies to some of the pictures that the auto focus is unusable. For some reason and in certain situations, I am unable to get the AF to work.As I said before, when the AF works, I can get very good quality pictures...You will want to get a bigger memory card too</review_text>
I have this camera for work, in a job I should take 100+ pics a day to document my work.Yes, this camera is easy to use and takes decent pics.The bad side: it eats batteries like crazy. The worst part of this camera is that after every 4-5 pics taken in succession, a "processing" graphic comes up on the LCD screen, and I need to wait 30-45 seconds before I can take another pic. Of the 15 co-workers who were given this camera as well as me, they experience the same issue.Once the processing is done, a majority of times, it goes back to processing after each image taken. This is really annoying.I tried using one of my personal hi speed SD cards instead of the dollar store SD card that work supplied, and the same result. It makes no difference whether the batteries are new or used.If you wish to take two or three pics, then shut the camera down... this would be a great inexpensive camera.I sure am glad I am on the clock when using this camera. For my personal camera needs, I'd never accept this camera... there would be too many missed shots. I'll stick with my Panasonic Lumix for personal use</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera.  It is very easy to use and a good size.  Takes great pictures, too</review_text>
I love my new camera. It takes great pictures and it's easy to opperate</review_text>
I don't think you'll find a better camera for around $100, but it does have some downsides.  Most of the downsides has to do with it's really really tiny lens.  It says 36mm but that's just a 35mm equivalent (not that I expected a 35mm lens it's just I didn't expect the lens to be that small).  Picture quality is still good especially in medium distance shots with high lighting, but low light can be hit or miss.  It's a great camera for vacation, or family photos and most of the drawbacks won't even be noticed by these users.  Battery life on the camera is really good I've taken about 100 photos (most with flash) and the battery bar hasn't even dropped.  It also has an auto-off feature to save battery life when you forget to turn it off yourself.This camera is fairly easy to use and doesn't really have alot of features to mess around with (or mess up) so it's great for those fairly new to the technology.  It's also priced just right so you can take it anywhere and not worry too much about having it lost or broken</review_text>
Very good first camera. Easy to use and gives great pictures. Highly Recommen</review_text>
Kodak has always been known for instant cameras, this purchase renewed my faith in instant shipment and delivery</review_text>
This is my first digital cam. I was looking for a good price, but also a pretty good quality. I have had nothing but success with this cam. It takes great pictures zooms in on subjects with clarity and I love the auto timer for 2 or 10 seconds. The battery life isn't the greatest but also not the worst I have seen. I would definately reccomend this to others</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my young daugther, after the canon i bought her fell apart after 3 weeks post-xmas for no good reason. Anyway, the Kodak works nicely enough, has a big screen to view pix on the back, but has a tiny viewfinder, if you like to use that feature ,its difficult. The pix are clear and colors are true. It takes videos which is fun and handy-for a short shoot, of course.The price was great. All around a good camera for the buck. However, it does eat baterries like crazy</review_text>
Overall I am very happy with this lens. I use it with an HDR-HC3 & it definitely widens the captured range with no distortion. It is especially useful if you are working in small areas or find yourself panning around frequently. I have 2 complaints on this lens though - it obstructs the flash on my HC3 so I can only take photos with this lens in good light. This is really more of a design fault on the camera than the lens but... Other thing is it does not allow you to use any filters - I would like to use some polarizing filters etc which this will not allow for. Otherwise good product & would recomend.</review_text>
Just came back from a 10-day vacation at Disneyworld in Orlando, Florida during the holiday season. Used this with my Sony DVD505 and it was fantastic. Captured every single firework display without necessarily panning left to righ and vice versa. Just propped my DVD recorder on a tripod and that was it</review_text>
This is a good quality lens. I bought it because Sony recommended it for the HDR-HC3 I bought. I thought this would have a wider shot but I still rate it a 5 star because it's the best quality your going to get for these types of cameras unless you move up to the bigger cameras with bigger "mm" filter size. I recomend the Sony VCL-SW04 37mm 0.45X Wide Angle Lens for even wider shots if you can still find one. It's made for a 37mm camera but if you can still find one new it will come with adaptor rings to fit your 30mm. It looks like Sony doesn't make them anymore so you may just have to go with this one. Stick with Sony lenses for these smaller video cameras if you don't want the HD quality be distorted</review_text>
I've been very pleased with the quality of the pics taken with the cam corder when theis auxillary lens has been attached</review_text>
Good: The wide-angle lens works great.  I've mostly been using my camera inside and my subjects have been so close I need to use this to fit everything in the screen.Not so good: I can't leave it on - my camera bag is too small.  The threads are a little small making it a little difficult to put on quickly but certainly not hard</review_text>
This is a must have for doing any close-up or indoor footage.  If using on a HD 1080 video camera then you will notice a little blurriness along the edge of the frame.  If you have a lot of camera motion in your video it will not be too noticeable, it's mainly when the camera is static does your eye tend to zone in on it.  Over all it's a good product</review_text>
I bought this for my previous DVD 403 Handycam and now using it with my HDR-UX1. If you like to shot in places like inside cars o small rooms, this lens does the job nicely</review_text>
We are not big users of technology.  This bundle was very inexpensive and allows us to produce printed photos with nearly no effort.  The camera is straight-forward to use, though not a sleek as some we've seen</review_text>
I was so happy and scared at the same time.  I had never used a digital camera before in my life. Guess what?  It was so easy!!I give Kodak all the koodles</review_text>
This is the ideal starter camera for a beginner.  I found it easy to use and simple to get started with.  However the software that comes with this camera is not so great. It runs slow on my system and has features that most people won't really ever use such as a greeting card maker.You're going to want a memory card with this camera as the internal memory doesn't hold a huge number of pictures</review_text>
I just got this camera recently along with the printer. Setting up was very simple. The only problem I came across was putting the ribbon in the printer. You have to use your finger to remove the slack from the ribbon but it's not that easy. When you put the ribbon in the printer it gets caught on something and could damage the ribbon. It takes time and tons of patients to get that ribbon in the printer. The pictures come out very nice and print even better. I washed a couple of pictures to test the quality and they came out flawless. This camera is a value and shouldn't be passed up. The screen on the camera is huge and the buttons take some time to get use too. If you have any further questions feel free to comment them and I'll reply as possible</review_text>
My only complaint: the built-in flashes on these cameras have limited range.  If you're shooting in a dark room and the subject is 30 feet away, it's time to upgrade to a digital SLR.  Otherwise - this is a great camera</review_text>
Very easy to use, multiple languages, something nice and easy for even unexperienced users.  Recommend to anybody buy it, it's worth it.  And the price is right for the features and MP.  I would not hesitate to pay more for this camera.  Kodak has done wonderful job with this on</review_text>
Initially I was wary after reading a few reports that this case may leak, but so far I have had no problems at all.  I tested it to 12 feet at the bottom of my swimming pool (with a 1lb lead weight inside to make it sink) and then took it to 130 feet on several dives the following day with my trusty S400 camera.  Great pictures, clear video, what a great product.My dive buddy has taken his to over 200 feet and it still works fine.  The only problem may be finding a source for replacement O-rings.</review_text>
I've had the S400 and this housing for two years now and I've taken it on at least 20 dives. It's gone with me down to about 80 ft numerous times. No issues, no leaking. I am not exceptionally careful with the camera prep but I do use dessicant - which I think is a no brainer for UW photography. For $170 this is the bargain of a lifetime. I love being able to use the same camera for both land and underwater shots. I don't have to master two camera interfaces. After two years, even if it fails at this point, I got my money's worth about 18 months ago, in my opinion. I can't recommend this enough - for anyone who is nervous, just buy the insurance for your trip like the other reviewers suggested - and see how it goes. Canon has made a fan for life</review_text>
This underwater case works just like a non-pro hopes it will. You get it out of the box, you put your camera in, and close the lock. You jump in the water and take perfect digital pictures. That's it! You can access all the functions while you're underwater. It's really cool looking. I can't say enough great things about this product</review_text>
The case fits perfectly, as a canon product for a canon product should.  Took the camera diving several times without a hitch.  I'd buy another in a heartbeat</review_text>
Just got back from the Galapagos Islands and have magnificent pictures from this camera. I took videos of the seal lions underwater and got great close up and clear photos of fish, etc.No leakage problems at all</review_text>
I bought this camera (Canon A460) as a second camera and was looking for a pocket-sized, compact, digital camera that had zoom and video capabilities, took AA batteries and priced reasonably cheap [...] The Canon Powershot A460 is all that.It's small enough to fit into your palm and fits into the front pants pocket easily and is light enough that the camera is not really noticeable after a few minutes. It seems to me that Canon designed it to be carried without a camera case because there is a lens shield that pulls into place to cover the lens whenever it is powered off. (The lens retracts into the camera body when it is powered off, and the lens cover pulls into place automatically). The body is well rounded with no sharp edges anywhere that might catch parts of clothing. The LCD screen is exposed but I pasted one of those see-thru LCD screen plastic protectors (sticky on one side) on it to protect it from scratches. All the camera's openings are well protected by covers. The only cover that I thought had a little more play than it should was the battery cover.The camera powers up extremely quickly. You can focus with either the viewfinder or the LCD screen. One thing that surprised me was that when using the viewfinder, there is no information shown on the viewfinder other than a green light to indicate that the camera is in focus or a blinking orange light to indicate it is not. The LCD mode shows a lot more info (eg, ISO speed, current resolution, etc). But, I guess it makes sense since this is a camera that is meant to be simple, and what could be simpler than knowing when something is in focus or not. That's pretty much all the info that's needed. (Switching to the viewfinder will conserve battery power).I bought a 2GB Kingston Secure Digital card for about $13 on Amazon for this camera so there's plenty of space. The card can be removed and put into a SD card reader that comes with most modern computers and laptops. (My laptop, the Toshiba Tecra A5 has it, and it was bought about 2 years ago). The computer will recognize the SD memory card as an extra drive, and the transfer rate is extremely fast. If your computer does not have a SD card reader, then the USB connector can be used to transfer the images to your computer instead.In video mode, the zoom works only when in the highest video resolution (640 x 480). (This was a surprise to me too. On my Canon Powershot S1, the zoom works in all video resolutions). The video is a little more choppy compared to the Canon S1.There is no dedicated zoom lever. Two of the buttons normally used in menu navigation also serve as zoom controls.(The Canon S1 (my other camera) has a dedicated zoom lever, which is nice). I guess, one of the reasons for reusing buttons for zooming is a more compact design--no lever sticking out that might catch your clothing). Once I got used to it, I did not have any problems using the 2 buttons for zooming.The pictures taken are the usual Canon quality. You do have to pay attention to make sure that your hands are not shaking when you press the shutter since there is no image stabilizer (I've gotten spoilt by the Canon Powershot S1 which has a image stabilizer). [...]The buttons on the camera are designed and placed so that you could operate the camera with only the right hand if so desired. The left hand is used just to stabilize and steady the camera.This camera uses a focus beam light that helps it to focus quickly and and has the much lauded Digic II processor. Both are technological improvements over the Canon Powershot S1 which does not have an autofocus light and only has a Digic I processor.The camera uses AA batteries (either the rechargable or the normal type will work). Easily available power was an important feature for me.I was very pleased with the Super Macro capability of this camera, which allows for extreme close ups. To access this mode, you have to set the camera to "M" (manual mode) on the dial, and then press the Func/Set button. This will open up a menu where you can set the camera to "Super Macro".[...] This camera (Canon A460) has a "SCN" mode in which you can choose different scenes (Portrait, Night, Kids, Pets, Indoors, Foliage, Snow, Beach). I've used the "Snow" scene setting and my pictures came out great when I'm skiing and taking pictures. (To access the Scene setting, turn the dial to "SCN" and then press the Func/Set button, which will bring up a menu that allows you to choose the settings).I'm really enjoying the Canon A460 and it has filled its role in my camera arsenal admirably. I needed a camera that I could take with me when I'm skiing or snowboarding that was light and small and cheap. It fits into my pants pocket and is pretty light that it does not interfere with my balance, etc. (The Canon S1, though a great camera, was a little too large to fit into my pants pocket or in a fanny pack. However, it is still my preferred camera when I'm able to have a camera case or back pack with me.)Update (4/11/2007)--I've had this camera for about 2 months now and have accidentally dropped it twice from about 2 to 3 feet onto a hard surface floor. Also, have dropped it into a foot of snow while skiing and using the video. The camera is still working flawlessly.</review_text>
works, which is a good thing...  it replaces a single type card reader from sandisk (which still works after about 8 years of using it). In windows explorer it displays a removeable disk for each type card reader it has, all of these extra "disk drives" can be confusing for someone not fimilar with computers or windows</review_text>
For a large camcorder like my Sony FX7 this adds nice rear "ballast" for balance and EIGHT HOURS taping time!  I use it for long shoots and the small one that comes with the cam for short home stuff</review_text>
This isn't a Sony-brand battery, but it works fine.  The remaining time shows on the camcorder display, just like it does with the Sony brand.  I'm pleased, and the price was great</review_text>
Now I don't have to worry about running out of battery life when going to family outings</review_text>
Features 30% more stamina than the NP-F960 rechargeable battery pack.I bought this AFTER spending half a day shooting with a Sony FX1 in very cold weather with my NP-F960 battery.  Between the pausing and occasional power down, the battery survived this bitter cold day with LOTS of juice left over.  So imagine what this NP-F970 can do for you.I have the NP-F960 clone battery, and it isn't holding a charge as good in storage.My only beef is waiting for it to fully charge. If you are a serious videographer, or use the Sony HVL20DW2 20 watt video light, this is a definite "must have"</review_text>
the maps are excellent, bought this for my 10 year od daughter and some of the wording inside is a bit beyond her at this time but she can grow into i</review_text>
Gift recipient said it was great.  I can't add any more than that</review_text>
This is a handy item.  My camera case is crammed pretty tight as I have stuffed my lens hood and adapter ring into it.  Not wanting to have my memory sticks get squashed and possibly not work I invested a little bit of money to insure that it wouldn't happen.  This case will hold 4 sticks together which is more than I'll have for a while (especially at 1 gig and 2 gig media memory).  However, this picutre is wrong.  It is not flat like this at all.  If you look under Velbon DMSP-SM4, that is what the case looks like.  I acutally like that one better anyhow.  But if you are looking for a very flat, long case this is not the one.  If you want one a little thicker and with the chain-order this one-you will not be dissappointed.</review_text>
Great purchase! The case is small and fits 4 memory sticks. Definitely recommend it</review_text>
I purchased this camera as a gift after extensive research.  The recipient ended up buying themselves the same camera before I could give it to them.  Lucky me.  This has been a great little camera.  It is great for a beginner and for those that want a camera that is portable</review_text>
This is my first digital camera and I really love it. I am enjoying using it so much. I recommend this camera highly</review_text>
The Canon PowerShot A540 6MP Digital Camera worked great right out of the box.  It is very easy to use and delivers great pictures.  The view screen is very large and I really like the option of using the view finder to take pictures.  I took 330 pictures with my first set of batteries that came with the camera.  At the price point of $175, I do not think there is a better camera on the market</review_text>
This little camera was my first digital. It was the quality of the on line samples that convinced me. The colors are true to life, not that  pastel look. This is what I've been looking for. A digital point and shoot that renders true colors. It has a very good clear view finder. Unfortunately, it has no diopter. But the view finder on this one is very clear. A lot of you may not have a problem with no diopter. I wrote to canon expressing my concern that view finders & diopters are still in demand. The LCD screen on this washes out in bright sunlight. The movies that this camera produces are very good for a camera of this type. I'm still learning about how to use the scene modes, so not much to share with you there. I do like the "P" mode for changing ISO settings & "vivid" colors. The ability to change the "EV" settings in certain lighting situations is a big help, as "auto" doesn't always achieve what you want. You have the ability to change the focus & light metering. Bottom line, you get a lot of bang for your buck here. If you are looking to get started with digital as I was, this will certainly open lots of fun & interesting doors. Experiment. Take lots of pictures. You can have fun while learning. I did</review_text>
I would recommend this camera in the sub $200 price range.  Easy to use, multiple settings and user friendLY controls.  I am very happy with this camera</review_text>
Although my camcorder delivery (extra fee) was rapid and well timed for a planned recording weekend, my excitement quickly turned to disappointment after opening the package.  I was unable to either charge the battery or use the camcorder because the seller delivered a version suitable only for a foreign power supply.  In other words, the power cord was unusable in the US.  This means a lost weekend as a minimum, with longer delays and higher costs likely in obtaining a suitable power supply cord.  My first business with this seller laid an egg in the form of an expensive movie camera</review_text>
After vigorous research and investigation, I decided on this camera because of portability with quality.  Bigger cameras may provide better HD picture quality but I believe you may lose lots of opportunities since the camera is not in your pocket.I used 4GB SD card to take about 1 hour of HD video.  With two 2GB SD cards, I am pretty much covered in most occasions.  With recent purchase of an 80GB portable hard drive that I can dump SD card to, I don't have to worry about running out of storage.Battery life is also reasonable: I didn't measure the actual hours but I used all three SD cards with one charge.Flash is also relatively powerful, but like other digital camera the built-in flash is not effective once it passes 10 ft or further.Ergonomical design is the best of all like-kind portable video camera.  I can control the button with one hand without too much worry about dropping the camera.High Definition quality is not as nearly good as bulky ones such as Sony HDR-HC1, but much better than average among the same level of pocket size cameras.  With a little adjustment on ISO, you will capture better images that you want.  However, ISO 400 presents noticeable grain.  5 MP still camera image is not as good as my Canon digital camera but is good enough to print and share with friends and family.Overall, I finally settled down with my seemingly endless research and enjoy this camera</review_text>
I think I originally gave the HD1 I bought through Amazon a 5 star rating. And while that model has performed satisfactorily for me, some of the reviews I've read have suggested it has failed in many instances. I think the oled display must have been the cause of many of the failures, because Sanyo apparently replaced the oled display with a more conventional lcd display. I have purchased the HD1a, also from Amazon, because I like more than one camera angle, whether I'm videoing for home consumption or for stock video to be saved in the not-quite-ready-for-primetime mpeg 4 video codec... although it really is better than much of my standard video shot with mini DV tape cameras I oun. I found that by purchasing the 49mm Sanyo adapter, I could attach a 2x lens I already ouned and can now optically zoom in quite close on subjects. I also purchased a polarizing filter to go on the larger lens that really saturates the color, especially of a clear blue sky. In short, I think I feel more confident with the HD1a purchase than with the HD1 camera, although it is still early days and this could all change</review_text>
The HD1 is a wonderful, amazing camera.  And it is small enough that you can always have it with you -- I've carried mine for months in my front pants pocket in its protective case, and been able to capture family and work stills and video that would otherwise have been lost.  Even if the quality were not up to par, I would have something instead of nothing.  But the quality is great!  I'll expand on the quality below.This camera is genuinely high definition, more than three times the resolution of NTSC.  This is best shown by comparing a DV image captured with firewire (no NTSC modulation artifacts) on a computer monitor, to the HD1 image transferred from its SD card.  Notice that this comparison should favor the DV -- but instead, it makes the increased resolution of the HD1 clear.HD televisons and monitors are already commonplace, and video captured at less than HD quality will not be as highly valued (like 8mm, good for historical content).  Capturing now in HD preserves the value of your video.  And this camera fits in your pocket!  My bet is anyone who thinks the video from this camera is not significantly better than DV is looking at its output downconverted to letterboxed NTSC, probably on an old TV.The HD1 records in 720p30 format for an hour on a 4GB sd card (about $70).  There is no transport noise picked up by the on-board microphones, as there is no tape transport!  Even lens and finger noises are attenuated by the intelligent placement of the microphones on the back of the fold-out screen, where unlike other cameras, they are pointed at the subject!  It also has an external microphone jack, missing in other cameras.Once the camera is turned on, folding the viewfinder puts it in standby mode with no apparent impact on battery life.  This way, the camera is ready to go in a couple of seconds after the viewfinder is opened.  Mine stays in standby, sometimes for days between uses.  Battery life is very good (but keep a charged spare with you, just like you keep a second SD memory card).The still shots from this camera are as good as or better than most dedicated still cameras.  I would rate it just below the Sony DSC-T7.  However, the HD1 has a 10x optical zoom, which reduces the need for cropping, thereby preserving resolution.  Look at the stills and video from the HD1 on steves-[...] (different Steve), which is a blowaway excellent web site for comparing cameras.The output of the HD1 is not as clean as the output from the Sony HC3 or the Canon HV10 HDV comcorders, both of which capture at a higher resolution.  Ironically both use CMOS sensors which have historically been much noisier than CCDs like the HD1's.  I suspect that this is due to better post capture processing, so I'm eager to try something like Noise Ninja or NeatImage on the HD1 output.  However, as is, it is easy to mix the video from all three using Vegas Video (and I'm sure other editors), especially when the HDV cameras have been used for tripod shots and the HD1 for handheld, more casual shots.  Of course, the HV10 and HC3 each cost about twice the HD1, and as wonderfully compact as they are, neither fits in your pocket.The program Jet Audio [...] is the best I've found for playing the MPEG-4 video directly from the HD1 SD card on a PC.  Even the free version does a great job.Two other general purpose digital imaging notes:  Always make two copies of your image files on different media before erasing the original!  And rent some Internet space from a web host somewhere across the country (or world) and copy your image files to a non-public area on your web server space.  This costs as little as $6 / month for 150 GB or so somewhere in a secured, backed up facility.  And you can still use the public part of the space to create a web site.  If there is a tornado, hurricane, earthquake, fire, etc. your "irreplacable family photos" (including any old ones you've scanned or reshot on your digital camera and uploaded) will still be safe.  I understand at this point there are folks offering this sort of a service directly, although typically at a higher cost.Another review mentions the "drawback" of the video freezing briefly when a still is captured while shooting video.  On the other hand, this camera in video mode is shooting 30 1MP stills each second!  Take your pick and always get the right moment.Did I mention that the HD1 is a genuine High Definition video camera / recorder that fits in your pocket so you can always have it with you? What an outrageous step forward!  I hope you like yours and find it as useful as I do mine.Aloha,Steve</review_text>
I bought this camera for its size.  I can carry the camera on my belt and and case that came with the camera is perfect.  Look it!The video and still pictures are very good.  The video in the dark was not up to speed but the flash does a good job for short distance.The video editing software is not the best and and still trying to get my first DVD.Overall the camera is great - good quality stills and Video!</review_text>
I purchased this polarizing filter for my Sony HC96.  The Sony store at the mall did not have it in stock and the Sony website was also out of stock.  Either it's a popular item or Sony didn't produce a large volume of it.  Anyway, it took Amazon at least a couple of weeks to ship it.  I took the filter on my trip to Yosemite.  It did just as advertised --- made the sky more blue and removed light reflections from glass windows and water surfaces.  If you want to keep the reflections for visual effect, you just have to rotate the lens out of the effective meridian.  The protective lens that came with the filter was handy, too.  At first, I didn't know why I would need it because I justed wanted a polarizing filter.  It turns out that it's good for protecting the camera lens from wind/dust and water spray from the waterfalls when the polarizing filter is off the camera.  It seems pricy ($75), maybe because it's a Sony or because it's not a popular item.  I'd say it's not useful for most occasions, esp. indoors.  It's a luxury item for outdoor shots as a hobby</review_text>
It does its job good and it is a smart purchase to protect your camera lens with. It's better to take the chance of messing up a $6 filter lens than your $500+ camera's lens. The only thing I didn't like about this filter is that it comes in a very cheap case that won't really protect it in storage at all. Besides that its all good</review_text>
This charger's main selling points are:  1. It has 4 separate and independent charging circuits, with each being able to charge 1 battery at a time, and 2. the batteries barely warm up during charging.  Heat is what kills NiMH batteries, so the low temp feature is great.The first unit I bought had two defective circuits that began to act up after a weak of use, where it either did not terminate the charge or it would terminate far too prematurely.  I should have returned it for an exchange, but didn't because I lost the receipt.  Anyway, I bought a second unit and it has worked fine so far.Besides the defective circuits, one minor nuisance with the design is that if you insert a cell in a slot the charging current would only come on if the cell is above some minimum voltage.  For some of my NiCAD and NiMH cells, the cells sometimes experience temporary polarity reversal or very low voltage after a prolonged storage.  No matter how many times these cells are inserted in the Mach 1 charger, the charging circuitry would not come on.  I think this is a safety feature to insure that dead cells won't be charged, but it frequently weeds out batteries that are perfectly good but that for some reason either experienced a temporary voltage reversal or fall below the cutoff voltage.  To charge these apparent duds, one needs a "dumb charger" that doesn't have the safety circuitry to first revive the cells to give them a positive voltage before putting them in the Mach 1.Another negative with the Mach 1 design is that the cells are usually less than fully charged when the unit finishes charging. The reason for this is that the cells heat up quite dramatically at near full charge, so it sacrifices fullness of charge for cell longevity by not charging the cells to fullness in order to keep them cool.Note that the 1-hr. charging time is based on 2000 mAH batteries.  If you put in batteries with less or more capacity, the charge times will proportionally change</review_text>
The Lenmar MSC-AA 1-Hour Mach 1 Speedcharger seems to do all it promises.  The batteries charge quickly and hold their charge well.  My previous charger took approximately 24 hours to charge 4 AA batteries, so this is quite an improvement.</review_text>
This Charger is Excellent in charging batterys in an hour. Its Great for those last minute, I need battery moments. I actually have 2 of them. We have 3 digital cameras and I have saved ALOT of money:</review_text>
This was a holiday present for my son (with Dad expecting to use it too!), whose handheld games eat batteries at a prodigious rate.  It has already been a hit today (Dec. 25) in that regard.  (I bought a dozen Maya Powerex 2300 AA cells  in addition to those supplied by Lenmar. The Powerexes are very highly rated in user reports, but also are a bit pricier than average.)As previously noted by others, unit ships with batteries insulated from charger terminals by a thin strip of clear (all but invisible, in fact) plastic. This should really have a "pull tail" on it, or a note stuck to the unit saying "Please remove insulator before use" or some such, I bet they get tons of DOA reports from people who just plug in the unit with the supplied cells still in place and expect it to start right up.The description of this unit on Amazon page says it comes with four 2000 mAh cells, though at the time I placed the order, 2300s/2400s were quite common.  I figured, no big deal in that regard.  I was pleasantly surprised when the unit arrived with four 2300 mAh cells!  Of course, to compensate for this, one of the four supplied cells turned out to be a dud and would not charge.Unit seems to work as advertised. "One-hour" theoretical charge time is for 1800 mAh cells. The unit charged two of the supplied 2300s in 75 minutes, the third cell took 90 minutes.  (You can charge individual cells in any combination in any of the four slots.)  Individual red LED indicators initally come on after cell insertion, during rapid charging, then go out again when cells are nearly full and are being trickle-charged.  If serious problem with a battery, its LED will flash, or in the case of an excessively-drained, dead cell, LED will NOT COME ON AT ALL upon battery insertion.  Note that this (LED dark) looks very much like the NORMAL indication for a battery that has finished charging, so you have to make sure that the lights initally come on for each cell as you insert it.  It is too bad dead cells don't ALSO cause a flashing error warning.While any cell is rapid-charging, the unit's internal fan runs.  This normally is an audible, but not excessive, whooshing air noise.  (Manual states not to run unit if fan is not operational.  Hopefully the unit also has its own thermal auto-shutdown protection for this possibility as a failsafe!)  In the case of my unit, the fan blades were striking the inside of the case, so the fan noise was like a cross between a cicada and a really noisy electric razor.  Probably cause for a warranty return, but I would prefer not going through that hassle if it can be avoided.  By gently flexing the plastic case and loosening the case screws a bit to give the top a smidgeon more clearance, I managed to eliminate the noise.Contrary to other reports, I observed that batteries became noticeably warm during rapid-charging phase, but not overly so.Pros--* Can use charging slots individually, in any combination* Very good "intelligent" charging performance* Comes with both AC and 12V car adaptors* Supplied with decent-capacity AA cellsCons--* (Minor) Should warn user that batteries ship insulated* Should be a more specific LED warning for severely-drained ("dead") cells* Can't leave cells to trickle-charge indefinitely (manual recommends removing cells after 4 hours max) so unit needs to be somewhat attended when in use* Minor flaws with my particular unit (one dead supplied cell, fan buzzing against case) probably not common, but it could indicate that quality control tolerances are a bit tight.Note that most of the "cons" simply require using the unit correctly, so as long as you are a careful user, this unit should do very well for most uses.  --JM</review_text>
Charger works great.  You can charge each battery individually.  My previous charger need to have battery charged in pairs.  A built-in fan keeps the unit nice and cool, a little noisy though. No problem here</review_text>
While I don't own this charger (still considering), I felt compelled to state what I have read elsewhere: an individual thought that his Lenmar charger was D.O.A. also.Upon closer inspection, he noted thin plastic coverings over the "touches". Upon removing them, the charger worked!So, a heads up to prospective buyers.</review_text>
The Mach1 Gamma is a "Smart" charger because it uses Lenmar's patented NeoTherm microprocessor technology to monitor each cell being recharged to make sure that it is charged to its maximum capacity.Operation of the charger is very easy.The rapid charging time is totally dependant on the capacity of the cell being charged.700mAh AAA -- 30 minutes1600mAh AA -- 55 minutes1800mAh AA -- 60 minutes2000mAh AA -- 65 minutesAC power adapter (100 - 240 volt AC)Lenmar provides a three-year manufacturer's warranty on the Mach1 Gamma Speed Charger.The only negative thing I can say about this charger is that Lenmar recommends that you don't leave the batteries on the charger more than 3-4 hours after the fast charge is completed.(The charger does not charge NiCd.</review_text>
I've owned this charger for over a year now and It's been flawless.  Batteries seem to last longer when charged on this charger than the other 1hour charger I own.  Very fast charging and batteries are never hot after charging (hot is a sign that they are being stressed = shorter lifespan).  The original Lenmar 2000mAh batteries are still going strong and are holding their charge as well as when they were new.  Because the charger is 'smart' I will often throw the batteries in to 'top up' even when they are only half used so that I have a full charge when I'm out and about (often done in 15 minutes).  Never any signs of memory effects.  I also love the fact that it charges each battery independantly (useful for devices like FRS radios that take 3 AA batteries).  Brilliant system. Sorry to hear about the other reviewers DOA, maybe quality control has been slipping</review_text>
This case is great for pictures of the kids underwater!  I also use it occasionally as a protective case for trips in areas where it rains a lot- it protects the camera very well.  I wish I purchased it at the current sale price!  It was a little expensive when I got it (half the price of the camera itself!) but I have no regrets.</review_text>
The product works amazingly underwater, what a cool thing to have, especially in the summer, or to use on vacations at the beach</review_text>
WOW!! All the money spent on disposable cameras! I can't wait to take pics of my girls snorkeling for the first time. Shipping only 2 days. Unbelievable!!</review_text>
Wanted this filter to protect my lens.  Does that just fine</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.I use this filter on my 70-300mm lens.</review_text>
good product. feets my needs (amateur photographer). maybe not the greatest filter, but good value for the cheap price you pay</review_text>
Excellent product that arrived very quickly. I took it on my trip to England and was very impressed with it. I would highly recommend both the product and Amazon's service.</review_text>
I use this filter on my Nikon N80. Works great. For under $10, this is a great buy</review_text>
I wanted lense protection at a very low price.   I can't see any difference in my digital pictures betwen filtered and unfiltered, using this filter.   Now, if I get dirt on the filter, or a scratch, or whatever...   I can just dump the filter and buy another one</review_text>
This filter is an excellent brand and is of high quality. Does exactly what it is suppose to do and it will last a long time. I have used this brand filter for many years and have many sizes for all my cameras. If you don't have one of these on your camera, you should</review_text>
This is the first time I purchased a product by Tiffen.  I'm using this UV Protection filter mainly for the protection of my new lens, and I assume most people purchase a UV filter for the same reason.  The main drive for me to choose this product is because of the reduced price and the 10-year warranty.  Being a simple UV filter, there aren't any extra effects except the advertised &quot;Helps eliminate bluish cast in images.&quot;  My prints just came back, and I can't really see too much of a difference with my untrained eyes</review_text>
This is a really nice frame - looks like an expensive black wooden frame. It has an extensive setup menu, but it is really a no-brainer. Just pop the card in and the slideshow starts.cons: Does not have a remot</review_text>
My sister owns this camera and I've used it a few times. It takes great pictures, quality pictures that are clear and the colors are deep and beautiful. I love this camera. She never had any problems with it.</review_text>
If you're thinking of buying this camera... I have a few things for you to be concious of beforehand.1) If you're going to be taking sports pictures (of your kids, or whoever!) and you're indoors our outdoors on a darker day or under lights, the camera does not take any decent pictures.  They're all too dark.  This was one big disappointment for me, regardless if you're in sportsmode (this acutally makes it worse) or just taking the photo in the normal mode.. it doesn't come out.  If this is one major thing you're planning on doing with the camera I would re-consider.2)The zoom isn't what it could be -- at times it's a little frustrating at how little distance 3x really is. Just a thought.Overall, I love the camera. I highly recommend getting a big memory card so you can go a long weekend/vacation without worrying about going over</review_text>
I am in LOVE with Photography again thanks to this camera.It's so easy to use, compact (thus easy to have always) and the pictures are AMAZINGLY clear in all kinds of lighting.THANK YOU SONY for making PHOTOGRAPHY FUN again!I'm now using this camera to take a ton of pictures for my students (HS and college) language projects (Go Flickr and movie making!) and podcasting.AWESEOME.THANK YOUGRACIASMERCI</review_text>
I have owned this camera for over a year.  There are most likely models out with more pixels.  I like this camera.  It is easy to use and the optical zoom ensures that I keep my resolution.  If you take the memory card to your local drugstore (or other picture printing store) you should be pleased with the quality of the pictures.  To my untrained eye I can not tell the difference between digital and 35mm</review_text>
I bought the DSC P 200 last year, after spending thousands of hours reading these reviews!!! and I've never had a better camera. So, thanks to everyone who reviewed this camera, and recommended it. This camera takes credible photos from the inside of the car, with the window closed, going 60mph! It fits in your pocket, and stays charged up for days. There are lots of features that I still have not figured out, but all you need to do is point, click and you get a great photo</review_text>
I have been using it for almost a year, I got it for my mother, she loves it.Pros:The picture quality is so good!!!! (on 7.1mp)Battery life is superb, probably one of the best for small cameras.LCD sizeNO Redeye ever!!! very few cameras this size can do thatlots of featurescons:video was not very impressive, quality goes down considerably when you make it a full screen on a 15 inch monitor.it is still very expensive, almost 300$ even now,  I still think it is expensive for a camera, but i guess it is worth the qualityI didnt use software that comes with this so i dont know if there are cons or pros related.</review_text>
I love this camera. I bought it for my trip to Paris. I found it very easy to use. One feature i didn't realize it had was video with sound. I found that very useful. I bought a 2GB memory card to go with the camera. The one it comes with doesn't hold that many pictures. The software was easy to install and use. Not really small enough for a pocket but still a great camera on a budget</review_text>
First off, let me make it clear that I am satisfied with this camera. I have had it for 8 months now and I have put it through its paces and its held up fine.But there are few things you must know:The camera has no zoom. I mean, practically no zoom. 2.2x may look decent but its pointless in any real-life situation. You WILL find yourself moving a lot with your camera to get a better shot, not standing in one place and using the zoom feature. You can never get a close wide shot - its just not possible with this camera. This camera is great for average stills but that's about it.You have to click twice to take a picture or "press halfway and then fully" according to the manual. This is a major pain. Sometimes when the battery is weak, it may take a lot of time to take a picture (and a lot of frustration), so this is not a cam to capture any special pictures or "kodak moments".Apart from these cons, the camera is great value for money and offers video and all kinds of stuff. If you're looking mostly looking to take landscape or portrait stills, this camera will do a good job</review_text>
I bought this camera six months ago for my 12 year old daughter.  It was her (and ours) first digital camera.  I read so many reviews prior to selecting this model.  The reviews for this camera were so helpful.  This camera has been so easy to use and it takes excellent pictures.  Rechargeable batteries are definitely a must! This camera is the best camera for this price, no doubt about it.  We have taken still shots and videos.  It is so fun to have the option to take a video.  We have some great clips.  All I can say is we are so happy with the camera.  We would definitely choose it again</review_text>
This is my 3rd digital camera and I bought this one to supplement my larger 10X zoom camera.  This one fits nicely into a pocket  or small camera bag to easily take it to all events or for travel.  I've found that it takes nice photos indoors when the flash is used....Even when the cats or dogs I'm shooting are moving around.  I've felt the life of a battery set is pretty good, but I've been using nice rechargeable ones.  Definitely get a set of 4, then you have 2 to use and 2 as a backup set.  The settings are pretty easy to figure out and change and 99% of my photos were taken on the "auto" setting and came out pretty good.  As others have indicated, indoors - without flash - can produce blurry photos, but that's the nature of almost all cameras, not unique to this model.  Glad I bought it and would highly recommend it</review_text>
I really like this camera! It is fairly simple to use, takes great pictures and is packed with features. It fits nicely in the hand and is compact enough to slip in a coat pocket or purse.We bought this camera for our daughter's birthday. She is using it with ease & especially loves the movie with sound option. In my opinion, the camera is a winner for any adult or kid wanting a good all around digital camera.My only negative is that it is a battery hog. As with most digital cameras, you will want to make sure you get rechargeable batteries and large memory card</review_text>
This camera is an exelent camara. It has plenty of effects, plenty of modes, plenty of scenery options. The image quality is 3.2 megapixel, but its quite good. The pictures you take without the flash do end up getting a bit blury, where as if you take it with the flash, it comes out exelent. And sometimes it takes a long time for the picture to get taken with out the flash, and sometimes it happens imediatly. But all these flaws are only with my version.But if you are looking for a good camera with a great price, this is your best option</review_text>
Cute, compact, easy to use - these are just a few ways to describe Canon's cool A400! This stylish digital camera is lightweight and perfect for snapping shots on the go. Mine is Sunset Gold.Plus, there are perks like macro mode (which lets you snap sharp pictures from as close as 2 inches), and lots of shooting modes (like Snow and Fireworks).And Movie Mode lets you capture video clips with sound.This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Just what you would expect from  Canon</review_text>
This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Even close-up photos turn out great. You would think this camera had more than 3.2 megapixels! You will have to get a much larger memory card though, as is the case with most digital cameras</review_text>
The camcorder was fairly easy to learn and use. The recorded video came out very clear and crisp.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
This camcorder has incredible high definition picture quality and it's very easy in use. It is very small that makes it very convenient to carry it with you everywhere. Because of the small size it is a bit difficult in the beginning to handle it well and control the zoom but after some time you are getting used to it with no problem. The lack of HDMI, and microphone input are minor shortcomings for this camera as you can also have HD quality to your TV with component connection and you very rarely will need to use external microphone in a small non professional camcorder like this. In contrary to the theoretical characteristics, it shoots great in low light indoor environments. For very low light environments there is the flash light. The image quality in general under any circumstances it's just perfect. The only serious weakness is the motor noise from the tape that is recorded along with other sounds from the microphone in sillent environments. Other environment sounds are captured great in very detail. The battery is also limited but having a second one you can easily solve this problem. However not using the player mode much and avoiding the integrated screen to shoot, one battery pack could be enough for one day moderate use. I think it's the perfect camera for general purpose.</review_text>
This is an amazing camera, simply put. Compact and portable with incredible detail and satisfactory low light functionality - I love it. The ergonomics are easy to get used to and the battery life is not all that bad either. If you hunt around, you hear complaints about low light quality, lack of HDMI, lack of mic input, etc., etc., but in fact, I've found no issues with this camera after shooting ample footage and have been nothing but amazed at watching the output on my HDTV. If you're not a professional videographer, techno-snob, or AV geek, but ratehr an average family man like me who simply wants a great up-to-date camera that even your wife can throw in her purse and use whenever and wherever with ease, this is a no brainer buy. Two thumbs up</review_text>
If you have plenty of light you will be amazed with the shots this camera will take.  The macro shots are breathtaking.  I haven't had the best luck in low light and have noticed some vertical banding that others have noted.  I'm not to concerned with battery life because I always consider a second larger battery as a manditory purchase for any camera.  I also wouldn't have wanted to pay for the inclusion of a firewire cable of which I already own.I highly recomend this as a take anywhere camera with unmatched consumer video quality in shooting environments with plenty of light</review_text>
Everything I need in a HD camcorder. Select a good capturing software or work in Mac to get best results from the video. Controls are easily used with one hand</review_text>
Canon has done it again! I got rid of a GL2 in order to reduce the size of the camera and got a real gem!  Now we have more movies because the camera is so much smaller and they are all in HD!  A great little camera</review_text>
I was forced to upgrade our family VHS-C camcorder (at least this is the story I offered my wife) because of my son's science fair project, which involved capturing incoming video from a CCD video camera coupled to a microscope, and recording the capture to DV tape. Our old VHS-C camcorder didn't have any video-in capability, and obviously wasn't DV. This unit from Canon also offered the opportunity to film in high-def. That wasn't critical for our project, but I figured this is where all camcorders are going to end up, as we fill our homes with new HD TVs, and our landfills with old lo-def CRT-based TVs. I'm all for future-proofing a purchase.First problem: no firewire DV cable included with camera. If Canon can include a mini-USB cable, what's the big deal to throw in the firewire cable? C'mon, Canon---I expect more with a thousand-dollar camera.Second problem: no video capture software included in the box. At the time of my purchase, there was a mail-in promo that entitled you to get a free copy of Pinnacle DV. Who knows how many weeks that may take to arrive. It also required that you cut the UPC off the box---not something I'm happy about doing until I'm positive I won't be returning the camera to the store and picking out a different one. If digital cameras can include a copy of Adobe Photoshop Elements in the box, why can't Canon make arrangements to put Pinnacle in the box too? Irritating hoop-jumping for the customer.Third: agree with other owners that the provided battery (and lack of a standalone charger) is also skinflint on Canon's part. Honestly, I'm not surprised, since pretty much every camera manufacturer I've ever seen plays the let's-make-some-extra-dough-on-worthwhile-accessories game these days.Ultimately, it's all about picture quality, and I haven't been disappointed in this regard. Took some family footage to break-in the camera, and showed it on our hi-def TV---terrific. The image stabilization worked pretty well. Didn't stress the camera with low-light shooting, so I can't comment on that. Agree with others that the tiny size of this camera makes for lots of itsy-bitsy buttons crowded together, which not everyone will like. I'm getting used to that. Now the main issue is learning all the features. It can take awhile to punch your way through the setup menus if you want to remove the date stamp, step down from 1080p to a lower def, or do anything else in the way of configuration. Ultimately the processes are all pretty logical, but the camera has so many options, expect to spend some time wading</review_text>
Decided to get this battery to utilize the original battery as a spare.  However, with this battery, we never needed a spare.  On a recent trip to Hawaii, this is the only one we used.  Through long days at Diamond Head, Waikiki, the Dole Pineapple Plantation, Polynesian Cultural Center, and a day trip to the Big Island, this battery never ran low.  Recharging at day's end was the only thing needed.Great performance</review_text>
For anyone needing several hours of shooting or picture taking away from an outlet source, the extra storage capacity providied by this pack is almost vital.Recharging has taken 20-60 minutes which fits my schedule.I find this power pack greatly enables the convenience for long shooting periods</review_text>
This is really helpful to use the camcorder without worrying about the battery life</review_text>
I hate spending more money on a battery, but the one that came with my Elura 85 was pathetic--it has a very short battery life.  This one is much better</review_text>
yeah.  it works.  It holds twice the battery life.  I am happy.-t</review_text>
Good price here and made in Japan.  Does NOT void the warranty.  The one I just received from Amazon.com charged to full in a reasonable time on the built in charger of my Canon Optura 400.  Doubles the time of the original, great backup.</review_text>
With about twice the capacity (and physical size) of the stock battery supplied with the compatible Canon camcorders, the BP-2L14 offers extended filming time that on a single charge will exceed the capacity of a digital tape cartridge, even if using the LCD screen instead of the viewfinder.Although the BP-2L14 is larger than the battery it replaces at about an inch thick (just about double the thickness), the added size doesn't interfere with filming or carrying of the camera.  Rather than carrying around a handful of the lower-capacity NB-2LH's, add a BL-2L14 or two to your inventory instead</review_text>
For $540 or so, this is the best you can get! Excellent pictures, ease of use, compact and sturdy.... You won't be disappointed</review_text>
I began as a child with brownies and graduated to instamatics, wondering at the wonderful new technology and the convenience of a contained drop in roll of film and a cool flash. In high school I progressed to dark room processing (whose magic and science later served me in a sweltering subtropical environment), but still with the most basic of cameras unless a friend lent me his Mamiya Seikor and hand held light meter. I have an old soviet all mechanical KGB 35 mm SLR camera laying around somewhere, but my main camera which became like a part of me, another organ of my body, was my Canon AL-1, with the wonders of a rudimentary Focus assist system and aperture priority photography. That Canon saw me across thousands of miles through Nicaragua and the heights of Machu Picchu, and finally gave up the ghost when twenty years came and went and duct tape couldn't hold it together anymore and the long lens fused to the body.Being known as a photographer, or one who has taken pictures, has its draw backs, as people ask you about the latest technology. In the mountains of NIcaragua in the eighties new tourists asked me how their latest point and shoot knew which ISO to set to. I had no idea. More recently people handed me their digital point and shoots, tiny as cellphones, and I had no idea and a lingering commitment to a roll of film as true photography, and a full sized SLR as the only way to go. I cannot grasp the concept of parallax which point and shoots require, but must compose in the viewfinder as I cannot control the darkroom with commercial and color film processing.Then I met this D-40Being obliged to buy a digital as the price of film processing soared, I searched desperately here on the amazon, feeling unfaithful, comparing product details, etc. which are so generously given here on the amazon, and I discovered: This D-40 is all of the camera you will ever need forever, case closed (Of course I felt the same about my Canon).I now once again sleep with my SLR literally, and its manual I commit to memory. This camera is really more than you will ever need, and since it is behind the latest wave its price is very reasonable and generous. The number of megapixels is more than sufficient for enlargement, and for cropping to details while recomposing. In fact, the camera is its own darkroom, as it allows you to crop and otherwise alter and adjust all aspects of images, including going sepia tones, and dump them to a printer or your computer, without the need for further graphics programs. The full functions of the camera quickly become intuitive, with its easily accessible and ergonomic buttons and switches and menu screens, and as one who used no more than a mainly mechanical SLR for years and loved it, this D-40 is truly magical and well beyond my needs, desires and imaginings. It can do everything and more.I strongly suggest you get the very inexpensive 55-200 mm long lens designed for this camera series. Watch for the full description of the lens to be sure it is fully compatible with all of this camera's features. And before going outside, as you learned in your first photogrpahy class, be sure to get the UV lens filter, or other filter, mainly to protect the lens from scratches and the world and your fingertip oils. Be sure to get the semi-soft camera case which is ample enough to cover the surprisingly short long lens. Also hunt around for the best price on SD memory cards, of which you will want several, and which are very inexpensive here on the amazon. If you can afford it get an extra rechargeable battery to carry in your case, and get the plug in transformer for use where plug in is available and long service is required. Pick up the remote control device and all the rest of the bells and whistles while available, but essentially get the long lens, lens filters, SD cards, and semi soft case. Also get a great all around technique refresher book like Understanding Exposure (see my review there please).One surprisingly expensive accessory is the Speedlight flash attachment. I got sticker shock at seeing the price on these nowadays, for one that angles, etc. We used to get these used for next to nothing, but now I'd get another lens instead! In any case the built in pop-up flash on the D-40 serves for most any flash situations without being annoying and with a red eye assist, etc., even at a good distance (ever seen those folks at a football game stand up and try to fill the stadium with their disposable flash or their CELLPHONE? Or stand more than twelve feet away?).I normally go with ambient light no matter how long the exposure, for the suffused effect, and so rarely use a flash. So I was glad to learn the flash can be suppressed in the "fully automatic no flash" mode, as well as other modes, but having it there to pop up whenever people require you to "take my picture" under unfavorable conditions is very comforting. This is a great all around camera with also wonderfully implemented specific skills.The only con mentioned elsewhere that I can agree with is regarding the three point automatic focus system which focusses on the nearest object. I lean on the law of thirds myself and so have to lock focus and recompose in the viewfinder, or think of cropping later. Obviously the focussing points were set up to favor the exact center, which is death to any photograph. But hey, work around this already!You cannot go wrong with this camera. Did I mention the ample rear screen, full color, which permits zooming in very closely to check your focus, etc., and which scrolls through several functional menu screens? It has everything and more, including settings for aperture priority (and even if you do not have a manual aperture ring on your lens, you can do it through the camera itself), shutter priority, etc. etc. etc. If you feel there is something this camera CANNOT do, as mentioned in other reviews, just READ THE MANUAL (we used to have an interesting acronym for that in the early days of PC's) and you will discover this camera in fact can do it all and more.You can set this up so that every iota of information regarding focal length, shutter speed, aperture, etc., etc., gets saved with the photo instead of jotting it down in a pad, and thus you can even see that the ISO is altered automatically to fit conditions. No more blowing off a roll of 100 ISO before nightfall just to take low light pictures by oil lamp with ISO 800 and using it up before daybreak. You can also set the ISO instead of automatically switching it from shot to shot as the camera wills.I have not yet tried setting the ISO to 1600 to see if it comes out as ethereally grainy as that film did when first marketted twenty years ago. Got some great shots of people and places that way. I suppose in the DSLR it simply grants greater latitude in low light situations without flash. But I see no pressing need to have a button dedicated directly and only to adjusting ISO as mentioned in another review. I trust the D-40's processor to make the decision. That's what I pay it for. Me, I am too concerned with keeping those kids in focus and in frame, or that wild bird from spooking to soon, or that flower from getting lost in too great a depth of field, or holding my breath while soaking in that altar lit by candles and wishing I had brought my tripod, or at least a monopod.Truly this is the camera to get, especially at this falling price, but be sure to protect it with lens filters and case, and READ THE MANUAL!</review_text>
I previously used mainly manual film cameras, but the cost of developing film made it difficult to take the hundreds of pictures needed to learn how to take good ones.  I recently bought the d40 which is a great camera for learning with.  I have taken about 1000 pictures in the last two weeks and probably have learned more in that time than I did with months of using a film camera.  I have large hands, so I was suprised how this small camera fits as well as it does.  The screen is large and very clear.  The availability of a few new cheap lenses alson makes this easy on the wallet, while allowing a newbie like myself learn the basics.  I highly recomment this camera</review_text>
This is a perfect cam for to begin with. The picture quality are simply amazing. Quite lot of things can be learnt from this</review_text>
This camera is wonderful. It is fairly priced and does everything I need it to. I had a d50 that was stolen and am almost glad because I could replace it with this one. The continuous shooting capabilities make for a more easy live action stop-motion frame capture. If you want it to do everything for you, it does so very well. It also allows you to have full control of the camera. I cannot say enough about the weight. I have decently sized hands, more large than small but still thin and the camera size doesn't feel small. I love this camera. I wish it had a guard for the screen, but you can't win them all. The only drawback to this camera is that I cannot use one of my brother's old lenses with autofocus because the body of the camera of course doesn't have an autofocus engine. I rarely autofocus anyway, so I'm fine with that. Plus it won't affect new lenses I buy</review_text>
I got this camera 'cause I was sick and tired of compact cameras that simply did not deliver quality photos.When I first got it I pleasantly surprised, you simply put the lens on and the camera took great pictures for you! Everything I could only dream about from a compact camera came from this beautiful instrument.The auto mode is perfect for everyday use, and the other modes are great for messing around with and getting great photos in the process.I would definitely recommend this camera to anyone who's willing to step up and get their first real camera</review_text>
For a digital SLR and with the kit lens this is a small light weight camera that takes beautiful photos and is simple to use on auto. For a beginner SLR user I can't emagine a better buy.</review_text>
It got seriously wet when the canoe capsized, but kept on going. Not under the water, just well into it. Even the actually submerged 70-300 lens came back to life once it dried out.</review_text>
This camera takes great pictures and is very easy to use.  I would recommend it to anyone that is interested in a digital SLR camera but doesn't want to spend too much money</review_text>
Fun and easy to use.. this is one of the best DSLR's for a beginning photographer! Grand Canyon here I come!Oh know that this does not have bracketing and the lenses are super pricey (new lens must have motor built in since the camera body does not have one)</review_text>
Absolutely fantastic.  Also works with the new generation of Sony camcorders (DVD308, 508, etc.</review_text>
This is my 4th underwater housing, and the second Sports Pack I have used. It works great with my HDR-HC3, keeps it clean and dry for boating and outdoor adventure. Not heavy-duty like housings designed for deep water, but fantastic for snorkeling and fishing trips. Cons: Hard to see the display screen unless you are at the exact right angle and the control buttons are somewhat small and hard to use smoothly.</review_text>
You need to add some weight to the casing to keep it from being so buoyant- we put some shot in a large pill bottle and tied it with a shoe string. The controls are easy to use, and it gives a nice, clear picture. A good buy for filming any water-related activites</review_text>
I bought this for my Florida trip. It worked perfectly while I was doing snorkeling. Well this is what it for. But also, when I use it on my air boat ride, it worked well too. I wouldn't say I enjoyed to see other's camcorders got wet but I was happy I had my protected.Pro: Easy of using, does what it says it does.Con: Needed to have a weight to keep the unit stable under water. It is hard to hold it when too close to the surface while windy</review_text>
This just worked.  No other way to say it.  Needed to protect my HDR-HC3 during some planned water shooting while windsurfing at Cape Hatteras.  Figured for less than $200, this was worth a shot.  Never got to open the box before the trip, but took it with anyway, just in case.  Temptation was too strong, and I decided to have a go in the field.  Managed to configure the camera and housing in the front seat of my car at the beach, close it up, and shoot some great on the water video of a 20 kt day at the Canadian Hole.  Too cool.  Only two minor issues, neither worth a star...1) The instructions for where/how to mount the camera in the housing are a little tough to follow.  Only because Sony put one set of directions in like 50 different languages on a very large fold out sheet made of very lightweight paper.  Didn't help I was trying to do it in a car with cold hands on a windy day.  But still, the directions were not all that ergonomic.  Functional?  Completely.  User Friendly?  No...2) The reflective viewfinder worked well enough, but you had to shield ambient light or you couldn't very well see what you were shooting at.  Admittedly, this was an extreme test environment of bright mid-day sun on the surface of the water with lots of reflection due to wind and wave action (including lots'o'whitecaps).  Mainly requires an adjustment in your shooting posture, specifically to put your face up against the housing, which is a little awkward at first, but then completely endurable...Added bonus, which surprised me:  Audio take while in the housing was quite good.  Conversations with those being filmed and observers nearby were completely intelligible.  Didn't expect that, but very pleasantly surprised.  Means your color commentary can continue unabated..</review_text>
This underwater casing is wonderful!  I took it to record video on my Sony DVD-405 camcorder while snorkeling along the Mayan Riviera coast in Mexico.  Other casings for this camcorder cost much more ($800), but they are rated for much greater depth for scuba diving.It was very easy to use: first, attach the bottom plate (provided by the kit) to the camcorder, second, hook-up the camcorder with the cable provided (don't forget to turn the viewfinder around), third, slide the camcorder into the casing, fourth, grease the O-ring, put in a desiccation pad, and apply the non-fog liguid.Then, just close the case, press the outside power button and start recording.  I was amazed by the quality and how easy it was to use.  We had good light, clear water and lots of fish to video.  The best video was filmed in mid-afternoon with the sunlight coming in at an angle.  We took the casing down to a depth of 12 feet but we filmed fish and stingreays who were in water as deep as 30 feet and still got good pictures.The casing floats on the surface without any weight attached to it.  I had no problem recording and moving the camera around under the water.  The viewfinder works differently than recording without the casing and takes a few minutes to get used to it.For snorkeling pictures, just a few feet below the surface, using this casing produces great quality with great value</review_text>
Overall it does what it is supposed to do.  Compact size is a plus.  The only complaint is the view gets dim when you zoom in a cloudy day.</review_text>
I bought these binoculars about a month ago and have been using it since. This pair does all that it promises, if not much more. The unit has a solid feel and does not look cheapy. The images at 10x are crisp but when you go 30x they get a tad dull given the 25mm lenses (I wont blame Olympus for this one since it is not a fault, just a way to cut size and costs. 50mm is the way to go if you dont mind the size).I would've given it 5 stars had it not been for the zoom-lever; the lever sticks just a bit when I zoom to max almost giving a "grindy" feeling.A couple of minor desirable features I'd like to see added:1) Tripod support - if you have steady hands you are fine but at 30x even the slightest of shakes can make the image look blurry.2) Lens caps - Given these babies cost me about $80 I'd like to see a pair of caps for the object lenses.I will buy something with 50mm objective lenses and variable zoom if they came less bulkier</review_text>
I know Sony already has a great reputation, but I was impressed with this product.  It's small and light-weight, but it's pretty bright.  It also has an auto function (just like a flash), so if you're not sure when you'll need it, you can just use that function.  My camera doesn't have a built-in flash, so it works well for video and still shots.  It is a tad pricey, but it's a Sony</review_text>
The fact that this little light is so bright is both pro and con.  If you have low light and you don't want to use the night shot, this is a good light to bring out the colors of the whole room.  It is also small and stylish while on your camera.  Easy to carry anywhere because it comes with it's own pouch.  The problem is also the same as the benefits.  The fact that this light is so bright, you get the similar reaction from people when they are on camera, "get that thing out of my face, I can't see!"  It's so bright that you can't get anyone to look into the camera.  They're always squinting.  But I figure that's the downside to any light.  If you feel that a light is necessary for your camera, this is a good light to have</review_text>
This one is very nice. You can clearly see the difference in the picture with and without this light. This works great. This is a must for compatible camcorders. I used this for HC42 campcorder</review_text>
Pros:- Brighter than expected from small light- Price- Really helps in low light, even for a cam that performs well in low light- No batteries - draws from camCons:- Drains cam battery - you may need a bigger battery for camThis light does what I was hoping for, fill in dark areas in low light, particularly in peoples faces. This makes for much more pleasant videos of my family and friends. The downside for home videos is that your subject will often not like the harsh brightness shining at them. It really is bright when pointed at you. I have started being selective when I really need the light because it is so conspicuous and often I want to video from the sideline to capture "natural" expressions without being a neusance.The value for this light is pretty high for me. The price paid for the benifit to my videos is very good</review_text>
A video camera without a light is like a still camera without a flash -- if your Sony camcorder doesn't come with a light built in, you need this!A couple of notes:  This light is much smaller than I'd expected -- it's only about 1" across the front by 1.5" high by 1.5" deep. It doesn't sound like much, but it puts out a remarkable amount of light, enough to illuminate out your subject with an even, warm light, even from nearly 10' away.The reason I can't give it 5 stars:  it puts out a lot of heat, and it will cut your battery life in half (I've got the HDR-SR1).  Both of these issues would be readily addressed by Sony providing an LED version of this light, but until they do, I don't think any other accessory could possibly give your videos the bang-for-buck that this one does</review_text>
I already owned a Sony Z1U, paid about $6000.00 several months ago, Paid for this Canon a lot less and the quality is a lot better, great for low light, the Sony have to much noise on the same circunstances</review_text>
In one word terrific. This is not as much a review as you a few notes for those who are thinking about buying it, and who have had experience with a Canon miniDV camera such as the GL1 or GL2 (or any other miniDv camcorder).  I wondered if the XH A1 shot in SD (Standard DV) as well as HDV.  It does.  I went through many articles not finding this and called Canon.  So this means you can sell your old model miniDv camera (mine was a GL1--and used GL1's are fetching about $1200 on Ebay.) and still access, read, upload and download your Standard 4:3 miniDV tapes.Do not touch the LCD display.  You can actually see it in daylight which is great. But be very careful not to touch the screen with a finger. I brushed a corner of mine and got a shiny spot.  What is nice is that the LCD display and viewfinder can work at the same time.One very minor but annoying problem was the manual.  Would you believe it doesn't tell you how turn it on.    Unlike my GL1 which had and on/off switch, this has a power dial.  No where in the manual does it tell you, you have to push a tiny button at 3 o'clock on that dial and then turn it to turn the thing on.If you need to capture footage you shot on an older Canon miniDV camera the XH A1 will realize that and play your old tape in its correct  taped format.The camera works well with Final Cut Studio.  To change from capturing miniDV to capturing HDV I just use easystepup in Final Cut and that's it.I used to use a soft case with my GL1. This is a heavier camera and I switched to a hard Vanguard VGP-32.  It is the perfect size for this camera with sizeable foam for tight fit.One big surprise for me was the battery.  It goes inside the camera, is huge and can last 7 hours.  Now, I'm still just getting used to it, but so far I just love it.P.S. There are a lot more bells and whistles on this than on my old GL2, many of which are not covered by the manual.  For instance under the LCD screen is a speaker that you can use to listen to audio you've taped (just like in my old GL1).  Next to is is a hole marked reset.  The reset button is not covered in the manual.  To my horror the speaker suddenly stopped working.  The speaker is not listed in the index. I did get it working again.  I went to the menu and set the audio setting back to the default. Somehow I had changed the settings without knowing it.  So, keep in mind there is a lot to learn here.</review_text>
After careful review and hands-on comparisons of Canon's XHA1, the Sony V1U, Panasonic's vastly overrated HVX200, and JVC's HD110, I opted for Canon's XHA1.Surprisingly, the V1U was quite "noisy" in all settings, appearing no better in quality than my obsolete TRV900. Apparently, 24P on the V1 is at this moment un-editable in most NLE's except Sony's mediocre "Vegas" software. And until a 16GB or 32GB P2 card is introduced at a drastically reduced price (unlikely) the HVX vs film camera comparisons seem justified only in that the cost of each precious minute is as astronomical as the cost of celluloid. JVC lacks an auto focus feature, which is fine as long as you've got a camera crew in tow complete with a professional focus puller.Bottom line, Canon's optics are second to none. The XHA1 is the low price answer to Canon's flagship XLH1, and from the same camp, the far superior camera in this bunch.A standing ovation to Amazon for overnight delivery of the XHA1, which arrived in pristine condition on time as promised</review_text>
This camera is great.  Its low light performance and high definition is really a great combination.  In side by side tests I have done with the Sony FX1 and V1U it beats both on the low light performance and has lower noise.  It has many manual controls which are key for me and the picture manipulation settings cannot be beat by comparable cameras.</review_text>
This camcorder is super easy to use.  We set it to take wide screen movies (16:9), so when we are done recording, we simply remove the disk and place it right into the dvd player to watch it on TV.  My kids love the instant viewing of their movies.  This camcorder will also allow you to take still pictures captured on a memory stick.  This function saves you from carrying a camera and a camcorder.  We have only had this camcorder for one month, but we took it on vacation and have been very happy with it.</review_text>
The camera is very nice, the still images quality is very high.The software is not so good, it can not get a normal DVD for support the videos.I paid a two days service because I needed my camera, but after two days I did not receive the package, I contacted UPS office and I had to go to UPS offices three times, and in third I got my package, Terrible service</review_text>
This is my first camcorder ever and I wanted to do it right. Buying the Sony 505 was a great choice. The large 3 inch touch screen is really nice and all of the controls are extremely easy to use. Within minutes I was recording my kids playing. I also love the fact that you can record on DVDs as well as a memory card. You really get what you pay for when it comes to this camcorder. Well worth it!!</review_text>
we looked at every differnet camera out there and this seemed the best for what we wanted.  its small and lightweight, very easy to use and i think the digital pictures came out pretty well. pretty decent clarity. we really didn't have to bring our digital camera with us. this seems to be an all in one camera. the discs were also easy to use and format. we used cnet to check out alot and actually ordered off amazon with next day shipping and it was still cheaper than best buy. ordered at 8 pm and had it next day at noon. overall- great camera</review_text>
I love this DVD505 very easey to take photo and i got the sony DVD record VRD-MC3 you dont need a TV are computer just Direct to the 505 all DV but ram it sales about 249.00 at circuit city  very good set up   ji</review_text>
great camera nice picture quality suggest you purchase an extra battery for entended use</review_text>
This is an outstanding camera.  Very easy to use and pretty good battery life.  I picked up the Sony accessory kit at the same time and even the "back up" battery in the kit lasts 90 minutes on a full charge.  This camera has all the best available features (night shot, good image stabilization, and functional touch-screen menus, to name a few).  The video quality in LP mode is not very good, so don't expect to get more than 30 minutes of shooting out of a miniDVD.  However, the SP mode provides really good quality, so you don't have to worry about cutting your time down to 20 minutes (which is the time you get out of one DVD in the highest quality mode).What I'd warn potential buyers about has to do with DVD Camcorders in general, rather than any problem with the camera.  As someone who was not intimately familiar with the wide variety of camcorders (and who was tired of my Panasonic DV camcorder not recording properly), I considered the MiniDVD option to be ideal.  However, I learned two things after finishing my first DVD.1.  You need special software (DVD video editing software or DVD copy software or both) to do anything other than copy from one miniDVD to another miniDVD.  Additionally, software like Roxio's MyDVD doesn't work well with the VOB file format used by the camcorder.  All video on the miniDVD is saved into a single file.  This means that video editors will have to know how (and have the patience) to trim down the video to make different chapters.  The chapters show up on the finalized DVD from the camera, but DVD copy software won't reproduce the menu for you, either.2.  If you want to play back your videos on something other than the camcorder, make sure your DVD player is relatively new.  Ours was 6 years old and didn't recognize the DVD-R as a valid disk.  Now that I know, this seems pretty logical, but when I popped my first disk into my player, expecting to see my daughters playing, I was sorely disappointed to find that the player wouldn't do anything with the disk.  However, there are some fairly inexpensive players out there now that recognize all DVD formats, so this isn't a huge problem.  It's just something you need to be aware of.In all, the DVD505 is a great camera.  Those seriously interested in DVD editing, unless you really know what you're doing, you may want to consider sticking with DV tapes for awhile</review_text>
This camera was so great that I ended up buying another one as a gift. It's a all in one.  There are tons of attachments and it's great that I can have a video and digital camera all in one.  If I run out of disks, I can always through the pictures or video on my memory chip.  Amazon has the lowest price on it by far</review_text>
Thanks for sending my product in a timely manner. The battery charger works.Thanks again,E</review_text>
Well worth investing in! Always have battery charging so you won't find yourself ready to record something special and find your battery is low, even worse, dead! Not bulky, very portable, simple to use! All you need is an electrical outlet and you're all set</review_text>
The charger is small, and it charges quickly.  Works great for my spare batteries</review_text>
I bought my son (the future Steven Spielberg) a video recorder for Christmas and got these tapes for him too.I just hope that technology doesn't leave all us "poor suckers" in the dust again. Anyone want to buy an 8-track playerr? A TV antenna fot your roof? A PONG video game? A BETA format tape player?But seriosly, the picture and sound quality you get from these is incredible -- and far exceeds the tedchnology we (old people) had. And these were a geed price. Not to mention I could avoid shopping during the holiday season</review_text>
THE BEST PART THE PROTECTORS ARE EASY TO APPLY.NO MORE FINGER PRINTS OR SMUDGES</review_text>
I was glad to find out about DIGITAL CONCEPTS SP90 Universal Video Camera Screen Protector.I have had two other Digital Cameras in the past and the LCD on the cameras look used and scratched.I have two kids that run cross country and I have used every thing to wip my LCD.Shirt tailes and such.Lets not forget screen glare and enhance view.IT realy workes</review_text>
I bought this last year ago after my wife raved about hers. It has lived up to the Canon name and takes excellent pictures. I haven't taken the time yet to figure it all out but even the movie option is great. I love the camera and the low price I paid.</review_text>
I have been a digital camera owner since the 640x480 days when digi cams were the size of bricks, and now i have one that's small as a deck of cards...the sd300.  i've had it for almost a year now, and it keeps on kicking.  I read all of the reviews about the cracked LCD screens and all, but i took my chances anyways...and quite frankly, the screen itself has taken a beating from me, it's all scratched up from being in my pocket, banging around with my keys and coins, etc.  i applied a thin screen protector and it fixes the cosmetic blemishes (and added scratch glare from sunlight) due to the scratches.  picture quality is awesome, i've made large prints at costco and they look immaculate.  I use a 512MB SD card which is able to hold around 200 pictures in "superfine" 4.0 megapixel mode (there are 3 modes for each of the 4 available resolutions; coarse, fine, and superfine).it is durable too, i've dropped it numerous times, and it still works beautifully.  the metal casing doesn't only look good, it truly serves its purpose in protecting the camera's vital internal components.I don't see myself buying another camera for a long time as i usually make 4x6 to 8x10 prints, which come out great from the images taken with this camera.  the size adds even more incentive for one to buy this camera or any from the powershot SD series, it allows one to easily slip it into their pocket or purse.  one can then whip it out, power it up, and be ready to snap a photo in under 9 seconds...seriously.  the power-up and load time is extremely fast, even faster if you buy an SD card with a faster write capability.Also, i was able to purchase extra nb-4l batteries for this camera from pricegrabber.com for only $4.99 a piece, can't beat that.i'd give this camera a 6 star rating if i could =</review_text>
ditto....lcd cracked for no apparent reasonsent it to canon in illinoisawaiting outcome on repairgood overall camera, but no low battery signa</review_text>
I had this camera for one whole year. It was great. This camera take beautiful pictures and is so easy to operate. Its size makes it so easy to carry around.However, while looking for cameras last year i came upon this one. Many reviews talked about cracking LCD screens. I ignored these reviews thinking it wouldnt happen to me. I was wrong. I was taking pictures one day of my car. Not even 15 m inutes later i took it back out of the case to put my pictures on the computer, and the screen was cracked. As far as i know, nothing happened that would make it crack. Its such a dissapointment, and i dont think i will be able to get it fixed through my insurance. A big disappointment. However, it was a GREAT camera while it lasted</review_text>
i've had my camera for almost 2 years now. it's great. i haven't had any problems with it, no lcd cracking or the purple stuff. i have dropped my camera before, from i would say about 4ft+ onto the cement and it barely left a dent, and it still works as good as new. the picture quality is awesome and also the video feature is really good. i love it. but the ONE con is that there is no battery indicator thing, it only blinks low battery when it's about to die, but the pros about this camera definitely weighs out that one con.ALSO, from a few of the reviews i have read, some people said that you'd have to take extremely good care of this camera because it's really sensitive. but honestly, i haven't been taking care of my camera. i don't carry it in a case and i always either have it in the back pocket of my pants or in my purse or i'll just hold it in my hand and actually it's been banged around a couple of times, but i hardly have any scratches on it except the tiny dent from that one time i dropped it.PROS:durablesmalllcd screen is hugeit doesn't lagit's cuteexcellent picture/video qualitylong battery lifeCONS:no battery indicatori DEFINITELY reccomend this camera to everyone :)</review_text>
My wife and I bought this camera about 6 months ago as an upgrade to an aging kodak 2mb. I am pretty much a "automatic settings" guy whereas my wife loves to use manual settings, change ISO, shutter speed etc. This camera is perfect for both of us and the picture quality is amazing.I was somewhat sceptical on reading other reviews on the display cracking but, fingers crossed, have not had any problems. The movie feature is very very impressive, and on the highest quality is good enough for transfer to DVD. Would advise you to get a 1gb ultra fast card to really benefit from the cameras features.Only complaints are that the software that comes with the camera for image editing is terribly outdated and looks like something to be used on windows 3.1 and the transfer via the cable is quite fiddly leaving you to wonder if the door to the usb cable socket on the camera would break over use. We bought a universal SD card reader and take the card out itself and then transfer to the pc.There is no battery indicator which is ridiculous. Suddenly the camera says "low battery" and then shuts off. Get yourself another battery as a spare. Whoever left this feature of the camera at Canon should be fired.Download the free picasa image software. Much better than adobe photo album and the canon software included in the box</review_text>
Love this case...loaded with protective padding...heavy-duty zippers, storage galore....a "rain coat", tripod carrier.....just the best buy around.  I have my new SONY FX7 Hi-Def camcorder and all accessories in it and just took it on an extensive trip.  Compact and sturdy.  Worth the price</review_text>
I bought this for my Sony FX1. It was the least expensive bag I could find that would accomodate the camcorder. But don't let the price fool you. it is better than bags costing hundreds of dollars more. Made from sturdy canvas with thick padding and plenty of pockets to hold accessories. I use the tripod strap on top to hold a small shoulder harness. so well designed. And you can't beat Amazon's price. it was about $60 less than the local stores here in LA</review_text>
I took delivery of one of these bags today because I've just purchased an HDR-FX1 and I'm about to walk around Japan for three weeks: oh the joy of it :-) I presumed that the bag was a container for the camcorder and nothing much more but I was wrong.Firstly it is very well made (in China of course) and the padding on the side walls and 'roof' are exemplary: about 3/4 inch thick. It has good rubber feet and quality zip. The fabric is excellent quality and having used similar before I can attest to its durability. The camcorder fits perfectly inside with no rattling and there is a movable/removable velcroed partition to hold the lens hood separately if you prefer. The supplied shoulder strap is OK and usable but I immediately ordered an OP-Tech bag strap because I'm like that... The strap can be attached to hold the bag horizontally or vertically as you choose. The attachments are heavy duty steel rings on the bag and the usual clips on the strap.Where the bag really scores is its additional storage. It has a large fold out pocket at each end which can hold quite a bit of smallish items (my electric shaver vanished inside one). It also has a large front pocket running the width of the bag which will happily hold (as tested) a Canon 10-22mm lens in a LowePro case and a Canon 580EX Speedlite in its case with room to spare. As you can tell I'm mixing my SLR kit with my video kit but you could fit most video accessories in the bag.At the back of the bag is a zipped pocket (flat) containing the rain hood. Pull out the hood and wrap it around the bag to make it very water resistant. This covers the whole of the bag except the base (I think, not tested it but look at the Amazon image) and that includes what's on the top of the bag, it's finest moment... The bag has a tripod holder!!! Oh joy, I didn't know about this when I ordered it and it makes my life in the next few weeks so much easier! The top of the bag has a cunning set of straps and folds of fabric that will lock a small to medium pod down securely. You can still open the bag and extract the camcorder even with the tripod in place (genius) and I can remove the pod in a few seconds.Finally: Sony has either been very lucky or very astute because with a tripod attached and all the pockets full the bag exactly matches the dimensions of the typical flight bag restrictions (Lufthansa's are spot on). Coincidence? Maybe but darned useful to be sure.In conclusion: this is worth every cent and more. I will happily trust the security of my $4000 camcorder to it and that's all there is to be said.</review_text>
This camera case is stylish, compact and fun! Be aware that there is not much extra space inside to store camera cards, and definetely not room for extra batteries. There are plenty of larger camera cases for that purpose; this camera case is for stepping out in style</review_text>
I love the size and style of this little camera bag. It's only a single compartment and the shoulder strap is nice and long. Long enough to use around the waist as a fanny pack.  The bag itself isn't padded inside and it's rather stiff. A tight fit for my camera, but good protection I think. I just wanted to keep my camera from getting scratched up and this does the trick nicely</review_text>
pretty and comfortable. could be more practical with a couple of inner pockets</review_text>
Bought this to go with the pink camera I bought for my 12 yr old daughter for Xmas. Nicely made, protects the camera and it looks cute!</review_text>
I bought the pink case for my mom, as I bought her a new HP digital camera for Christmas. It's so cute, and the camera fits in it perfectly</review_text>
A nice piece of glass. Easily screws over the existing lens. Does the job nicely allowing zoom through and no unsightly bending around the edges. Attractive price too.</review_text>
Adds so much freedom to my regular shooting...  Sure makes my job easier being able to get a wider view and more creative shots because of it.  Definatelly a good investment</review_text>
I'm still new to this camera, but I find it absolutely amazing.  I had a Fuji FinePix from 2003 and I've just given up on using that one because it eats batteries and doesn't take high quality pictures compared to my friends' cameras.  I was looking at sales over Thanksgiving break and the significant other took this as a hint.  He found this camera with a very good deal at a department store, but it was a display model so I didn't get a manual or anything like that.  However, the camera itself is really user-friendly, and I've found that I can use most of the functions without having to look up what they are.  We just took a trip to Atlantic City and this camera performed well inside the hotel, outside at night, down by the ocean at night, inside the casino--in all types of lighting, pretty much--so long as I chose the proper options.  I'm excited to get to know this camera better, but I think it's an excellent choice for people looking for something of good quality at a reasonable price</review_text>
This camera is so wonderful.  It's so easy to operate and the picture quality is excellent.  What a deal</review_text>
I love this camera. I would suggest this camera to anyone looking. It takes great photos and is easy to download</review_text>
I went through the G-series of PowerShot cameras and was probably an owner of one of the first batch of G1s that were imported. Still love them, especially with a 420EX Speedlight mounted on top. Alas, I needed a pocketable digital camera so went with the A710IS. I get excellent pictures from it, even on Auto, and the several non-photographers I've suggested it to are amazed how many more excellent shots they get. ITS THAT GOOD.I have two beefs with it. Pocketable means pocketable: 1) the need for an add-on flash because the built-in one is only good for 11 feet instead of 18 feet. 2) the need for a case because the LCD doesn't reverse for storage like others in the Canon product line. Canon does not have it quite right yet</review_text>
Being an owner of Canon Digital Camera, I had high expectations for the A710.  The model I owned before this one was the PowerShot A60 2.0 megapixel.There are a few key features that made me very satisfied.The main two are: 7.1 megapixels, 6x optical zoom, which are of obvious high quality due to being a Canon.A feature that is somewhat 'unique' to this camera is a color swapping mode(allows you to swap a color for anyother color, i.e. turn a red car into a blue one, change wall colors...) Coupled with the powerful software that is provided, this camera is ideal for any individual looking to have a well rounded camera with user friendly controls.**Would not recommend to a first time digital camera user however*</review_text>
Excellent camera.  I have a Digital Rebel XL and wanted a smaller high quality camera for hiking, etc.  I am very pleased.  It is not as slick as the rebel and the smaller lens is not a match - but the shots are more than adequate.  It has a few very sweet aspects - one being the WYSIWYG aspect of a half shutter depression - very good for questionable lighting situation which I tend to find myself in.  The IS is a slight advantage too, and works well.  Overall I am pleased</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras and this tops them all!!!!  Everything they say about it, is true.  I love not even having to think about batteries, I didn't believe what people said about the battery life, and I was just happy I didn't need to think about batteries, but I just got married and my 13 year old daughter took more than 100 pictures with this camera and her pictures are almost as good as the photographer I hired and yes the camera battery lasted all day and thru the next 4 days on our honeymoon with another 200 pictures taken, no low battery light!!!!!  I even going to buy my parents one.  Also, one more note I love how fast you can take pictures, no wait 4 seconds between shots.  I had a Kodak digital before only 1 1/2 years old and hated it, I hated the download procedure, it didn't put your pictures onto your hard drive, but in it's own little cubbyhole and trying to attach them to your email was absolutely a nightmare, you'd have to identify the picture copy it to your desktop, remember what you called it and then attach it your email.  This is the main reason why I purchased this camera.  I will never own anything else, especially a Kodak.</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras, of many brands but I must say that the Casio Exilim EX-Z600BK is one of the best ultra digital cameras on the market.Pros:Fast OperationBig, Bright LCDGreat BodyNice PicturesCons:No ViewfinderNo Manual ControlsAdditional Comments:LookRating:The camera looks as it is on the online images. Its a nice dark, glossy black but doesn't smudge or keep finger prints easily.SizeRating: 5/5Its very tiny. You can hide it by clasping of your hands.FeelRating: 5/5Its has a great feel. The buttons are small but not awkward.  Its light too. You can hardly feel it in yout pocket but its balanced and comfortable to hold.This camera is practically perfect. This is an honest review. Its a great value for the money. I recommend it.</review_text>
In Special for Latin American People: Soy de Venezuela y tuve el inmenso placer de comprar esta camara las pasadas navidades, a traves de mi tarjeta de credito y un currier que me llevo la camara hasta la puerta de mi casa en Valencia Venezuela, supero todas mis expectativas en cuanto a calidad y precio, cuenta con Garantia Internacional, una Bateria recargable que realmente es duradera, la calidad de las fotos impresas es realmente extraordinaria, y cuenta con un sinfin de opciones que hacen de la Exilin EX-Z600 una excelente selccion, la recomiendo a cualquiera con los ojos cerrados y digan Whisky!!!!!</review_text>
My husband purchased this camera for me for my birthday last year.  His Aunt and Uncle had one and we thought it was simply amazing.  Since our purchase, we've help several of our friends and family members buy the same camera through Amazon. Actually, we've bought 4 other ones besides the one that my husband bought me for my birthday.  I highly recommend this camera to everyone.  It's small, has many neat features, and the quality of the pictures is the best I've ever seen from any digital camera.  Don't just take my word for it, buy one and see for yourself.  It's very affordable.(best feature</review_text>
I chose this Casio because of the price, good shot-to-shot speed, and most important for me was the charging cradle and battery life.  I got so tired of running out of battery in the middle of the day.  All cameras should having charging cradle, just like your cordless telephones</review_text>
I did a LOT of research about digital cameras before making a purchase.  Probably 50 hours on [...] and [...] and price checks on 10 different websites and asked everyone I knew what they liked and didn't like about their cameras.  I AM SO HAPPY I PICKED THIS ONE.  It is very lightweight yet durable, sleek and attractive if that's what you want.  The large viewfinder is a great asset.  Great zoom capabilities although I will say the picture quality (on the screen, anyway) is somewhat compromised (gets a little grainy) on the max zoom.  I will probably only use 6 or 7 of the "Best Shot" modes on a regular basis but it's fun to experiment with them all.  VERY LONG battery life.  I took this camera on a 7-night cruise and didn't have to recharge it at all.  I have 2 friends who are ready to buy new cameras and they are going to get this one</review_text>
I purchased the camera after my old one (casio EX Z-40) was broken and since I loved my old one very much I was concerned if the new one would be as good as the old one was.It is 10.000 times better!The automatic mode helps unexperienced photographers to take great pictures. But by using the individual modes and settings the results are even better. I tested the camera in any situation during a 6000 mile roadtrip across the American West and it did not disappoint me at all.The only thing that is a bit annoying is that everytime you switch the camera on it will automatically go to the snapshot mode and you have to switch through the different modes again to adjust the settings that you need. But surely there is a way to figure out how to avoid that, I'm probably just not patient enough to find out how since all the other models of casio cameras that I have tested do not show this problem.Overall, I can highly recommend the camera for all types of photographers!</review_text>
I don't think anybody is going to pretend that the little Casio Exilim EX-Z600 6.0 mega pixel camera is the best camera ever built or takes the best pictures in the world.  But for under $[...], it's hard to beat and does everything advertised.The size is perfect, one of the smallest, slimmest cameras made, easily fitting into one's [...] pocket, even when enclosed in a small case.  The viewing screen is probably the biggest and brightest you'll find, so aiming and shooting is easy as it can be.  The range of modifications (size, contrast, sharpness, saturation, etc.) to taking and managing pictures seems almost endless, yet the various menus the camera offers are simple to navigate.  And the camera's docking stand makes downloading pictures to one's computer as well as charging up the camera a snap.  Moreover, according to Casio, a single charge will afford one up to 500 or more snaps.Picture quality?  It's perhaps not as absolutely clear and well defined, even at its maximum six mega pixels, as the best cameras; although, to be fair, the best cameras often cost three-to-four times as much as this one.  So, as far as I'm concerned, I've no complaints, and the pictures I've been taking are a delight to the eye.  The Z600 makes picture-taking fun again</review_text>
I love just about everything about this camera.  It's nice and small, it's easy to use, it takes nice photos.  But, I haven't figured out yet how to get good night photos, 'though, I've used "Best Shots" (a feature on the camera). I've had it 3 months and am still learning it.  But, all in all, I love this little camera.  The price is right, it does what you want it to and if you get the camera sun shield, from any camera store ($19.00), you'll be glad you did</review_text>
The Coolpix P4 received lukewarm reviews when it was released in the spring of 2006 with a list price of $399, but you can forget all that. In Canada this camera retails for something less than $300 now, and that makes it a tremendous value. This camera features a very solid aluminum body, a large 1/1.8" 8.1 MP sensor, excellent Nikkor optics and optical VR. It even has a very good macro mode. Most importantly, it takes great photos. The VR is very effective: I have taken clean handheld photos as slow as 1/4 second. Even though it's a point and shoot and the Auto mode is fairly reliable, the P4 is clearly aimed at the advanced user, because you really need to know what you're doing if you want to take full advantage of its capabilities. I found that I got my best indoor photos when I set the exposure mode to aperture priority, disabled the flash and used the "Pre" function for white balance. If nothing else the P4 is great as an inexpensive, go-anywhere 2nd camera for the DSLR owner</review_text>
1-25-07After my Nikon 4300 was stolen a year ago, I bought the Nikon P4 in April 2006.  Bottom line:  I get more photos that are acceptable with the P4 than with the 4300 but none is great.  The 4300 occasionally produced superb shots with perfect color and incredible subtle detail.* My main interest is in photographing wildflowers.  The macro mode does not focus as close as with the 4300, there is less detail and what detail there is is not as sharp, even with the "Max Sharp" option turned on.  The color generally is not as natural and finely graded even with post processing.  However, the P4 does not blow out highlights as crudely as the 4300 did.  I can take pictures of yellow flowers in fairly bright light and still see some details of all the petals and the center.* The P4 only shoots in jpeg mode, with no raw option.  That means that the 8 megapixel pictures are smoothed by the internal algorithm into a photo only a quarter of the size of the original.  Three quarters of the information is discarded so much of the 8 megapixel power is lost.* In P mode I usually set the white balance at Cloudy, the sharpness at Max and the exposure at +3.  This gives more pictures that are closer to accurate.* For photographing wildflowers I set the timer at 3 seconds so I can brace my hands against my chest or a rock and avoid the shake that comes with pushing the shutter button.  VR on or off doesn't seem to make much difference in this situation.  However, when the wind is blowing so that the flowers wave continuously, using VR Normal makes the difference between getting an adequate picture or a blurry mess.  The 4300 could not take even adequate shots in any kind of breeze.* The P4 seems optimized for taking photos five to ten feet away from the subject in good but not super bright light.  My photo of water lilies taken from the top of a bank about 10 feet away on a partly cloudy afternoon was extraordinary -- sharp, with perfect color and detail.* The 2.5" screen is excellent in all but very bright sunlight.  3" would be even better.* For lack of a better alternative, for now I will continue to use my P4 but plan to upgrade at some point to a DSLR, probably the Nikon D80, which gets the best reviews of all the sub-$1,000 models.</review_text>
This camera is great!  It takes amazing pictures with incredible quality.  The videos that it takes are equally impressive with great zoom and clarity.  This camera is absolutely perfect for college or any recreational use and is very easy to use.  I actually needed a head shot for an audition and i set the automatic timer to take a picture of myself and cropped it.  When I picked up my pictures, the lady working said I needed a copyright release form because the pictures looked too professional.  She finally gave them to me, but I guess that proves that the camera takes professional quality pictures</review_text>
I am a in house graphic designer and needed a camera that took great high resolution photos to use for print. This camera is so easy to use and takes great photos - very little abberration! I even used it to take my bosses family portraits and his wife loved them. Highly recommend. Great buy for especially for the low cost</review_text>
This has been a great camera so far. There's a lot of options I haven't gotten a chance to use yet, but so far it's been easy and takes great pictures</review_text>
The Nikon p4 has to be one of the best point and shoot cameras on the market.  There are very few to no instances where the p4 does not perform as hoped.  The many different scene modes, selectivities, VR, and many other features give this camera a broad range of capability to which pictures turn out with great clarity.  The pixel size of the picture to be taken can be varied so one can take a very sharp picture and fit around 250 on a 1 gig card or around 600 smaller pixel images on a 1 gig card.  This allows great selectivity between pictures and does not force one to invest in a 4 gig card just to take a day's worth of pictures.  The camera takes the clearest pictures I have seen from a point and shoot digital camera, and the color quality is amazing.  Overall this is the best digital camera I have found, and I would recommend it to anyone in the market.  If I do find anything that I do not like, I will update this review!  If you have any questions or anything contact me, and I will be glad to try to answer them!</review_text>
I found this camera very easy to use and the photos come out clear with good qualty. I have yet to explore all the extra added modes and features but I have been very happy with it so far. Would recommend it.</review_text>
The camera works general good especially for times when bringing a larger camera is not feasible. I can put this camera in my pocket and use it at anytime. I love the movie mode I can shoot a movie until the storage space has run out, can't do that in my Nikon D50 SLR! With the 2GB memory card it equals to about 16 minutes. The video comes complete with sound and after burning to a DVD in the highest quality it looks clear and visible on a large 50" TV. I still like my Nikon D50 SLR better for taking regular photos though. For one reason the SLR will snap photos as quick as it possibly can with the shutter or flash as the only thing that will slow it down.  The problem with the P4 when compared to the D50 is the D50 focus instantly where the P4 has a delay so when you're ready to take a photo the D50 takes it with no delay. This is really useful when the subjects are moving and you need to capture them in the frame before they move off. In many point and shoot cameras, that I've used, there is too long of a delay to take the photo and I've ended up with half a person or a blurred image and then that good shot is gone. The P4 has a slight delay because it needs time to focus it is worse when the camera flash is charging for low light situations. The two inch display is great, great for previewing images. The pictures I've taken so far have been sharp, rich in color and detailed. The vibration reduction is a good feature because I've noticed it is hard not to shake the camera just a little bit when pressing down the shutter button. I suppose there may not be a point and shoot camera without delay, but this one is better than most. A digital SLR is still the best camera, I think, not only for its fast shooting ability but also for its exceptional picture quality. So if you need a camera for portability and compactness then the Nikon Coolpix P4 is a great camera if you don't need such a small camera then go for a SLR camera which means: Single Lens Reflex, if you don't already know that means it basically means when you look though the eyepiece of the camera you are actual looking though the lens, you see exactly how the photo will fit and look. A camera such as Nikon's SLR D50 is one such example. If you have the money buy both, a point and shoot and SLR because each camera offers advantages over the other.</review_text>
We took this camera on a trip to Austrailia, Fiji, and New Zealand.  VR was great and camera performed flawlessly.  Would buy again</review_text>
I love the size and picture I get. Just dock then camera and VLC Players plays them great. I installed none of the software that came with the camera. So no drivers needed to get at videos. I will have to order a differnt lens for it. I fide it just dosnt get the shot I want up close. I need negative zoom it seems. Thinking a wide angal lens will fix that?Wish it had on board usb. Docking it kind of sucks to use it as an SD reader</review_text>
I purchased the hd1a model and returned it since I was made aware that the new model was soon coming out.Honestly although I want so much to love this camera, I am disappointed and decided to send it back as the video quality  did not measure up to my old Sony P350, and the camera stills did not measure up to my wedding camera, which is a Canon 30D.Then I started thinking. I pass up taking my Sony or Canon anywhere because they are not small enough for it not to be a bother. I realized that now with my Sanyo, I actually take it in my man purse with me everywhere I go so now I get shots and footage I never got before. What good is a great camera if you leave it at home? The point is, my Sanyo is just great if I just except that it does not take professional level HD video and that the pics are just a little grainy indoors even with flash. For casual use, this Sanyo is the missing link. I can at least improve video and stills with software if it becomes critical, but as with my wife, once I stop expecting her to be a superwoman, I realize how amazing she really is. This camera is the best hybrid out there and the macro mode blows me away. It is worth it and I am keeping it</review_text>
I just received this device yesterday. I got to play with it for about an hour so far. So, this review is going to be "first impressions" or "initial quality" review.Quality, packaging, instruction manuals, and supplied accessories all look good quality.I couldn't find an SD card in the packaging. I did have a 2GB memory card with me, so I was OK.I could put in the battery, charge the device, take a couple of pictures, and a couple of videos without even reading the quick reference manual. I would call that intuitive enough and user friendly.Quality of the pictures and video is acceptable considering that I used the device straight out of the box without adjusting any settings. Actually pictures and video looked much better on my home LCD monitor, but looked pathetic on my work CRT monitor. (This is not the first time I have experienced this.)I have played the video on a 61" widescreen HD TV using S-Video cable and the quality was acceptable. Nothing compared to off-the-air HD programming, but it was not bad at all.I have placed a couple of pictures and videos elsewhere on the Web. Amazon doesn't allow URLs in reviews. Search in Google groups and you may find a link to the pictures and videos.I will come back here and update the review over the next few weeks.Update 4/12/2007:I have uploaded a couple of low light videos. Link to the Web site in the first comment to this review. Results are disappointing. With what I know now, I would probably give it only 4 stars. Can't change the rating now.I could quickly and easily compile and burn a DVD using the supplied ULead software. I didn't try any bells and wistles, just used the simplest path and I was done with the production process in about 10 minutes. Burning process itself (with an 8x burner) took a long time (unattended). DVD played fine on a regular Panasonic DVD player.MiniDV based camcorders probably produce much better HD footage. But, that is not of much use for me, because burning a DVD out of MiniDV footage is very hard. I don't think I could have posted sample clips on the Internet so quickly if I were using a MiniDV camcorder. So, should we compromise on quality of the video or ease of sharing the footage?Update 4/16/2007:This camcorder is going back. While it is very easy to use and very convenient to quickly share the footage (compared to MiniDV based camcorders), I don't think this can replace my existing DCR-DVD201 due to the poor video quality under low light conditions. I am not the kind to maintain multiple camcorders and use different one for different situations</review_text>
Just purchased this Sanyo Camera and it's great.I Love It!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I love this thing! It holds not only the camera, dock and paper, it will hold another small thing too!</review_text>
It is perfect.  I especailly like the detachable side pouches for carrying just the camera.  Everything fits nicely in it, cords and all.  This is going to be really handy for our trip to Hawaii in April.</review_text>
after i purchased a camera and printerdock i could not find anything to carry it in. i found it on your sight and it was 26.95 at the camera store[ when they came in] it would be 39.95 plus tax and shipping. since i am a smart blond i ordered from you . thanks thanks</review_text>
This gets five stars because it was exactly what it advertised itself to be - a classy, compact way to carry the printer anywhere you need to take it.  Space for everything with a bit left over and well padded.  I bought it because I knew I had to take the printer to the family for Christmas and it was perfect</review_text>
Very well constructed.  Holds dock, paper, camera, batteries in separate compartments. Compartments fasten with velcro and snaps for safety.  Shoulder strap has very comfortable padding</review_text>
This bag is the perfect size. It carries my Kodak Easy Share camera and all of its accessories with ease. I love all of the compartments. They keep everything neat and organized with plenty of room for extra batteries, etc. The construction of the bag is also excellent--tough exterior with shoulder strap option. Highly recommend this bag!</review_text>
I love this bag!  It is durable and roomy.  It holds my printer, extra ink cartridges and extra paper plus the power plug and cables.  It makes it convenient to carry printer dock back and forth to scrap book events.  This bag was definitely worth it!!</review_text>
This camera bag has it all! Plenty of room to carry all your gear and to store it in one place. Awesome!!! Just what I was looking for. And I received it the next day without any extra charge! Fabulous all the way around!!</review_text>
This bag is awesome, lots of room for everything. I looked all over for a bag large enough to carry my printer dock and all the accessories, this bag even holds my camera accessories and all the user guides,etc...etc....You can even store your camera too. I use a smaller bag for carrying my camera on short trips but for longer ones the travel bag is GREAT !!!</review_text>
I went to my son's wedding in another state.  It was great to be able to carry my dock, camera and cables in one case.  I wasn't sure my Z740 would fit in the detachable camera case - it was a tight fit but worked just fine.  This is a great thing to have especially to be able to charge battery in hotel room</review_text>
We were really impressed with the quality of the stitching and how well the camera fit. Good Buy</review_text>
There is not much to say about this case. It is more than adequate for a DVD or MiniDV Camcorder with lots of room for the camera and all the extras....charger, remote, tapes, etc. I would buy it again in an instant</review_text>
This is the perfect size for our camcorder. It fits all of the necessary cords with ease. It also has a little extra room to fit a digital camera as well.</review_text>
I purchased this case for the HDR-HC3 camcorder, and at first the case seemed enormous. The camcorder was only about 1/3rd the size of the main compartment! Granted my cam is much smaller than most Sony's, but most (if not all) Handycams should fit quite well.With the nicely-designed 'false bottom', you can pretty much pack everything you can think of into this elegant case. I was able to fit all of my accessories (cables: component, DV, usb, power), a travel tripod, a few spare tapes, and spare battery with ease. The finish of this case is absolutely incredible. Highly recommended</review_text>
Sony quality in every detail, and it's big enough for all your Handycam junk</review_text>
Compartments range from open areas for camera and accessories.  Also has netted areas for extra cd's, remote, etc.  Good look and extra carrying straps, included</review_text>
One obvious and unexplainable omission from the details and reviews here is the dimensions of this unit. Not including the external pocket they are approx. 11" long x 4" deep x 8" tall (external). The padding is approx. 3/8" thick. The "false bottom" is approx. 2-1/2" tall and is completely removable. There is one spacer in the top area to secure the camera and a large, velcro enclosured, pocket on one side. The "rattling around" of an earlier reviewers camera would, I surmise, be eliminated by proper use and adjustment of the internal camera spacer. The external pocket is 9-1/2" long x 6" tall x 1-1/4" deep. It has a 2 opening pouch on one side and on the other a zippered net.I bought this case for a DCR-TRV20. It is replacing a smaller unit that, although it was a snug fit, allowed for the inclusion of very few of our ever growing selection of accessories.I am now able to comfortably carry the charging unit (under the false bottom), an external light unit, several tapes and the remote. I could easily fit an additional lens if necessary. These are obviously the bulk of the cargo with plenty of room for small incidentals in the various compartments.Everything about this unit screams H*E*A*V*Y D*U*T*Y! From the heavy grade, woven nylon semi-rigid casing to the reinforced handle to the heavy, solid metal zipper pulls, strap clips and flap closure.My previous case is a well built unit and held up admirably through four years of use. It also cost as much as this sony case. However, the Sony case is an obvious step up in craftsmanship and quality. On top of all that, my camera and my camera bag finally match!Awesome purchase, incredible price.Thanks Amazon!**UPDATE**Checking back on this review, I can see that reviewers are still giving a poor review of this bag based on the fact that their camera doesn't fit properly. Although this is a valid issue, I feel it gives the bag a bad rap because the bag itself lives up to all reasonable expectations.The listings that Amazon is providing for these camera accessories seems to be at best generous and in truth, quite often erroneous. Regardless of where they are acquiring their information, be it their own writers or from Sony itself, the list of cameras for each item is often inaccurate.As an example, I purchased an external light for my camera based on the list here claiming it would work for me. In actuality, the light was specifically designed for a different battery type than my camera uses and would require an adapter to mount as the shoe mount was a different size. Additional research showed I needed a different light altogether that WAS specifically designed for my camera. Although the light "would work" with my unit, the amount of effort and added expense required to utilize it was unacceptable.My point here is, although the listings here are often innacurate, the item itself receives a bad rap when we give poor reviews based specifically on the inaccurate listing and not on the actual performance of the unit.It is my belief that these reviews should generally reflect the actual performance of the item. If necessary, any experience with poor or innaccurate listings should, by all means, be highlighted.By adhering to these guidlines, we can actually improve the descriptions of the items and by researching reviews, make much more informed decisions.Just my 2 cents on the issue.ALSO, after a busy Summer and a ton of use, my case still looks and works as good as new.-D</review_text>
I received my order fast then my Camcorder. Take two or three days with free shipping. Thanks Amazon.com. It have a lot room for my Two NF-90 and six dvd,battery charge,extra lens and light.</review_text>
I have every friend amazed with the capability of this scanner. In a matter of seconds I plug the USB to my MacBook Pro and just press a button in the scanner and it starts immediately. No waiting, no heating up lamp, etc. It scans all documents no matter the side you place it, Adobe PDF Software (included) automatically flips the page if you placed it in the wrong side and in a few seconds it does the job. You can get character recognition in the PDF so you can search words inside the PDF, even with OSX Spotlight, you will find everything! Both sides of the page in one pass. I'm very happy with this new hardware... Ive had it for 3 weeks and I have scanned and shredded about 500 pages. 500 pages in a few hours of work and no more storage in my office! All the sizes of papers accepted, I scan every voucher of my credit card I get from my shopping, invoices, mail... everything! I believe that every office will find it extremely helpful and you will be happy you got it. I forgot about the price once I was enjoying the great uses it has. Welcome to the future of every office.TIP: It takes some patience to get this from Amazon. They get it and sells out of stock in a matter of hours. Check frequently and you will get it</review_text>
This scanner works just as advertised.  It is very fast, and wakes from sleep in an instant.  Although expensive, I heartily recommend it</review_text>
If you are looking for an entry level MiniDV camcorder, the Canon ZR500 offers excellent value for money.Pros1. Very intuitive interface2. High Optical Zoom3. Use of joystick reduces number of buttons to just 3Cons1. Motor noiseIt also lacks a still camera mode, though I don't consider that to be a drawback</review_text>
I got this camera and love it, except for one thing. The microphone input jack does not work. So I am sending it back as I need this for an external mic. Everything else was better than expected. This zr500 has dropping prices right now,so now is a good time to buy. I can now get the zr830 for only a few dollars more than I did for the zr500.The zr500 does not have an usb connector so you'll have to use firewire, which cost me a few extra dollars. The zr600 I "believe" has the usb connection direct to your computer so I would say buy the zr600</review_text>
Bought for my son and daughter-in-law as they just had a baby...EASY to use and the videos are clear and easy to take...so simple to use and such a great way to have a record of the baby!! For the price it can't be beat</review_text>
We bought this camera to film our new baby. It is perfect, easy to use and a great price. I researched a lot before I decided on this one and I am very glad I did. The picture quality is great.</review_text>
I am very, very pleased with this camcorder. It produces great photos and videos. It is small and compact. The price is appropriate and the optical zoom and numerous advanced options makes it one of the best options on the market. Well done, Canon. Thanks for this great product</review_text>
I purchased the Olympus 720 for my daughter at Christmas time because we are all scuba divers in the family and there was the housing option as well as being able to go 10ft without a housing. We recently went to Bonaire and both the camera and housing worked well considering that she did not have a strobe. She was able to capture a little squid on a night dive with just camera and housing. I highly recomend for ease of use and quality of constrction as the housing also took a beating in the surf. Great for those of us that wish to point and click and a lot lighter and smaller than my Ikelite</review_text>
This camera takes fantastic photos. It's resolution is great. Waterproof is one of it's greatest assets. I highly reccommend this camera. Just get the LI-42B battery for extend time (approx 2 hrs) as the camera provided battery only lasts about 20 minutes. I love this camera. Using a hi-definition printer, it prints photos comparable to the developing lab</review_text>
I got it in right before christmas eve. Great shipping time, I was impressed</review_text>
VERY GOOD ,SMALL SIZE,WELL MADE AND BY THE MANUFACTURE OF THE CAMERA.THE REASON i BOUGHT IS THAT BY HAVING AN ALREADY WATERPROOF CAMERA-OLY-720SW.,EVEN IF THE HOUSING LEAKS IT WILL NOT COMPROMISE THE CAMERA.,SO IT IS A DOUBLE INSURANCE AND GUARANTEED LONGER LASTING OF THE CAMERA.</review_text>
I had the error message on my and I checked the canon website and found that they have a recall for it, I sent it in and they fixed it for free. Check the website and call the provided phone number even if you don't see your problem listed, eventually they might do other recalls do to all the complains.</review_text>
I bought this as a gift to a family member and what can I say.  Easy to take pictures, and they come out looking really good.  This is the second Canon I've purchased and its very reliable.</review_text>
Without doubt, if Canon did not make the best digital cameras out there, at least it makes the most popular digital cameras. S400 and S410 are the first two which made Cannon so successful in digital camera market. And the later SD series definitely push Canon to be No. 1 digital camera seller in US and world(sorry, Kodark yields to Canon this year and HP is considering to leave this market).So far, I am still happy with my choice made about 3 years ago. I have used this camera almost daily, taking over 12,000 pictures already using this S410. It still is strong, except a few scratch on the body. I am satisfied with the picture quality. Before this one, I used Fuji, Kodark and also used other's Nikon, I would say, S410 still the best to use and gives best quality. If considering for the next digital camera, I would take the even smaller size Canon SD series without question.This camera is NOT perfect, anyway. But please tell me, which one is? And it might not never have one. However, it's good enough for me. Specificly, the cons of S410: startup is not fast, focusing sometimes takes longer time than expected. Not good at contiguous shooting. Also I got the famous E18 error after two years of heavy use. Being lucky enough, I just tap it against the table and problem is gone. Other than that, it is so far so good for me to carry it and use it everyday</review_text>
I have never owned a camera in my life (hubby always took all the pics) and this has been perfect for a beginning photographer mom.  It fits in my pocket (guess that's the elph part), and we have taken it on two summer trips so far.  I can't believe the photos are so crisp and colorful, and print up as well as the ones we always had developed at the drugstore.I have to admit that my two young children have helped me with the batteries, memory cards, and understanding how to get the photos off and printed.  But if they can do it, I can certainly learn.  Great camera and I am capturing memories I might have lost otherwise.</review_text>
The color is much better than Kodak Max 400 speed and the pictures are much clearer</review_text>
Does anyone here remember Kodak Royal Gold? Well this film is the same thing, just re-packaged in a spiffy new "HD" box. Overall the quality of prints made from this film are pretty darn sharp, even on cloudy days. Note that in some situations bright subjects will result in cartoonish colors which seem to bleed into each other. The grain is minimal as far as amateur based film is concerned, and in my opinion it outperforms Fuji Superia X-tra 400. Considering that Kodak UC400 is now available in various common department stores for about 2 dollars more, I'm ditching HD for the far less grainy professional UC line of film</review_text>
This film has great color reproduction and performance.  I would give this film 5 stars except for the fact that Fujifilm Superia X-TRA 400 provides similar performance for a cheaper price</review_text>
I'm amazed at how my pictures turned out with the use of this film.  The colors are so vivid and vibrant.  The images come out sharp.  Definitely the film I'll be using from now on</review_text>
I purchased this camera before our trip to Hawaii, and have not repented... It delivers clear photos, with a very flexible set of pre-programmed settings... A must purchase for folks on the move</review_text>
I bought this camera a month ago for our trip to Roatan, Honduras.  My wife and I are avid snorkelers and we wanted an inexpensive camera (not the throw aways) that take great pics of sea life with the vibrant colors we see through our mask.  This camera is the one.  The divers at our resort were blown away with the clarity of each picture.  Also, the pics I took on land were excellent as well.  One of the pics I've posted (sunset) is now a desktop background for one of my co-workers.  I read every review for this camera before I bought it and when I saw the pics from the reviewer in Hawaii, I was sold.  I hope my pics help.</review_text>
This camera is the best digital camera I have ever owned.  Being a very active person, I needed a camera that would hold up to anything.  Waterpoof, shockproof.... everything proof!  It's compact size makes it great for sticking in your back pocket during a night out on the town, or packed away in your backpack while traveling the world.  The large screen makes for easy viewing of your pictures and all of the functions are very easy to use and understand. This 7.1 megapixel camera taks great pictures that aren't too large so they don't take up too much memory which makes it espescially easy to upload your picutres onto social networking sites without having to reformat them.  You definately get your moneys worth buying this great all around camera.</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera....I have yet to use it 10 feet under water but maybe someday...  I love the compact durability of this camera.  And the picture quailty is excellent!!!Very happy photographer</review_text>
Small size with rugged construction makes this camera very practical for traveling.The availability of numerous settings enables capturing high quality pictures under various conditions.This camera has produced many excellent photographs</review_text>
Befores having this camera I was a cybershot user; since that I believe this camera has great characteristics as: a good flash level to take close pictures, several especialized modes, compact size for a 10x zoom, great outdoors pictures (vivids and colorfuls).My main complain is about software: I can not choose diferent flash intensity levels (shots in not well iluminated indoors are really poor)and I can not choose the ISO mode (to avoid bad pictures of objects in moving).Besides the night shots mode is not as good I expected.My general opinion is that this camera could be really better if the software would be more versatile</review_text>
I've had this camera for about two months now and I really like it. The fact that it has image stabilization means that I have yet to take a blurry picture. Also, the zoom is quite impressive.Another nifty feature is that you can overlay a grid to help with photo composition(the "rule of thirds").The only caveat with this camera is the lack of an optical viewfinder, so you can't really turn off the LCD to save battery power. I have never had the batteries die out on me, so I don't really consider it a problem, although you may</review_text>
I own various digital cameras, from cheap point and shoot to pricey SLR's and for a small camera, this one is great. 10x optical zoom on a camera that fits in your pocket is awesome.I took it to a wildlife sanctuary along with a 10.3 meg SLR, and the pictures from this camera were almost as good as those taken with the 300mm zoom on the SLR (at least 4x6 and 8x10, I didnt try anything bigger yet).Easy to navigate the screens, and loaded with options.I would definitely buy it again. Dont let other brands 3x and 5x optical, plus a digital zoom fool you. Digital zoom is degrading the pixels. This is the one to buy if you want a camera that fits in your pocket and can zoom in close.</review_text>
This little gem of a camera packs a mighty 10 times optical magnification into a small but sturdy case. The Leica lens is a marvel of design. It has good easy to read LCD screen and very intuative menus. I have now had the camera for a few weeks and it lives up to Panasonics claims.  I wish I could have waited for the new models but I needed it for my vacation.My wife refused to entertain the idea of such a large magnification range because of the lens size she envisaged, based on past experience. she is now completely won over</review_text>
I'm not a pro by any means, but this camera is fantastic. The zoom is really impressive and the clarity is great (again...I'm not a pro, just someone who loves to take pictures). For the folks who have complained about the detachable lens cap... it's really not that big of a deal. There is a small strap packaged with the camera, which is very simple to attach, that will connect the lens cap to the camera. The same strap also attaches a wrist strap to the camera</review_text>
I got this camera when the price on it took a nosedive.  I found that I wasn't carrying my Powershot S2 around outdoors as much because of the size issue.  This one I can bring anywhere.  Picture quality at low ISO is just about as good as the best of the superzoom cameras,  The Leica lens gives a very clear rendition of any scene.  The build quality is fantastic, solid metal with a large, bright and high resolution screen.  Focus times are decent, on par with other superzooms.  The lens hardly extends outward at all, the folded optics really do shrink the footprint of the camera.However.....shooting indoors or at high ISO is another issue entirely.  Noise is a BIG problem above ISO 100.  The flash is pathetically weak.  At ISO 80, the flash is only rated to around 3 feet!  This is not a camera for the indoors or low light.Movie mode is decent, but nothing to write home about.  The widescreen 848X480 mode is interesting, but overall quality is a couple of steps down from a Powershot S2 or S3.  The sound is especially weak in comparison.  On a positive note, you can zoom during filming.The TZ line of cameras is designated for "travel".  If you plan on using this camera for that (in the well lit outdoors), it's a great choice.  As an all in one solution, I can't fully recommend it.</review_text>
This is the best digital camera I've owned.First, I believe that a camera should fit into my jeans pocket so that it will be with me when photo opportunities arise.  It's not the smallest camera on the market by any means, but it fits comfortable into my Levis.  I use this camera all the time.Second, the ZOOM is amazing.  10x optical zoom on a camera that fits in my pocket!  Because the camera has built in image stabilization, deeply zoomed pictures look terrific.Third, my wife finds it easy to use.  This says a lot. I'm the techie, but she thinks the dials and menus are intuitive and easy / quick to use.Fourth, the camera takes 16:9 aspect ratio movies (or regular 4:3 if you prefer).  The image quality is much better than I expected.  The image stabilizer probably helps improve the quality, but I have played the videos on our 42" TV.  The quality appears just about as good as our normal cable signal.  Definitely not HD, but good enough to share short videos with friends on a TV and more than sufficient for emails and YouTube postings.Fifth, we have been very pleased with the image quality.  Because we are amateurs, we take pictures under all sorts of less than ideal conditions (low light, moving subjects and cameras, long zoom shots from rocking boats, etc.).  This camera's sharpness, colors, and details are better than any of the other digital cameras we've owned over the last ten years.    A pro might not be satisfied, but we are.Sixth, it works great with iPhoto, Mail, iWeb, and iMovie on our mac, so sending pictures or videos via email, making webpages from them, or editing them into movies / slideshows is very, very easy.Battery life has been sufficient, but I would rather that it took standard batteries (AA's or AAA's) so that I wouldn't have to bring the charger on vacation.  The charger is small, but takes valuable space in tight suitcases.  At first, I was not thrilled with a manual lens cap.  However, I veiwed this at a camera store before buying at Amazon.  The salesperson convinced me that the integrated / automatic covers provide less protection and are likely places for mechanical failure.  The big lens that lets the Lumix pull such a massive zoom definitely needs good protection.</review_text>
Great little camera. I also have a DMC-FZ30, and this one has almost as many features in a much smaller, less expensive camera.  Hard to beat</review_text>
The camera works quite well, and does what is says it does (senses movement and then blinks a red LED while swiveling back-and-forth), and is very low cost.  And it actually *does* look like a small, low-cost surveillance camera.  The only negative aspect is that you have to be relatively close to the "camera" (around ten feet in a lighted situation) to make it activate with normal (not exaggerated) body movements -- and it won't trigger at all in low light situations.  All-in-all though, a great buy for a device that may prevent a burglary of your home or apartment</review_text>
The camera works great even though it is a refirbished unit. However it did not come complete. It is missing the adapter ring and is now out of production.Buy.com, Fuji and other locations do not have the ring. My bad for buying an out of date camera for sale</review_text>
I am just getting around to reviewing this camera after purchasing it about 2 years ago. I love it; it's a good first or second digital camera, as it is functional but without too many features for the beginner. I use it for both personal and my job as a newsletter editor -- the 4MP are more than enough to get the quality images at the resolution required for publishing</review_text>
absolutly love this camera, dont tyink its worth how much its up for, maybe a little over priced, but absolutly greaqt non the less. never have a single problem. pictures come out great. however, pictures come out a tad blurry when flash is not on. but other than that, FABULOUS</review_text>
The camera works great.  It is easy to use, and takes wonderfull pictures.  The image quality is very nice, and the range of the focal length is great too.  I have two issues with it.  It does not perform well in low light situations(inside dark rooms) it's tough to autofocus.  Also, it goes through batteries like crazy.  I would recomend getting a set of rechargable batteries, it will be well worth it after 3 or 4 days of using the camera all day</review_text>
We bought this camera online, refurbished.  Everything functioned correctly. It does not offer shutter speed adjustment, which is the only thing that annoys me, because the camera chooses slow(er) shutter speeds, unless you point the thing directly at a lightbulb. (Which, I might add, it took an excellent picture of) So action shots are not it's specialty. However, macro shots, and pretty much everything else works great.</review_text>
I bought this camera for my sister to replace one that I broke (oops).  It does not have the zoom range that her other camera had, but the megapixels are higher.  I borrowed it one day (and she let me!) to see how it works.  It worked GREAT! I was in a high school gym taking pictures of my son's basketball game and the pictures were not too dark and came out pretty clear for the situation.  I have the next step up camera with a 10X zoom and 5MP and do not get as clear pictures in the same gym!I am very impressed and she is very happy</review_text>
Bought this with my P712 camera.  It should come with the camera.  I had to buy it from a differnt vendor.  I love it and it really makes the camera much easier to use and charge.  Also great to download the pict's onto the computar.  I would highly recomend it. It makes storing the camera much easier.</review_text>
The easy share dock is a great little device delivering everything promised. My one complaint, albeit minor, is that the entire "Easy Share" system of Kodak might be wonderful to someone new to digital photography. It would be very useful to that newbie in storing pictures with a PC to hard drive, CD or DVD, but I found the software's folder stucture contrary to the way I do things. "its way" isn't flexible enough to allow me to continue to do various picture tasks my way. After using EasyShare to download pictures from the camera via the dock, I always have to move files around to suit the way I've done things for several years. As to the dock, I'd recommend it to anyone. It's a nice unit.</review_text>
Easy to use, works as described, compact, the whole Kodak Easyshare system is a dream and well designed</review_text>
The Kodak camera dock makes digital pictures easy. Push one button to download all of your pictures and it charges the battery at the same time</review_text>
easy to use and understand, quality,keeps camera fully charged at all time</review_text>
This item was recommended to me by my daughter.  She explained that it is actually easier and cheaper than to buy batteries for the camera.  I keep my camera sitting on the dock, so it is always ready to use.  I recently took the camera and dock on vacation with me and it was always ready for me to take a picture.  It was not available in local stores, so I was very happy I could order it from Amazon</review_text>
I wanted a wider view for the camera and this converter took care of it beutifully.  I'm very happy with it</review_text>
Product works well only when used without flash unit on.  If flash operates it creates a shadow in the finished photo.  When used with sufficient light and without the flash unit on this lens delivers quality photos</review_text>
Works as advertised. Be aware that when using the flash with the lens it will cast a shadow in the picture. Also your view through the view finder will be partially blocked, but you can always use the LCD screen</review_text>
First off this is a fun accessory for my A95 and A80. At about 26mm lens you can shoot some very nice wide angle landscapes to close-ups for under $100. The lens is sharp and is a nice piece of coated class. Once mounted you zoom lens works inside the adapter so you probably have a 26mm to 40mm (total guess)zoom lens. Yes it does have barrel distortion, yes it does stick out and block the flash, yes it is black and it does look a bit dorky on the camera. So either go buy a digital rebel and a 19-35 zoom for over $1000 or correct the barrel distortion in your image editing program, use a slaved flash for indoor shooting (manual mode only) and paint it silver.Bottom line...if you like the look of wide angle, don't mind or even like a very very mild barrel distortion (ever so slight fisheye look), and are good with silver paint, then for the price of a cheap hotel room or a nice meal for two, you can have a lot of fun with this accessory.Highly recommended!!</review_text>
Useful for reconditioning batteries that are losing their charge.</review_text>
I bought this for a Kodak Easyshare C360 and it has worked perfectly, just as I needed, the charged battery lasts a very long time.... product just as described</review_text>
They do what they are supposed to..they are batteries</review_text>
Regular batteries caused my camera to need repair. Independent repairman stressed only use kodak batteries. Sometimes it's worth it to pay for name brand</review_text>
It was just what I was looking for.  I thought the price was right also, it was less expensive then retail</review_text>
This was purfect, exactly what I was looking for, and at a great price too.</review_text>
I have this for more than a month now. Installed a 256 MB SD card, currently loaded about 800 photos, and configured my albums based on trips and occasions. I set the photo frame on slide show mode and with daily auto on and off settings.1 week ago, I bought another product, Pandigital (7 in) w/ 128 MB built in memory. Philips has far better picture display where Pandigital has an acceptable photo display. When you look closely or stare at the photos, you will immediately see that Philips does not have any of the grainy reproduction. It also has elegant slide show transitions; Pandigital needs to work on their transitions.You just have to be patient when transferring files from your PC to the photo frame, I find myself hitting the reset button more than I really would prefer. I find this no harm to my pictures. This can be resolved by just having your pictures displayed straight or transferred from your card. I just chose the PC method because for easier management of what I needed to be transferred.</review_text>
I've seen some bad digital frames- ones that stretch out the picture, making everyone look fat, or dim displays with bad color. The Philips frame is absolutely the opposite: it's delightfully easy to use and the picture quality is great. Pictures are automatically sized, cropped, even rotated when you turn the frame. I didn't need the software they included. I just dumped a pile of pictures on a CF card (using my camera wired to a computer) and then plugged the card into the frame. The menus in the frame are navigated with a little joystick on the back. It's not the nicest menu system, but I got the hang of it pretty quickly. If you are buying this for Grandma (of course) here's a tip: buy two memory cards so that you can switch photo albums when you visit</review_text>
This product delivers exactly as promised and we could not be more pleased.  The pictures are wonderful.  The initial downloading process was straighforward and problem-free. We actually purchased three photo frames for ourselves and our children and they love them as much as we do.  The slideshow feature is wonderful as well. Everyone of our friends that have seen the photo frame are equally amazed by this product as some were not aware that such a product even existed. To be sure, they are expensive but worth the cost.  We will enjoy our photo frame for years to come as we update with new pictures regularly.  Thanks to the folks at Philips for getting this soooooooooooo right.</review_text>
This product is so cool.  Whatever your situation is, if you have a lot of digital pictures, then I recommend going out and getting an SD card...preferably up to 1GB (or even 512MB), for use this with this product.  Even if your camera doesn't use SD, you can plop the SD card right into the picture frame and upload photos from your computer TO the card!  It's like a little computer, this frame.  Another big suggestion I have is to find a program online that resizes your photos to the dimensions of the frame (photo size explained in other reviews). (I downloaded Visualizer Photo Resize).  This will take photos down from its original size (e.g. 1.8 MB) to a smaller size (e.g. 500KB).  This will let your store dramatically more photos.  So far I have fit over 1700 photos in about 430MB worth of the 1GB SD card that I have!  The picture quality is very good and the frame can swivel to basically any angle and could be used horizontally or vertically.  Plus, it is a Philips, which is a great brand.  I have a Philips HD TV as well and it is my baby...I love it.  This is a great present for anyone!  How can you go wrong with a picture frame that replaces its picture any time you want</review_text>
This is a good product.  I like the way it automatically resizes pictures to fit the full screen.  Image quality is excellent.  It's like always looking at your photo album.  One complaint - the colored trim rings are magnetic and don't line up perfectly due to the magnetism.</review_text>
We had ordered this product as a retirment present for a co-worker who was leaving in about a week so we even had Fed Ex shipping.  The product kept showing up as in Order Status & never updated until almost a week later when it was delivered.  Product arrived in excellent condition but we were wondering if it was ever shipped...Amazon or Retailer needs to update shipping info instead of leaving product showing Order status & not shipped</review_text>
Excellent item that protects my digital camera well; Has nice sized external pocket to carry extra batteries (4 AA) and extra memory card. Very durable and still looks new after 2.5 years of use. Have taken it to India/Abu Dhabi & back as well as all over the US and still hold up well.</review_text>
Nice and compact it has a place for everything I need for my 35mm camera.  The shoulder strap is adjustable and makes it easy to transport</review_text>
this case is great for my camera and my needs.  i usually only take with me my digital camera, four extra batteries, and possibly one extra SD memory card.  everything fits in there great, and i don't have to worry about locating anything when i need it.  i know just where it is.  i bought this case for myself in december, and so far it has been to washington dc and new orleans!i did take the suggestion someone else had made about strapping it around your waist, and it worked like a charm...  until the heightened security in the museums in washington, dc.  i had to wiggle out of it so it could go through the x-ray machine!  but other than that, it was very comfortable, stayed put, and i had no complaints</review_text>
I wanted a small case for my new digiital camera, and did not like those offered by Fuji.  No offense Fuji, I just didn't need all the bells ans whistles you include.This little case is a great alternative.  It holds my camera, a couple of memory cards, and spare batteries like a glove!There is a strap on the back of the case that can be used a belt clip, or as I will, as a wrist strap.My only complaint is that the shoulder strap is not removable.All in all, I am very happy with my purchase.</review_text>
Well aside from what has been said, I will say the velcro part could be annoying, however it is big and secure enough to make you feel safe for the avg user who wants just a camera and nothing more professional, has extra storage for batteries and your usb cable. All in all, better then nothing and good for the value. You wont feel the need to get rid of it anytime soon</review_text>
Overall I like the case very much. It's a little big for my Canon Powershot S45, but the extra room is tolerable and might be handy later for carrying other stuff. The front pocket is just the right size for my usb small card reader, extra CF card and battery. I like the dual protection for the camera (velcro and plastic latch) and the fact that the lid entirely covers the camera pocket (protects against rain), it would be nice to have a hard case for the really bumpy rides. Great product</review_text>
The wall-plug adapters for the traveller-sort are nice, if you have travelled beyond the oceans you'll understand what this means.  The Fuji camera is kind to rechargeables and lets you focus on learning the camera rather than worring about running out of power.  The asthetic of the case is lame, but not to worry, functionality is primary.  A good value, and the item was shipped very fast.  The charger is built cheap, so be carefull not to mangle it when putting the batteries in.</review_text>
I've been using this camera for a few months now, and so far I'm very happy with my purchase. The main factor for me in deciding on a camera is the quality of the pictures. The A430 delivers 4MP. To an amateur like me, this does not seem like much. Actually it seems outdated compared to other cameras out there. But once the photos were taken, I was amazed at the clarity and resolution. The resolution is more than enough for amateurs/hobbyists(?). The colors are vibrant and sharp, although there are some noise/grains with blacks. Plus, you can record movies...with sound! The quality of videos isn't spectacular but gets the job done (rather grainy in 640 mode [largest]); it's not something you'd make a movie with, but perfect for places like youtube. I believe you can get ~15 minutes with 1GB in 640x480. So for someone who takes pictures just for fun, it has nearly everything you'd want.pros:great pictures: high-res, vibrant, and clear; good flashgood body constructioneasy to use (low-med learning curve)awesome battery life (with rechargeables)good video feature for a cameracons:bulky (much more than it seems) (I suggest A500 series when it's on sale [slimmer profile])small screenslowdowns when zooming in and movingThings to note: I suggest at least 512MB of memory. With that much, you can take as many pictures as you want without feeling constricted. Memory is really cheap now. Brands such as SanDisk are too costly - there are MUCH cheaper alternative for the same size card, same quality (buy online).</review_text>
I only got this A430 a few days ago so I haven't used it extensively yet.Tonight I compared flash photos of my book case from about 1 metre using my Pentax ist DS 6Megapixel SLR and the A430.  I took a number of pictures and the difference was pretty well zero using my 17inch monitor.  I have to say I was impressed as I was expecting more of a difference in favour of my SLR.The autofocus on the A430 is excellent and very reliable.  I tried a few shots in complete darkness and the IR beam made short work of focussing and firing the flash giving a perfect image.I am also very impressed with the video images with the picture being very sharp and clear with good sound.It does lack the manual featurs of an SLR and there is no information in the actual viewfinder.It is hard to criticise this camera.  It doesn't even look or feel cheap even though it only cost $159AUD.  It feels lovely in the hand and is a camera you can be proud to own.The batteries have been lasting well too even though I have been snapping away with it for several days.  I am using the 512M SD card from my SLR in the camera at the moment as the 16M supplied one is pretty inadequate.All in all a great camera at a great price</review_text>
This camera is really good, easy to use, and has Macro mode, I like to take pictures of collectibles watches, and is really awesome the images you can get. I also have a Canon Digital XT, with 100 mm Macro Lens, and a light box; well some pictures I took with this A430 Camera, are almost the same quality as the ones I got with the more expensive equipment</review_text>
An easy to use digital camera with good features for someone wanting to venture into digital photography.  Canon does not disappoint here.  Ergonomically well designed</review_text>
I had this one before and it was stolen so I replaced it with the same thing because it was just what I needed. Great clear shots, user friendly, downloads without problems, feels good in the hand, small and light. If I lose this one I'll buy the same one again</review_text>
I did a lot of research before buying this Cam.  The mix of features and quality have supported my purchase, and if I needed another Cam I would buy this one again</review_text>
This is my first digital camera and I am so impressed! The pictures are very clear and sharp. It is easy to use, even for someone who is electronically challenged like myself. My son(who is a camera buff) recommended this camera to me because of the Canon reputation and it definitely delivers. I was looking for something with more megapixels, but he told me that this camera would be more than enough for someone like me who takes pictures mostly at family events and he was right. I would definitely recommend this camera to anyone like me who is looking for an easy to use and great quality camera</review_text>
If you are looking for a point and shoot that will turn out some great photos with little effort, go no further.  This camera has a 4x zoom, which is hard to find in this price range, plus enough megapixels for good looking 8x10's.  There are also some neat artsy features like a color swap and a color accent (everything is black and white except one specified color....very fun to fool around with).  I am very satisfied with this product, and use it almost daily.  Give it a try, and it will not dissapoint</review_text>
This is my first digital camera so I can't compare to others. However, I'm not someone who needs a top of the line model, and I thought the price could not be beat. I found the controls fairly easy to learn with the "quickstart" guide that came with the camera.  Downloading to a computer is also simple.  I did not try the software which came with the camera as I did not deem it necessary to transfer the photos to my computer.  If you use Windows XP it will automatically detect the camera. (Other reviewers believe the software is not up to par however).I took many photos on the highest megapixel setting (average picture is about 1.4 MB) so that they could be printed out (no larger than 4X6 prints recommended).  If larger prints are important, a higher Mexapixel camera might be in order. For viewing online-only, the lowest setting looks very good. It's compact size means it fits comfortably in a small bag and weighs nothing.Recommended that you purchase the camera case separately as well as an NiMH battery charger.  Also, purchased a 1G Memory card separately.  Flash does take a while to recharge between shots, but this is not a problem for me</review_text>
We purchased this camera for several children as christmas presents.  It was easy enough to use out of the box for 7yr & older, however the menu system was a bit difficult to navigate and the more gadget-oriented kids fared a bit better.  response from the kids was great, and it has several key advantages over slightly cheaper keychain type cameras.  It supports an external memory card (SD), has a flash, and doesn't lose pictures if the batteries die or are removed.  USB connection (with Windows XP) worked fine without needing to install any additional drivers.  For less than $40 it was a great present, and picture quality is sufficient for most "snapshot" applications, and feature list is rich enough to allow kids to learn something about digital photgraphy.  We have not tried the web-cam feature or recorded movies so do not know what the video quality is like</review_text>
If it wasn't for the safety caps that fall off easily I would rate this item with 5 stars. However, the binoculars are great for checking out sports like basketball and football, especially if you can't afford the pricy seats</review_text>
Although they weren't packed securely--just loose in a box--the Bushnell Falcon Binoculars work well and have served us well.  My wife especially has enjoyed them at the huge 92,000 seat stadium University of Georgia football games.  They have functioned very well, with a sharp image and no mechanical problems. We have enjoyed them very much, and I would recommend them to others</review_text>
Mostly plastic, with spindly parts and a lack of smooth motion.  Mine came broken out of the box - the plastic cap screw which holds the eyepieces in place had shattered.  Better to spend your money on a higher quality product</review_text>
I was looking for something for stargazing. I read a few reviews and bought it. I couldnt see the stars but the binoculars if of excellent quality, the optics are very clear without no color distortion. Its reasonably light weight for the cost and magnification. The material is very good and doesnt feel cheap. If you are looking for a binoculars to take on a field trip, hiking, trekking, sightseeing etc this would be pretty good</review_text>
I found this product to be worth the money, if you go ne where else you will pay more.  The instant focus works good and never had a problem with any part of the binoculars falling apart, it's a great starter item for someone..</review_text>
This is fixed 10x -- not a zoom. Didn't realize that when I bought... even so, it works fine for the price. Using this, in the suburbs, I was able to see (albeit faintly) the Andromeda galaxy and the orion nebula. I can't wait to try out somewhere in the countryside... these are useful but of course, now I am left wanting more</review_text>
I wanted a 10x50 for a long time for watching the stars. Ideally you should buy a binocular with a BAK4 prism for astronomy (This comes with porro prism). BAK4 ones sell at a higher price. At the price I saw this one ($26+Free shipping), I thought I will give this a try anyway. It did not disappoint. It comes with a carry case. It's over a month since the purchase. Still working good</review_text>
I have found no problems with these binoculars. Well worth the small amount of money spent. Images are clear, and focusing is very simple. Great buy for someone not wanting to spend a ton of $.</review_text>
it has good battery life but if only they can make it smaller than it will be perfect</review_text>
It's compact, well designed and easy to use, plus it charges the batteries rapidly - a full charge in an hour or less and the batteries seem to last all day, unless subjected a to a lot of flashes</review_text>
It's a great stand for the money.  It didn't work right out of the box, (this is the only reason I give it 4 instead of 5 stars) but with some serious elbow grease and some WD-40 the stands now work just fine.  For the money though, it's a very versatile package that's neatly transported in a single bag</review_text>
I'm a casual photographer and I don't have a permanent studio so I needed a backdrop that could be set up and taken down quickly. It also needed to be versatile and durable. For the price, the Savage Port-A-Stand was exactly what I was looking for. It's a breeze to set up and dismantle and comes with a handy carrying case for easy storage. Although the included paper is a bonus it has generally been too narrow for my needs. So I'd recommend that anyone purchasing this item consider how much width the will require and consider buying a wider seamless. Outside of that I am very pleased with this product</review_text>
The Support System and the background paper funcioned as expected. The plants I photographed were beautiful, without background clutter. A great value</review_text>
Pros: This is truly a high end digital without the bulk of a DSLR. Great feel and features. It was slow at first with standard SD card, but installed a very fast, Sandisk Extreme III (20mb/sec.) and the Digic 3 processor was instantly unleashed. Now it performs as I had hoped. I think that the reviews would have been better if they had used faster cards. Shutter lag is gone and I can take continuous shots with amazing speed. Menus and controls are excellent. Movies are great, too.Cons: No RAW (if you need it). Red-eye is similar to all close flash cams, but easily removed with included software. No zoom during video.Other Thoughts: G7 is smaller and lighter than reviews say. It really feels like a camera, not a tiny toy. Battery life is not bad so far...will likely buy a spare. Oh...it takes very nice photos, too.</review_text>
I am pleased with all aspects of the camera.  Combining the 6x optical zoom and 10 megapixals has allowed me a lot of flexibility to crop my prints.  The stablizing must work, all my pictures have been sharp.  There is some lag between the time you push the shutter button until the camera takes the picture</review_text>
This is the very best pocket camera I've been able to find, including the brand new nikon P5000 which I just bought and have found to be inferior.   I'm not saying I LOVE it--and in fact I'd actually prefer the pain of bringing a DSLR over the limitations of this camera whenever possible--but it avoids the flaws that damage the competitors.First of all, it fits comfortably in your pocket.  It is big but the lens retracts in a nice way.  Unlike the 10 mg lumix pocket camera which has a lens protrusion issue.As far as quality, here's the scoop.1) the pictures at low ISO are the highest quality indoor pics I've been able to get with a pocket camera.  And I've tried them all. At higher iso's it starts to suck but so do all the competition it seems.2) the movies are *extraordinary.* absolutely rock solid video and the sound is great too (very very rare).3) it can take a wide angle converter, telephoto converter, and has a hotshoe flash feature.Note the following drawbacks, but these are common to all pocket cams it seems.1) useless viewfinder2) small aperture, completely useless for putting background out of focus.  (however, there is just enough change in the focus emphasis that you get a tad of a 3d effect, but it is VERY subtle).  Again, I have been able to find no pocket camera that has a fast (large) aperture.  The G6 had one but was otherwise--I assure you--inferior to this camera.</review_text>
I purchased this camera assuming it would shoot like an SLR in a size that still makes it packable like a point-and-shoot. For the most part, it does. I upgraded from an older, simpler Powershot S400, hoping to get back some of the manual control from my old film SLR days. Certainly the manual aperture and shutter speed modes (which use an attractive on-screen display along with the dial ring on the back of the body) are very accessible and convenient. A setting lower than f2.8 would certainly be nice, however. What I didn't expect was to be making so much use of the auto and program modes... silly me, that's probably what I paid all the $$$ for in the first place. The face recognition, and advanced metering capability really helped with some tricky shooting situations. You can wow your friends with the face tracking on screen as the subject or camera moves...The most noticeable drawback (and this has been previously mentioned) is the high noise of that tiny CCD with 0.01 Gigapixels crammed into it. It's really pretty bad in some situations. Be VERY careful not to forget and leave the camera in a higher ISO mode, or pictures (even in daylight) can be ruined by graininess. True, you'll get some photo's at the higher ISO modes that you would not have gotten otherwise, but the result is a bit of a disappointment.Props go out for the superb job with the image stabilization. Seems like that's where the investment really paid off (by me and by Canon). With a steady hand-held position, 1/15 shutter speeds do not present a problem (I do recommend snapping off a couple shots though, just ot be sure).On the non-shooting side, the options available to manage and selectively delete pictures stored on the SD card are very good. I was especially happy to see I could clip videos down to the desired length right there on the camera. Who wants to carry a hundred MB of video, when all you want is 10 seconds that's on the clip? Nice job on that.A strange/annoying feature (haven't figured out how to disable it) is that if you zoom in on an image to view it, and delete it or move onto the next image on the card, the camera holds the zoom to previous level of the last image. Sort of odd.Battery life has been fine, compared to other camera's I've owned. For a camera this size, it seems like they could have worked a little harder to fit AA's into it.Overall, I can see this camera and I are going to get along fine. It fits in my old camera pouch I used to carry my SD400 around in. It shoots awesome pictures in daylight, and does well in low light as long as I my hand is steady and I don't b*tch too much about the graininess. Prices look like they're starting to come down, and I'd say it's a steal at about $400 if anyone wants to wait</review_text>
After having switched 3 cameras in 2 years, I think I can safely say that this is perhaps the best Pro-Am camera around and best value for the money. Was very easy to use and pictures are very close to the real thing.</review_text>
The filter may cost a bit more than some lesser filters but one gets what one pays for.This filter kit is complete with plastic case and pouch to protect the filter when not in use. Since it's a 67mm filter, that is a toughtful touch because a filter this large can get scratched pretty quickly.What's the ND filter good for?Think of it as sunglasses for your camera.I use it to allow for slower shutter speeds when I want to blur part or all of my image.This comes in handy when photographing a waterfall when you want that silky blur on the water with the rest of the picture in sharp focus.It also works well in car races where you might pan the camera, staying fixed on your target as you shoot, creating the effect of blurring everything but the moving car.Very effective.Those are the two main reasons for me to use the ND filter.You won't use it often but when you do, you will create a picture out of the ordinary.</review_text>
I have a Rebel XT with lenses, flashes,etc.  My wife wanted a small easy to use camera so I got her this for her Birthday.  She got it last night and was up all night taking pictures around the house and experimenting with the wide range of options available.At first she thought the camera was too complicated but after staying up all night using it, she is living it.As a Professional Photographer, this camera is great and I may have to steal it for events as a quick way to take some pictures. It has all of the features and super resolution to make a great companion (as long as she lets me take it)Highly recommended for anyon</review_text>
Great camera, just chosen as editor's choice by PC mag as well.[...]I have it for about 3 weeks now, couple of family parties later I am really happy with this little one. Fits even in tight jeans pockets, and is quick to take pictures. Face recognition works really well, not flawless, but really amazing. I took about 300 shots so far and they are mostly great quality, some indoor pictures without the flash are a bit blurry, if you don't hold it steady.My 4 year old niece was running around with it and took nice shots just on her own with the automatic setting, pretty amazing. Flash can be a bit strong when to close indoors. It takes fast pictures and is very easy to understand. I still have to read the manual, though. ;-)I added a fast 2GB card and even the video quality is pretty good, althought just avi format, not mpg. Sound is great. It even has a speaker when you play the video for review. Outside pictures are outstanding quality. I had some outside self-timer family pictures enlarged at the store to 20-30cm, and the picture quality is awesome. Highly recommended when you want a camera you can carry with you at ALL times</review_text>
Truly an amazing little camera. I was looking for something small that I could stick in my pocket when I go out everyday but still took sharp pictures. This camera does all of that and more. Its small and solid and still manages to take gorgeous photos and very nice videos. I highly recommend this camera to anyone looking for a easy to use and very portable camera</review_text>
This replaces my 2.1MP Digital Elph that I use when I don't want to carry my big SLR (Digital Rebel XT with L series lens).Positive:Instant start-up, menu navigation and zoomScreen quality comparable to video iPodComfortable and intuitive button placementStrong flash (for camera size)Modern/traditional camera aesthetics (great looking)Acceptable battery lifeCamera operation was obviously well thought outLow price for what you getNegative:Poor low-light shooting without flashLots of noise at ISO more than 200No image stabilizationZoom ring spring a little too strongPlastic battery doorThis is a perfect pocket camera if you care more about ease-of-use, aesthetics, size, and price than trying to capture a print-worthy photo.  Overall I'm very pleased with this camera, but only because I have a SLR to capture important moments/places.  Think great MySpace photos rather than great family Christmas cards.</review_text>
I did all sorts of research on the SD600.  I had made up my mind that the SD600 was the camera for me.  The SD1000 is the newer kid on the block and therefore did not have many reviews.  And that is why I am here today.  The SD1000 is the newest version of the SD600 with a few additions.  Those few additions make this camera AWESOME.  I love the ISO choices.  I was zooming on my local Calif. freeways at around 80mph and decided to take a few shots of passing signs out my passenger window.  At the high speed the ISO caught such great detail that I could clearly read the sign later at home.  That means that despite the small size the camera filtered out the shake of my hand, the shake from the road, and compensated for the fast movement. The color options are very much the same as other Canon Powershot models.  MACRO is so much fun to play with on this camera.  The button layout is easy to figure out.  Lighting options like White balance are a button push away.  With the Face Detection option on you are sure to get a great photo of the family.  I have been playing with it none stop for over a week.  Get at least a gig for memory.   The only downside that I have found, and it is a minor one, is that when the battery warning comes on it means that you have 1-2 more pics and then it shuts off.  I ordered another battery ahead of time and it was worth it.  The batteries charge in about 30-40mins. This is a great camera.  If you are thinking about the SD600 step up and get the SD1000.  You will not be disappointed with it</review_text>
Canon all the way! I've had an s230, sd300, sd400, sd630. I really did not like the feel of the SD630 very much after living with it for a while. I also didn't like the button placements..was not comfortable with it. It DID take great pics and video. BUT, I moved to the SD1000 (black), have had it one week and love it!Of all the Canon point-and-shoot digitals, this is my favorite. It is tiny and so pocketable. A pleasure to use. The switches and buttons are where they should be and feel good. The screen is 2.5 so people who want 3.0 need to go to the SD750 which is basically the SD630's replacement with the Digic III processor. Same form factor.If you liked the SD200, SD300, SD400, SD450 or SD600, you will love this!My only reservation is how great ARE the pics from this little camera. I'm sure they are excellent but the jury is out on how good they are compared to earlier Canons. I like vivid pics so I may have to set the camera to vivid.Got a good deal at Amazon</review_text>
Pro photographer here. have been using so many different digital cameras .. because i am very picky.  this camera is fantastic. great looking sexy design. simple easy to use. fantastic looking pictures.. fast and easy and small size fits in your pockets. great micro function. great movie mode. sharp and accurate color pictures.. best compact digital camera in the market.   well always new things coming out and surprise me but  at least for now/so far this is the best one in the market right now- in point and shoot/compact camera catagory. canon makes great camera..</review_text>
I love this camera.  It is handy, goes in my purse everywhere.  Sure it isn't a Canon Rebel or remotely like it, but it is fast fast fast, holds a charge, takes a great wide angle shot and takes superb macros.  I don't use the movie feature but it has it.  There is a lot to offer in this little camera.  I have people stop me all the time and ask what brand it is.  Buy it and be happy :</review_text>
I have owned Canon Powershot S-series (S330), A-series (A540, A570is) and the S2 IS.  I wanted a 28mm wide angle point and shoot, so I bought this because Canon's SD800 IS is outrageously priced.  I'm a Canon fanatic, so be prepared for multiple comparisons.  However this camera is worth crossing over to Panasonic for.PROS - I definitely enjoy the 28mm feature.  The bright rear display is wonderful, the OS is quite intuitive as well.  Also it gets great battery life.  The ~ 300 shot estimate in the specs is pretty realistic.CONS - Compared to Canon cameras this is my conclusion -All of Canon's camera have much truer white balance presets.  Even with RED & BLUE fine tuning options, indoor dim lighting is really hard to do, as is snow lighting.This camera takes much more saturated and contrasty photos than Canons do.  Even when the FX01 is set to be less-vivid, it's way more saturated than Canon's most vivid setting.  The end result is a dramatic and unrealistic photo sometimes.The CCD noise is another issue.  This camera's sensor is much noisier than Canons'.  Nothing dramatic and deal-breaking, but don't expect the same crisp, clean shots a Canon will take.Finally Panasonic image stabilization.  It really does not hold its own against Canon.  I used the 570 IS and handheld shots that were a 1/4 second, and sometimes longer, with decent results.  The same goes for the S2 IS (which I HIGHLY recommend as a digital camcorder/super zoom hybrid).  The panasonic's sensor doesn't seem to match the ISO standards that you set it to, and it wants slower shutter speeds at f2.8 ISO 100 than a Canon set at the same f-stop and ISO.  So, despite the FX01's Mega OIS, its longer shutter speeds mean you still get shake that you wouldn't with an equivalent Canon.I know Canon, Canon, Canon.  Well, I told you I'm biased.  After reading these cons, why would you get this?  It's 1/2 the price of the SD 800 IS (if you shop around) and it's a must have for city photos, big landscapes (skies look so cool with wide angle) and it's vital for indoor group shots!Buy it, but don't expect the world from it</review_text>
I deal in major brand cameras and Panasonic cameras are my personal favorite! I've seen people whine about the "noise" they make many times but have never found it to be a problem. I own the FZ10 and the FX01 for my personal cameras. The FX01 is a very fast camera and takes great pics! I love the 28mm wide lens. Compared to most cameras I've used the FX01 does a real good job of metering the light and exposing the images.I love Panasonic's solid build and reliability. They may not be as popular as Canon or Sony but in my opinion are every bit as good.</review_text>
I am accustomed to using a larger point and shoot zoom. This is a sleek pocket sized point and shoot that gives exceptionally sharp pictures. It focuses very swiftly I would suppose due to the Leica lense. The battery life is good. I do notice that photos tend to calibrate a little to the blue range. I like to have a little more zoom. Overall,I like it very much</review_text>
this is my fifth digital camera, and i like it the best by far.  it's also the cheapest.  it's my first wide-angle and my first silver-not-black:  as someone else said, i don't see how i would ever go back to a non-wide-angle after this; but i do wish mine were black.  i have noticed the colors are faded in fluorescent light, but for macro it is excellent--much better than the more expensive camera i already had bought for macro purposes (canon.)  i also love the battery, which seems to last forever.  i bought a replacement lenmar battery which is also great, and cheap, but it got some bad reviews because it was described as being for the wrong model camera, not the fx-01.  (if you read the customer reviews, you can figure out which one is the right one for you.)i do have problems understanding the display, which shows options that don't correspond to any place on the camera you can select the options at.  (i guess i should look at the manual.)  also, i don't like the software and decided not to download it at all.i bought this because i wanted a camera made by a computer company as much as a camera company, that is, i wanted it to work.  also, someone had sent me an email about the history of leica, and how they saved a lot of jews from the concentration camps.  the other nice thing about this camera is that i use it a lot more because i carry it with me every day:  it is tiny and the battery always works, so why not?as for the graininess, on my desktop the pics look fine, and i would not be raving about this camera if it were not very easy to take good pics with--but i have to admit i haven't used it for printed pics so far</review_text>
I spend hours pouring over reviews trying to decide which ultracompact was the best deal and the best overall camera.  In the end, it came down to Panasonic's FX01 and Cannon's SD600.  I read the warnings from other reviewers that the Panasonic's images weren't top quality, but I chose to ignore those reviewers because on paper the FX01 looks like it would out perform the SD600.  I was wrong.After using the FX01 for a few days I knew what those other reviewers were talking about - grainy photo after grainy photo.  I really really wanted this camera to be great, but it just wasn't.  Actually, my old 3mp camera took better shots then the 6mp FX01!  Very disappointing.  I ended up returning this camera to Amazon (very easy-great service) because of the poor image quality.  I mean, wanting good photographs is why you take photos, right?  I know someone with the SD600 and he's very happy with the quality.  Judging by the customer images on the SD600's page on amazon, I think I should've gone with Cannon</review_text>
Good product but the color was not so attracticed</review_text>
With the exception of low-light photos, and action photos which has been talked about in other reviews, this camera has done a good job.  The wide angle is nice, gets more in the photo.The biggest problem I have had with it is that it does not have a standard USB cable. So, it will not work with the single cable that my Canon camera and my motorola phone both use</review_text>
This battery is all that it says it is. I'm an ex-pro and just used the battery on a trip to Haiti where I got to be a pro again for a week. I used this battery and its previous version, charging one while shooting with the other. They both charged pretty quickly, the newer one charging a bit faster. With my 4 megapixel camera I was able to get a half-day's worth of photos out of both</review_text>
I recently purchased this product to replace my LI-10B battery that was in my Olympus Camedia camera.  It seems to hold a charge better than the original battery ever did and works well in the camera.  I've only been using it for several weeks so only time will tell how well it lasts</review_text>
This is the EXACT same battery that came with my camera & at 1/2 the cost of buying it from Olympus!  I'm a photographer & go through several batteries in one shoot.  I was very happy to find these same high quality batteries for a MUCH lower price!  I would recommend them to anyone</review_text>
I've purchased this battery 'cause I usually take hundreds of pictures of long sports events and I needed to have a second battery so I could take all the pictures I want. I'm very happy with this product 'cause the power last for hours and hours and I can re-charge it in a short period of time. I've used this one for a year and I'm still satisfied with it</review_text>
nexiamge very great ue video and still .I was use during transit Mercury of the Sun too ir/vu blocker and reducer lens for neximage good O</review_text>
I love this item and I recommended for anythings.Me encanta y lo recomiendo para cualquier usuari</review_text>
purchased as a birthday present for my husband to use with his telescope.  He has used and enjoyed this product several times</review_text>
This has got to be one of the easiest telescope imager/camera around. This imager goes in place of the eyepiece and the images instantly appear on the laptop computer screen. The included image processing software is very user friendly. The driver loads quickly in seconds. It is very exciting to see astro images of the moon and details on the lunar craters. The CCD chip is highly sensitive and gives you excellent detail even at low light conditions. The photographic magnification of this imager gives you a remarkable 150x. I have not tried it on Jupiter but I am certain that I won't be disappointed. Great purchase</review_text>
This was kindof an impulse buy. I originally went in to buy a kodak easyshare but it was sold out so I got the next affordable one which was this one and I have to say that I was thinking about taking it back because I hadn't researched it but after trying it out and reading the manual I changed my mind it works perfectly all functions work, the flash is ontime, it's simple and it looks great! I've had it one week so far nothing has gone wrong but we'll see so far I'm in love w/this cam..and not taking it back.</review_text>
I bought this camera in April 2006 and it was great! However, in July it just stopped taking picures; the camera would come one and all the functions worked, but you can't see anything on the LCD screen- it was black. When you tried to take a picture it would flash, but the picture itself was black and it still had the specs & time stamp on the black picture.  It was like it taking picutres with a lens cap on- but it doesn't have a lens cap- which makes me think its somesort of an internal shutter  problem. Anyway I took it back to the store and exchanged it for the same exact camera. Guess What?!!? The new one only lasted ONE WEEK!!! It had the SAME EXACT PROBLEM~~ What are the chances that this problem happens to me twice? Now, unfortunately I have lost my receipt, I have to mail my two week old camera off to VIVITAR- where hopefully they will fix it or perhaps I can try out another.  DON'T waste your time or money there are other cameras that are much much better! The only reason I decided on this camera to begin with, was the large viewing screen, functions, video & it was easy to work.Oh.. BTW.. If you use RECHARGEABLE camera batteries you can save money on the regular Double A..  the batteries don't last long</review_text>
I really like this camera. I especially enjoy the video capture and sound feature. Took it to Kings Island and was very pleased with it's functionality. Picture quality is amazing and it is very user friendly. Very large LCD screen. I do wish it had an optional view finder but I knew that when I purchased it. I would like to find the alternate power cord that it is capable of using. Should have been included in the purchase</review_text>
Great camera to start off. I didn't get mine on amazon, found it cheaper elsewhere, but anyways my parents have the 5385 so just getting it i knew some stuff ahead of time, like it eats batteries, even rechargables(maybe i got some bad batteries who knows), the best thing i've found to solve this is the energizer e squared batteries, they hold up. And why doesn't it come with a power cord?...and by the way you can turn off the LCD, all you do is press the ok button on the back like 2 or 3 times and it switches through and one of them it turns off. For the most part the only real problem i have with it is the placement of the on/off button i'm afraid it might accidentaly get turned on but i keep it in the case provided to prevent that...so yeah 5 stars</review_text>
Ok, so I bought this camera because a friend had the exilim z700, and I loved the features. I wasn't quite prepared for what I got. This camera is amazing; I love it and carry it everywhere I go: to take photos of myself and with friends, to take video of funny things I see on the streets, to record rehearsals and performances and even auditions (it has a vocal recorder that records for 49 hours!!!).There are so many uses I've found including posting quality video to the internet at [...]. Everyone I know comments on the quality of the video and the pictures come out amazing.I'm just a layman as far as photography is concerned, but I feel like a professional when I use my exilim. It's sleek and easy to manipulate; it has a very nice size display screen; and the buttons and prompts are very easy to follow.If you're thinking about buying it, look at the z1000 first; but this one should be a steal and has mpeg4 technology which is like movie footage.Happy snappy</review_text>
The zoom resolution is amazing and pictures generally turn out clear. The "Snapshot" function that automatically adjusts settings seems to be a little retarded, but "Bestshot" settings are numerous and create good pictures.Some of the great innovations that I have noticed on this camera are the picture management software that allows you to view the pictures on your storage on a monthly calendar by date taken. There are other neat features, but I cannot think of them right now...... but remember I was impressed. lolAgain, the zoom resolution is absolutely amazing. Because of the high resolution of the camera, even the digital zoom creates clear crisp pictures from many feet away.Make sure that you go through the settings when you get the camera and disable the "Review" and "Record" buttons from turning on the camera (set it to only allow the power button to turn on the camera)....... it is way to easy to accidentally turn the camera on and extend the lens right into an immovable surface.Now to the serious drawback.......... the absolutely horrible, disgusting, disgraceful, and noisy high ISO images. Anything above ISO 300 is, pretty much, far from archive quality</review_text>
The camera is great. The manual that tells you how to use it is awful. Also it didn't come with a picture card-surprise! The dealer I bought it from mailed it out right away and the price was good</review_text>
My wife purchased this camera and she adores it.  It's easy to use and produces excellent pictures.  An important feature of this camera is its viewfinder.  Many manufactuers, including Casio, have eliminated the viewfinder from most compact models such as this, forcing us to use just the display screen.  Although the screen is more accurate than an optical viewfinder, it's virtually useless in bright sunlight.We particularly like the dial on the camera, allowing the user to more easily switch modes without the need to push the menu button and scroll through the various options.  While this is not the slimmest of the compact cameras, it is still quite small and handy</review_text>
Worth wile considering if you are a snap shooter growing to be an enthusiast. Great features in a mostly practical mini package, but be prepared to print out and study manual and beware of some flimsiness [battery cover, telescoping lens and easily scratched exposed screen]. And don't overlook Casio's trade-in offer if you have a recent camera you like to replace--it could make the purchase of the 850 a true bargain!</review_text>
I got a 750 more than 1 year ago and love it. I purchased the 850 for my relative. It is also a great product</review_text>
Puts my PowerShot A70 on a higher level of photographic ingenuity.</review_text>
I used this on the cannon A85.   It worked very well.  I got some nice shots at the Kennedy Space Center (where you cannot always get close to the sites).The shortcoming is that when the camera is on low magnification (zoom level where the standard lens would work), the shot does not fill up the screen.  It is like you are looking down a tube.  So if you are going back and forth between close shots and far away shots, you need to change lenses</review_text>
My son plays competitive golf, so we can be on the golf course for 4-6 hours.  I follow and take pictures and mini movie clips with my Panasonic FZ-20.  One battery will last me at least that long and sometimes longer as I upload the card to my computer afterwards.  This includes turning the camera on and off during the round.  But I also will forget to turn the camera off as we walk down the fairways, and with the camera's power save mode, it is never a problem.  I always carry an extra battery in my back pocket, but rarely have to switch it out.  I have 3 batteries that I rotate in use.  I have just found that Panasonic is a superior product for my needs</review_text>
Product was as advertised and genuine Panasonic; it fully met my expectations and performs well</review_text>
I love the Vista Frame so much, I've just ordered 3 more for family gifts.  All the original problems listed in the reviews have been fixed by the manufacturer.  If the frame goes into sleep mode (overnight when no motion is sensed), it wakes up and goes right back into slideshow mode without having to restart with the menu buttons.  The color is great and the photos are viewable from all angles.  I haven't experienced any flickering problems.My digital camera allows me to upload photos from my pc hardrive onto the compact flash card so I was able to create cards with different groups of pictures for different family members.This digital frame would make an excellent gift</review_text>
This is a great product, a fine gift, espcially for those who love photographs but are not techie or don't have a computer.  I was diappointed in the auto shut-off feature that couldn't be disabled, but the fix below from our friend &quot; A customer from West Des Moines, Ia&quot; is brilliant and worked for me the first time, with less than three minutes time invested.  The company should send him/her a dozen of these picture frames for figuring this out</review_text>
I really like this battery charger. It is very easy to operate and charges batteries in about 1 hour. I leave them in the unit for at least anothr 1/2 hour to make sure they are fully charged. I like the fact that it comes with 4 rechargeable batteries at a very affordable price</review_text>
We bought 2 of these battery packs for our kids MP3 players.  It has saved us from spending a fortune on batteries since they can go through a single battery in about two days.  These batteries seem to be keeping a charge of at least 70% of a disposable, and since they have four batteries they have plenty of back-ups.My only complaint was that when we ordered the batteries we got one, but not the second.  I emailed the company to let them know and to please send a second one. They did not reply for 5 days.  They did send the second battery pack withouth further question.  It just would have been nice to get some response that I had at least sent the email to the right place</review_text>
The product comes with 4 AAA batteries which seem to work fine. The charger itself has four places where you can charge either AAA or AA batteries. I haven't measured the time it takes to charge, but 1hour seems about right (according to what they claim). There are two LEDs which change from red (charging) to green (finished).The charger is small enough to take with you if you want, or to store away unobtrusively in a drawer. The plug folds into the charger when not in use and is approximately the size of a cigarette pack (a little bigger actually).I've been using this for about 2 months without any problems</review_text>
Michael Bates' review is in error. All true rechargeable batteries are 1.2 volts so this charger is operating at the correct specifications. Non-rechargeable batteries are 1.5 volts</review_text>
As soon as the battery is charged, we were ready to go. In auto mode, it was as easy as turn on, point (focus), and shoot. Especially love the (1) speed at which it turns on and is ready to go and (2) the large, clear display screen. Additional modes are available, but I have only begun to explore. On the downside, this model is larger than the other Elph models and barely fits into the Canon camera bag</review_text>
I just got back from my first trip using this camera, and it performed excellently.Two things I found very good:Night shots at high ISO and no flash were outstanding.  I took a lot of pics of the Hong Kong skyline, and they were just stunning.  No blurry image and crisp colors and lines.  There is no need for "no shake", given these pics are possible at this high ISO with no tripod.Battery endurance was unbelievably long.  I was taking pics constantly all over Hong Kong for two straight days, including a lot of night shots.  The battery lasted the entire time.  I bought a second battery as a backup, but I rather doubt I am every going to need it, with this kind of endurance.This is the best compact camera I have ever owned</review_text>
This camera takes great pictures all the time.  I haven't had one picture that has turned out bad.  It is also very easy to use and there are lots of fun things you can do with it.  I would recommend this camera to anyone</review_text>
It's amazing how much they can squeeze into such a small space.I have owned one form of the Elph or another, for the past 7 or 8 years, and they've always been top quality.  This version is no exception.  Everything you'd expect from one of the leading names in digital cameras.The screen is BIG, and the menus and onscreen information is clear and everything is very intuitive.  The picture quality is fantastic!  Crisp and hi res, with many options for size and quality.  The detail on some of my shots is simply astounding!The video capture is some of the best I've seen from a none dedicated camera.  The 640x480 @ 60 fps mode, is quite startling when you first see it.  The improved video capabilities is one of the main reasons I upgraded.The battery life seems very good.  Infact, I'd say it's a bit of an improvement over my last Elph.  I purchased an extra battery, so I could be charging one, while using the other.  I still haven't switched batteries yet :)Overall, very please.  This is a great, stylish, neat, full featured, camera</review_text>
I've purchased other bags but this one beats all & it was a great Price to</review_text>
I've had Canon digital cameras for the past two years and with my first, opted to purchase the accompanying Canon camera case. Though it's a good fit, it has a couple of flaws that caused me to look elsewhere for a case when I got my second digital camera this year.This time around, I chose the Tamrac case because, unlike the Canon, it zips closed. The Canon has a flap closure that creates two big gaps on either side of the case, allowing small particles to get inside the camera itself. Second, the Tamrac features not only a belt loop, like the Canon, but a nice shoulder strap. This means the user can carry the camera hands free without having to put it in a purse or backpack.This case fits many small film and slim digital cameras (go to Tamrac's website to download a spec sheet that lists camera/case compatability), so don't expect a custom fit. For my Canon A510, this case is a bit on the long side, but no so much so that I have to be concerned about it shifting around too much in the case. It's a good bag from a great manufacturer for a decent price. Recommended</review_text>
I have had this for over 6 months now and i cant really complain about it. Its compact and easy to use. However, people with glasses would have trouble using it. I use it without my glasses(there is a power caliberation that you can do to match ur eye power) and then its very clear.Easy to carry around and solid. Very good for its price</review_text>
I was a bit worried at first at the tiny size, but it is tres powerful! I bought it for a school trip to the Amazon forest and I sighted way more birds and animals than everyone else which helped get me an A in the course. Yes, these binoculars rock!</review_text>
Well, I bought the bino for my 7 year old nephew to introduce him to birding. And he loves it, infact he pronounced it "Pretty Cool". Was a good buy considering its compact and does what its supposed to do</review_text>
I have not purchased this item; however, I wanted to inform westwindtalker2 how to use these binoculars (or any other normal pair of binoculars).  First step, take off your eyeglasses.  Second step, look through the binoculars at a stationary distant object, close your right eye and adjust the focus until the object is in focus for your left eye.  Third step, while continuing to look at the same object, open your right eye, close your left eye and adjust the diopter correction until the object is in focus for your right eye.  Fourth step, open both eyes, adjust the distance between the eyepieces so the image is seen as a single object and adjust the central focus knob.  (You could also try reading the instructions supplied with the binoculars--they are available in pdf format from amazon.com from this item's webpage.</review_text>
The product was easy to use and accurate.  It is also a great buy</review_text>
This camera is great because of its size and its features are just what you are looking for in a digital camera. It fixes blurring and the zoom cability takes phenomental pictures. it was a good investment for future memories</review_text>
This camera has a large screen very easy to view. We are satisfied with all the features of this camera so far. The wireless transfer function using our existing wireless network is so convenient and efficient. Just need to clean the screen often because all your finger prints are over the glass screen when you hold the camera</review_text>
What a horrible horrible horrible camera this is. The only thing that is nice about it is the looks. Like other lessons in life, looks aren't everything.Run Away!!</review_text>
This camera is great. I haven't used the wifi component yet ( because you need a t-mobile plan) and I've  heard all types of reviews about it. Otherwise, the camera works great. Many have been complaining about the flash function but I have never had a problem with it . The blur reduction could be sharper but,  its good regardless.  I highly recommend this camera. It has a sleek design and works great</review_text>
This is a wonderful camera. I had the Nikon Coolpix S1. It was also excellant until I dropped it. I replaced it with this S7c. The view screen is bigger, 3". The camera itaelf is slighter bigger than the S1 but still very compact and easily fits in a pocket. The play back of photo feature is easier to use than the original. Picture quality is superb. As with the S1, the S7c is slow to take pictures in flash mode. This can cause you to miss some candid shots. Camera is certainly worth the cost.</review_text>
We bought this camera to keep handy so it would always be available around our newborn daughter. We bought a case that fits on the strap of a diaper bag/backpack/purse/briefcase and this camera is always ready when needed. The size is great!! We did not intend to buy a professional level camera (Would have bought the D80 if I was looking for professional settings). THIS CAMERA IS AWESOME!! The response time is quick, we have not missed a shot yet. When our digital video camera is not readily avialable, it is very easy to shoot video with the S7c. Battery life has been great. Everyone who sees the 3" screen is jealous of it. Picture quality has been outstanding. I've read several reviews that mention problems with blurry images and having to delete pictures that are out of focus; I think these people must have issues. I have not seen one picture that was the least bit blurry. I have printed pics at home on my HP photo printer and I have had photos printed at Costco, Wal-mart, etc. and the quality is always the same...AWESOME! I researched for months (9 to be exact) before making my decision and I don't think there is a better compact camera available. If you want SLR features, buy an SLR. If you want the best pictures from a small camera with point-and-shoot features, buy the S7c</review_text>
I enjoy the large built-in LCD, the amazing colours and the beautiful pictures captured with it</review_text>
I've only had it for a week, but I'm already up to speed on most of the features.  LUV the touch screen navigation and intuitive menus.  Online manual is better than print version.Now I'm a movie director in one easy lesson and do my own editing on the PC.Take three still photos while recording video!By an extra battery</review_text>
Strengths: Excellent Video & Audio Quality. Great Still Pictures. Cool Touchscreen LCD. Night shot video is amazing. In Built Flash is very powerful.Weaknesses: Battery protruded outside kinda gives a odd look. User Manual supplied is not very informative... u got to explore all the menus urself. u need docking stn to connect to PC.Summary: Hey , no more additional softwares to convert all other video formats, Directly recorded as Mpeg format, connect to PC and rip your DVD.. its that easy.Picture Motion Browser supplied with Handycam is cool and very handy, you can trim out unwanted portion of your videos.I have been waiting for this since long. I purchased this just bcos its predecessor SR-100 was a big hit, and this one has all the features of SR-100 and some extra features</review_text>
This is my first HDD camcorder. I owned several MiniDV camcorders in the past. I have owned the camera for 2 weeks, so this review should be considered as initial impression.PROS:- Picture quality is very good in good daylight. I had some shots at night in well lit family room, and the video is not as sharp as day time shots, but still very good.- The Super Nightshot feature is fun to have to take kids video while they are sleeping. As expected, the video is very grainy.- The quality of still pictures is acceptable.- Zoom is very smooth- The touch screen is awsome. Hope the screen won't get scratched in the long run- Camera is easy to use without having to read too much into the manual- The menu is sort confusing in some areas, but not too bad- LightweightCONS:- Pricy, compared to MiniDV models of similar quality- Battery sticks out too much off the back of the camera making it look sort of ugly- Allows only 3 still shots during video. I wish I can snapshot still photos from video like most of Panasonic models.- All connectivities are on charging base. This means one more thing to carry with on vacation- No separate battery charger. Battery is charged on the charging base or on camera- Only 10x zoomOverall, pretty happy with the purchase, and will be a lot of funs making family videos. I did not make a single DVD from my previous MiniDV's. This is a 4.5 stars rating</review_text>
I bought the camera to use on a trip to Lake Tahoe, NV.  The scenery was beautiful and the camera was so easy to operate that I got lots of wonderful pictures.  I would recommend this camera to anyone who wants to take great pictures without a lot of problems.  It is small and easy to handle</review_text>
I love this camera.  It is SUPER EASY to use and takes fantastic pictures.  The megapixels are such that you can even blow things up and still have a good quality picture.I would highly recommend this camera.  I have had zero problems and love Canon products</review_text>
We wanted a camera that uses AA batteries (for convenience) and is easy to hold (for my young children when they take picture of us) so we bought this camera. I had a Canon Powershot A80 and liked the picture quality  but it broke after three years of use. The A80 was quite expensive at that time so I hesitate to get another point-and-shot that priced at the higher-end. We are very satisfied with the price, the picture quality, and the functions of the A550. The only shortcoming of the A550 I noticed so far is that the recharge of the flash is quite slow (even with full battery) so there is a longer-than-usual wait time before you can take the next picture after using flash.</review_text>
For the birthday party, vacations, and casual user, this camera is outstanding at the price.  For about $200, you get the great resolution and GREAT color, compact size, and usability you need with 15 kids running around you at a party!  You will, of course, immediately need a memory card before using it (the one in the package serves up about 8 pics!) The SanDisk memory cards are supercheap, and I bought both a 1 and 2 GB version, both of which work great (2GB will hold about 1,000 pics...plenty). The program for your computer can be a little clumsy to load, but within 20 minutes I had the program and all my recent pics all loaded into my computer.Awesome for the price, and unless you are a professional photographer looking to get published in National Geographic, you cannot beat the value priced A550 for 7.1 megapixels and the Canon name.  Fill your family scrapbook for under $200.</review_text>
I wanted a camera that the whole family could use - Including my 10 year old son. This camera has proven to be that and much more!  What impresses me the most is the astounding battery life and the quick focus features. It is at an excellent price point as well. Our pictures no longer suffer from the dreaded 'redeye' effects. I upgraded from a 4 year old Olympus4 megapixel camera and am blown away by the improvements over that period.Canon rocks</review_text>
I ordered a Nikon Coolpix L6 (6MP Digital Camera with 3x Optical Zoom) and then ran into a friend at a party. He had one and I gave it a try. SLOW and fair pics. I went home, jumped online and changed the order to the Canon PowerShot A550. This camera is slightly larger, but is quick, good zoom, easy enough on the batteries and takes wonderful pics. Make usre you buy additional SD cards 'cause you'll love using this camera.</review_text>
Sorry for the guy who sent his camera to the bottom of the Atlantic, but this product is great when you read the instructions!  The camera case shows the weight configuration needed to make it and your camera neutrally bouyant - when tightened it stays on great and the camera does NOT sink.  The weight kit is a great addition for those who are really going to use the case diving.  I did 6 dives and it was great</review_text>
I purchased an optional weight kit for my WP-DC80 Underwater Housing (for Canon SD550).  Following the instructions to make the camera and housing neutrally buoyant, I attached one of the weights to the tripod attachment spot on the botton of the housing.  It worked perfectly</review_text>
Canon Compatible Models:PowerShot A10PowerShot A100PowerShot A20PowerShot A200PowerShot A40PowerShot A510PowerShot A520PowerShot A60PowerShot A610PowerShot A620PowerShot A70PowerShot A75PowerShot A80PowerShot A85PowerShot A95PowerShot S1 ISPowerShot S200PowerShot S230PowerShot S30PowerShot S330PowerShot S40PowerShot S400PowerShot S410PowerShot S410 Coach Edition Gift SetPowerShot S45PowerShot S50PowerShot S500PowerShot S500 Coach Edition Gift SetPowerShot S60PowerShot S70PowerShot S80PowerShot SD100PowerShot SD110PowerShot SD500PowerShot SD500 Coach Edition Gift SetPowerShot SD550PowerShot SD600PowerShot SD630PowerShot SD700 IS*** NOT COMPATIBLE WITH ANY OTHER MODELS ***</review_text>
It takes a little getting used to but is very similar to any of the movie cameras out now (focusing and tilting).  Takes awesome pictures.  I wanted a camera that was small but had at least 10x optical for those basball, recital, play pictures of the kids.  I could never get close enough and would get a picture of the entire class on stage.  Very happy now!  Close ups of items are wonderful too.  My daughter needed close up pictures of flowers that showed detail for her science project and I was so impressed with what we got!  My 10 year old can take pictures without a problem so that shows you how easy it is to use.  Oh, and yes, you CAN see the screen in the sunlight AND it is a very sharp image</review_text>
This was a replacement camera for one that was lost; it came with the new feature Vibration Reduction.  My pictures have come out much better - especially those taken from moving vehicles (think vacation pictures).  I have also found the close-up feature much improved.  Quite a surprise</review_text>
I love this camera!  I own a Sony F707, now discontinued and has since broke and this is the only other camera on the market that has a tilt/rotateing screen.  This is ideal when you have children because you don't have to get down on the floor you can just hold the camera at waist level and tilt the screen!  It takes great pictures and great video too!I love it</review_text>
I didn't want a camera so small I would be subject to lose it!I didn't want anything more than a click and shoot.I got just what I wanted a solid camera that clicks and shoots without any fuss and gives me clear great photo's!!I am totally happy!Should have included a started memory card and case to protect LCDmsladyja</review_text>
It has every thing, loaded with features (manual setting is hard).Slightly big in size, not user freindly like coolpix 5900 preowned.Very delicate, warranty is not clear wheather it's 1 day or 60 or 90 or 365 days I don't know (made in Indonesia shocked me hopfully nothing happen)At the end I am happy with it, my kids are happy with it and You don't need more than that</review_text>
Photo quality is excellent! Like the 10x zoom. The ability of this camera with its large zoom and 6mp to fit in a shirt pocket is great. My only complaint is the tiny size of the multi-selector. It makes selections unnecessarily difficult.</review_text>
I have a Coolpix from 2002, liked it, but was rather slow and needed to be updated.  The new S10 was great in extremely cold temperatures(-60 degree windchill!).  It is much faster than my previous digi. Very happy with it. Haven't read up on all the features yet, but very easy to use</review_text>
I would have love the camera to be a little thinner, it's a bit bulky but I like it very much.I still need to get to know it better, play with it more.</review_text>
This is a great Camera for the price. If your looking for a great easy to use point and shoot. The menu system is nice and it has alot of options.The only down fall that I saw was the speed. It's not breaking any speed records. (but I'm not using it for that) I even have I high speed SD card and it doesn't make that much difference.Also, people were saying that it took blurry pictures? They must not know how to use the camera. These pictures are the best quality that I have ever seen.You won't go wrong with this camera</review_text>
The camera has great qualities at such a good price. If you read the manuel, it makes it even easier for the camera to be used. The camera at Amazon including shipping is less than 200 dollars, and all other cameras that only have 5.0 megapixel with 3x optical zoom is set up to 300 dollars. If you care about the tinyness of the camera and won't mind paying a few extra hundred for a camera that has the same qualities then this one isn't for you.</review_text>
The camera arrived very quickly.  THe software installation took about 2 minutes and seems much simplified compared to the software for an earlier Nikon camera.  I am still finding how to apply some of the features to various 'picture taking' situations.  With an external power source and the correct media card it can even take a 25-minute movie with sound</review_text>
The viewer on the back is really big.  I like the features that it has.  The panoramic help is particularly nice.  The main downfall to this camera is the time lapse between pushing the button and the picture actually being taken.  Then after the picture is taken, you have to wait a little while for it to be stored.  It takes good quality pictures, but it's hard to have a "photoshoot" with toddler and have any of the pictures look okay because the toddler is faster than the camera.  I haven't taken any strictly scenery pictures with it yet, but I have a hunch that those will turn out great.  There is a vivid color setting and the pictures that I have taken outside are very nicely colored</review_text>
Works well.  Packaging of item was good and package came to destination in good condition</review_text>
Even though I have only had my JVC GR-D370 MiniDV Camcorder only a short time and I am 77 years old, I have found getting to know and use my new JVC camcorder has been quite easy as it seems to be very user friendly.    Sincerely Joseph Ellsworth</review_text>
I got this camera for my birthday a year or two ago and it is awesome! It is handheld, it works great, and it is NEVER blurry! This was probably one of the best presents ever given to me!</review_text>
This is the first camcorder I've ever owned. I saw it demonstrated on the shopping channel, and eventually went shopping myself for an equal good price. It's a 2006 model, and has only been around for a few months. After having it just a few days so far...I'd say so far so good! I'd have to say it's fairly simple to operate, and offers a great many bells & whistles for the price. The 32x optical zoom is what sold me, and it works like a charm. The digital zoom extends that to 64x and 800x. I have yet to try out the "super-zoom". The camera features stabilization control, but I'll admit its still tough to keep it steady even at 32x! The other features include night vision, live slow, an automatic focusing control, with auto white balance etc... and can operate as a digital (still) camera as well. If I was to make design changes, it would be to have some of the operating controls, FF - STOP - etc, on the outside of the unit, instead of having to open the LCD viewfinder to operate many of the basics.  The only operational button within easy reach, is to release the pause mode & record from standby. Actually, the button to take "a picture" is right there too.Battery power is ok I guess. The rechargeable pack (included) allows up to 90 min on average. To upgrade to a 3 hr or 7 hr battery will cost you!! No SD memory card included either.So in the end, if you compare the features and prices of JVC's competitors, I'd say they did pretty well with this one</review_text>
I was very happy with the product.  It serves me well.  Fast delivery, good service by the vender.  I have a large project to do and it will serve me well on into the future. Adds to my large studio lights an added ability to focus lighting on small projects.</review_text>
I am a jewelry designer and struggled with the idea of spending hundreds of dollars for a photography set-up to photograph my designs, yet I needed to photograph them and the pictures I was taking just didn't capture the details that I needed.  A friend's relative had just purchased this item and really liked it, and it seemed the perfect solution to my problem, and the price was right so I ordered it.I couldn't be happier.  The set-up is easy.  The unit is super-portable, and with a little tweaking here and there, the picture quality is fantastic.  The only negative is that it seems a tiny bit flimsy and I wonder if it will stand the test of time.  But even if it lasts just a few years, I will consider it money well spent.  A really great item for a great price</review_text>
This kit is all you need to start taking great photos for online auctions and websites.  The screen provides diffused lighting that really captures all of the detail wihtout any glare.The tripod is not the most stable, but it will get you by in a pinch.</review_text>
This product is all it claims to be and it is doing an excellent job for me. There is just no other way to photograph highly polished silver or sparkling stone or crystal jewelry. Because the camera is in a stationary position all the pictures have the same size and proportion; product doesn't appear larger or smaller than it actually is. The attached carrying case is a tremendous convenience for keeping all the components together when not in use and it is very easy to set-up and take-down. I was a bit hesitant to choose this seller because theirs was the lowest price; however, the quality exceeds my expectations. The postage was very minimal and I received the equipment within 2 days of purchase. So, needless to say, I am very pleased with both seller and product.</review_text>
I found the materials used and construction of the photo box to be of a very nice quality.  The portable design was well thought out.  One of my favorite features is the camera stand. This is better than tripod models because it stays out of the way while changing subjects within the box.The lamps heat up very quickly. They have a very nice broad spectrum.  However, in order to keep from melting them I connected them to a power strip and just flick the switch with my foot right when I'm going to shoot the photo.Otherwise, what I have shot in this studio has come out well.  The soft white sides can take glare off of anything.  The box is well suited for items as small as pins or as large as a bust with a necklace.  This is the least expensive photo studio I came across but I can't imagine a reason to recommend anything else for jewelry photography</review_text>
I was recently hired to shoot hundreds of small items for a catalog. Rather than take my large light setup, I took the studio-in-a-box to the shoot.  The little unit was left on all day for 3 sessions on three days. The photos look fine and I saved a great deal of set-up time. All this unit really needs to make it perfect is some sort of diffuser/reflector for the front (to help lessen glare on glass bottles and such).  The included camera stand isn't quite strong enough for many DSLRS (including mine) but most photographers already own a decent tripod or two. It paid for itself many times over</review_text>
I was so excited when I got this camera from Amazon.  Why ?  The looks alone - the flip out screen was cool, like a mini camcorder.  It has MPEG4 with Stereo Sound which is, indeed, very cool.  And, the video is great!  But that was where the excitement ended.  Now I'm not technical but I've had 3 digial cameras in the past so let me explain in simple terms why this camera sucks.Why does this camera suck ?It's bulky.  Had they packed in something better than the standard 3x optical zoom I could understand that but they didn't.Pictures came out blurry in darker settings.  Maybe I didn't make the right settings adjustements ?  But it's the worst in standard settings of all my cameras.Flash is weak.  Again with a camera this size you expect more.5.1 Megapixel camera only.  Not bad, but come one, my wife's credit card sized DCS T10 does 7.2, so again, why is this camera so big if the specs are so... average...You need the base station to both charge the camera and view on the TV using the AV cables.  Considering the base sticks out like a sore thumb with its bulky design its not something you can easily take with you unless you are carrying luggage or something.  Bad choice.But here is what really clinched it.  After having 3 cameras where the LCD screen was exposed I thought, wow, this screen is protected inside so it will never break - never mind none of my screens ever broke before.  So what happened?  Two months after I got the camera I dropped it from from waist level and it fell on a little rock or something because I saw a little indentation on the outside and guess what - the LCD screen was all messed up.  90% unviewable.  $450 wasted.  I wasn't going to put in another $200 to get this junker fixed.Bottom line?  Best video I've seen, esp. for the size.  Everything else about the camera sucked</review_text>
I can't believe they haven't made more and these are so hard to find now! I've had mine for a year now and it is awesome. Finally a handy marriage between a still camera and a video camera. Parents and grandparents everywhere I go wish they had one to catch EVERY fun moment with the kids. My only complaint is the low-light capabilities. Pictures just won't turn out and movies are terrible unless you're outside or inside with bright lights</review_text>
I love this camera, I love the quality of the still and video. Great purchase. Everything everybody wrote here is true. HOWEVER:* It requires a proprietary USB cradle to download pictures to a computer. It doesn't have a standard USB jack. So get ready to pack the cradle whenever you are going to travel.* It uses its own proprietary battery that gets charged when the camera is in the cradle. If you run out of power while outside, you can't just buy a couple of AAs and use them until you get back home.* If you carry it in your pocket without a carrying case, it will flip and turn on by itself and the battery will be discharged.I thought buyers should know this. These minor annoyances make me sometimes choose to take my old, clunky  1.2MP sony to trips instead of this one just because it is so much more straightforward.Anyway, it is a good camera.</review_text>
When I sought to purchase a digital camera, I was intrigued by the idea of a hybrid camera/camcorder. Reading what was written about limitations of these hybrids really dampened my enthusiasm. But I decided to take the leap with the SONY Cybershot DSC-M2 and couldn't be happier. It takes crisp, gorgeous shots in automatic mode, and although it doesn't have many manual controls, it has enough to keep the average snapshooter happy. The movie mode surpassed my expectations. My little home films look like the ones my dad made with his expensive camcorder. It has a big, beautiful LCD screen which makes others envious. People have complained that the design is awkward, and I have joint problems, but handling it has been a snap for me.My only complaint is that I wish the zoom function was better...otherwise, this is an excellent purchase</review_text>
I bought my sony dscm-m2 from wolfs camera.Iwanted something small that could take really good pics with the ability to record video.did not want mini cassete.want one memory card.this thing is great.take really good pics and video.you can transfer the video from the m2 base station to a vcr and record it even on to a dvd recorder.I wish it had a little more zoom.and have a inferred mode.just like the sony night shot or super nightshot!!!!hopefully sony will make a dsc-m3.and add it to that camera.other wise this camera rocks!!!!!!!easy flip up lcd.wish it was touchscreen.sony you made a really great camera for some one who wants small pocket size camera.my wife loves this camera.you can switch from photo to video so easy.with a touch of a button</review_text>
I bought this case for my Panasonic DMC-FZ30 digital camera.  While I have only had this case for a week now, I am still confident this case is going to meet my needs well.  It reminds me of a women's purse in the sense that there seem to be an endless amount of pockets to put stuff in.  There's even a net on the side to hold a water bottle.  I should have no trouble fitting the camer in, plus the lens hood and other small accessories.  The main compartment has a movable divider, so I can keep the camera easily separated from the charger and lens hood.  Another review on Amazon questioned the quality.  I have not used it long enough to know for sure, but it looks like it will hold up well</review_text>
For people that love macro photography, this item is a must. Great definition, detail and sharp image is the result you are gonna get with this lens. Being able to play with dimension by focusing in part of the element or object and having the background out of focus, it's super! If you are undecided, go for it! I can guarantee professional results</review_text>
After using this lense only a couple times I knew it was a must have for anyone using the R1 that wanted close up photos. Great product at a great price on amazon</review_text>
Before I get K10D, I experienced with Olympus E-500, CANON XTI, Nikon D80.I used Olympus E-500 to take lots vivid color pictures that I love very much, but no water resistance and no second Display window, also only 3 focus point makes it not so enjoyable. Same thing happen to Canon XTi, no water resistance and no second Display window make it little hard to use when you need to change settings. The Nikon D80 is a great camera but also have no water resistance and shake reducer build in on camera, the color tone of D80 isn't the kind that I would love. Finally I bought Pentax K10D, the feeling of the body,the water resistance, shake reducer,auto dust remove,vivid color tone,etc...makes me feel the K10D is the way to go. Only complaint would be the Limited Edition Lens are hard to get. Get it while you can</review_text>
I purchased the Pentax K10D digital SLR about four weeks ago, and am very happy with this camera and the two lenses--18-55mm and 50-200mm. With the shake reduction and anti-dust features, You can`t go wrong. If you went with Canon or Nikon, you would pay through the nose for their lenses. The construction is very solid with seals that help prevent dust and water entering the camera.The features of the K10D make it a joy to use. I would highly recommend this camera to anyone moving up to a digital SLR. I am age 81, so it`s never too late to move up the ladder. W.C.RHYN</review_text>
A million words have been written about this thing, and this is not an attempt at a comprehensive review, so look above or on dpreview-com for complete info.I looked at Canon, Nikon, Pentax and Sony DSLRs.  The Sony makes sense if you already have a bag full of Minolta lenses, which I don't.  Canon and Nikon put their image stabilization in the lens, which makes their 'good' lenses significantly more expensive.  Canon EOS is not backward-compatible with their old FD lenses, of which I -do- have a bagful.  Pentax is backward-compatible with all K-mount lenses made since the 1970s, and will even take 645 and 6x7 lenses, with adapters.Sooo,  I set out to ease into DSLR ownership with a K100D, then started reading the reviews, and it was a bunch of little things that made me want the K10D.  The viewfinder has an actual prism, not a mirror cage like cheaper cameras, the displays are backlit, and the low-res mode (1800 x 1200px) is exactly what I want for certain applications.  With 10 Mpx, I can point & shoot if I have to, and crop (somewhat) more later.  And the controls are more 'classic' camera-like than the 'scene modes' on beginner cameras.  Not to say this would be worth the price difference to everyone, but I bought the K10D, and the Pentax 12-24mm / 4.0 lens,  and am very happy with both.Digital cameras use less of the image projected by the lens, so your lenses are 'longer' than they would be on a film camera.  Downside: for a 'journalist lens', had to buy the 12-24mm, which is equivalent of 18-36mm on a film camera.  Upside:  my old 50mm / 1.4 is now equivalent of that top-of-the-line portrait lens I never felt I could afford.  Pentax plans to introduce in 2007 a 16-50mm / 2.8  and a 50-135mm / 2.8, which sound fantastic - but let's see what they cost before we get too excited.  Meanwhile, Sigma, Tokina, and Tamron offer some very adequate alternatives.Camera and lens together are pretty heavy, just like an older SLR, and the LED screen cannot be used as a live viewfinder - no image gets to the sensor while the mirror is down - so you have to hoist the camera to your eye to compose a shot.  No problem, I'm used to it, and it's common to all DSLRs.((My personal feeling is that the SLR platform is just about done.  It's hard to see the need for the mirror box in a digital camera, which can use the actual sensor to compose the shot through the lens and display it on the back. Future top-end digital cams will probably be a lot flatter, like the old rangefinder cameras.  Look at the Olympus E330 or Panasonic DMC-L1 to see what direction I think we should be headed.))Having said, I am very happy with the Pentax K10D, it behaves as it's supposed to, and an affordable (barely) 12-24mm rectilinear lens was unthinkable just a few years ago.  This camera has a ton and a half of features and capabilities, and I am still sorting them out.  There is definitely a learning curve if you are to get the most out of the camera, but there are also two full program modes, including 'green zone', so you can start shooting right away with good results.  Pictuers come out great.  Colors, brightness, and contrast need almost no adjustment or photoshop-ing, which has not been true of any other digi-cam I have ever owned.  Happy with this, until the next big thing comes along</review_text>
I was pleasant surprised with K10D as it combines built-in image stabilization, self-cleaning sensor, easy-to-use image controls and sealed body. It's just fills right in my hands. I'm not going to repeat all good pints that can be found in previous reviews. But I want to comments on some "Cons". Yang from MI point out that: "10M is not much bigger than 6M (*ist DL), it is good to have but don't expect a big difference..." More pixels isn't give you better image. You wouldn't see a difference on 5X6 or 8X10 in print. But if you want to print 24X36 in print this when you need more pixels. Overall it's a GREAT camera and a big step forward from istDS/K100 series cameras. I like that K10 has more controls on the body that before was bared in menus. I like RAW button big time.  What hold me from give K10D five stars it's AF. Even AF much improved from DS still not as fast as Nikon D70S. Highly recommended</review_text>
I do photography as a hobby for over 20 years. I love Pentax cameras because the lightness and for the lens compatibility and this is the best SLR I have ever had. I still need to test some of its features. But I am very happy with the quality of the pictures. I upgraded from istDS that I got two years back. The shake reduction come very useful when I take pictures of my 2 year old son who can not stay at one place. I used to get many blurred images with ist DS at low shutter speeds and this camera handles that very well. The colors are very natural and I like the fact that I can save images in both RAW and JPEG at the same time. I usually use RAW to store my images and JPEG for the web and email. The image processor may not be as good as what u may find in Nikon or Canon but the RAW images are very impressive. I think I finally got the right camera to really replace my older film based Pentax SLR and still I can use all those expensive lenses I have without having to spend more money. If u are an owner of Pentax SLR with many lenses and wants to go digital, there is no better choice than K10D unless u have a lot of money to invest on a camera and new lenses</review_text>
I owned a *ist DL for about 8 month and bought this upgrade. I don't have any experience with Cannon or Nikon. So my review is mostly based on a comparison to *ist DL. Hope this will help those in the same situation.I am not a Pro and will not be a Pro. So I only need a decent but inexpensive camera with a handful choice of lenses. I bought K10D mainly for (1) shake reduction (2) dust removal (3) RAW button (4) 10MB CCD. Of course, there are plenty other features to expect. At this pice level, I think K10D beats Cannon and Nikon and any others. Plus, I have had a DA 50-200mm and a couple of K and M42 Takumar manual lenses. Sticking to pentax is the best for me.After about 150 test shots, I can share you some of my opinions:Pros:-- Shake reduction is great (but it has its limit)-- dust removal comes handy-- RAW button is very useful-- manual choice of any one of 11 focus points, great for composition-- faster focus than *ist DL-- rich functions, e.g. SV mode, program line-- support ISO 100Cons:-- Weather-seal does not mean too much if you don't get weather-sealed lenses-- 10M is not much bigger than 6M (*ist DL), it is good to have but don't expect a big difference (but this is not Pentax or K10D's problem)-- Battery meter drop from full to empty without stopping at a half-empty status-- PentaPrism viewfinder is not brighter than the pentamirror of my *ist DL (at least no noticable difference)-- shutter release is not as crispy as *ist DL (just a personal feeling)It's bigger and heavier than ist DL. Great ergo design. I am happy with K10D. I take one star off for the cons listed.PS: the ccd/stablizer slides inside (even power off) when you flip the camera. a little scary when I first got it. But after some reading I think it is "normal".</review_text>
This case is really outstanding! I tried a few others and this one really is the best. The camera fits in easily and is easy to access, plus it looks great. A very quality case</review_text>
It hugs the camera perfectly.  I love it because it fits in my purse.  Good price for leather too</review_text>
I have the Nikon Lens Pen Cleaning System which I purchased for a fast easy way to clean my lens however this system is much more effective. The cleaner is phenomenal and the pre-moistened cloths that come with the package are easy to use and very effective. Very compact and at 4in x 2 1/2 the cleaner can tag along in my Crumpler with no problem. All of the dust particles I've had on my camera from the Nikon Lens Pen Cleaning System have been picked up completely by the Nikon Complete Lens Cleaner Kit, I'm back to crystal clear pictures again.</review_text>
I loved the lens cleaner kit, it comes with a lens cleaner bottle, and moist lens cleaner cloths, and a lens cloth itself...and a great carrying case for those moments when carrying a camera and u need to clean your lens in an fast, effective way.</review_text>
A good product-compact and easy to tuck in pocket or camera case.  A useful item to clean lens and everyone needs this for good photos</review_text>
I use and depend on this for my SLR camera and now for my flat bed scanner. I need both to be clean. This works great.I'll order it again!</review_text>
I simply love my Nikon Coolpix 4600! It is so simple to use and offers so many features that this is the perfect camera for me! I had a Kodak digital camera but it was big and bulky, so I was in the market for a smaller updated version of a digital camera. After doing some research I decided I wanted to get the Nikon Coolpix.It's effective megapixels is 4.0, has up to a 3x zoom and has over 16 scene modes. This is such an easy camera to use. I basically point and shoot and check my results on the screen on the back. It has a red-eye fix which I love and has a Macro shooting choice as well.One of the things I love about this is pulling out my memory card and popping it into my computer. Within seconds my pictures are right in front of my on my screen. I'm always impressed with how great the pictures come out. I LOVE this camera! I love the size of this camera as well, it's small and compact, but not so small that it's hard to hold onto!The Nikon Coolpix 4600 is easy to use and takes great pictures, which makes this a win/win for me</review_text>
A lot of people are talking about issues with the delay after you take a pic. with flash, but it really only bothers me if i'm in a big rush.  So  you might not wanna get this camera if your either REALLLLY impatient or just always in a big rush!  People also have mentioned that the pictures are always blurry.  I never get blurry pictures except when i'm not using flash.  The pictures usually come out great!  The red-eye remover works pretty good on this camera, but the night visions and stuff dont really work, but if its dark you just use flash.  I love this camera!  I would deffinitley reccomend rechargable batteries because this camera eats them up pretty quickly but the rechargable ones last a long time! Hope this helped!</review_text>
The reason I purchased this camera has to do with the delay in how long it takes to actually take a picture after pushing the shutter button.Every other camera I had tried in this price range was unnaceptable. The coolpix series have a reasonable level of performance in shutter delay.Now that I have the camera, and have used it, I am impressed with how easy it is to use, and it's performance.However, this camera will kill batteries if you use the flash, but it takes good pictures with the flash turned off, and the batteries last a lot longer that way. No glare or uneven lighting too!I've been using alkaline batteries, so I don't know about the recommended Ni/Mh type, but if you use alkalines I recommend that when the batteries stop working in the camera, to save the batteries for use in a mini-mag flashlight(or other device) as they are not really run down all the way and judging by how much light I get from my mini-mag, they're only 50% When the camera decides to stop working</review_text>
The camera itself if fine but please beware.   They show the product weight at 20lbs meaning you will be charged over $40 to ship when the box it arrived in shows 3 lbs.That said, I really like the camera, it is going to take a while to get through all the features but seems to be far superior to the standard point and clicks I have been using.</review_text>
I purchased this camera 2 or 3 years ago, and still use it as if brand new today. This camera is excellent for amateur hobby photographers like myself, as it has a lot of functions that can be accessed by the click of a dial, such as shutter speed, aperture priority, manual function, etc. To be honest, the camera has so many functions that I don't even understand how to utilize it to its full potential. If you are well versed in photography, this camera is for you. If you are just a point and shoot kind of person, this camera has too many functions that it wouldn't be worth it. I purchased a 1G memory card that will store over 1000 pictures (the camera comes with one that only saves like 20 photos). The software is easy to use and has nice photo viewing and editing capability. The only caveat is that the size makes it too bulky to take along everywhere so it can only be used in planned outings, not something you carry around with you daily, thus stripping you of your random photo op. One other thing that I have trouble with is that if the settings are not perfectly adjusted in some low light situations, the pictures come out blurry. But it does take really great flash photos and some settings make the night look like daytime. You really just have to play around with the settings if you are an amateur like me, but once you get the hang of it, it's awesome. I love this camera and the quality of the photos is near professional.</review_text>
Had the Fuji S5100 exactly one year now.  Meant to write a review after our Hawaii trip last year.  Just back from second annual trip and remembered that I hadn't entered a review yet.First - you'll be more satisfied the more you use it.  This is my 5th digital camera and first Fuji.  It's really grown on me.My wife rarely uses it since I take virtually every photo.  But when she does, I just set it to AUTO, remind her how to zoom, and find that the pic's are just fine.I use a 512mb xD.  I routinely fill up a card on one set of batteries (almost all of my shots are at the 2mp setting which are just fine for most any purpose).  But beware - use only high quality digital batteries. If you are on a budget, here's a surprising find - buy the Kirkland 40-ct box at Costco.  It's only about $11 and they are conveniently shrinkwrapped in 4-ct bundles - great for packing an extra set.  These are far better than any other generic or store brand versions and rival the special batteries for digital products.With a 512MB card, I never deplete batteries by reviewing/deleting photos in camera. Download using a card reader and do your purging on the PC instead. Shots you might have deleted using the LCD may turn out to have an interesting look when seen on computer. And, unless you really have to use the LCD, learn to use the viewfinder it matches the final shot pretty well and it's more discreet.Here's a fail-safe insurance tip for good shots. Use fast shutter mode. There's a special button for this on the top of the camera.  This allows 3 shots at a time in rapid succession.  You can select first 3, last 3 or bracketing mode. I use last 3 for almost every photo. Just depress the shutter and the camera starts shooting. When you release, the last 3 shots are saved.  I always find at least one keeper. (bonus tip - only in AUTO mode, you can squeeze off up to 40 in a row - try it at knee level while following your toddler or during the last 10 yards before a finish line).I get incredible indoor shots without a flash, using Sports mode with fast shutter while increasing the ISO to 400. Be sure to resist the urge to zoom too far, the shots get darker and fuzzier in dim light.  Use widest mode and move yourself closer.  Great for photos of the talent show without  distracting the performers with a flash.I recently discovered a cool new technique using Continuous AF and Aperture mode.  Open up the Aperture to the highest level, set your ISO to 64, and find a still subject with an interesting background.  You'll get an ultra crisp detailed view of your subject with the background blurred slightly.  Very professional!I use a tiny 6 inch tripod for night shots.  There are two timer modes.  One for 10 seconds and one for 2 seconds.  Use the 2 second mode when you are not in the shot.  Be sure to use bracket mode to squeeze off 3 shots in a row. You'll get one regular, one brighter, and one darker shot to choose from later.One technique I started using is utilizing more candid shots with less posing. You can turn off the beeper and false-click sound using Set Up mode so your subjects are less aware. While getting the family to line up for a group shot, try squeezing off a few fast-shutter shots as they are moving around.  You can quietly zoom in on a smaller group and get some very interesting and touching photos and they'll never know.I think it has a relatively fast response time.  It helps a lot if you can frame your shot before hand but it's not really necessary.  Just squeeze half-way down so that all you need to do is squeeze all the way at the right moment.  When I can't frame the exact shot, just pick a spot approximately the same distance and frame that as a substitute.  This works well when there's lots of light.Why won't I give this 5 stars?  It's a bit too big to be ultra portable in a briefcase or purse (I travel a lot) and I find that some colors appear bland. I fix a fair amount with a photo editor. But it's still my favorite camera.</review_text>
This camera's flaws may irritate more seasoned and adept photographers than me. However, for the amateur looking for room to grow, this camera is a great value for the money. I was drawn to the S5100 because of its automatic and manual settings. I figured that I could slowly learn how to use the more advanced functions while still being able to take photos. The 10x optical zoom is a major bonus. The colors fade a bit at full zoom, so you won't get the same terrific, sharp images as at lower magnifications, but it still beats the heck out of the point-and-shoot 3x optical zoom cameras.I've owned the S5100 for over a year, and though I love it, it has a few significant shortcomings:1. While it takes beautiful pictures in bright sunlight, indoor non-flash pictures taken without the aid of a tripod are often blurry. The S5100 takes some beautiful night shots (with tripod), however.2. Shutter speed on automatic settings is slow, and start-up once you turn it on takes too long. Also, if you turn the camera off, and then immediately turn it on again, it often won't turn on. You need to wait a beat after turning it off before turning it on again. It's not that annoying because you don't often need to immediately turn it back on after turning it off.3. The view-finder is digital, not optical. When you look through it, you're seeing a digital image, and not actually looking through a lens. I find it difficult to see the image in the viewfinder, so I only use the LCD screen. Unfortunately, the LCD screen is hard to see when it's very sunny.4. It's hard to take incognito shots, because the camera makes a lot of noise (beeping when it turns on, and an artificial film-camera-type "click" when it takes a photo).That said, I love this camera and would buy it again. I live overseas and often post photos of my travels online to send to friends and relatives back home. They always ooh and ah over my photos and frequently ask what sort of camera I have. The S5100 offers a lot of bang for the buck</review_text>
I noticed there aren't any pictures of my Mom around after her passing. So I decided to have her pictures displayed, but instead of printing and framing a lot of it, I decided to get a digital display. I got this digital photo viewer for a lot less than what others are charging and this didn't disappoint. The 16x9 aspect ratio is not the best since you have to convert your pictures to 480x234 for it to fit perfectly without stretching. Cameras don't take anamorphic shots even with widescreen. Other than that, I left the pics at high resolution and allowed for some stretching to view at 16x9. The brightness is crisp and you have to play with the controls to get used to. Music does not play while photos are being viewed. Maybe more expensive brands does the trick. I figured i can always turn a music player on if I want to listen to music. At 7"viewable screen, it's good enough. I'd recommend this for the price alone if you are looking for a simple photo viewer that doesn't involve a lot of gadgetry</review_text>
I have been using this frame to display 2000+ of my digital images on the desk of my office.  Here are my comments:Pluses:1.	Excellent brightness, contrast, color saturation, and viewing angle.  The Mustek frame uses a LCD TV type panel that has much better brightness, contrast, and color, compared to the computer monitor type LCD panels.  The trade off is lower resolution.  The Mustek frame has resolution of only about 480x240 vs. at least 640x48 for most computer monitor type panels.  But my experience of actually seeing images on this frame for a while is that Mustek made the right trade-off to use the TV type panels.  I have compared the Mustek frame with another frame that apparently uses computer display type of LCD panel.  The other frame had much better image details when viewed at book reading distance.  But at a viewing distance of 3 feet, the images on the Mustek frame were much better.  The images on the other frame were dark.  The color was not nearly as vivid.  The viewing angle was also much limited compared to the Mustek frame.2.	Excellent transition between the images.  The transition is fast and smooth compared to the other frame.Negatives:1. Strange display mode.  The Mustek frame has a native display format of 16:8 but displays only 4:3 images.  You have two choices to display the 4:3 images.  One is to use only the center part of the LCD panel to display the 4:3 images and leave the two sides of the wide screen blank, much the same as viewing a normal TV images on a wide screen TV set.  The other choice is to have the images stretched out horizontally to fill the width of the screen, distorting the images significantly.  Making subjects in the pictures short and fat.  A much better choice would be to crop the top and the bottom of the 4:3 images to make an undistorted 16:9 images.  It is strange that the Mustek frame does not offer this choice.  So you have either a full screen display of distorted images or partial screen display.  Neither looked good.  To solve this problem, one has to pre-distort the 4:3 images to 1:1 images by stretching the pictures height wise and then cropped the top and the bottom of the stretched images to make them 4:3.  The Musteck frame can display these pre-stretched images as undistorted 16:9 images.  This is a fair amount of trouble to take each time you want to display any new images.  There are some free software tools that do an excellent job of batch processing images to stretch and crop them for Mustek frame display.    The two I found to be the best are the FastStone Batch Resizer for batch resizing and stretching the images, and the BIMPLite for batch cropping the stretched images.  I used a three- step process.  In the first step, all the images were resized to 1024x768 using the FastStone tool preserving the aspect ratio.  This makes all the images, regardless of the original size and aspect ratio, 4:3 images.  In the second step, the images from the first step were batch resized to 640x640 forcing aspect ratio, this is done using the BIMPLite since the FastStone tool could not do aspect ratio change.  In the third step, the 640x640 pre-stretched images were cropped down to 640x480 using the FastStone tool.  I found 640x480 images to have a slight better quality than 480x320 images on the Mustek frame.  I don't know why.Overall I am happy with the display quality of the Mustek frame.  I wish Mustek would provide a firmware update, if can be done, to provide the display mode of cropping the 4:3 images to 16:9 instead of stretching.</review_text>
We are very pleased with the product.  We had recently purchased another brand and ended up returning it for the Mustek PF-A7005.  It is easy to use.  We like the idea of being able to use a regular flash drive.</review_text>
I read through all the reviews here at Amazon, the best being the one from J Rueffer. He accurately explains how to get the best output from the frame, I followed his instructions and my pictures display perfect with no black sidebars.The compact flash compatibility is great, so is the USB port, although a usb drive sticking out looks sort of ugly, so compact flash or SD card is the way to go. I managed to put about 1000+ pictures on a 128mb card if you follow the instructions from J Rueffer about sizing them down.The only reason I gave this frame a 4/5 is because the mp3 compatibility works fine, but it would be great if it could play simultaneously while showing the pictures. However, the music plays separately, which is kind of silly. Overall, for the price, this is a great frame and it works fine for the last month that i've had it</review_text>
This battery is compatable with those camcorders:# DCR-HC20# DCR-HC30# DCR-HC40# DCR-HC65# DCR-HC85</review_text>
I ordered this as a Christmas gift for my sister because I love the one my husband got for me as a mother's day present.  I love watching random pictures of our family, friends, vacations and often just stop what I'm doing and become mesmerized.  My sister and her husband are also enjoying it very much as well</review_text>
First. Let me get something off my chest. It's a PICTURE FRAME! No one would buy a picture frame with the horsepower to render 10MB photos. I imagine that a device like that would be several hundred dollars.My wife complained about the performance and wanted me to send it back. I was about ready to do it until I realized what this thing really is. I decided to play with the device and prove to myself that it worked "as advertised". I collected a bunch of her favorite photos along with the MP3 file from Don Henley "Get over it" and put the frame in slideshow mode with 1 second display. Conversation over and we kept the frame, although now I am responsible for maintenance.In reality this device does everything advertised. It is disgustingly easy to use. It boasts a wonderfully clear display with brilliant colors. It will provide hours of photo viewing enjoyment. I figure 100 sheets of quality photo paper and two printer ink refills covers the cost of the frame.I've read elsewhere, and I too had to take the frame apart to clean the glass. It was easy enough to do, but be careful because the frame is delicate. I put a scratch in it with my fingernail...down to the wood. If Digital Spectrum is reading this...fix your assembly process.Performance: To make this product work "as advertised" the photos have got to be made small...I mean really small. I found the optimal size of the image should be under 200K. That means you simply can't take the media out of your camera and expect the photo frame to render a series of 4MB files in 10 seconds or less. While the frame will eventually display the photos don't expect it to do so quickly, it just doesn't have the capacity to do it.So what does all this mean to you? Well, it means that you've got some work to do. You're going to learn some file management techniques. You need to keep the originals safe while you resize copies to be under 200K. But hey...disk space is cheap these days...right?Once you get the photos to a reasonable size, copy them off to your memory device of choice and plug it in the frame and enjoy. If you can't deal with the extra hassles you can't call yourself an early adopter.</review_text>
Digital picture frame has a very good display and is very easy to use I had purchased one some time ago and bought this one for a christmas gift. It is well worth the cost</review_text>
At night is when I noticed that this frame is superior to a conventional frame holding paper photos.  This was bright and sharp.  The frame looks acceptable in any living room.  My wife has it at work where 350 pictures slowly work through the slideshow.  Her colleagues love it.  Simply drag and drop, {buy at least a 500 meg card}, the files from your computer to the card, then insert your card in the side of the digital frame.  You can change a couple of settings on it.  It has a simple menu.  Overall, a monkey could figure it out.  I bought one for my wife's office and we just bought another for her mom and dad</review_text>
I bought this for two reasons 1) I didn't have a large budget 2) I wanted a camcorder that was palm-sized and ultra-portable.  I was surpised at how tiny it is (VERY ultra-portable) and the controls are simple and easy to learn--perfect for beginners like me!  I took it on a trip to Miami and it worked great, though as others have found, it doesn't record very well in low light situations, and the digital zoom is grainy, but hey--you get what you pay for! I first used AA batteries while waiting for my Ni-MH's to power up, and they actualy lasted a long time before I switched to rechargables.  I was very happy with my purchase, and would have given this 5 stars, had it survived the trip back to Maui; I had this in my purse stashed under the seat on the plane and I may have kicked my bag around a bit.  My Pentax digital camera that was next to it in the bag came through without a problem, while the Aiptek was DOA.  So, if you're rough with your stuff, it would be a better idea to spend the bucks for a better, more durable camera.  If you're gentle with it and don't have a big budget, this is a great little camera for it's little price</review_text>
But you can take some pretty darn good pictures, and very good video.Definatly NOT in the evening or night time... it needs light- lots of it.I found it very usefull and fun.IT NEEDS A MEMORY CARD! it only hold like TWO songs without the memory card, and just a few pics. Just buy a cheap card and you can fit alot more of the various medias you can store.I really have no complaints for this except that maybe i wish it worked at night</review_text>
I purchased 3 of these for christmas presents for the 3 teenagers in my home.  The cameras were very well received.  The kids LOVED them and recorded and took photos of everything under the sun!  They had a B-L-A-S-T with these!  However, before a year was up, the door that holds the batteries in the camera broke on every single one of them (I purchased 3 -- that's over $300 down the tubes), even on the "mild child".  Too bad the construction wasn't better :o</review_text>
Very happy with this multi function camera for the price.  Five stars for Value ...It records digital video in an a low file size .asf format that was easily read with winamp and media player.   I tried to pull the video into Adobe Premiere to edit with no luck but Windows Movie Maker accepts it and allows you to export it out into many workable formats.  The video file size is amazingly small.  With a 512 MB SD card we took a couple of hours of video.  The MP3's I had on the card took up more space.The camera has about 16 mB of internal memory ... not room for much.  Get a big SD card.. they are getting really cheap now.The quality of the video is OK. Its not a high def video by any means but looks decent on my 17" laptop.  There is a setting for 640x480 and its looks good on my big screen. Most of the videos I get of the net are not as good as the quality and size that  this little guy puts out.  You do need a decent amount of light for this to work well.  Also slow smooth motions while recording help to get better quality.Music plays well on this device.  The menu to find songs isnt great.  you just have to scroll through songs and find the names.  The file names are appended and hard to read.  I beleive that is due to screen size.  Defeintly not meant to be a music player but is plays mp3s none the less.  I took a look at the ipod Nano and it is tiny.   But I like this because of all you get for the money.  Ipods nanos are just music players with non expandable memory (2 and 4 GB).The photos are OK.. I noticed alot of artifacts on some photos while others came out smooth.Alkaline batteries didnt last too long.  I read somewhere that it is best to use batteries rated for camera use.. NiCad or something.  Read other reviews for more info on this.To use the camera and other functions there is a spin wheel that changes the function from camera to video camera to music..etc.  So this device is fairly easy to use.Web cam I havent tried but did plug it into my computer and monitor myself easily...  its is a decent monitor and i'm sure it does the web cam thing well.Overall this device is a great value.  It does all its functions fairly well and is easy to figure out.For $99.00 USD you can hardly go wrong. But if you need high quality for any one of the features look for a specialty device.</review_text>
This camcorder is pretty good. It's perfectly priced, although Amazon has it for a higher price.Good things:1. Low price2. Camcorder/Camera/Voice recorder/MP3 player3. Very small4. Easy to use5. Perfect for kids who don't have that much money!Bad things:1. You need to be in at least a medium-lit enviroment to get good footage on camcorder mode.2. Can only go up to a 512 MB memory card.3. The Ulead video editing software that comes with it doesn't let you do many cool things, but the picture editing one is great.You should get this camera if you don't have all that much money to spend!</review_text>
I have had this lens for about 3 years. It has never let me down - and it has an amazing macro range. I use this lens for portraits of models as well as nature close-ups. This lens was designed for film format cameras, so shooting it on a digital gives you the sweet spot of the lens circle covering the digital sensor. Highly recommended. The only negative thing I can think of about this lens is that I wish it was an f/2.8 aperture instead of f/3.5-4.5...</review_text>
I would recommend this lens to all D50-D80 users, for the price you get incredible sharp throughout its focal range, macro function is impressive. Also, it is very well constructed nice balance and very light</review_text>
I've been an amateur photographer for almost 40 years and a devoted Nikon user for the last 30 at least. In that time I've owned every professional film SLR from the original F to the F5 and, at one time or another, almost every piece of glass from 18 to 300 mm that Nikon ever produced.  Like many, I went through a period of having to have only "the best" in my camera bag and consequently paid a premium to own only "professional" primes and zooms (many of which I still own).What constitutes a good lens however is not it's performance on test targets alone but how it performs in real life.  A $1000, pro level, f2.8 zoom is useless if it's so heavy you hate taking it with you on vacation.  All the money you spent on that "pro" performance is useless sitting in the bag at home.As a real life "user", this lens is hard to beat.  With a range that covers the focal lengths used for a large percentage of the pictures you will want to make, the sacrifice of 0.5 stops at the short end and 1.5 at the long is a small price to pay - unless you are in the (discouraged) habit of using slow (ISO 50) films handheld all the time.  The lens covers it's long focal length range with a surprising lack of distortions - a tribute to the designers - and even has a usable "macro" feature. Is it the equavalent of my 105 f2.8 AF Micro Nikkor? NO! But the difference only shows in the corners wide open.  For the occasional close up on the beach that you might want to grab on vacation it performs surprisingly well.All lenses are compromises and this is especially true of zooms.  This lens is a generally nice package as a stand alone vacation lens.  Or, if you prefer, couple it with a AF20mm f2.8 Nikkor and an old AF70-210 f4 Nikkor or newer AF70-210 f4.5-5.6D Nikkor (all using 62mm filters) and you have a very versatile travel package for film shooters.My only complaint has to do with the recent addition of a Nikon D100 to my collection of bodies.  The 1.5 multiplication factor of the sensor makes this effectivly a 42-157mm zoom on that body.  Consequently, for the digital shooter who "sees" wide this becomes an unattractive range. If, on the other hand, you, like me, "see" better at longer focal lengths, you now have a "normal" to medium tele zoom with a macro capability.  In addition, since the digital sensor only uses the center of the lenses projected circle - this lens in digital is as sharp as my AF180 f2.8 Nikkor prime on film.For my way of shooting these are acceptable compromises</review_text>
This camera is execellent and beautiful crystal picture and sperverb stereo/surrand sound makes this camera one of the best.</review_text>
This is a great starter camera if you are thinking about getting into videograghy. This camera will give you the pro look, but it seems to be just a consumer level camera in a pro package. quality seems to be very good however, I have only shot a few hrs of tape so far. if you can come up with an extra $1000 seriously consider a different camera that really is on the pro level</review_text>
Compre la DVC7 hace ya poco mas de un ao en Amazon. La compre porque mi esposa estudio la carrera y estaba interesada en tener sus propios negocios en el tema de video digital.Voy a separar el review en varios temas que me parecen fundamentales:Calidad de ImagenLa camara tiene 1CCD de 1/3 sino me equivoco, lo cual la hace medianamente aceptable entre las camaras de tipo consumer, OJO, no hablo de las Semi pro o Pro. Sin embargo, tiene un calidad de imagen impresioante en ambientes de iluminacion controlada. Si vas  a usarla en ambiente oscuros, encontraras algunas cosas que te sorprenderan si no estas familiarizado con las camaras profesionales. En conclusion, si la vas a usar en situaciones de iluminacion razonable, te ira de las mil maravillas (tengo unas imagenes excelentes filmadas con esta camara)ConstruccionEl formato de la camara es grande, tipo camara profesional, lo que la hace relativamente impresionante a primera vista. Digamos que el 99% de las personas que te vean con esta camara pensaran qeu definitivamente sabes lo que haces... La camara es basicamente plastica, y no pesa mucho, apenas 3 kilos. No pretendas usarla con una Glidecam sin el soporte de cuerpo, simplemente sera imposible de cargar. El viewfinder me parece muy pequeno, y no es adaptable para usar con el ojo izquierdo. La pantalla LCD mide 2.5, no me parecia pequenna hast que compre otra camara, una sony con pantalla de 3.5 se ve inmensa!, pero la de la panasonic se ve muy bien tambien.Ubicacion de ControlesLa camara peude ser utilizada al hombro, tipo camarografo de tv, o con el asa para mano, en ambos sitios, tiene control de grabacion y zoom. El zoom del asa es mas suave y lento que el zoom en la parte del handgrip. Algo que me encanta y me resulta super util cuando fimamos eventos largos donde no puede haber edicion, es la posibilidad de hacer fade sin la necesidad de estar grabando (ideal para cuando usas la camara con salida directa sin usar cassettes). Por lo demas, los controles son faciles y rapidos de comprender yy utilizar.Ventajas contra otras camarasSi quieres utilizar funciones ed Pros sin ser uno de ellos, pero aprender en el camino, esta camara es para ti. Tiene control de foco con un ring en la parte delantera, entrada plug de microfono, salida de audifonos, control de volumen de grabacion, ganancia, etc, control de shutter, de ganancia (basico en situaciones super oscuras), control de white balance, etc.Problemas ocurridosDespues de unos meses tuve que enviarla a soporte tecnico por un problema medio extranno, se colgaba y n queria grabar, aparentemente era u problema con unas piezas, investigue en internet y aparentemente a nadie mas le sucedio, por lo que asumo qeu fue mala suerte y n un problema con estas camaras. Otro detalle fue medio anno despues, durante un evento en un hotel, aparentemente no le fue bien con el aire acondicionado, ya que me saco un mensaje de Condensacion luego de varias horas de uso, un poco de ventilacion y continuo en el trabajo sin problemas.Impacto VisualDefinitivamente se ve bien, tiene el peso correcto si quieres ahcer tomas suaves, no es muy pesada como para que no la opere una mujer, y no es muy liviana para que se mueva con cualqueir pequenna reaccion de tu mano.A los clientes siempre les llama la atencion el aspecto de esta camara, lo cuale s muy bueno cuando de negocios se trata.Manejo en la PCSe conecta sin problemas, la utilizo para bajar y subir video en formato DV con premiere, studio, etc.En conclusion, si no quieres gastar en una sony de 3ccd o una canon tipo xl2 o similar, y quieres tomartelo con calma, esta es una buena opcion, no te va a defraudar</review_text>
If you are looking for an extreame camcorder this is the one. i use it for all my extrame adventures to italy and venice etc. i highly recomend this to advanced users. his is the 5th camcorder i own. it produces great playback and the sound is amazing</review_text>
A lot softer than I thought it was going to be but very nice.  Does the job very well</review_text>
case is too small looks bigger on web,  I returned the product</review_text>
The fit of the semi hard case is perfect and is easily removed when using the camera</review_text>
not a bad case, but not worth the money.  your pocket works just as well</review_text>
Feels like it's made of cardboard?  Nonsense!!  The structure is made of very rigid plastic panels covered with some kind of synthetic material that is textured to - - supposedly - - look like the surface of the camera.  The camera barely fits into the case - - but this is a good thing, because it keeps the small size of the camera intact.  Overpriced?  All of Sony's accessories are always overpriced; get over it.  If you buy this camera - - which I recommend - - then you need this case</review_text>
I just recently bought the sony DSC-M1 camera and absolutely love it. Since then, I was looking for a nice case to store it in. For $10-20 you can get a full blown padded camera case with all sorts of pockets, zippers, straps and what-not.The thing is, a big point about this camera, is just how small and portable it is. Stuffing that in a generic camera case does as much as triples the size of it.Thats where this case comes in. Its probably one of the cheapest feeling (and looking) cases I've seen. Essentially it feels as though its made of cardboard (with a very thing layer of polyester wrapped around it), honestly, it feels like this case cost sony about 2 cents to make, and that is no joke.So why the heck did I give this 4 stars?Well, it works great for what its designed for. Its a great fit, so adds almost NO extra size to the already tiny camera (A huge plus), has a belt loop, as well as a metal ring.. This is nice as it lets you connect it to your pants and very easily slide the camera in or out.. Other cases have you stumblings trying to squeeze a camera in there.I would've liked SOME additional compartment for it (2nd battery or additional Memory Stick)Finally, this camera does fully enclose the camera. Both the upper left and right sides of the camera are fully exposed.So again, with those additional problems, why the heck am I giving it 4 stars?Simply, It works.Its way too much money for what you get, and you're really only paying for the SONY name on the packaging. But its the best case out there for the M1. If you spent $600 on the camera like myself, you can spend $30 on a real good case for it.If you want an all-in-one case, by all means get one of the generic branded ones, You'll get a lot more functionality for a lot less. If you're looking for a 'perfect fit' designed specifically for this camera, and one designed to keep it the same exact size, get this</review_text>
This case fits the camera like a glove!  It looks nice and protects it - and is an accessory you should get with this camera!</review_text>
I just got this camera for Christmas and have already taken tons of pictures and used the video feature several times. Its small design is a great feature, is great for students, and the styling is absolutely adorable. My two complaints are:1. The LCD screen shows black for what most would think of as of a well lit room. Indicating that the need for flash may be more prominent than on other cameras.2. The camera is not, by any means, self explanatory.I have an absolute phobia of manuals and guides, so when I first got the camera out of the box, I can say only that I was amazed at the many functions that can be fit into only 1 button. If you, like me, have a fear of manuals, either do not buy this camera or get a trained professional (or the closest person near you) to help you figure the camera out. One day at a time, my brothers and sisters. One day at a time</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my sixteen year old niece.  It's only a 3.2MP so the picture quality isn't as good as a 5.0MP, however, 3.2MP is above average quality.  This is a great starter camera for a young person or teenager.  It's compact, has easy to use menu items, and a cool charger base.  The batteries run out a little too fast but so do the ones in my expensive 5.0MP camera.  It's the nature of the beast...The person who wrote the review about the pictures being to dark didn't turn on the flash.  The flash must be turned on in low light.  If they had read the directions, they would have figured that out.  Once the flash is turned on the pictures come out perfect.Don't hesitate to buy this affordable camera for someone as a starter.  It is a great device.I gave this "4" stars because of the price, features, and slim body.  I thought "5" stars was too high because it is not for a serious picture taker, it's a great "first" camera.</review_text>
Works well!tested it first like the directions say watching out for stray hairs, dirt, etc.Then took it too the pool, works perfect....Dont be concerned with the few super tiny bubbles that come out at first, they hide on the seal and in the wrist strap. I was overly cautious.Best $6 UW housing I'll ever find</review_text>
When I bought my Evolt E-500 it came with a genuine Olympus battery, and I bought a knockoff to use as a hot spare. Admittedly they are new and performance will degrade over time, but in identical conditions the genuine Olympus lasts up to 500 pictures and the knockoff barely 300. I bought a second Olympus battery and have more confidence going out into the field</review_text>
This is a battery I use in my E-Volt 500. I've been impressed that I've never needed to change it in mid-session. What more is there to say? It's a battery that's reliable and does the job well</review_text>
Items deilivered very fast ( 3 days instead of 5 to 9 days as stated</review_text>
I knew that I would need a backup battery for my Olympus E500. This is identical to the battery supplied with the camera. I wanted to use an Olympus battery after reading some BAD reviews of knockoff replacements. The battery seems to have plenty of reserve power even though the E500 has a full color display that does all functions instead of the 2 displays that most dSLR have (one usually is a low power LCD display for exposure settings). I only have long term experience with NiMH batteries with a point-n-shoot so I really can't make a final review of the longevity of Lithium-Ion batteries. Laptops seem to lose holding power over time. So far I'm happy, but if something goes bad, I'll update my revie</review_text>
I purchased two secondary brand batteries for my Olympus C5060 camera. The price was very good and I thought I was getting a good deal. These batteries lasted one month and then started to indicate low battery after two shots.I have purchased an Olympus BLM-01 and I am getting very good performance.Beware sometimes the deal that looks too good to be true usually isn'</review_text>
This battery shoots and shoots and shoots! I used it for ten days of faily heavy shooting and it was up to the challenge. It's much, much better than buying alkaline batteries</review_text>
GREAT product, and even better for the price!!  I'm thrilled with the quality and the ease of use.  I love it!  Great for birding, and recommend very highly !!</review_text>
I bought these for bird watching in the yard. The focus on them is a little stiff but I see as well with them as any other binoculars I have used. Overall they seem a good product for the money</review_text>
I bought this so we could get a better look at the birds in our backyard.  We keep it by the kitchen window, and find ourselves using it at least once a week to peek at a feathered friend who is visiting.  Nice clear lens, pretty easy to find objects through them.  Certainly does the job we need it to do.  Don't buy this if you do your birding out in the field - these are not particularly portable nor leightweight and are not meant to be; buy a binocular specifically made for that purpose.Only complaint, and it is minor, is that I find the lens caps to be flimsy and a little hard to use.  We generally just keep them off</review_text>
1. I ordered this very close to Christmas. The data said there would be a three to five business day  delay. The binoculars were mailed out the next day. I recieved notice of the mailing and they arrived in time for Christmas. I am very impressed.2. They were shipped carefully and arrived in good shape</review_text>
These glasses should not have the Bushnell name on them, which misleads one to think they are good quality. I bought them for my son, and by the time I got around to sending them, I discovered that the plastic housing was cracked where the front lens screws in, so the lens was misaligned. It was past the 30-day return date, so I glued the crack and kept them for my own use. They are still not right, but I keep them in my car for occasional use. My advice -- spend some extra money and get a good pair.</review_text>
This set of binoculars performs as it said it would, and was a fantastic purchase for the price</review_text>
I recently went to New York and found it quiet amazing to watch things from Empire State building. It does not have that adjustability but than that is mentioned in the product description. For the price it goes for it is definitely a very good product</review_text>
We had a bushnell that finally wore out after twenty years, and tech out paced it. I bought a pair of glasses from another vendor, and these. This is a superior set. Easy to adjust, powerful, in fact too powerful for our backyard feeders, we use the compact pair for the yard, and save this for the beach and bird walks. Bushnells are not super compact, but the compact 8 x40 model I bought is going on Ebay this week.good buy, should last another twenty years.If you are a new birder,keep it simple, buy these and several birdbooks, have fun</review_text>
I have bought a few binoculars in the past couple of years. And have been satisfied with only a couple.  These binoculars I am very pleased with. The clarity is very good and the price is terrific.  I have wasted alot of money on some not so good Bushnell binoculars. But this pair was a pleasant surprise</review_text>
This was exactly what I was looking for- a small point and scoot camera with a good zoom.  It can be a little tricky to use but once you get used to it it's great.</review_text>
This camera packs surprising punch in a little package. The "pause" in the zoom doesn't bother me at all. However, I do with the video quality was a bit better. Then again, if I want to take a lot of videos, maybe I should go buy a video camera..</review_text>
Seldom have I bought anything that fulfilled my expectations to the extent that this Kodak V610 has. From the simplicity of it's menu and buttons, it's many modes for shooting a person can master the controls in one sitting with a bit of experimentation.With a 2 gig SD card you can get 1056 pics at full resolution or 56 minutes of TV quality video with sound. The stitch panarama mode is effortless and fun. Would be great for scenics and real estate work.I most like it"s portability which fulfills the first rule of photography,"BRING CAMERA WITH".It fits easily in any pocket.Like any light weight Camera it is impossible to hold steady for long telephoto shots which a 10x optical and 4X digital allows. However that is fixed with a tripod. The steady shot in video mode does however work quite well.Pictures are crisp and color clean, great pics! Also love the large clear LCD monitor with framing grid allowing me to look professional at taking shots. So many good things built in that I could get writers cramp extolling it"s virtues, so I will end by saying that I am way more than pleased with my new Camera.</review_text>
The original piece that I lost and this is the replacement, was cordless, which I prefer.</review_text>
Ok for someone on the go who doesn't have an extra usb port on their laptop to spare. At forty dollars it's a bit expensive but what can I say, it works</review_text>
I love having the large number of photos available. Of course Amazon's customer service is excellent. Even the free shipping is very quick</review_text>
The Kodak color cartridge and paper for Easy Share Photo Printer which I purchased is a great product and a great bargain.  The convenience of being able to make my own prints on my Kodak Easy Share Photo Printer is perfect for me.  I take lots of digital prints and sometimes I want to make prints that I can immediately share with my friends and family.  Even though the cost of each print may be a little higher than you would pay at a drugstore or online printing service, the results are much better.  Since I love to take pictures and I enjoy enhancing them and printing them myself, this is the perfect product for me.  You can enhance your photographs on your computer and then print them on the Kodak Easy Share Photo Printer.  The quality of the prints on the Kodak thermal print system is absolutely incredible.  Everyone that I have share prints with remarks how great the photos look.  All in all, the Kodak PH160 Color Cartridge & Photo Paper Kit has been a great deal for me</review_text>
The package was a real money saver-almost half the cost of what I could buy it for at Office Depot or even WalMart.  It arrived within 5 days right to my doorstep! Also no shipping charges which is a real bonus for those of us living in Hawaii</review_text>
Two years ago for Christmas, my husband gave me the Kodak EasyShare Photo Printer.  I absolutely love it.  (FYI - You don't have to have a Kodak camera to use this printer. I have a Fuji.)My first big print was photo Christmas cards.  I took a fun, casual photo of the kids that I liked better than anything I'd ever had done at a store's photography studio.  I could print out as many photo cards as I wanted, and the cost was much, much less than what it would have cost me for "professional" Christmas cards.  I made my own Christmas photo again this year!For time purposes alone, it saves me time spent running to & from the store every time I take some photos.  (Which is often.)  Not to mention the considerable amount of time I used to spend standing in line.For convenience sake, it's a no-brainer.  For example, I was putting together a portfolio for a last-minute homeschool evaluation and needed a photo or two to highlight my daughter's progress.  All I had to do was turn on my EasyShare printer and press "print."I'm getting ready to put together a photo display for my son's wedding.  How nice to browse through my collection of photos, scan the older non-digital ones I want and print them as I need them, or just simply press "print" from my more recent digital collection.No matter when I need a photo, I have the ability to print it immediately.  The quality is wonderful, and fun to watch as it prints out first the yellow, then layers the blue, then the red.  The cartridges and the paper are matched so that when you've printed 40 photos, it's time for a new cartridge.  You always have enough paper for the cartridges; you always have enough cartridges for the paper.After about a year of use, the printer started having trouble grabbing the photo paper.  I contacted Kodak; they gave me instructions on how to clean the printer.  My husband cleaned the printer as per instructions, and it's been working perfectly once again.I always buy the PH160 count cartridge w/paper for my printer.  First of all, because it's LOTS cheaper than the 40 or 80 count.  Secondly, I do a lot of scrapbooking, and I use lots of photos.Buying the Kodak PH160 cartridges w/paper from Amazon saves me big bucks.  Amazon usually has it for much less than retail.  I've checked.  And if you keep an eye on it, Amazon will frequently sell it for MUCH less than retail.  Since this item's cost is over $25, there's no shipping.  And, there's no sales tax.  I guess over the course of owning the printer, I've spent, on average, about 25 cents per photo.  I print what I want, when I want it.  A great deal!</review_text>
It is very disappointing to have 40 pages of paper and only be able to print a little over half that number with the cartridge that comes with it. I now have three unopened packages of paper that I have no cartridge for. I think we should be able to buy just the cartridge when we need to. It sure would be nice. That is why I am only rating one star. Otherwise, it would have been a five....  Thanks, Marsh</review_text>
This is obviously made to work with Kodak-branded printer docks and camera docks, so don't buy this paper package if you don't own one or the other.That being said, I STRONGLY recommend getting this 160 package instead of the smaller packages because A) it ends up being MUCH cheaper when you consider how many more pieces of photo paper and ink you get, and B) even if you don't print a lot, you'll use them all up sooner or later. It's not like they expire, right?And considering you get free shipping and no sales tax if you order it from Amazon, than the several-dollars-cheaper-than-Best-Buy price sounds even sweeter!</review_text>
I would have given this 5 stars if the info on the Amazon/Kodak website had been a little clearer about the batteries. This camera dock will not charge "rechargeable" batteries. You will have to buy a recharger. The website says the dock can be used for recharging your camera but nowhere in the documentation that came with the camera does it say anything about recharging on the dock. I think this is mis-information, but we love the camera anyway and it takes great pictures. The printer prints excellent prints also</review_text>
Excellent product with a great value for the price.Product is easy to use and the photo quality is great</review_text>
The Harness is great. There is no strain on my neck. It felt great</review_text>
This is a decent, pretty standard bino harness.  If you're still using the neck strap, the benefits of the harness are that you don't have a sore neck at the end of the day, your binos don't bounce and swing on your chest as you walk or do other activities, and it slightly stabilizes your grip while viewing.  The harness is highly superior to the neck strap!!!Down sides of this model:  The quick-release clasps are actually a little tricky to unclasp.  Maybe this is a good thing if you have super-expensive binos, but I find it a little frustrating.  Also, the plastic strap-junction pieces aren't designed quite as ergonomically as they could be.  There's a big "Nikon" logo on the back that I wish wasn't there.  But if you find it for a competitive price, go for it.Another downside: The bino harness makes you look like you're some tool thinking he's tough because he's wearing a pseudo-gun-holster (ie Gareth Keenan's cell phone holster in "The Office").</review_text>
Just came back from Orlando vacation with it.  I am very impressed with the video and still picture quality.  As a non-pro consumer, I think it is a perfect product</review_text>
Pros:1. Great video quality in good to great light. Colors are "punchy".2. Doubles as a still camera. Even though the still quality is not great, it could still come in handy.3. Down-conversion to standard definition seems pretty good. Can easily record hi-def to DVD using a down-converted digital connection from the camera to a DVD recorder.4. Handling seems good. The size of the camera is fairly small. It's amazing what they can pack into things of this size.5. Uses HDV format on MiniDV tapes.Cons:1. USB interface is not USB 2.0! This is 2007! Downloading still photos takes much longer than it should. I don't intend to buy a proprietary memory card reader.2. Uses Sony proprietary memory.3. Still camera functions are mediocre. Probably equivalent to today's $200 and less digital still cameras. I have a Canon 20D digital SLR and the difference is quite clear! The Sony still photos are noisier and just not as good looking. The flash photos in low light are poor to fair.4. Don't like the menu system. Seems harder to use than it should be.Neutrals:1. Fair battery life with the included battery.2. Video quality in low-light could be better, but it's not poor. I'd say it is fair.3. Audio is good but it picks up the camera's motor noise and that can be a bit annoying. It does have a MIC jack though</review_text>
What a great camcorder! The resolution is excellent and the 6MP pictures are sharp and clear. This is one camcorder that really does an excellent job as a combination camera/ camcorder. Motion artifacts are minimal and the colors are bright even in dim light. All in all, an excellent buy</review_text>
I got an HC7 a couple of weeks ago and am really impressed with the image quality. I originally tried the Sony HDR-SR1 but was put off by its dismal low-light performance. The HC7 is much better on that front. Color tends to wash out a bit, but noise is not overly prounounced. However, in bright outdoor lighting, the picture quality is absolutely stunning.In regards to photos taken by the HC7, I haven't printed any out yet, but I've viewed some on my 1080p and they look very good.Overall, I am a happy camper. Perhaps unfairly, I gave this a 4 star only because it lacks 3 CCDs.</review_text>
This product, so far as I know, has not been available from Amazon since Jan. 8 as a comment claimed.  It wasn't available on Feb. 19 when I ordered it from an Amazon competitor.  It's now available (about March 1) at a very competitive price.It is a fabulous video camera.  Colors are accurate, low-light performance is amazing, video noise is non-existent, resolution will blow you away.  The 2-hr battery provides a full 2 hours of recording.  The camera is light, flexible, and intuitive to use.The Sony miniDV tapes cost a reasonable $10 ea., and there are zero dropouts.  Loading couldn't be easier.  It'd be nice if Sony would stick to optical zoom specs (10X), since digital zoom can be anything (why stop at 20X? - go for broke, 1000X!  Idiots.)  Steadycam - optical stablization - seems to work very well.  You can shut it off if you're using a tripod.Audio is okay, but it could be much better.  They provide a jack for an external mike and a powered shoe for a lamp.  Video output is flexible - USB, iLink, component, S-video.  Speaking of flexible, the user guide runs over 100 pages!  There is useful content on every page - it'd take months to try all the options available!Image quality is stunning, esp. considering the reasonable price.  I've not tried the included software, but HDMI playback to my Panasonic 50" plasma is just like network HD!  Fantastic!  You won't be disappointed.  (Okay, there is one little glitch.  The zoom speed (rate) is not menu adjustable.  There's variable zoom speed provided via a little lever, but you'd better be  r e a l l y  steady.)Great camera overall</review_text>
I received the Sony HDR-HC7 over two weeks ago.  This HD camcorder is the 3rd and final piece of my HD makeover.  The first component is the Sony KDS-R60XBR2 1080p TV, the second is a PS3, and now the new camcorder.  One thing I noticed immediately upon playing my older home-made DV videos is that the big screen really amplifies the lower resolution (which is bad), and that the hand jitter of the home movies is more problematic as well to look at.  Both of these deficiencies prompted me to go for this HD camcorder with optical stabilization.  Impressions after using this camcorder in different locations (snow, indoor, and the beach):Pros--  The video is great, especially filling the 60 inch screen.  The images look smooth, not always necessarily eye-popping sharp, but very pleasing.  The clip of an arcade at the beach with its many sounds and especially the many bright colors made for a very rich video experience on the big screen.-  The still images are excellent.  At 6.1 Megapixels, they are as good as any 6 MP still camera (I did the comparison).  My test for still cameras is to print 8x10 glossies.  When you do that, it is easy to judge excellent, good, and not-so-good.  The 8x10 prints are excellent.  Moreover, the camera has a 10x optical zoom, so that is a major advantage for still photography.  The flash is surprisingly robust- better than most smaller still cameras.  This camcorder truly opens up the possibility of leaving the still camera at home.-  The DV tape is a cost-effective convenience.  I popped in a standard Sony Premium DV tape and everything's been fine.  So far, I've not seen any evidence of frame dropping after 1 hour of HD videotaping.  Everything has been smooth and very eye-pleasing.  I carefully considered the other alternatives of HDD and DVD burners, but for overall ease-of-use, the DV is a proven cost-effective way to take a lot of videos and to store them conveniently.-  Sony offers a case for underwater video (Sony Camcorder Marine Case (SPK-HCB)).  This case which is listed as an accessory offers good value considering that custom camcorder cases can run in excess of $1K.  I bought one and had to custom-adapt a mounting plate because the hole pattern was not quite right.  I used it while it was snowing on the beach and it worked very well (the case has its own stereo microphone).  I'm planning to use it very soon for some snorkeling.  Such underwater home footage should be very cool.  The case really protects the camera from the elements.  The case is surprisingly sophisticated.  For example, it uses a mirror to access the camcorder display.  It turns out that once connected properly, the image on the LCD display is backwards, so that it can be seen correctly when looking at the reflected image in the mirror.  A well thought-out product indeed.Cons--  It is not the most elegant or stylish hardware.-  Does not have a neck strap.-  The audio is not its strong point- nothing bad, but not particularly compelling.-  I like to use the fader feature to separate the different tape segments, but accessing the fade button through the display touch-screen method takes too many strokes.  Once I start to tape, it is bothersome to activate the fader function during taping.-  The on-the-fly stills are in 16:9 widescreen so that the overall resolution on printed paper is not as good as the stand-alone stills which are the standard 4:3.-  Naturally, with a substantial investment in the camcorder unit, comes the additional costs for options such as (1) stand-alone battery charger, (2) extra high-capacity battery, (3) better microphone, and (4) external light source for video and stills.  I already have the external mike (Sony) and the double external light (still and video).  I haven't used these enough yet to provide a proper review.This early camcorder review would not be complete without mentioning the significant value added by using PlayStation 3.  The camcorder video is stored in the DV tape in MPEG2 format.  After recording, I simply transfer the video into my Ulead VideoStudio 10 Plus which handles HDV files.  After that I copy the MPEG2 file into the hard drive of the PS3 using a transportable hard drive.  Roughly speaking, one hour of HD recording takes up 10 GB of memory.  One can then watch the HD video on the big screen using the handy remote ($25) for the PS3 with fast forward and such so that the overall operation is almost as convenient as if you had burned a BluRay DVD.  Also, the fact that the SXRD TV has a 3rd HDMI input in the front makes connecting to the camcorder particularly convenient.  Bottom line- the camcorder is very impressive.  The picture on the 60" screen ranges from very good to eye-popping.  The colors are very rich.  I've primarily covered the basic functions so far but there's more to learn and to explore with this unit.  The coupling of the 1080p TV and the PS3 with the camcorder results in a most enjoyable HD experience.</review_text>
This rechargeable CR-V3 battery was charged and has been working quite well for several photos.  Since I have not used it very long I cannot state how well it will work over an extended period.  So far, it does the photo job well</review_text>
I bought this to use in a Kodak EasyShare digital camera. It works great; however, I noticed the batteries put a 'strain' on the battery compartment on the camera.  The batteries must be a bit too long for the compartment.  Eventually, the compartment closure will break.  Knowing this, I don't know if I would buy this battery again.  Other camera's battery compartment might be a little longer and therefore, not have this problem</review_text>
I had reflex Nikon cameras previously and this is my first digital camera, and im not disappointed.Wonderful quality of the pics, very customizable, lot of options and of course easy to use. Worth the money. 5.1 megapixels are enough and the quality of the photos are superb. The Wi-Fi is a bit more complicated for non-advanced computer users, but works fine if you search through forums and read how to setup.The construction of the camera is solid, very confortable for the hand, but you must have good pulse with your hand or the pics could be distorted, otherwise is an excellent product.</review_text>
i'm in the army and i got this camera as a field camera. i have taken it everywhere with me since then and it has proved to be a very durable camera as well as taking good quality pics and video. I have used it in temps of -30 and 120 and it has worked just fine when other cameras wouldn't. the only reason i'm not giving it five stars is because the wifi feature only works every once in a while. other than that this is a great camera</review_text>
Initially I decided to by this camera for the sake of brand Name. After buying initially I was not happy with the pics I was getting. Then I tried changing settings and change in the quality of snaps was a miracle.I am happy on my decision to buy this camera. Not exactly value for money but is satisfacory</review_text>
I got this for Christmas, I notice the price has dropped a lot since then!Good points:- Nice small size; easy in a pocket, lightweight- easy to use controls.  I like adjusting ISO/flash/WB- automated red eye removal works nicely, as does auto enhance- new lower price (wish we paid that)Less good:- Not sure the pictures are that stellar without editing- shutter lag slower than I expected, particularly with flash- wifi transfer difficult with XP firewall on.  I've updatedthis review.  The Owner's manual under Ports gives 2 settingsto the Windows firewall to allow the camera to use wifiwith the firewall on.  Works great, but may not be forsomeone who doesn't understand these issues.The documentation does not describe this problem, youapparently have to understand the issues.- Must remove battery to charge, flimsy plastic keeping it inthat I'm afraid is going to break.- Picture organizing software not great.  I want to be able todelete photos, and only can from "some" directory viewsof them.  I'd also like to easily lighten/darken and changecolor tinting.  I keep going back to Print Shop poster makingsoftware...I was agonzing over this vs the Canon A610.  I didn't likethe Canon's larger size or 4 AA batteries required.  I suspect the pictures may be better however...</review_text>
I read all these reviews and cannot FOR THE LIFE OF ME understand all the crying and whining about the WiFi mode. I keep hearing how "complicated" and "annoying" it is, but this is just plain WRONG. I actually set my WiFi up yesterday, and do you want to know how long it took me? About a minute. Pop in the setup CD, click "wireless setup only", plug your camera in by the USB cable (you need only do this the first time to set up! The setup CD will give you all the directions, just follow along), install it (takes all of a few seconds), choose your connection mode, name, and icon, and you're DONE. Then unplug the USB cable (you now no longer need it!), rotate the click-wheel at the top of the camera to wifi-mode, click "ok" and VOILA (you'll see the WiFi antenna flash blue). Easy as that, and it will download all of the images in your camera at a fast speed without any wires needed. How in God's name are people making this out to be a big deal?Read your manual and you'll be fine. I did my homework for literally months and ended up choosing this model. I know cameras and this is easily the best deal for the money. Do get familiar with the scene modes, they're absolutely phenomenal and there is something for every shot and angle. Each scene mode has a choice of 3 different effects, which is really nice. The variety of shots you will be able to take is second to none. 5 MP is a perfect compromise for image quality, resolution, and price. Nikon as always is top-rate. Photography is something that seems to run in the family and when my grandfather approved this camera, I knew it was truly great.The screen on this thing is AMAZING. 2.5 inches! The loss of the viewfinder is something you won't even notice, the LCD is a far more accurate tool anyway. Erasing pictures is simple, operating the zoom is a piece of cake, and the Zoom Nikkor lense is one of the best on the market, (along with the SchneiderKreuznach lenses on the Kodaks and the Carl Zeiss lenses on the Sonys). Nothing against Canon's Elph line because they're amazing, but the lense on the Nikon is better and I honestly feel that the Canon models are overpriced. Ever picked up an SD400 or 450? They feel far too tiny and almost flimsy. The SD500 and 550 are a bit better, but there's virtually NOTHING to grip. Trust me, when you want to really focus on a subject and get the perfect shot, the LAST thing you want is not to have a firm enough grip on your camera and have it slip. This also increases the likelihood of dropping it, which is never a good thing! Some complain that the red-eye reducer takes too long. The flash will go off three times in red-eye-eliminator mode, so if you're taking a picture of your dog, turn it OFF, (because the subject will have moved by then). For people though, it will be fine. The P2 comes with great software and it will take all of 5 seconds to remove red-eye manually once uploaded if the time before the final flash goes off bothers you too much. I've heard whining about the P2's size...why? Pick one up if you can look at one in person. They're wondefully compact yet still have a heft to them, and a very substantial hand grip that doubles as the battery casing. It's all metal and beautifully designed, the worksmanship speaks for itself. Nikon is a great choice, and I also recommend Olympus and Kodak (Kodaks are the king of easy-to-use cameras).Even full price for this camera is worth it (400 dollars), though you'll see it advertised from between 250-350, which are very fair prices. You're going to love it, it's a very capable little machine that will take you gorgeous pictures. Nothing is off-limits and there is a scene mode for any situation. I have NO regrets. The rechargable battery is good to have and will save you money. I HIGHLYYYY recommend you purchase LCD screen covers to protect your very-large LCD screen. These can be bought on Ebay in packs of 3 for about 10 dollars with shipping</review_text>
I was looking for a snapshot camera to replace a 1.3MP camera function on a Canon video camera.  The Coolpix P2 is compact, and takes capable pictures in most settings.  Auto red eye reduction works as advertised.  Wifi capability helps reduce wire clutter in transferring images.  I set up an adhoc or peer to peer wifi connection.  I Recommend reading the good techical help section on Nikon's website to help you set it up.  It is found at:  http://support.nikontech.com/.  Screen resolution and size is adequate, if a bit difficult to see under bright outdoors.  A helpful feature I found is the built in "help" function.  If you can't remember what Effect 1 and Effect 2 accomplish under the Party/Indoor setting, the help button will tell you.  Now you don't need to carry around the camera manual.  Facial tones seem natural, landscapes pleasant, with blue skies.  Great snapshot camera.  Prints came out very good to excellent also</review_text>
I can't speak to all the advanced, fancy manual options that some highly advanced photography professionals seem to use to rate cameras.I can say what was most important to me in choosing this camera was:1.  A good flash range for indoor shots beyond 10 feet.2.  A quick focus and reset so that it I can take one or more pictures   quickly without having to wait for the camera to reset.3.  A realtively small size and excellent viewfinder.4.  High quality pictures without huge complexity.This camera is excellent in these areas.  I would hightly recommend this  for someone who wants great pictures from a realatively small camera without spending a ton for advanced features that most people never use (although these features may be available in this camera - Don't know and don't care)</review_text>
This is a good solid camera that if you use it well it will provide you with good pictures. It is a bit heavy compared to other digital compact cameras but it is solid and functional. Easy menu and good lens</review_text>
I did a lot of review of verious camerias prior to purchasing this one.  Expecially comairison reviews from a number of resourcs.  This one floated to the top of the list and though was a little more expensive than I wanted, having used it, it was worth every penny.  The features are far to numerous to note here, but let's just say that the camera is beyond great. What ever complaints that you have about your present digital camera (if you have one), this camer probably solves them.  You will have to read the manul to do most of the super features, but it is well worth it.  To borrow a saying from an old TV add "BUY IT, YOU'LL LIKE IT"</review_text>
Snaps high quality pictures super fast and came with batteries that seem to last forever!  What more could a person want?  It even stores video snips effeciently.  We've had this camera for several months, used it frequently, and love it.My only warning is don't let the batteries run low (ok, so they really don't last FOREVER!).  We have run into problems where we couldn't properly turn the camera off when the batteries were low</review_text>
excellent in all indoor and out door shots. Beautiful and bright LCD panel. Excellent flash and long battery life</review_text>
I was just doing a CR review on digital cameras and decided to add my comments to Amazon (I always check Amazon for reviews of items I'm thinking of purchasing... Thanks Amazon!).I purchased my DSC-W5 a little over a year ago and have been very pleased with it. The main reasons I decided to purchase this camera was its small size and the fact that you could get an underwater housing for it. I've had other underwater cameras but I found this one to be great above and below the water. With the housing being so small you can use it at the beach/pool or the big waterfest, Songkran, in Thailand without worrying about getting it wet.The other things that I've really liked since I purchased it is the manual setting (good for underwater and sun sets) and the ability to use standard AA batteries (this has saved me many times when my rechargeable have gone dead). I have also purchased the zoom lens... It helps the  3X zoom. When using the zoom  you sometimes get the black hole effect on the edges, but you just have to work around it or crop it later. I've thought about the underwater filters but Sony is very proud of them (ie. to expensive). I just use a Photoshop action in Elements called underwater that I got from the Adobe's share site to color correct pix's.The video is good also. I've used it for underwater and the high quality setting gives you a pretty good video even on my 50" HD TV. It does eat up a lot of space on the 1G chip, but what do you want... (may need to order a bigger one if they're now available)Friends of mine have liked my camera so much they've purchased the W7. Another thing I'm hoping is Sony will continue the line so you can purchase accessories in the future (underwater housing, I had an Olympus/5050 with underwater housing, but after a year or so you could not find replacement accessories so I had to buy a new camera (ie. W5).The only con on the camera is the red eyes from the flash being so close to the lens. But then I use Elements to fix that in a jiffy.Other features that would make it even better are (Sony are you listening): More manual settings. I would like it to have the infrared capability of other Sony's. Another feature that would be great and don't understand why companies have not added it would be... time-laps photography using the video or still capability.</review_text>
I've had this camera for two years.  Compared to other cameras I've used, this digital camera is VERY fast.  With only five megapixels, I've managed to take some really fine pictures with amazing detail.  The macro mode is excellent.  This camera is also very durable - I've dropped it at least twice on hard floor but nothing broke.After using it obsessively for two years though (I was literally attached to this camera), the camera lost some of its reliability.  For example, when I'm in the automatic mode, the camera would randomly switch to the review mode for no reason.  Also, when I take pictures using the self-timer, the pictures now sometimes turn out blurry - it doesn't make sense to me because nothing holding the camera is moving (the subject isn't moving either).Also, this camera is rather bulky and heavy compared to some compact digital cameras out in the market today.This camera is a little confusing to use (even with the manual) when trying to control the settings manually.  My photography professor told me that Canon cameras were best for manual picture taking.Nonetheless, I really think I got an excellent use out of this camera for the time I've had it - I'm quite satisfied</review_text>
The camera was an excellent one, it took very high-quality pictures; however, it broke a little more than a year after I bought it, it wouldn't power on for an unknown reason, and it was exactly 14 days out of the one-year warranty! The repair cost is rather expensive: $184. I would rather buy a new one than to send it for repair</review_text>
This is a very consistant and reliable power source. The main function is for microphotography, which involves continued use of the system for 3 or more hours each time</review_text>
I appreciated that they sent the product quickly to us.  It was the right part and worked correctly</review_text>
I have owned the Panasonic FZ7 for 1 year and was excited to purchase the FZ8.  There are so many excellent qualities this camera offers.It is very simple to use for a beginner and offers features to suit a professional.  The preview screen is a perfect size with its bright and vivid colors.  Settings are easy to change,Including: shutter speed, aperture, time and date, changing the focus point, and many other awesome features! The picture quality is awesome, even with the 12x zoom, my prints do not turn out grainy. Nice light weight and easy grip.Now, the dislikes....only one.  This camera does not offer an automatic pop-up flash. I have to remember to open it.I cannot comment on the video of this camera, I use a Sony Handycam for all my video needs.Overall, I would highly recommend this camera and even the FZ7 to anyone interested in starting out with a simple to use camera</review_text>
This camera is wonderful.  For the novice that I am, it's perfect.  The basic mode is very user friendly.  LCD and menus are great.  I purchased this model primarily due to the 12X optical zoom and have not been disappointed.  This model has advanced modes that I hope to master as my digital knowledge grows.  If you're looking for a camera that is  easy to use with excellent features, I highly recommend the DMC-FZ8</review_text>
I have received this camera for serveral weeks. It's a good long zoom digital camera. I can use it for 18x optical zoom when I set its photo size less than 3M EZ. the photo isn't blur as I use image stabilized. The picture is sharp. Image quality is good. However I have to set the ISO at 100 or 200. When the ISO is 400 or above, I can see the noise, and the picture lose detail. But every camera has its own defect. Overall, I am satified with this camera, and I am enjoying using it to take pictures.</review_text>
I just got this last week and the quality of the photos are excellent! The videos are really good as well! No complaints so far. This is perfect for point-and-shoot folks but then the camera features a whole a lot more if you want to get creative. Just be careful in buying SD cards larger than 2Gb, but just make sure the SD card has 'SDHC' stamped on it. I made the mistake of buying a regular 4Gb SD card and it did not work on the camera. Good thing the SD card worked on my Nikon D50. Live and learn</review_text>
Grainy ISO 100 pictures at any light conditions. Usage of 5mp and low sharpness options partially solves the problem, but if you take pictures with Panasonic DMC-FZ7 and compare ... it will be clear that a garbage trash is the right place for this camera.I had Panasonic DMC-FZ7 and the only cons. is really noisy high ISO sensitivity mode.In FZ8 camera Panasonic implemented the Venus III processor (FZ7 has Venus II processor). As a result picture quality really improved at high ISO sensitivity modes but DRAMATICALLY changed for the WORSE in ISO 100 mode</review_text>
I do a lot of hiking and usually carry my DSLR in my backpack, which makes it awkward to take out for pictures.  Since getting this harness my camera is always at the ready and I take 20 times as many shots out on a hike</review_text>
This was by far one of the best purchases I've ever made. I recently had the opportunity to use this product, while elk hunting. I have a full-size set of binos I use for hunting. With the bino harness, I never knew my binos were there. It really takes the weight off you neck. I would recommend this to anyone, 100%.</review_text>
I just bought the Cannon 8X25 IS Binoculars through Amazon. Because of this purchase and the other heavy 35MM cameras I own, I though this shoulder harness might be nice. After comparing similar products I bought this through Amazon's partner Adorama due to its low price, the inclusion of the "metal split rings" and a "micro-fiber lens cleaning cloth" as stated in Amazon's Product Description section. The problem is that neither the rings or cloth came packed with the product. I could return it and spend 50% of what it cost me just do so but that's insane. Since Amazon provided the description, I think they should credit me back something and re-write the description too. The product does seem well made for the money and when I just tried it with my camera and binoculars it seem to perform well.  This is a God send to avoid a sore neck</review_text>
Haven't tried it in windy conditions yet but I like that it's lightweight, easy to transport and extends to 70 inches.  The extra height extension prevents you from stooping over when shooting videos.  Good value, and free shipping (delivered in 5 days to Hawaii - not bad!) from Amazon only makes it better!  Highly recommended</review_text>
This goes up to 5 feet 10 inches, while others go to up to an average of 5 feet. No bending over in an uncomfartable position, tape while staying at your height. Its very sturdy and woth every penny. Compatable,safe,comfartable - You should buy this one</review_text>
I am completely satisfied with the overall value of this camera.  The picture quality is great and it is very easy to use.  The LCD is clean and bright.  The video capture lacks a little, but for the price I don't think you could get any better.</review_text>
This digital camera is awesome. I have no problem with the batteries.  I made sure I put the good batteries in (no cheap ones).  I looked at purchasing a canon and a hp but the features it had on this one was outstanding and for the price.  I purchased this camera with the 1GB card with it.  I can't wait to start using it when I go to San Diego in March.....  Awesome digital camera......  You won't be sorry on this purchase...</review_text>
This camera takes awesome pictures, even at long distances in infinity mode.Just got some pics of a moose 1/2 mile away. The only complaint I have is the battery usage. I've had the camera powered on for probably 20 minutes total, and it shut off due to 'low battery'. Testing the batteries indicated ~80% power left, so I don't know if there's a flaw in the camera's power sensor or what.</review_text>
I got this camera for my daughter for Christmas...it is a great little camera!!  Small enough she can throw it in her purse and go and it takes great pictures.  It has many cool extra little features too...like memo and movie.  Only fault we've found is it does not come with a memory card.  Not a big deal as it does have internal memory, she just went out and got a new memory card to hold extra pictures.  I'd highly recommen</review_text>
I purchased this for my son and he really likes everything about the camera. He loves the quality of pictures.  He did mention the camera has a proprietary cable that hooks to his computer - just an FYI</review_text>
I saw the MAGPIX reviewed in the New York Times and had to have it. Somebody finally came out with a digital photo album that you can actually use like a regular photo album. Best feature is its battery life - I've been using it for about 2 months now and it's still going strong with my orginal 2 AAA batteries. I thought that the screen was going to only be so so- given the price - but the screen is beautiful, colorful, bright, and sharp. I run Windows XP - had no issues</review_text>
I have impressed my friends with my pocket photo album, and referred a few new customers while I was at it. Not only is it great technology which is easy to use, but it slips into your purse or pocket and is a great way to share pictures of your dogs and cats; I make people look at all five of mine. You can also share photos of your kids, your latest trips, or even blackmail photos from the last party you attended. It is also a really cool design and my "artsy" friends like the colors and the fact that it is  tiny</review_text>
I needed a battery for my Sony Camera.  Amazon had the best price on the Sony battery.  However, my search revealed that this Combo which includes the battery is CHEAPER than the battery alone.  Well, that was a no-brainer!  As it turns out, the camera bag is a great item also.  At that time, this was an outstanding deal</review_text>
Get sony bag and battery for the price of a battery at a retail store, plus its delivered to you.  Bag is very well made but could be a tad bigger, plenty of room for camcorder and main accessories but starts getting tight with extra charging units, adaptors, cords, and stuff.</review_text>
My son (he is 21) recently announced that he wanted a telescope for Christmas, so I got on-line to educate myself.  Didn't take too long before my head began spinning!  So, to make a long story short, this is the scope I ended up buying.  My husband immediately set it up and has been having a blast with it! Don't know if my son will really get it now!  I definately recommend that you buy the accessory kit with it also. I really enjoyed coming home from work today and looking at all the craters on the moon</review_text>
I recently purchased this scope from amazon.  I read many reviews and suggestions and decided to go with the Firstscope 114 because it seemed to be the most scope I could get for the least price.  I considered some cheaper models with the same features, but I'm glad I chose this one because the differences in quality would have ruined my experience.  It took about 2 weeks to receive my scope from Amazon, but you can't beat free shipping!  The scope was well packaged, the only casualty during shipping was a wingnut on the tripod with a broken wing.  I contacted Celestron, and they immediately sent me another wingnut.  Great customer service!Setup was easy, just follow the instructions.  I had the scope together and was looking at Jupiter the next night (there were clouds the first night).  I live in the city and the lights combined with the humidity make it hard to see any stars with the naked eye in the summer, however the images were crisp and clear through the 10 and 20mm eyepieces and I could see 4 of Jupiter's moons and distinguish the bands crossing its surface.At first I was a little disappointed with the German Equatorial mount.  It seemed very shaky and I had a hard time following objects in the sky.  However, I quickly realized that I had not done a good job of balancing the scope on the mount.  With it properly balanced, the scope's movements were smooth and it was very stable even at high magnification.  I purchased a 5mm Celestron Ultima lens as well and I have been pleased with the images I have seen so far.I would definitely recommend this scope to anyone looking to get into astronomy.  I forsee many more hours and years of enjoyment with my Firstscope</review_text>
I've had this scope for about 4 months now and I have been very pleased with it.  Firstly, I received it in only three days from Amazon.  Secondly, I was genuinely pleased that all components are made of an alloy or other metal, unlike a particular Meade unit, which I used that had lots of plastic screws and other parts.  Even the tightening screws for the lens mounts and red-dot sight are metal on this Celestron.  The aluminum tripod is quite sturdy and adjustable; good for the little guys and girls that star-gaze too.  The housing tube is black aluminum and sturdy as well.  The red-dot sighter works well, especially when looking at stars/planets with a high-power lens, with less eye relief.  The magnification and clarity of the views are really good.  I've seen the rings of Saturn and Jupiter quite clearly with this scope.  I also purchased the Celestron eyepiece kit that offers additional plossy lens (varying power) and a pretty good set of filters (including a moon filter).  The only down side I can think of would be that the lubricant used by the company for the rotating axis' is quite sticky if you get it on ya.  For the money, you're not going to regret the buy and you'll probably be glad you went with this quality model over lesser ones, that might even cost more.  Celestron has a good product with this one.  Hope this helps some.</review_text>
i thought this is a very good telescope ameratuers but for pros dont by this produc</review_text>
This is the first time that I have had a battery in a camera that I did not think would give out in the middle of my picture taking.  I cannot get over how many pictures I have been able to take without changing the battery.  In fact, I have taken several hundred pictures with my Panasonic DMC-FZ7 and find it to be the most carefree combination.  Charge time is so fast.  I bought an extra battery to be sure I would not run out of power but have found I do not need it but I sure am glad I have it.</review_text>
I purchased this battery for my Panasonic FZ7 and except for a little high price I am very happy with it</review_text>
This is my first experience with this type of battery, and I have been quite pleased.  I took it to Hawaii and was able to shoot all day on one battery</review_text>
I just got back from Maui, it was the first time I had used this case and it worked perfectly. Great pictures snorkling and when it's raining. No problems what so ever</review_text>
The camera exceeded my expectations.  Some people stated in the customer reviews their camera case leaked and ruined the digital camera which made me hesitate to purchase.  I read other people reviews stating you must follow the instructions to ensure a watertight seal and which I made sure I followed.  The camera took some beautiful underwater pictures while I was snorkeling in Hawaii.  I would recommend it to anyone wanting to take some underwater pictures.  My wife only complaint is I took too many underwater pictures and filled the memory card.  Just make sure you follow the directions and you will not run into any problems.</review_text>
The rechargeable batteries are very good and the charger is faster than the manual says. It is always faster than the 3 hours it says</review_text>
We bought this camcorder in 2006, it's perfect for us!  The hard-drive can store many hours of video and the zoom is great!  The 12x zoom is so good that the 1MP still shots can actually look somewhat impressive (but don't get rid of your digital still camera!)  I can't imagine how awesome the 25x zoom must be on the new 2007 models.  The DCR-SR60 is easy to use, so don't worry if you're not very tech savy.  It's simple to transfer video from the hard drive to a PC, and not too tough to burn video onto a DVD with an external DVD burner.  Our only complaint is that it sometimes takes a second or 2 for the color to adjust when the light changes, and the video can look a little funky during those times.  We don't use the camera in dark areas much, so we've been happy with the overall performance</review_text>
I bought this camera directly from the sony store paid $650 on March 7, 2007.  Amazon was selling it for $350 more than what i paid for it.  Buy direct from Sony and save.  The guy at the counter tried pressure me to buy the extended warranty, i declined.  Sale guys make more money selling equipment warranty then the camera itself.  Camera works great, i also bought the $20 stand which i use for my sony digital stills camera.  You can't go wrong with this product.Bira RaiBiraRa</review_text>
I have used an older Sony 8mm camcorder for years.  Nothing digital about it.  Transferring tapes to my PC involved a third party converter.  I had graduation to go to the next day that I really wanted better quality video of.  I looked at the other brands and decided Sony had done me well for years.  I liked the features.  The hard drive made purchasing and carrying media go away.  The camcorder has a more powerful zoom than my old one.  The picture quality is great.  Battery life is outstanding.  16.9 is great.  Moving video to my PC is amazingly fast.  After my purchase I saw Sony has a new model DCR-SR82 available soon.  It has more zoom and can use memory cards.  There is a limit to the amount of zoom you can use.  At 800x it's still hard to keep the picture steady with a tripod.  The 82 I think has 1000x.  I haven't found a lot places to use that much zoom.  I was able to get clear up close video of the people speaking at the graduation across a large auditorium with about half the zoom this unit has.  The sound was great too.  There was a sound system in the auditorium.  I have no regrets buying this camcorder.  If you intend to record for more than an hour and a half at one event get the larger model 90 something battery and use the one that comes with the unit as your backup.  There is the auto settings and then, for the more qualified, many manual settings.  There is an infra-red setting for low light video.  My final answer; buy this camcorder</review_text>
As a first time video camera owner I found this camera simple to use and intuitive.  I turned it on out of the box and just started to use it without needing to read any instructions.  Simple</review_text>
No need convert anymore.  You can just hook up the usb cable and drag the clips from camcorder to comoputer.  Save lots of time</review_text>
This camera has been great. I haven't used it to much but the times that I have its been really nice, the quality of the movies are really good. I also liked that I didn't need any tapes. That would have been a big hassle. The main reason this camera was purchased was because I was getting married and it did the job quite well. I would recommend if you doing any outside filming that need sound of other people to get a microphone. I received one free from amazon when I bought the camera. It was made by Sony for the camera. I would recommend this camera to other people.</review_text>
I had such a hard time choosing the right hard drive camcorder! According to most of the comments on the web all HD camcorders are of poor quality, or have software problems or something else. So i had to decide myself at the end and I converged on this one, which was a great pick, so easy to use, of incredible quality, and so far no problems with burning the DVDs! Slight compatibility problems between the existing burning software present on my laptop and the Sony software... But once solved, I love it and I love the touchscreen! I got the whole package with an extra battery, but I still haven't used it! The battery lasts pretty long.</review_text>
If you want an easy to use camera just to do the basics, this one is great.  It's lightweight, and the one touch DVD burn is a really nice feature.  The image quality seems fine-no complaints so far</review_text>
The camcorder is great.  Good picture quality, easy to use, organizes your videos by date, easy to play back on TV, and remote makes it very convenient.  Battery life is fairly good, but you may want a spare if you'll be recording for more than a couple hours at a time.  I can record the highlights of an all day family outing and still have battery to spare.The software really falls short, I wish it were half as user friendly as the camcorder.  It doesn't organize your videos as well as the camcorder, and the DVD creation is confusing and rather limited.  The software documentation is also limited, confusing, and not always accurate</review_text>
This is a great case that protects my DSCL1 very well.  Nice and compact, not bulky at all and fits perfectly!  The leather is soft but it is hard enough to withstand impact.  The only reason I give it 4 stars instead of 5 is that it doesn't have a pocket for memory sticks</review_text>
I was looking for a case to protect my Sony DSC-L1. Local sales representatives kept reccomending the universal case for Cybershots, but the L1 was too small and kept moving around in the cases they showed me. Low and behold, I found this Carying Case from Sony. Don't be fooled by the name of the case. The material that it is made of is stiff and maintains its shape. The camera slips in nicely, and the case does not add much to its size. I don't use the belt loop. I place the camera in the case and place it in either my pocket or bag. I find that there is less dust on the camera. I feel safe now that my camera is in the Sony LCS-LA Soft Leather Carrying Case</review_text>
- Stiff attractive leather case contours the camera perfectly and protects it against knocks and scratches to the LCD screen.- Includes a belt loop.- When attached to belt, the camera slides into case like a gun slides into a holster. A stiff leather strap wraps itself over the top and snaps in place. Therefore there is a small gap at the top- so you probably don't want to have this out in the rain</review_text>
I bought last year's model of the Canon ELPH series because it has a CF card rather than an SD card. When I needed an extra battery, I found that for a genuine Canon battery, this kit was cheaper than just the battery alone. The small leather case is nice too, and you get the large handbag case for free as well.Throw in Amazon's super saver shiping, and this deal can't be beat. Just make sure this is the right accessory kit for your camera. It doesn't fit the current models</review_text>
I needed a new Canon NB-1LH battery for my Elph S500, because I lost mine. Not because it wore out or was performing badly.Having learned my lesson about purchasing the inexpensive generic camera batteries (NB-1LH), I found that a Canon battery would cost $42.99.With this kit for only six dollars more, I got the Canon battery I needed as well as a lovely protective leather pouch and a camera bag, with lots of zippered, velcroed, or clipped compartments and a nice long, adjustable strap.Two cameras will easily fit in the bag, as well as a charger, extra batteries, cables, maps, passport, wallet, and other small travelling accessories.You'll definitely see me with my new camera bag on my next trip, slung diagonally across my shoulder, as I'm riding on the back of a motorino. Ciao</review_text>
The camera accessory kit is perfect for the S230 because it didn't come with a camera case and the Elph models are so small, this kit provides the kind of protection this little camera needs. It comes with a smaller leather case for the camera itself and then a large purse-like carrier with lots of pockets and zipper pouches. It's a thin case, not too bullky, with soft interior pockets for storage of cords, user manuals, and there is lots of room for other stuff too. The battery that comes with it is useful because I have had the battery that came with the s2300 for about a year or so and it takes longer and longer to charge up.</review_text>
The local retail shops had it for $69.99.  So I saved $10 and shipping.  Includes a battery, leather case (which can be strapped to your belt), and a carrying case for all the accessories.Only gripe was with US Postal Service.  They're just inept.  They attempted to deliver to a business on a Saturday (when they weren't open) and couldn't redeliver till the following Friday.  Next time I'll pay a few bucks extra to get the professionals (UPS, FedEx, etc.) to deliver</review_text>
What and awesome deal!! An absolute must have!! Don't leave home without it!! The perfect accessory kit!! Build quality is Five Stars all the way. Metal parts, extra padding, great access to many compartments large and small. Kit also included a nice leather case for the camera body, not the nylon case shown in the Amazon ad. The camera and I are totally stoked. The pack even had room left over for a small tripod, the AC charger, 12Volt car charge, my 7x42 Zeiss binoculars, Sony Clie PDA, Apple iPod and Delorme GPS. WOW, I'm set!</review_text>
I am extremely satisfied with this product.  It was recommended that I get a significantly more expensive device than this one for the purpose I wanted to use it for.  I saved myself a great deal of expense as the product works perfectly for the function that I purchased it for.  This device is extremely compact, but has a large highly visiable screen</review_text>
Gift for husband.  Uses it for work.  He carries it with him everywhere.Photos are taken for reference, not for high-end photo duplication.Video is very helpful.Pleased with quality</review_text>
The binocs are really nice and sharp, but you can purchase just as good for less.The eye pieces were difficult to get used to, but for viewing I really like them.Camera is absolutely disappointing.I have not taken the first clear image. The shutter is at the top and makes taking a photo quite awkward for someone with small hands.I tried different cards, in case the write speed was blurring the image.No difference in quality. I used a prop and snapped a photo, and image was still unclear. Played around with settings and still no good results.I would not recommend this as a camera AT ALL.To help with your decision, please view submitted photo. If your needs require better clarity than the submitted photo, think again. This was taken at noon on a cloudy day. 3 Megapixels. Please identify the bird inside the airbrushed red circle.So, for example: if you're searching for an Ivory Billed Woodpecker, you'd better choose more wisely - cause there's no way anyone at Cornell is going to accept this as scientific proof.Bird in photo is a Red Bellied Woodpecker, which is approx. 9". I am about 70 - 80 feet away. 66 ft is minimum focal distance.Hope this helps.</review_text>
I have used this product for a few months now.  I like the fact that it uses SD card technology. I simply remove the card and can read the pictures from my card reader.  Used it at college football game last weekend and it worked great.  I could see close ups of the players and even take some action pictures.  It will take a little practice to keep the action shots from blurring but they appear to be working fine.  Shots of the band are nice and clear. It would be nice if you could see the actual picture you are taking but that is probably taking the technolgy to a place this price point won't allow.I also like the way they have a knob that adjusts between people shots and distance shots.  Still experimenting to see when to use which adjustment.Quality has been fine and they appear to be sturdy and waterproof which can be a help when working with them outdoors where binoculars are really designed to be used.I'll grant that the camera is probably not one that a professional photographer would like but for the price to get the binoculars and the camera together they are a good product  and a good bargain</review_text>
Pros: great price and compact.  it powers up quickly and is ready for to catch that quick shot. Touch screen menu works great (see cons)Cons: did not come with a mem card(but who would expect that).  Touch screen works gets dirty and since it is also your lcd i found that i had to clean it often.I have shot mainly outdoors and the video is great, indoors there is added noise, but what do you expect...its a $350 camera.</review_text>
The DC-HC48 is a great camera very nicely sized and easy to use. I chose this version instead of the HC38 due to the support for stills and the improved CCD.The picture quality in good light is great. I actually displayed it on my 60 inch TV and the picture was as good as normal television. I was very impressed with the picture. It was also nice how easy it was to switch aspect rations to either 16:9 (wide-screen) to 4:3 (standard). However as it got darker outside and the light got lower inside I notice much of the "color" from the picture began to fade and the picture became somewhat mono-tone. This seems to be a common complaint for cameras in this price range with low-light.I took the camera into a dark room (I couldn't see a thing) I turned on the night mode and was very impressed. People and things showed up great in the pitch black. The IR light emitted by the camera was picked up nicely and acted like an flashlight that only the camera would pick up. The subject had to be 5-10 feet away and of course the image was best in the center. The effect was very much like Survivor's night shots, or the Blair Witch Project.The camera has two modes of operation. Normal node , which allows you to custom set settings like set Focus, Exposure, White Balance, or Effects like Old Film etc or set the settings to Auto. And Easy mode, which lets you basically turn beeping on and off and leaves all settings set to Auto.The issue I found is in Easy mode the Still Pictures did not work. Also you have to stop recording to switch between Easy and Normal mode. The still photos are a fine quality for considering its a 1 Mega-Pixel camera. I wouldn't recommend using this as your primary still photo camera though its nice to have the option.The touch screen I found to be somewhat cumbersome since you have to scroll through looking for the choices that you want. So if you want to make a setting change quickly and if you are unfamiliar with the camera it might take a while to find. I also tend to shake the camera some when I use the touchscreen. A nice feature is that you can create your own custom activity list so settings you set frequently are more accessible then those you don't use.Where I was most disappointed was with the accessories. The standard battery it ships with lasts 1.5 hours, which seems like a reasonable time considering a MiniDV tape only holds 60-90 minutes depending on your setting. But like all batteries the 1.5 is ideal conditions and not real world turning the camera on and off and playing with the features and zooming in and out etc. Additionally the Battery takes an 1 hour and 40 minutes to charge which is surprising. Unfortunately the battery is not the newer ActiForce batteries which charge in approximately 20 minutes (with the actiForce charger).Also to take still photos you'll need to buy a separate Memory Stick Duo card. (Not a Memory Stick, Memory Stick Duo has a smaller form factor). The USB cable that ships with the camera lets you get the Still photos from the camera (attached to the dock) onto your computer. However it does NOT let you get the video. Instead you need a fire-wire cable which is not included. Sony sells this cable for around $40. Belkin makes that  cable for around $12. The fire-wire (i.Link) cable only allows you to download video onto your computer (not the still photos). Again you must be attached to the docking station. If your traveling and wish to download to a computer you'll need to bring the docking station with you (it is pretty small but my be a hassle to bring with you). The docking station is one way to charge the camera or you can connect it to the wall with the supplied cables. Unfortunately there is only one power cable for the dock and the camera so if you plan to just bring the power cable you'll have to disconnect it from the docking station.In short the camera is great just be aware you might be buying some more cables, batteries, chargers, memory sticks or other accessories that will end up affecting your total price of ownership. And that the Sony brand name versions of these accessories can be surprisingly pricey</review_text>
Purchased this for my husband - we are both happy with the Camcorder.  We originally bought a Panasonic upon a friend's recommendation - NOT HAPPY WITH PANASONIC!  Compared to the Panasonic, the Sony is far more superior: easier to use, lighter, and most importantly - MUCH BETTER PICTURE QUALITY AND IMAGE STABILIZATION FEATURE</review_text>
my skill level: beginnerI picked up the latest Canon ZR800 from a local store and tried some shooting with it, since there were no reviews of that latest model - but i was totally disappointed with the quality - video had granulation & the worst part was - it has a motor noise which gets dubbed on the tape :(so i ordered this Sony HC48 & i am really really impressed with the performace, great video quality (no granulation) & sound too. As some of you are curious, it has infrared light which is great plus point for shooting in night time. Infact, when i tried shooting in dark with the NightShot Plus turned on and i tried to put my hand in front of the infrared light, I could see a patch of light on my hand, i was really thrilled by that, seeing its actually a light coming out of the camera. Ofcourse you probably need to use a tripod to shoot in night light for better stability.Also, it has various other features/modes that i didnt notice in canon. for instance, it has a color mode to bring out colors more effectively in low light, a shooting mode to capture minute objects like insects etc..I am glad i returned the Canon ZR800 and bought this on</review_text>
I hope to give a more in depth review later, but wanted to be sure to make it clear to everyone that a Firewire cable (the so-called iLink) is not included with this product.The camera itself is intuitive and easy to use out of the box but also highly customizable.  The video and sound quality are excellent, and the LCD screen is gorgeous and uses touch screen buttons in addition to the button bar beneath it.  But Sony has a way of making fantastic products and then alienating the purchasers of those products (a la the PS3).  So understand that in order to do the very basic and essential task of transferring your DV images to your computer requires you to shell out $35-70 more to buy a Firewire cable.  The provided USB cable is for transferring stills from the Memory Stick only.  Thus, this camera can only receive 4 stars due to Sony's cheap skate approach.  Caveat emptor..</review_text>
This is an easy thing to use u can print your pictures no problem and easy to replace ink and paper</review_text>
On the recommendation of a photographer friend, I bought this along with the Kodak C875 camera. I wanted a smaller, easy-to-use camera and printer that would produce high-quality, permanent photos with or without my computer. At the moment, I'm using it without my computer, so I can't comment on the software, UBS connection, etc.This produces terrific, durable, quality photos, and the camera and system are easy to use, once you figure them out. As with most electronics, the instructions are minimal and not very well written. Troubleshooting, online or not, is annoying and unhelpful. I'm moderately electronic/computer literate, although definitely not a technogeek. But I can fix basic stuff on my computer, security systems and programs with online help--I should be proficient enough to benefit from Kodak's online info. Instead, after fishing around and not getting what I needed, I relied on trial and error. (Kodak, are you listening?)Like another reviewer, I've had trouble with the paper feed. The first time I tried to use it, the printer kept signaling that there was no paper in the tray, regardless of how much or how little paper I put in. I almost sent it back based on that problem, but kept it, hoping it was a one-time thing. That problem has resolved somewhat, but the paper still doesn't always feed properly, and sometimes needs a bit of a push into the feeder.Even so, I'm impressed by the overall quality and ease of use, especially at such a reasonable price. Cartridges are easy to handle, and printer/paper cost is less than that at a photo-developing service, especially since you only print what you want. It's so small, it invites you to take it along to parties, family gatherings, etc., and it's hard to beat the instant gratification of nice photos to send home with guests. Plus, it just looks cool when it's printing--very entertaining for anyone who hasn't seen it before.If I could, I'd give it three and a half stars based on quality of prints, ease of use and portability. Kodak is on to a great concept, but still has some work to do. But I'd give them the benefit of the doubt, and buy this printer/camera again</review_text>
I have a P880 Kodak camera. This Easyshare Printer Dock (Plus series 3) is the perfect partner to the camera. I find that it is easy to use and produces high quality 4 X 6 pictures. All I do is set my camera in the tray and either transfer the pictures to my other software or make great photos right then and there. When I got this from Amazon I took it out of the box, plugged it in, and I haven't looked back. I'm very happy with my Easyshare Printer Dock Plus Series 3</review_text>
We got this printer dock in a bundle with an Easy Share camera (C643)earlier this year.  This was our first experience with a printer dock and we've been happy with it.  It's super easy to print high-quality pictures right here at home.We've since added another Easy Share camera (Z612) to our household and have used the dock to print from both cameras.  It's easy to switch from one camera to the other - just remove the plastic "foot" for the camera and snap the other one on the dock.We've not used the WiFi option, nor is the printer dock connected to our computer, so I can't comment on those particular options.We've noticed one little glitch with the dock - every once in awhile, it seems to not recognize the camera.  For example, if the camera has been off the dock and it's put back on, the dock doesn't "power" the camera.  We've fixed this by unplugging the dock for a few seconds, then plugging it back in.  When it's plugged back in, it'll go through its start-up and works fine.  This is certainly not an everyday occurance - I'd venture it happens maybe once a month or less.  And even though it's a bit annoying, it doesn't really decrease our overall opinion of the printer dock</review_text>
I purchased a kodak camera and printer dock about 4 years ago for our daughter and family. I was impressed by the ease and use of both. I had a sony camera and printer and when the camera needed work I decided to go with a new KodakZ650. I love the camera it is so easy to use. All the grandkids take photos with it and the dock is a plus. Just snap the camera in and it loads to your computer or print out any photo you want. I think this is a good setup for easy use. Tooty Hallber</review_text>
This printer is wonderful. It presents great prints quickly through variety of connections. Its prints are high quality and quite water proof (the water just beads up, nothing runs). I think anyone purchasing it should know a few important points.1. the Wi-Fi card sticks out of printers side preventing you from closing the slot cover if it is installed.2. you don't "print" to it through BlueTooth, you copy pictures to the printer with a file transfer utility. (This does mean that you can send your cell phone pictures directly to it if your cell phone has bluetooth).3. setting up any wireless options REQUIRES a USB connection to your computer.4. It has no ON/OFF switch.I am very happy with this printer</review_text>
More than satify with this product, easy to use and excellent results. Photoes are sharp with excellent colour reproduction,highly recomended to any one who owns a Kodak Camera or any other Camera,a must have. Thanks Kodak</review_text>
I was skeptical when I first read about the Easy share printer, but after that first photo was printed I was hooked. So easy to use and some of the best pictures I have seen.  Price per picture is a little higher but I don't have to print all the bad ones. I taught my wife to use it and now she keeps everyone supplied with pictures of the grandchildren.</review_text>
Sony has done it again....the need for a Digital....GET MY FEET WET Camera...the more i looked  WOW....Like a beautiful woman....Stands out in the crowd....She has the look   Confidents....etc   April 5, i ordered: Sony SAL-85mmF14Z 85mm f1.4 Carl Zeiss Planar T Coated Telephoto Lens    I Predict this lens will be HOT....LET the Magic Continue...Quimbyproductions  since 196</review_text>
The Sony Alpha A100K is the best camera I have ever owned.  The images are nothing short of spectacular.The lens mount allows you to use telephoto lenses from other camera's.  I have an expensive telephoto lens that was on my old 35mm Minolta and it fit this Sony digital perfectly.  You will notice a lot of Minolta features on this Sony since Minolta has left the camera business.The image stabilization feature makes it real hard to mess up a shot.If you are a beginner or a pro, this camera is easy to use for perfect pictures every time</review_text>
Well I dont think my money got wasted!!Cool one shooting great pictures, auto focus is good.Have a 2 GB card and start shooting memories...Recommended!!</review_text>
I am new to Photography but I have to say with out a doubt, I am so impressed with the pictures that I can take being a novice that I feel as If I could be an artist!If you have ANY KNOWLEDGE on how to work with the features of this Camera you will be BLOWN AWAY!This is a very good Camera, but do your research!</review_text>
There some very detailed reviews, most of which I read before I ordered the camera from Amazon.  There is ample evidence that professionals will find the camera useful.  I want to take a minute to speak for the rest of us. The camera came a month ago and I've extremely happy with it.Let me offer some perspective on my comments.  The last camera I bought was a small SONY shirt-pocket-sized camera that I was using alot and it got me back into taking pictures.  I decided that since I was taking so many pictures I wanted a camera that would take much better quality shots, WITHOUT my having to get a PhD in picture-taking.  I opted for this camera with the 18-200mm lens.  I now take the same pictures I took with the small camera, but with the zoom lens I can frame them better and with the 10.2 mega pixels I can blow them up and frame them.There are dozens (hundreds?) of features that I will grow into, but for now I am delighted to use this camera right out of the box, with just minimal reading of instructions.  Everything I remember from my 35mm days (my first camera was a Minolta SRT-101 that I bought in 1973) can be put to use, but what I forget, the camera remembers.My point--this is a camera that is ready to meet you wherever you are and grow with you should you decide you want to go farther out and deeper in</review_text>
Echoing what most others have said, this is a great camera. It's a dream to use, and the pictures are stunning.Since it's based on a Minolta design, it accepts the lenses from my old Minolta Maxxum 9000 (circa mid 1980s).  This is a huge benefit to me; I now have an excellent quality 70-210mm zoom lens for my new Alpha-100 for no additional cost!  The auto-focus and TTL metering work properly, and since the anti-shake hardware is in the camera body, that works with the old lens also.  Even my old Minolta cable release (a switch on the end of an electrical cable with a proprietary rectangular plug) connects and works fine.I'm very happy with the camera.  That said, there are a couple of annoyances. One of them might be significant to you, depending on how you want to use the camera.First, noise.  Not picture noise, as in grainy low-light photos, but acoustic noise.  The shutter mechanism is *loud*, much louder than my old Maxxum 9000.  If you want to be an unnoticed photographer taking discreet pictures like Cartier-Bresson with his Leica, this isn't your camera.Second, the lens shade.  This is a nit, but I find it more clumsy to use than the lens shade on the old camera.  The old one was held on by a spring clasp; you just squeeze on opposite sides to install or remove it, or to reverse it for storage.  The new one has to be positioned precisely so that tabs will lock into place when it is turned.  Not as quick or as easy to use, but not really a big deal.  I suppose it saved a couple of dollars, as the new one is one piece of plastic while the old one had several parts.On the whole, an excellent product.  I'd buy it again in a heartbeat</review_text>
This camera takes great looking pictures right out of the box.  It is very easy to setup and shoot.  You can go from using the presets built into the camera, or go totally manual.What sold me on the camera was the fact that I could use the lenses from my Minolta camera.I would highly recommend this camera to anyone that is considering buying a DSLR for the first time, or not.</review_text>
Great camera, no wonder it was named "Camera of the Year".  Fast, clear and accurate describe the camera and the photos it produces.  I have had the camera for a month and it has been all I expected.  The super steady feature truly gives two f stops.  The kit lens is useful and quite a bargin.  I use it more than I thought I would.  I truly get the same feel and results that I did with my old Maxxium SLR</review_text>
A camcorder with features found only on more expensive models and resonably easy to operate by a beginner. The quality of the picture was very good and the zoom operated very smoothly. Overall I felt it was a product that was  well thought out in design and well made</review_text>
Strengths: 1. Great price. 2. Very good picture quality. 3. Excellent low light capabilities. 4. Excellent auto-focus. 5. Excellent zoom range and control. 6. Small and light. 7. Small and compact.Weaknesses: 1. Ok, internal mic. Low audio output. 2. No true 16x9 mode. 16x9 squeeze mode reduces quality.Summary: I have used this camera on three shoots so far and it continues to surprise and impress me. For the money its an excellent deal. The image quality is comparable to its big brother the AG-DVX100. Didn't think the night modes would be usefull but they can be and can produce some very artistic shots in B&W.My only disappointment is no true 16x9 mode. The 16x9 modes they have reduces image quality noticably.I would definitely recommend an external mic. I use the Rode video mic...very sensitive but comparable to the more expensive shotguns. Also, a wide angle lens is a must. The Raynox HD-6600 is an excellent lens for the price and it produces a great soft focus effect at the long end of the zoom range. Also the Libec zoom controller works great on the camera and for creative shots check out the new Manfrotto Fig Rig.</review_text>
I checked a lot of camera reviews from many sources and it was hard to find anything better than the DVC-30 for making documentaries, shorts, sketches, and interviews.  I tape a lot of live performances as well, and after I figured out how simple it is to adjust the colors and settings, it puts out a great picture.  I have a friend with a consumer Sony HD, and he wants to get this camera.  The only drawback:  The XLR adapter is around $200 bucks, but if you need super high quality sound, it's worth it.I shot a short horror film right out of the box, and it came out amazing with the true black and white infared.  I LOVE this camera</review_text>
This is a great camera for the wedding videographer or other serious amateur or semi-professional.  It's well built, has great manual control, and takes super video including good low-light performance.  You will probably want the external mic attachment, which lets you use professional microphones without additional adapters and signal processors.  Now that the price is well below $2000, it's a great deal.  One caveat:  If you plan to shoot 16:9 format, this is not the best choice.  The Panasonic GS400 handles that much better, and at a lower price.  (But the GS400 doesn't have the low-light chops that the DVC-30 has - so you have to set your priorities.)Plusses:*	Very good low light capability*	Sturdy, metal body construction*	Will take professional external microphones (with optional attachment)*	Unbelievable B&W no-light capability with infrared (short range built into camera; medium range add-on IR light increases range to hundreds of feet.)*	Excellent manual control available via menu AND you can put your favorite four settings on programmable buttons on the camera body for extra convenience.*	Without attachments, the body with built-in mic is small and consumer-like (won't draw attention to itself), not to mention light-weight.*	Lovely video with three 1/4-inch CCD's.Minuses:*	The Sony 2100 has even better low-light ability*	The 16:9 mode isn't as good as the PDX10 or GS400.*	The still picture capability is only adequate.*	The built-in mic is only average</review_text>
Titles says it all. For the money, the best camcorder hands down. After 2 weeks of intense research and a month of using this camcorder, no regrets</review_text>
While the Sony vx2100 does better in low light, this camera holds it's own very well.  For the price, it's impossible to beat.  Great picture quality, 3.5 inch LCD and solid build quality.  Most cameras in this range still have the plastic body, but the magnesium alloy body on the AG-DVC30 is rugged and feels great.  I've used it for regular family shooting and filming plays.   So many choices on the manual settings.  Can't say enough.  Here's a great forum for it.  http://www.camcorderinfo.com/bbs/f13</review_text>
This is a superior camera for the money.  Simple operation and well constructed.  It has a "well built feel" to it and fits well in your hand.  The detail of the image is awesome, better than I hoped for.  I'm very impressed with the 16x zoom, very nice and clean image.Don't be fooled by the size of this camera, the quality of the image is beautiful.  A lot of camera in a little package.  It has 4 built in shooting settings for different situations.  It has a low level light option that does a decent job of capturing the scene after dark.I gave it 4 stars because I didn't like the manual that it came with and the manual controlling for the iris and focus could have been made easier to access and use. The built in microphone does not really pick up the desired audio that well.  I recommend picking up an external boom microphone or lapel mic system to supercede the built in mic depending on your application.If you are in need of a firewire cable to download the video to your computer make sure you pick one of those up as well.  The camera firewire port is a 4pin firewire connector</review_text>
This great machine, simply put, takes superb pictures.  I have experience using a great number of point and shoot cameras and this is definitely the best.  The features give a great control over what you shoot if you are so inclined to use them and know a bit more of photography.  But if not you can just use the auto mode and take unbelievable pictures.  Pictures I take with this camera often look better than ones I take with my 8mp canon rebel.  The video is also great quality compared to any other point and shoot cameras.  For the price, this camera is spectacular!  If you are even considering buying it then please make the purchase, you won't be let down</review_text>
it would be this one.  hahaha.  It is the love of my life.  It takes amazing pictures and videos.  Its easy to use once you get the hang of the buttons and different functions and it can get kicked around, dropped, wet and crushed without having a problem.  The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because the sound on the videos can be bad sometimes.  Mainly if you're trying to record live music at concerts.  But the pictures for concerts are amazing</review_text>
I picked this camera up for an amazing 150 dollars at Sam's Club! I was originally going to buy the Canon Powershot a630 but didn't want to pay 100 dollars more. This camera takes awesome pictures and has a great movie mode. I don't know much of the photography jargon, but I know you can adjust the white balance, ISO and shutter speed in the manual mode. Some shots do come out blurry but most look great and I'm sure will look better on a 3x5 photo. I was blown away by the macro mode, I have submitted a macro of my eye. The photo viewer here on Amazon doesn't do the picture justice...when I view it on my computer it's just breathtaking how detailed it is. My old cam was a 2.3 megapixel and I could only take 16 pics on the internal memory, with the fuji f10 and my 1gb olympus xd card, I can take 341 fine-quality 6mp pics. I love this camera</review_text>
The Fuji F10 is an outstanding camera with a small problem:  When shooting in brilliant sun light and trying to frame the picture, the screen is sometimes hard to see.</review_text>
I love this little camera! After waiting for 10 years to buy a digital camera, I'm very happy with this one. In 1996, I was working in a digital imaging lab with the first point and shoot camera's; and said at the time that I'd buy one when the resolution reached about 2000x3000 pixels, and they were affordable. This camera is what I was waiting for. The combination of the ability to shoot at ASA 1600, sharp images, a good size, and a price under $200 (rebuilt) were the factors that made me choose this camera. The slightly clunky menu system and small capacity XD card were minor problems, but shouldn't stop you from buying this camera</review_text>
I recently purchased a f10 at my local walmart on clearance. I would recommend the f10 to anyone seeking an easy point and shoot camera with good battery life.  I tried the f10 after purchasing 2 other digital camera's. The f10 comes with a 16mb xd memory card and the approprate cables. The battery is built in but has exceptional life. I was initally concerned with having only one battery, but the performance has demonstrated there is no need for concern.In terms of the picture performance the camera has a number of settings but takes excellent photos with use of the auto focus setting. It also works well with motion once you understand how to use the autofocus. The pictures with this camera were much better than the 8mp polaroid I had been using. I purchased a 512 xd card and this seems to meet my needs in terms of storage capacity. Overall this is the best camera I have seen for $200. It was rated 1 by consumer reports last year. If you can find one for under $200 its well worth your money.</review_text>
While I am still learning how to use all the "bells and whistles", I think this camera is awesome!  I can suppress the flash, force the flash, reduce red-eye, take pictures in low light..  Best of all, the LCD display is so large I can review the pictures immediately and REALLY see them.  All my friends and family comment on the size of that screen.  At a recent family gathering, everyone wanted to review the pictures immediately rather than wait for me to get home and e-mail them!  My nephew has a camera with a tiny screen and no one was asking to see his pictures because you would need a magnifying glass to see anything!</review_text>
These are great for bird watching. They make things very clear from a distance. Good buy</review_text>
After much research I finally found the binoculars that fit my every need.  The price was right, the delivery was right on schedule, and the product is excellent</review_text>
The only negative on these binoculars is that they come with a really cheesy plastic strap, which I promptly threw away.Otherwise they function fine for a bargain binocular</review_text>
The only knock on these binoculars is that the image can be unsteady, but that's a product of the 16X magnification, so it's not really a product fault. If you've got a steady hand, you'll love these things. Great for sporting events or the theater, and great bang for the buck. Highly recommended</review_text>
This camera is great! Not only does it take great digital photos and is extremely user friendly, but if you add a 1GB memory card to it (which slides right in and only costs about $40.00) you can take a LOT of great quality digital videos with sound that are very easy to upload to your computer and/or the internet and email to family etc. In fact, there is no need to buy a video camera when you have this and it fits right in your pocket. I can take up to 30 minute videos and lots of photos at one time. You can easily take a photo while you are making a video as well</review_text>
This has got to be the best camera for the money that you can buy right now!! I was looking for an affordable camera, small and thin, a well-known name brand, takes sharp digital photos, can shoot at low light, uses cheap SD cards, good-sized LCD display, and can take decent videos. Well, this Casio Exilim is everything and more, and at a great price. I have used it so much during my out-of-state travels without running out of power or memory (I bought a 2gb SD card for $20 at [...] and I can take more a 1000 hi-res photos or about an hour of video). I was absolutely surprised at how good the videos are that I can shoot on this small digital camera, that now I have decided not to buy a new video camcorder, as this Casio Exilim is all that I would need for any occasion. If you're in the market for a great camera, look no further than the Casio Exilim</review_text>
its sleek and easy to use. it takes great pictures and has alot of feature</review_text>
I have used the camera for three months, and absolutely love it! The pictures are crisp (even very close-ups), and the video feature is right up there. Sound pick-up is excellent. I have created two DVD's combining videos and still pictures. Folks have thought the quality was very good.The battery life was rated very good, and I have found this to be true. I carry the camera with me nearly everywhere I go. People are impressed with the size.Drawbacks? Because of its size, there are no connections from the camera to a computer, TV or battery charger. The docking station is small and lightweight. Because of the battery life, I have never been away from home long enough to need recharging.I recommend the camera without reservations, and will look first to Casio in the future</review_text>
I own a Nikon Coolpix 3100 camera and have no complaints with it, except for the fact that its size (even though it's fairly small) is a pain to carry around when you want to take pictures. Looking for a much thinner camera, I came across this one and was quite pleasantly surprised at its size, and its ability to take really great shots! I'm merely a birthday - holiday type picture taker, but this camera will definitely enable me to take more pictures, because I'll be carrying it around in my pockety whennever I go somewhere that might provide a photo opportunity.</review_text>
I have many traditional film SLRs including the original Pentax K1000 (fully manual), Canon Rebel XOS and a Canon Elph. When considering digital SLR cameras the Canon Digital Rebel and  the point-and-shoot Canon Digital Elph were at the top of my list. But at $150 less than the Canon Digital Elph, the Casio Exilim  EX-S series is a better buy with the the same features (and in some cases a better execution of the same features). If you're looking for a fun point-and-click camera that will record audio, AVI movie files and digital pictures this is it. It takes about 15 miuntes to read the manual and you're off taking pictures. Pay attention when reading the manual and everything else will seem very intuitive.Of all the cameras I have I use this one most often.Other users have complained about the proprietary lithium ion battery but 3rd party equivalents are available right here on the amazon site, you just have to look. My back-up battery was only [...] bucks. San Disk 1GB memory cards are cheap too, [...] online, [...] retail. Last, I agree with many users that a lock switch needs to be developed so that you can keep the camera from accidentally turning on when it's in your pocket -- but remember many cameras have this problem/lack/this feature. I solved my own issues by buying a [...] case with a belt loop</review_text>
This really is a great camera (for it's purpose!) This isn't a camera to get if you want super-fine shots or are some kind of amateur photographer.   If you want a camera to preserve memories, snap shots during travel, parties, etc, this is the one to get.Here are a few of my favorite things about the camera:Solid construction.  The thing just reeks of quality.Very fast startup time - not only is it easy to fit in a pocket so you can grab it while other idiots are unzipping their camera bags, but it starts up so fast that you're taking a picture before you know it.Portability - I've taken this everywhere.  I've gotten great pictures I'd have never gotten otherwise because this camera is small, unobtrusive, always available, etc.I'm very happy with this purchase & my next digital camera (sooner or later people will laugh at 5 megapixels) will definitely be a card/small sized Casio</review_text>
This is my first digital camera. I thought I would have trouble figureing it out. It was really easy.I take it in  my purse every where I go. I am looking at homes to buy one. I like to take pictures of every room in the homes I like. Then when I get home I can look at mt pictures.        Judith Turner  Mississipp</review_text>
we purchased this camera for our child who loves photography.  Instant pictures are great for kids who hate to wait for developing.  Easy for kids to figure out</review_text>
Pros: This camera is great, 5MP and an excellent picture quality.Cons: Can't make zoom when filming video :</review_text>
This was a post-Christmas gift to myself.  I shopped around and read many, many reviews.  This was my choice because it seemed to offer the best value for my price range with its 5 megapixels and optical zoom.  I was a bit surpised to find that it didn't come with even a small, cheap case to keep it in.  So if you buy one, you'll need to make sure you have or get a case for it.  I've just recently finally worn out the batteries.  It would have been nice to have a guage on the screen to tell me how low my power was before it shut off.  Operation is easy and the pictures come out nice and clear.  However, I have found that it usually works best without the flash so I turn that off.  But if you use the flash and get red-eye, you can remove that from the picture right there in the camera which is pretty neat.  The only things that would have made this better would be a battery guage, a quicker shutter time and a case.  But I'm giving it five stars because I feel I got more than my money's worth here</review_text>
love it, love itchristmas gift to my guyhe was thrilledpriced righ</review_text>
I am really excited about my new digital camera. It is in very good condition and working order. I would recommend everyonne to shop with yo</review_text>
it came before the expected, that is nice, so nice , all new , working fine.'i truly recommend BEACH CAMER</review_text>
No soy muy bueno con el ingles por eso me dirijo a ustedes en mi lengua materna, espero me entiendan.Con mi nueva camara he logrado capturar momentos magicos de mi vida, cumpleaos de mi hijos, fiestas, paisajes maravillosos,momentos de humor,  entre otras cosas, es fantastica, vesatil, comoda, tiene muy buena resolucion, y lo mejor para mi es que esta de acuerdo  a mis necesidades y guarda un perfecto equilibrio en la relacion costo valor y eso es bueno para mi.... gracias</review_text>
perfect for a family, a mother, a child, for EVERYBODY! i've had it for 4 moths and its perfect. I can take all the pictures i want, etc etc. Everybody loves the color! Loved it!Buy it!</review_text>
I have sticked with Sony since I got my first digital camera 4 years ago and Sony camera has been the moneys worth! This one DSC-T10 is the one for the parent who is carrying to much already and needs to pack down for a change. It fits in my purse and still have space for more, the only thing to remember to buy a slim fitting case for the camera and an extra battery(for those kind of battery are not sold everywhere) you need that one when you don't thing you need an extra battery, you always run out at the wrong time.I recommend this one</review_text>
I bought this camera for a trip down under a couple of month ago and I have been really impressed with the image quality. It takes great low light pictures and the steady shot technology works really well for longer shutter times. The camera is very small but feels solid in the hand due to excellent construction unlike some of the Casio ultra-compacts. Well worth the extra cost</review_text>
I wanted a good quality consumer grade digital camera to take on short trips, so I  purchased this one. I think the quality of the picures is very good and it has most of the features I wanted. It was a few dollars more than I really wanted to spend, but all in all I am pleased. My main complaint is the battery life is a little on the short side, and it takes a while to see the photo you just took on the lcd screen. I really want something to hold me for about two years, by then these things will be twice as good for a fraction of the cost. For now it does what I need it to do pretty well</review_text>
A bit tricky to set up, but nothing special by the standards of today's technology.  Excellent feature</review_text>
What a purchase!! Simple and easy to setup and a great Christmas gift. Now it holds our wedding photos and is proudly displayed in the living roo</review_text>
The picture and video quality is great! This frame was a hit at our last family gathering! It was also very easy and intuitive to use, with a sleek look</review_text>
Large Sharp Photos amd the MP3 Player is cool too</review_text>
This is the best frame i have seen, good price, awesome quality, a lot of functions... i really recommend!</review_text>
I ordered the Ziga 8" digital picture frame when another one I had wanted was out of stock.  It was a christmas present for my wife.  Over all I am very happy with the operation of the Ziga.  It has a lot of functions and the picture quality is good.  The only comment I have is about the frame on the Ziga.  I think it would be better if it didn't have the clear outer edge part.  If it was all white or all black I think it would look nicer.  The clear part makes it look cheap. Other than that I am happy with it</review_text>
I was dubious after reading reviews of frames.  This frame was a gift for my parents, who are nearing 80.  It had to be easy to set up and use.My expectations were exceeded!  It is simple to plug in and go!  It is easy to insert a memory card and launch the slideshow and play music as well.My parents were delighted, there is virtually no computer savvy required to make this thing work.  The remote is easy too, and accurate.  I can imagine my parents setting this up in their living room or family room, with a constant slideshow running for themselves and their guests</review_text>
I bought this camera Jan. 2007 to replace 1st gen 3 MPixel Fuji. This camera is compact, easy to use, loaded with features, and takes great pictures. On the minus side, the xD picture card shares the compartment with the batteries</review_text>
Like most, I've owned many cameras over the years - Canons, Fujis and even Polaroid.   My favorite was a Fuji.For digitals, my current stable includes these cameras:- Canon A520 (4 megapixel) workhorse- Sony DSC-W7 (7.2MP) - 2.5" viewfinderThe new addition:- FujiFilm E900 (9MP) - 2" viewfinderFor the work I do, I needed the raw format and 9-10MP and this Fuji E900 camera fits the bill.  Originally, I wasn't looking for a point-and-shoot.  Was hoping to get a 10MP and RAW which prices you out of the compact camera range into more expensive SLRs.  This Fuji fits nicely in between - not quite bleeding edge 10MP but very good and near point-and-shoot size.NOTE: As others have mentioned, this camera was rated high by Consumer Reports.Here are my ratings:Pros====- Good ergonomics- Fast On/off/store- supports RAW (it really wasn't that hard to find in the menus)- AA batteries (my Canon, Sony and Fuji all use AA NiMH rechargables)- Photoshop pulls the raw image right in (it's a supported camera)[...]Cons====- The Fuji E900's 2" view finder a little small (same as my 4MP Canon A520) but this camera *is* a few years old.- Flimsy camera in terms of plastic quality.  Fuji's cameras are built to a price though this one's a good value at today's prices.   The Sony W7 feels more substantial.  The Sony survived a drop of 4 feet onto pavement (same day I bought the E900 - go figure)- 16MB XD card included can't even fit *ONE* raw image and throws a "card full" immediately after setting the format to "RAW" *before* I even took a picture.  I was waiting on a 1GB XD accessory card but geez, not even ONE raw photo out-of-the-box???- About 1/3 larger than my Sony W7.  The Fuji is no longer a "fit in shirt pocket" compact camera but the quality and the higher MP is worth it.Other cameras looked at:-Panasonic DMC-FZ50 10.1MP - the one I wanted but too much $$$-Fujifilm Finepix S9000 9MP - not a compact. Cheaper than Panasonic-Fujifilm Finepix S9100 9MP - not a compact.   "             "-Canon PowerShot A640 10MP - Great specs. Great value. My #2 choice. But no raw mode.Get the 1GB XD-Picture "H" (high speed) type card - you'll need it if you use the maximum 9MP mode and especially if you use RAW - for storing speed.  It's worth the extra money if you're shooting RAW.  If you don't use RAW, get the slower "M" card and save money</review_text>
In the late 1960's and early 70's, I purchased a nice 35mm SLR and a lot of accessories while in the Navy. Once I got back to the State's and re-entered college, I could not afford to take and develop all the pictures anymore, so I sold all my equipment.  Recently I have wanted to get back into photography and was intrigued by the point and shoot digital market.  The cost of developing prints limited me in my desire to take lots of pictures of a given subject. Plus, I want to do more than just snap photos a family get-togethers.  Digital cameras solve these problems and have finally grown up from their 'toy-like' beginnings.  Consumer Reports rated this camera as a "Best Buy" for an Advanced Compact.  All I can say about this camera is "Wow!"In addition to the "Auto" point and shoot, the Fujifilm Finepix E900 has modes for natural light, portraits, sports, after dark, plus a 'Photo' mode that lets you change focusing method, photometric method, white balance, flash intensity. It also has functions to allow up to 40 shots in burst mode and auto-bracketing of shots by changing the exposure value (EV) of your shots.  You can also work with the shutter speed, apperture setting or just do everything manually.  It also does movies up to 30 minutes long on a 1 GByte xD photo card.  That is what makes this advanced point and shoot great.  I can experiment with a subject and take a hundred shots just to see how the camera responds and then keep all, some, or none of pictures and I have not spent a cent for photo-finishing.In about 3 weeks, I have taken over 1,100 shots while trying to learn the basics of operation.  It is a very easy camera to use.  It is forgiving in the Auto mode and most of the other modes also.  If you want a camera that does more than point and shoot, then the E900 is a good camera to consider.  Sucking the pictures off the camera and into the 'My Pictures' folder your PC is as simple as plugging the camera into a USB port and clicking OK.  The software included with the camera does basic editing.A word of warning, however, buy a large xD memory card when you buy the camera.  The camera shipps with a 16 Mb xD-Picture Card that holds about three 9-megapixal pictures!  A 1.0 GB xD holds about 200 shots, while a 2.0 GByte xD will hold about 400 shots.  You can, of course, crank the quality down to as little as 2-megapixals.  Also buy rechargable 'AA' batteries.  The E900 will accept regular 'AA' batteries, but the life of two standard alkaline batteries was about 20 shots compared to about 160 with the rechargable ones.I am still learning the bells and whistles, but thus far, I like what the camera does and how it does it</review_text>
While I've used other peoples digital cameras before, I never had one of my own until now.  I'm very happy that I read most of the reviews for the E900 and purchased it.  I've owned and used it since the first of the year and I haven't tested all the features yet but I have been very happy with it so far.</review_text>
We replaced our 2.1 pixel camera with the E900.  We're not experts but, it is easy to use, takes wonderful pictures.  It seems to be especially good in low-light conditions without using the flash.  If it was more compact, I would give it a five</review_text>
This camera is truely incredible! The pictures really do come out beautiful and it is really easy to use. The only function that I find to be not as superior as the rest is the Macro function. Close up photos do not have the clarity that even cheaper Fujifilm cameras have. Other then that I highly recommend this digital</review_text>
We have a new little four month old baby and so really wanted to get a good camera to take the normal hundreds of pictures parents take of their first baby doing nothing! The picture quality is amazing and we love that we can take short videos-it's perfect for the sweet little moments you want to be able to catch in an instant. We did our research before we purchased and this camera was a Consumer Reports Best Buy and a great value for the money. We would recommend it to anyone.</review_text>
I'd assumed that the E900 would be a slight improvement over the E600, at the very least pulling even. I was surprised at how much improved the E900 is over the E600, a camera that I've been very satisfied with. Performance: point & shoot capability much improved, especially in low light conditions; less sensitive to shake, remarkable improvement in movie mode sharpness and in low light. Convenience: tether on outlet cover; no longer have to go through menu for multiple shot and preview, display is "sticky". Nit-picks: the I/O ports are reordered, causing an initial confusion between A/V & power ports, A/V & Power ports use the same connector, and the case is marginally cheaper & maybe less robust than the E600</review_text>
My son loves the camera, the only thing I didn't realize that it takes AAA batteries.  I know that there are some cameras similar to my sons that take AA.  Other than that were good.  Thank you</review_text>
I will be leaving for college this Fall and wanted a little something that was easy to handle to send home videos, or post them.It works great! And I am especially excited about compiling them onto a DVD with my laptop's DVD burner. It's is so tiny it fits in my pocket and it is VERY good on batteries, you will need to buy a scan disk (I suggest 512 MB or 1 GIG) but it still turns out cheaper than a regular clunky sized video camera. Of course it isn't AMAZING quality but it is small enough to take anywhere to capture every and anything.Great deal for the money</review_text>
This camera is awsome cause you can store music on it and take pictures too, one of the only stupid things is... it doesn't work on a tripod so, i suggest you don't buy a tripod if you buy this camera</review_text>
This camera deserves 5 stars if you need a camera that easily fits in your pocket or purse and is ready to use whenever that picture or movie moment arrives, even under water. Considering the varied picture taking situations, action, and lighting conditions, the performance was beyond my expectations. The only significant limitation is seeing the display in bright sunlight or under water, even when the screen is set at its brightest. However, aiming was intuitive enough that I never missed a shot and I was able to change modes even under water (but I did practice switching between underwater wide 2 and movie ahead of time). One feature that would be an improvement would be the ability to zoom while taking a movie.I received this camera just a couple days before leaving on a cruise so I didn't have any time to practice with it. Be careful not to have your finger in front of the lens, especially under water where you may not be watching the screen. Also be aware that when you zoom in for movies that the image movement is also magnified. The wide angle underwater movies are much better than at full optical zoom (digital zoom is off). After a couple days the controls were easy to use to change modes and review pictures and movies.I used 1 gig cards and the highest resolution which provided about 240 pictures or about 40 minutes of movies. Switching back and forth was easy. Movie recording will continue until the card is full or the battery runs out, not just short clips. My clips were too short until I was comfortable that I would not quickly fill up the memory card or run out of battery. Under water pictures were superb with a natural shift in color toward green. I recharged the battery every other night. The battery was able to take about 100 pictures and 15 minutes of movie between recharges. I recommend a spare battery as it did indicate it was getting low a couple times and ran out once.The camera was also used in daylight, inside, with and without flash, even night shots (the auto setting was better than Night Scene for harbor lights at night. The camera was steadied on the railing).I purchased a lanyard with metal clasp at Sports Authority for a dollar which provides a very secure leash. With the lanyard around my neck I could tuck the camera in my shirt pocket. I was always ready for the next picture opportunity without worrying about dropping it.I'm very pleased with the picture quality although it may not match a camera with a much larger lens system, but it was great to be able to take pictures and movies when I would not have had my larger camera available. The 15 fps movies do not match a 3CCD digital video camera, but they are acceptable. I even recorded short clips during live theater performances (with the screen brightness set at its minimum) and I was pleased with the quality from this tiny camera.</review_text>
The new Olympus Stylus 770SW is the nicest camera to date I've purchased.  It takes great pictures and is extremely durable.  The picture quality is awesome in all types of weather conditions and lighting.  I stronly suggest to purchase this if the price is right</review_text>
I have an Olympus 770 SW (NOT the 720 SW), for sure...and I like it. I have had five digital cameras before, and this one is terrific. Considering that it's a sub-compact pocket camera, image quality is fine (not equal to that of a digital SLR, but I don't want to carry around a big box like a DSLR). Shadow detail is especially impressive. Operation is smooth and intuitive. The screen is fine, even outdoors. Shutter lag, a big concern of mine as I like to photograph my kids at sports, is minimal and can be zero if you prefocus. The number of custom scene settings is impressive. I bought it because of the waterproofing and shockproofing, and because of prior good experience with Olympus over the years, but I'm just as happy with the pictures it takes under normal circumstances too.A few gripes that stop me from giving the camera 5 stars:1. The battery cannot be recharged when it's in the camera. For a total of $80 or so, you can get an external power source and a cable, and together they let the camera run a long time without draining the battery, but they don't charge the battery. Battery life is fine for a day of normal shooting, but if you use the camera actively, every single night you pretty much have to unlock the case, take out the battery and charge it, then remember to put the battery back in the next day. Each charge takes 5 hours. I'm going to take the same $80 and instead buy two extra batteries to be comfortable--One in the camera, one reserve along with me, and another charging at home. Even so, it will take some planning and thinking to keep batteries ready all the time on a vacation. It would have been much nicer to have a holster or a charging socket on the case.2. The case is actually smaller than it needs to be. It could be significantly bigger and still fit in my shirt pocket, which is my standard size requirement. As it is, the advanced engineering is impressive to pack all the features in a tiny box, but the camera is more expensive than need be, the lens is smaller than it should be (depending on zoom position, the lens is between f/3.5 to f/5.0, which is pretty weak), it's harder to hold the camera than need be, and if the case were bigger, there would be room for a nice little charging socket too.3. There is indeed a background, almost mechanical noise introduced when filming videos. It probably can be filtered out, as it's very constant and very low pitched, but it's mildly annoying.4. Time between shots is too long--it takes several seconds to save each shot at full resolution.5. You can use the internal memory only if there's no memory card in the slot. Given the slow transfer speed to the card, it sure would be nice to be able to save a dozen or so shots very quickly to the internal memory and then transfer them to the memory when you have time.For all that, though, I'm really looking forward to using this camera on a forthcoming sea kayaking and snorkeling trip this summer. With one camera, I'll be able to take snapshots above and below water, also modest videos underwater (there's a special scene selection to do just that)</review_text>
Nice little bag.It fits my JVC everio videocam with the power adapter and my little canon elph with its power adapter.  No room left for the videocam's remote, manuals and misc cables.Good little bag.I would have liked it a weeeee bit bigger so I could fit the extra junkbut otherwise a very good little bag (at a good price)</review_text>
I use this case for carrying a P&S digital camera and accessories.The case is well-designed and crafted. The padding provides ample protection for the contents. The movable divider is padded and makes the case versatile.Lowepro products deliver excellent value for the money. Highly recommended</review_text>
I picked up this bag to actually carry my lager MP3 player and various accessories with it, and it does what I want it to. It has enough pockets and dividers, and if I had a small camcorder or camera I would not hesitate to buy another bag of this size. The other bags this size were about double the price for the same thing. Their are leather types abvailable as well, but why pay the extra for something that is meant to be tough and protect. This case does that, looks good, and not a huge sticker shock.</review_text>
The camcorder bag that I ordered is wonderful! The material it is made from is perfect, the size is just as it should be. I received it quickly and I didn't have any problems so far and I don't think there will be any</review_text>
a real high quality bag for a very low price. well padded and perfect for today's small camcorders. has enough room for necessary accessories(eg. batteries, mini dv tapes, cables, mmc/sd card). good enough to fit my elura 100 and my canon sd700 fitted inside the canon psc-55 deluxe leather cas</review_text>
This bag is very compact, but it can take just about all you need. Got it for my Canon ZR700 camcorder. I can fit in it the camcorder, my Digicam Fujifilm E550, 8 AA batteries and remote controler in front pocket, 2 DVC cassettes in the 2 side pockets and extra memory cards in the inside pocket. If i take out the digicam i can carry the power and video cables of the camcorder in that space. This bag is well made, it protects your equipments very well. I had used Lowepro bags earlier and they have shown to be high quality products.Edit: Got a new Fujifilm Finepix S5200 DSLR like camera and it fit just right in this bag, it's like it was made for this camera. Of course, only the camera can be inside the bag, no space for other digicam, camcorder or accesories. Maybe some filfers at most</review_text>
Very nice. Like the case did not really need it but others fine</review_text>
This wireless mic is quick and easy to setup and transmits clearly. Unfortunately the mic does not come with foam cover to reduce wind noise and the sound of it rubbing on clothing</review_text>
Unlike one other wireless mic, I have used, this one has never yet picked up fluorescent light noise. The battery economy for this mic. is quite good. The transmitter and receiver each use one size AA penlight cell, which seems to last at least 10 hours.I suspect this microphone sometimes picks up cell phone interference from cell phones in the room, since I don't know what else would cause the rare rat-a-tat-tat noise that the receiver picks up. The best advantage of this microphone is that there are seldom any dead spots in the room where the receiver gets a weak signal</review_text>
Nothing crazy.  build quality is kind of cheap feeling. but it works.  there were times where it faded in and out from approx/ 20 ft away. but other than that, it works fine</review_text>
It certainly isn't Hollywood quality, and I wouldn't use it for music.But for interviews, the sound works just fine, especially considering the price.My only real complaint is the clip for the lavalier. Unless you can slip it into a lapel hole, it will generally fall off if your subject moves more than a tiny bit.Bottom line: I'd buy it again for the kind of shooting I do</review_text>
Actually, there is nothing much to review except to say that the product arrived in a condition that I expected.  It is just a rechargeable camera battery</review_text>
With my new camera I needed an adapter to fit on my old Kodak docking station.  The docking stations are great and saves batteries when downloading your pictures</review_text>
I like this product very much. I already had a Kodak printer dock from another Kodak camera. This little device saved me the expense of buying another camera dock printer. Thank you very much Kodak</review_text>
$15.95 on Kodak site.  Strange! The cable is USB to Kodak 4 pin USB not Firewire as some folk tried to say.  Typical cost of Video/Audio is $4, Kodak USB A Kodak/USB/B4 $9 (OEM) $14 (Radio Shack) $19 (kodak) respectively so Should be considered even if you just want a new Cable.Oh Dock Connector Changer works Great!  Use it at work for my report shots.  Doesn't care if you use Kodak Easyshare software or XP Pro Camera Wizard.  Just Works</review_text>
When my DX7590 was stolen I bought a Z7590.  It didn't come with a dock and I still had the dock for the DX, so this was a great solution.  It stands a little taller but the functionality and ease of use are still the same.  It sure beats having to buy a new dock</review_text>
I looked on line at kodak site for this product....they sold it for half the price but were out of stock.   So i spent double to buy it here because i didnt know how long i would have to wait.   It works great</review_text>
I have this for more than a month now. Installed a 256 MB SD card, currently loaded about 800 photos, and configured my albums based on trips and occasions. I set the photo frame on slide show mode and with daily auto on and off settings.1 week ago, I bought another product, Pandigital (7 in) w/ 128 MB built in memory. Philips has far better picture display where Pandigital has an acceptable photo display. When you look closely or stare at the photos, you will immediately see that Philips does not have any of the grainy reproduction. It also has elegant slide show transitions; Pandigital needs to work on their transitions.You just have to be patient when transferring files from your PC to the photo frame, I find myself hitting the reset button more than I really would prefer. I find this no harm to my pictures. This can be resolved by just having your pictures displayed straight or transferred from your card. I just chose the PC method because for easier management of what I needed to be transferred.</review_text>
I've seen some bad digital frames- ones that stretch out the picture, making everyone look fat, or dim displays with bad color. The Philips frame is absolutely the opposite: it's delightfully easy to use and the picture quality is great. Pictures are automatically sized, cropped, even rotated when you turn the frame. I didn't need the software they included. I just dumped a pile of pictures on a CF card (using my camera wired to a computer) and then plugged the card into the frame. The menus in the frame are navigated with a little joystick on the back. It's not the nicest menu system, but I got the hang of it pretty quickly. If you are buying this for Grandma (of course) here's a tip: buy two memory cards so that you can switch photo albums when you visit</review_text>
This product delivers exactly as promised and we could not be more pleased.  The pictures are wonderful.  The initial downloading process was straighforward and problem-free. We actually purchased three photo frames for ourselves and our children and they love them as much as we do.  The slideshow feature is wonderful as well. Everyone of our friends that have seen the photo frame are equally amazed by this product as some were not aware that such a product even existed. To be sure, they are expensive but worth the cost.  We will enjoy our photo frame for years to come as we update with new pictures regularly.  Thanks to the folks at Philips for getting this soooooooooooo right.</review_text>
This is a good product.  I like the way it automatically resizes pictures to fit the full screen.  Image quality is excellent.  It's like always looking at your photo album.  One complaint - the colored trim rings are magnetic and don't line up perfectly due to the magnetism.</review_text>
The Philips 8-Inch Digital Picture Frame is an excellent, high-quality device.  Very easy to get it going - the included cable and computer software make it simple to select digital pictures already stored on your computer and copy them onto the device.  No need to mess around with memory cards - although the device accepts those as well if that works best for you.  Everyone who has seen ours loves it.  It looks great and the picture quality and size are excellent</review_text>
This is a FABULOUS gift for grandparents if you preload the pictures.  Just be aware that the customer support folks are not that knowledgeable, probably since the product is new.  Don't bypass their software to load the pix if you're transferring from your PC to the frame - their software reduces the memory needed for each one. And even though the software for different size frames is labelled the same, it is not compatible and you can only have one version installed on your pc at a time</review_text>
We had ordered this product as a retirment present for a co-worker who was leaving in about a week so we even had Fed Ex shipping.  The product kept showing up as in Order Status & never updated until almost a week later when it was delivered.  Product arrived in excellent condition but we were wondering if it was ever shipped...Amazon or Retailer needs to update shipping info instead of leaving product showing Order status & not shipped</review_text>
My son loves the camera, the only thing I didn't realize that it takes AAA batteries.  I know that there are some cameras similar to my sons that take AA.  Other than that were good.  Thank you</review_text>
We got this camcorder for our daughter for her birthday and she loves it! Her only problem with it is that a memory card is needed because there isn't as much space as she would like and alot of light is needed to film. We were aware of both of these complaints when we purchased it but we were certain that she could work around them. We were also aware of the battery problem, so she got rechargeable batteries. Awesome little camcorder, especially for the price</review_text>
I will be leaving for college this Fall and wanted a little something that was easy to handle to send home videos, or post them.It works great! And I am especially excited about compiling them onto a DVD with my laptop's DVD burner. It's is so tiny it fits in my pocket and it is VERY good on batteries, you will need to buy a scan disk (I suggest 512 MB or 1 GIG) but it still turns out cheaper than a regular clunky sized video camera. Of course it isn't AMAZING quality but it is small enough to take anywhere to capture every and anything.Great deal for the money</review_text>
This camera is awsome cause you can store music on it and take pictures too, one of the only stupid things is... it doesn't work on a tripod so, i suggest you don't buy a tripod if you buy this camera</review_text>
Works really fine for what it's meant to be! A little side pocket to put a filter and spare memory stick would be nice, but is missing. The one I had for my Sony DSC-H1 had it... maybe you should buy the new A100 bag instead</review_text>
Good product, like the price.  This is much less expensive than the current pinseeker 1500 models, I bought it on ebay used for $150 so you may be able to find it for less (look under hunting AND golf rangefinders for this model).  This does not have the pinseeker feature of the newer models but normal mode and scan mode work perfectly for ranging flags that have no reflectors (although you may need to try more than one time and have relatively stable hands).  I was able to range a flag at 270 yards, and was able to range the top of a telephone pole at 375 yards (but it was windy so the flag was straight out and a little cloudy).  I would estimate that this will work for ranging flags on a calm sunny day (these don't work as well on a sunny day because the laser used is a visible light laser and gets a little interference from sunlight) at 215-230 yards for a flag (which is what I need it for).  Less expensive alternative than the pinseeker, and I really like the performance, very impressed.</review_text>
Purchased this unit new for $160.  Good performance - with a little practice, was getting readings well over 800 yards, even in bright sunlight.  Also like the fact that it uses standard AAA cells.The housing design leaves a bit to be desired - it's bulky, and the battery cover is not very secure.  Can see losing the cover easily.  Not as ergonomic as more recent models.Overall, $160 for a rangefinder that has genuine 800 yard performance, is a good deal</review_text>
This product is rugged and forgiving.  Accurate to +/- 1 ft., this is an absolute must have for all serious bowhunters.  Lightweight and easy to use, I find only one minor design flaw.  It is designed for right-handed use and is slightly cumbersome for those who choose to use it as left-handed hunters (I am).  Even with this minor design flaw, I still am very satisfied with this unit and would not hesitate to recommend it to others.  Most encounters are under 50 yards and ease of use and accuracy are critical elements in a hunt.  I harvested a nice elk this year at 52 yards using this unit.  Thanks Bushnell</review_text>
I am a female bowhunter who really had trouble judjing distances on green fields. This is a great product . It is easy to use and very accurate</review_text>
I havent gotten these before but they look like a good pair of binoculars.I suggest adding these to your wish list if you like the outdoors</review_text>
I use this great product when playing golf and while hunting. Plus it is just fun to have and a great discussion item. It is very accurate and precise</review_text>
It's a great Flash.I got it today, still trying to figure out features. It has lots of features to grow with.It looks like Panasonic FZ-30 has limited internal communication with the FL-36. "TTL Auto" and other advance features are not available with this camera.The AUTO setting does a great job. But it would have been great if FZ-30 would have the capability to communicate to get TTL feature.Overall, it's great flash. Charges fast even with regular AA batteries.</review_text>
Bought this flash with my EVOLT 500.  Great flash for most types of typical low light situations and for fill-flash.  It offers all the advanced features for creative lighting such as bounce, diffused light and the angled bounces.  Allows manual settings and works incredibly well in auto settings with camera.  Olympus makes several accessories for this flash to help you get this off the camera and for multiple flash or slave set-ups.   For more power and throw distance, and complete professional capabilities, go with the more expensive FL-50</review_text>
The flash works wonders. My wife and I bought it for my son's 17th b-day and for passing his driving test with one take. He enjoys the flash as it creates nice picture with his new Olympus camera that he got for X-mas</review_text>
I am extremely pleased with this flash. Olympus is well ahead of the curve in digital camera, lens and flash integration. The FL-36 can achieve beautiful photographs that appear to be taken in natural light. I am just beginning to discover its capabilities. You have to spend some time with the manual to fully utilize its features. Before purchasing, I had read complaints about the fact that it utilzes only two AA battries and short battery life. I haven't found this much of a problem, using 2400 mah NI-MH batteries. They're cheap, easy to carry and can be recharged quickly with a fast-charger. It's not cheap or disappointing. I highly recommend</review_text>
I'M VERY SATISFIED WITH THIS PRODUCT, ENHANCE HIGHLY THE PICTURES SHARPNESS IN LOW LIGHT CONDITIONS, I'VE A OLYMPUS SP-350, AND TAKES PICS LIKE PROFESSIONAL CAMERA WITH THIS FLASH!, I HIGHLY SUGGEST THIS PRODUCT FOR EVERYONE THAT DESIRE BETTER PICS IN LOW LIGHT CONDITION! THIS FLASH REACH MORE THAN 30MTS LONG</review_text>
I recently purchased this item for my Evolt 500 and all i can say is wow.  I went to camera store and held both the fl 36 and fl 50 and decided to go with the fl 36.  The fl 36 was alot smaller which I liked.  I'm gonna mainly use it for vacation pictures, birthdays and holidays.  So i really don't need the fl 50.  My opinion, if you're not gonna be shooting weddings, you really don't need the fl 50.  I've noticed that E 500 always had problems focusing in low light.  The camera would search, fire the af illuminator off like crazy, and it still wouldn't focus. Even just focusing in regular indoor lighting was a problem.  This completely solves this problem.  I was able to focus on my girlfriend in complete darkness..  Accurately and quickly.  I was already thinking about getting a different camera in a year or so just because of the low light focusing issue.  But now.. I'll probably use this camera for a good five years, if not more.  Even if you weren't looking for an external flash... buy it.  Just the improvement in low light focusing alone is worth the money.  Recycle is great, i threw in cheap dollar store batteries just so i can use it the first day i brought it and the recycle time is fast enough.  I'm not really trying to shoot night pics at the INDY 500. Stop searching and buy this item. I also recommend the Sto_Fen OM-600 omni-bounce diffuser.  Its made for the Nikon SB600 but if fits perfect on my FL-36.  Nice and snug.  It makes a big difference. TRUST ME, YOU'LL THANK ME IN THE COMMENTS LATER!!!!!!</review_text>
With my Evolt 500, I found the automatic flash that came with the camera would often give a blue hue to photos when the flash came into use.  Finally photos are bright and no longer have the blueish hue.  One thing that isn't mentioned in the other reviews is that no battery comes with this camera.  Make sure you order a battery so you can use this flash right away.</review_text>
The flash works great. I'm thankful it's auto programmed and works off the cameras settings making picture taking quite easy</review_text>
GREAT product, and even better for the price!!  I'm thrilled with the quality and the ease of use.  I love it!  Great for birding, and recommend very highly !!</review_text>
I bought these for bird watching in the yard. The focus on them is a little stiff but I see as well with them as any other binoculars I have used. Overall they seem a good product for the money</review_text>
I bought this so we could get a better look at the birds in our backyard.  We keep it by the kitchen window, and find ourselves using it at least once a week to peek at a feathered friend who is visiting.  Nice clear lens, pretty easy to find objects through them.  Certainly does the job we need it to do.  Don't buy this if you do your birding out in the field - these are not particularly portable nor leightweight and are not meant to be; buy a binocular specifically made for that purpose.Only complaint, and it is minor, is that I find the lens caps to be flimsy and a little hard to use.  We generally just keep them off</review_text>
1. I ordered this very close to Christmas. The data said there would be a three to five business day  delay. The binoculars were mailed out the next day. I recieved notice of the mailing and they arrived in time for Christmas. I am very impressed.2. They were shipped carefully and arrived in good shape</review_text>
This set of binoculars performs as it said it would, and was a fantastic purchase for the price</review_text>
I recently went to New York and found it quiet amazing to watch things from Empire State building. It does not have that adjustability but than that is mentioned in the product description. For the price it goes for it is definitely a very good product</review_text>
We had a bushnell that finally wore out after twenty years, and tech out paced it. I bought a pair of glasses from another vendor, and these. This is a superior set. Easy to adjust, powerful, in fact too powerful for our backyard feeders, we use the compact pair for the yard, and save this for the beach and bird walks. Bushnells are not super compact, but the compact 8 x40 model I bought is going on Ebay this week.good buy, should last another twenty years.If you are a new birder,keep it simple, buy these and several birdbooks, have fun</review_text>
I have bought a few binoculars in the past couple of years. And have been satisfied with only a couple.  These binoculars I am very pleased with. The clarity is very good and the price is terrific.  I have wasted alot of money on some not so good Bushnell binoculars. But this pair was a pleasant surprise</review_text>
This digital camera is the best.  I cannot complain about any aspect of it.  It has a huge amount of modes and settings and additional features to add to pictures as you are taking them.  It's small enough to fit into your pocket and not think about it (it's smaller than a wallet).  It takes excellent pictures that come out looking great, all very high quality.  The huge screen makes it easy to view what you are looking at and has great image quality.  The videos are equally good, with great sound and good picture.  It looks better than just about any other digital camera that I have seen.  Even though I said I cannot complain, there are a few things that slightly annoy me occasionally.  The first is that it flashes twice.  Remember to tell this to people before taking their picture!  After the first flash, people tend to look away, and by the time the second flash comes and the picture is taken, the moment is lost.  This only occurs when the camera is set to "AUTO" mode.  I usually press the menu button and choose a mode.  When you do this, the flashes occur very quickly (you barely notice a gap between them).  Some of the features are very useful.  I use the "backlight" mode quite often.  It allows you to take a picture of something even if there is a bright light in the background.  My only other complaint is for those of us with large fingers, the circular button that operates pretty much every feature can be difficult to use (sometimes I push 2 buttons at once, or the complete wrong one).  But everything else that this camera can do cancels it out.  This camera has more features and better quality than many larger and more expensive cameras out there</review_text>
Firstly, I love its black all-metal body. I also love its ergonomics and size. I've own other digital P/S and SLRs. They are all good cameras, but big in size. I tend to bring the L60 with me everywhere I go (e.g. biking, hiking, etc.) for convenience.On the inside, it was also beautiful. I've ordered prints upto 11x14 and they turned out beautiful. Using a 2GB SD card, it also allowed me to record more than 1.5 hours of 640x480 video in MPEG4 at 30 FPS. If you need a small, robust camera that you can take everywhere you go and still takes beautiful pictures, this is it</review_text>
so far i've had this camera for about a week and im am pleased with everything. its actually my 10th digital camera and i think i've finally found one that i like. it takes beautiful pictures, film good movies and it also has great sound. Its also smaller than any other camera i've bought and better looking. i think it takes pictures better at night though and sometimes that a good thing. buy it cause its very nice!!</review_text>
This is the 3rd digital camera I use, and it really is impressive.Here are the highlights:-First off I LOVED the Video Feature, you get a decent 640X480 with SOUND, and since the camera is so small , you'll always be able to capture those special moments, it also comes with a USB cable to connect to the PC and a cable to connect the camera to a T.V (has video and audio out)-The rechargable LiOn Battery that also comes with a charger is a very nice feature, digital cameras are notrious battery drainers, I had a separate budget for Batteries (AA) for my former camera, and those aint cheap!- so you wont worry about this with this one.-it also has a voice recorder so you can record notes when you are taking still photos.on the negative sides:- you need to buy a separate SD memory because the high resolution stills and the videos take a lot of memory, you'll need AT LEAST 512MB, better yet go for the 1GB.-The special effects button on the back of the camera is kinda useless, It can turn the pictures into monochrome, B/W. sepia etc. or negative,_ the biggest negative thing I found is it takes way too long to actually capture the picture even on the low res. the flash goes on twice for red eye reduction( very impressive results) but the whole process is slooow, so you end up not taking the shot you intended , I am still trying to figure out how to disable this feature so it takes photos faster.this may be the only real negative feature of this camera.</review_text>
Bought this camera for my teenage daughter who wanted something sleek.  The camera is all that and powerful too.  Photo quality is excellent and the camera is easy to operate.  The video feature works very well, also.  My daughter found the controls intuitive enough that she hardly had to look at the user manual.  Battery life is good although you can't charge it without removing the battery.  Extracting and inserting the battery is pretty straightforward and is not as inconveinient as you might think.  This is an easy pick for a solid, versatile camera</review_text>
for the price and the size i am very pleased with the digimax l6</review_text>
I purchased the Targus Digital TGB-LI42B battery to use with my Olympus Stylus 750 camera. I used from Thanksgiving through the holidays and on a trip to the mountains and Sequoia in California. It actually seemed to last longer than the Olympus battery that came with the camera. I am well pleased with it and am considering ordering another as I am planning a trip to the Boundary Waters this year where there are no electrical outlets to recharge the battery not currently in the camera</review_text>
I decided I wanted this a while before i got it. As I read reveiws I realized majority of them were postive. There is nothing wrong with it, the microphone works really good but you can not watch your videos with sound on the camera. It can take around 300 some pictures and about 60 minutes of video on Super sine mode, where it uses the most megapixels. It is definetly something I would recommend for anyone</review_text>
This camera is fun to use and easy too.  It is a great size to keep in my coat pocket at all times.  Also with a 1 GB memory card I can take many many pictures and the battery lasted a few weeks before needing recharge.  Overall this is a good buy and value.</review_text>
The controls on this camera are not hard to figure out.It is fun to haveall the little things you can do with the pictures and being 12 almost 13,photogerphy is somthing I love to do with this camera.If you think thiscamera is to complicated,well you didnt read the instruction guide very well</review_text>
I purchased for 9 yr old and it's a great camera.  Takes excellent qulaity.  Battery life is good.  My Cannon and Nikon are really no better.  she takes pictures of everything and never a flaw.  Seems to be a very sturdy camera built very well.  I bought becasue the Samsung name.  I have purchased many Samsung products before and was very happy with them.  I've used theri customer service for other products and I've found them quick in respnse and helpful.  I would recommend this camera for any age child or adult.  +++ The only thnig I don't like is the lens does not cover when off.  I have not experienced any problems but I am keeping an eye out just in case.  I still recommend this quality camera</review_text>
daughter has had a great time using it.Size makes it easy to take it anywhere</review_text>
I have a great DSLR that I use for "real" photography, but there are times you just want to throw a camera in your pocket and go.  The Samsung Digimax is great for that.  At 5 MP it great for family get-togethers, business travel, kids playing, pets being pets, etc.  I'm not thrilled that it didn't come with a case. It would be nice just to have a little pouch - even if it adds a couple bucks to the price.  And perhaps I'm spoiled with my "good" camera, the zoom leaves a little to be desired in the clarity department.  Transferring to your computer is SUPER easy.  I didn't even install the software that came with it on any of my machines.I bought one for my mother in law as well, so I recommend this camera for the non-tech savvy person.  She's been able use it with no issue.  I'd also recommend it as a second camera</review_text>
Hi....I purchased this camera for my daughter after looking at several "in person" at Best Buy and then looking far and wide on the net.  this camera was her choice and she has loved using it.  So, while, I've not used it myself I can safely say that this was a good purchase at a good price.  Also the black case makes it quite "hip" or at least I'm told since at 65 my "hipness" days maybe behind me! &lt;g</review_text>
This camera is small, easy to use, and perfect for the price. It has so many features. The one thing I love is that the date is on every picutre even when you print it out. I recommend this camera to everybody</review_text>
It's an AC adapter.  One end plugs into the wall, the other end plugs into the camera.  It's pretty hard to screw up</review_text>
This is a must for the Nikon Cameras, battery don't last that much and instead of having to change them all the time, I just plug it in for still shots or photo shoots and click away</review_text>
This camera is very small, sleek and light. It takes great pictures with a lot of features. Only has 3x zoom but can zoom much farther once picture has been taken. I have used Olympus in the past and have never had a problem with their products. :</review_text>
The camera works great, especially with the under water case for it.  I love the item, and it fits very nicely in a pocket for going out and having a camera to get pictures with too</review_text>
This little beauty really does do everything that it claims. There are so many shooting formats that you are spoilt for choice. The only problem i have is that there are so many formats that it will take me a lot of practice to be able to pull a fast point & shoot in anything other than normal light. I tend to do better with less choices but many people will undoubtedly love it. However, the internal guide is very helpful -- it will choose the format you need if you have a few moments to consult it.Its size is perfect and the body feels good in your hand. Huge viewscreen for the size.With a 1 gig card and extra battery, i'm set for travel</review_text>
This camera is very nice. I actually bought it for my g/f and she loves it. When it first arrrived I got to mess w/ it a bit before giving it up to her. I really enjoyed the different settings to take the picutres. Its great cause usually you get those shots that are way too bright because of the flash or too dark because of no flash. This camera takes care of both problems  easy. I even enjoyed the software it came w/. The only problem I had was when you upload the pictures to the computer be sure you push the "safely remove hardware" button or you will end up getting the camera to say there is more pictures  on the camera than there are. This was easy to solve though. Theres a way you can clear the camera memory but Im not sure I remember how. So that problem was more user error than product problems. Great camera and a great price. It might not be the same prices since I got it from the electronics expo so it was knocked down in price but it has to be worth the original price.So theres my review. Not in depth but to the point. Good enough</review_text>
-This camara picture quality is Nice, and depend on user purpose. My gf is kinda satify with it.-Function is easy to use.-Battery life is so so.-Battery charger design is not convenience. You have the put the battery into the batter charger. recommand to get a cradle charger, but extra cost. It should sell with cradle charger.</review_text>
I have had this camera for about six months and I still find new features to play with. One of my favorite mode is the sequence shots. I love its sleek design and its durable shell. I carry the camera in my back pocket, even in my tightest jeans. This is a great camera</review_text>
it is what it is but works as an easy to carry compact tripod, comes in hand</review_text>
A similar tripod I owned was great if it's paint hadn't begun chipping after 1.5 year of gentle use; since I've only had this tripod for about 2 months, I hope Sony's paint is more durable! Otherwise, this is one of the shortest compact tripods that becomes one of the longest when its legs are fully extended. This makes for better camera height and angle versatility especially when used on or at near ground level. It's also sturdy enough to hold any typical (not just Sony) point and shoot digital camera (I have not used it with a camcorder) stable even if mounted sideways for vertical pictures. Furthermore, this is the only tripod I found that comes with a pouch; it's wonderful in avoiding scratches and other damage if you tend to store your camera and its accessories in one bag.</review_text>
I bought this item on a whim before a trip to Europe in case we wanted to take some pictures of us on the trip.  It turned out to be one of the best ideas I had for the trip.  It is small, so it can easily be carried around in a bag or even your pocket and is light so you don't even notice it.When it proved immensely valuable was taking picture in low light situations.  I have a tendency to shake a bit, so I get blurry pictures quite often.  Long exposure times in low light situations compound the problem even further.In many of the old churches and in a few museums they allow pictures, but with no flash (as the flash ruins the art).  I was able to get some great pictures because I was able to set up the tiny tripod and allow the camera to sit perfectly still for the 2 to 4 seconds for the exposure to finish.It also took some great pictures at night of dimly lit monuments as again the ability to aim and hold perfectly still for those couple of seconds is key to great pictures.</review_text>
You will be amazed to see the difference in clarity between a photo shot without a tripod and with a tripod.  A tripod is a must.  This cute little tripod from Sony makes the job easier to carry it around along with your camera.  I gave it a 4 star because sometimes the tripod is not able to hold the weight of the camera and tends to fall.  I have a Sony DSC-P200 camera which is very light-weight.  This tripod is not able to hold the weight of such a light camera.  You can't use it for your heavier cameras or camcorders..</review_text>
This small tripod has proved to be quite useful.  First, because of its size, it is absolutely portable, fitting into the side pocket of camera bag.  It has allowed me to setup stable shots even when visiting places where carrying a full-size tripod is not possible or at least not convenient.I also use my digital video camera to shoot still photography of small electronic components.  This mini-tripod has been wonderful for these shots, as it allows the camera to still be very close up to the subject and yet still mounted on a stable surface.  And, trust me, when shooting such a small subject, any hand jitters show up every time.  I definitely recommend this to anyone using digital cameras, whether video or still photography.  It's a very handy piece of aluminum to have with you</review_text>
great addition to my sony V1.  very sturdy.  well built.  looks great.  it comes with a carrying case and a soft towel to wipe it down with. overall good</review_text>
The picture quality is good, but when you take the flash off you have to hold still to take a picture or it will blur. If you have the flash on and you are moving or are in a car taking a picture it will not blur.Overall i really like this camera and the wide viewing screen is awesom</review_text>
This camera is so cool!  It's small enough to carry around in my purse.  It's very intuitive to learn to use.  The Kodak website contains loads of information that is user friendly.  Most of all the pictures are beautiful</review_text>
Is it possible to be in love with an inanimate object? Because I am!!! I love the wide angle lens on this camera, it just makes the pictures look more professional whether your doing landscapes and portraits or just having a night out at the bar. I'm not a big fan of their red eye technology, but the rest makes up for it. You can use the fish eye lens, sepia for an aged look, or spotlight. It also enhances your pictures with Perfect Touch, if you so choose, and your pictures become more vibrant (helpful if they were taken in a dark setting. Plus you have about 26 different portrait settings to choose from (landscape, action, night, portrait....) It was a great buy for me. And it's very sleek and easily fits in a pocket</review_text>
This is about the 5th digital camera I have owned and I think that none have compared to the quality vs price as this one. I was a little frightened by some of the reviews but after getting this camera I have taken about 200 pics in the last 4-5 days (learning how to use the different settings) and I am really pleased that I ordered it. As with all new products you buy you have to learn how they work. The more options, the more to learn. I was impressed with the movie quality also in that most cameras do not have that great of quality. I converted the Quicktime to WMA for DVD and they looked great on a big screen TV. The only little drawback I see is the door to the card that I am very careful when opening.I have always carried a couple spare batteries and if you buy a charger and keep them charged there is no problem. This I think is true with all battery based items with a lot of use. I also keep 3-4 extra cards for storage. You don't depend on flashlights and not keep extra batteries or blame the flashlight when it quits</review_text>
Before I bought this camera, I was worried about some of the reviews. I guess you can't please everyone. As long as you can recharge the camera, or carry a spare li-ion battery, you will be fine. The zoom is great, but the really outstanding feature of this camera is the wide angle lens. You won't be just using it for those indoor family shots-- it is great outdoors too, taking in additional scenery without distortion. The panorama feature is easy to use, too. I took 245 pictures in 7 days and love this camera</review_text>
there are a lot of canon lovers who like to post negative reviews on other camera brands.  well, this camera has a unique feature that other brands don't have--in-camera stitching of up to three wide angle shots so that you get a great superwide panoramic shot right out of the camera.  no computer is needed.  and yes, you can save the shots individually if you want to stitch them on a computer.  just save three individual 23 mm shots--it is not rocket science.  comments that the camera lacks RAW are silly--this is not a big, bulky dSLR or a really sophisticated camera with lots of manual controls--sorry, but that is not the target for this camera--it is a pocket camera that takes easy, wide angle shots and panoramics.  RAW is for people who want to fine tune pictures on their computers.so, in sum, this is a great camera for shooting scenery and when indoors, getting all the folks in the picture without having to back up far away.  i highly recommend it!  (and Kodak's colors are wonderful!</review_text>
This is a great camera!  Finally someone has made a camera that takes in the whole field of view, not just a small portion of it.  Also the image quality is excellent.  I took some pictures in a low lighted restaurant without a flash and they came out extremely well.  In normal lighting conditions the pictures are sharp and the color is excellent.  The screen menu is also very intuitive and easy to use.On the down side, there are a few minor issues.  First, it is rather annoying that the focal length jumps from 23mm all the way to 39mm and then zooms up from there.  I would have preferred that the second lense began at 32mm or 34mm rather than at 39mm so that more of the mid-range was available.  Second, the battery is rather small.  I would have preferred that the battery was larger so it would last longer.  I haven't had an issue with the battery running out on me, but I know it would last longer if it were bigger.  Third, (and this is an issue for all pocket cameras, not just the V705), I wish someone would make a camera case that had a belt clip as well as a battery pocket.  I haven't been able to find that anywhere for any of my pocket cameras.All in all, this is a great camera.  I also own a Canon SD300 (which is also a great camera) but I find that I take the V705 with me most of the time because of the beautiful wide angle shots it takes.</review_text>
I love this camera case! It is manufactured from very fine materials. It is very soft to the touch while being protective of my camera. The craftsmanship is outstanding. It is well worth the purchase price and then some</review_text>
I bought this case for my new Kodak Digital Z700 camera.  It is a perfect fit. Prior to purchasing the case, I read several reviews.  Many were slightly negative, saying the camera didn't fit properly in the case.  A few people said that they're glad they didn't listen to the other reviews because the case was a perfect fit for them.  I'm in the latter category.  This case is a perfect size for me...the way the Z700 fits in it, and the ease of carrying it around</review_text>
the quality is good, but the case had so much padding inside it could not hold my Z740.  The padding is removal tho so I got it to fit.It lost a star becase the advertised dimensions are of the case without the padding or the external dimensions which is not useful</review_text>
basically, the 70-300 ED is the perfect complement to the 18-70 kit lens for the nikon d series. it's worth having because of the 1.5 mag factor which means it's actually a 105-450mm, which gives you plenty of reach. add a teleconverter and you can get to 900mm (!). general consensus is it's also better than the 70-300 G lens, although if you're on a budget or don't plan on using telephoto that much, the extra $250 might be better spent elsewhere (like the 50mm 1.8 prime and/or a flash). this is a mid-level nikon lens with ED glass and decent build quality--not cheap, but not tank-like either. the lens extends way out at 300 mm, and you have to twist the manual focus ring (which is a bit stiff) to get it to fully retract. the plastic lens hood is big and has a cheap feel (not lined with velvet like tokina), but reverses for carrying around.still, it's nice and sharp with good bokeh and a reasonable value--if you want better bokeh, go for a long prime. no macro capability like the cheaper sigma APO variant but sometimes lenses are better if you don't ask them to do too much.optical quality is pretty consistent through the entire zoom range, which is a good thing; definitely a nice piece of glass, although not a head-turner. it's not a quick lens at 4-5.6, but what did you expect for $400? a 2.8? yeah right.with a steady grip, it's usable handheld out to 200mm; beyond that shake is noticeable. the rubber grip ring balances nicely on objects without worrying about scratching the finish for braced shots. if you plan on using it handheld fully extended, consider the VR version, although you'll still want a tripod for longer exposures. 70mm is a bit tight on the wide end, but passable for portraits. for a non-macro, it lets you get reasonably close with a shallow depth of field. no noticable lens creep. not super lightweight, but not too heavy either. doesn't take up much more room in the bag then the 18-70. middle-of-the road in most categories, except for optical performance, which is above average. good for nature or wildlife w/tripod, or for law-enforcement/private detectives, handheld "stakeout" surveillance shots (which don't require perfect clarity). if you plan on using it for sports or action in low light, good luck -- use a speedlight and a tripod/monopod, set up at a spot, lock focus, and wait for subject to come into view. wouldn't recommend it for tracking quick-moving objects beyond 200mm.the 70-300 ED is super-sharp stopped down to 5.6-8, beyond that performance didn't really improve; the images just got a bit more resonant. bottom line, you can get some nice long shots with this lens, which should be good enough for casual enthusiasts and prosumers. it's not a pro lens, but then again, it doesn't cost what a pro lens does. you might be able to find it used for a fraction of the price, but it might be worth it to get the warranty</review_text>
First, I'm giving this 70-300mm lens a 5 stars rating partly because the price is quite attractive especially the used ones (the G version of the lens is even more cheaper and picture quality isn't too much different with this ED glass version in my opinion).If your primary objective is to take pictures in low light situation such as wedding and concert, then get the 80-200mm f/2.8 or the 70-200mm VR f/2.8 instead.Get this lens (or it's cheaper brother the 70-300mm G) by any means unless you already have those alternative and more expensive zoom lenses that I mentioned above.Pros:1. Inexpensive (with the VR version is released, many will sell this one)2. You can get up close and personal (300mm which is equivalent to 450mm if you attach it to a DSLR)3. Very sharp and fast in bright light situation (outdoor etc), though it gets a bit softer as you get closer to the 300mm4. Very light5. Bokeh is suprisingly good6. Great for portrait7. ED glass for better contrast and picture quality8. Metal mountCons:1. Though more solid build than the 70-300mm G version, the external part of this lens is still made from plastic. (but I don't think you should care on this)2. Very bad on low light situation especially if the object is moving/sports photography, but still works fine for long exposure with tripod like photographing fireworks or night light building/city/car lights.3. Focus seems to be slower on low light situation (focus hunting a bit more)Bottom line: this lens loves a lot of light.If you give this lens a lot of light, it will take good care of you.Last but not least, after you get this lens, go and buy the nikon 50mm f/1.8 AF-D prime lens for $100 or less (equivalent of 75mm if used with DSLR which is very good for portrait and semi-zoom). This is a very fast lens and works extremly well in low light situation even without using flash. This lens will complement your 70-300mm ED lens very very well.Also check out the 70-300mm G (half the price of ED) and the 70-300mm VR (released Oct 2006). VR feature works really well on static object.  If the obect is moving then you will be better off with fast lens like the 50mm f/1.8 AF-D, 80-200mm f/2.8 AF or the 70-200mm VR f/2.8 AF-SHappy photographing!</review_text>
I used this lens for about a year with both film and digital.  In general, it's a decent lens for the price.  Even though it's ED (extralow dispersion), I do get purple fringing on high-contrast subjects at long (telephoto) zoom.  Since I do wild bird photography, this would show up as purplish bird beaks and twigs against a bright sky.  Annoying.  On the other hand, it has produced some excellent portraits and even wildlife photos where contrast wasn't excessive.Doing a side-by-side test w/ the help of a camera store and a D70, I compared this lens to both 80-400/5.6 VR (nikon) and Tamron 200-500/6.3.  All three were "good", but the Nikon VR was sharpest (Tamron roughly similar to ED), and also lost the least contrast (Tamron somewhere in the middle, ED worst), and the ED and Tamron lenses both appeared to kill color very slightly (not a big deal). Only the ED showed purple fringe w/ high contrast.But although the 70-300 ED wasn't stellar in these tests, I still prefer it for backpacking due to the low weight and size (and robustness), and I rely on the 80-400 VR for serious wildlife photography where I can tolerate the weight/size in exchange for image stabilization and sharp optics.</review_text>
In addition to the review above - The D version passes distance data to the body for flash use, and the G does not.  Also, the D version has a metal bayonet mount, the G is plastic.The build on both is very light and "plasticy".  I have used the "D" version on a D2H and D2X with surprisingly good results considering the cost.The G may still be a better value, but at least consider these differences in addition to those mentioned in the other review.</review_text>
I'm interested in the lens, heard it's great, the price is good. However I can't find in the description whether it's a grey market lens, which may or may not be covered by Nikon's warranty and I believe has a one year warranty, or a USA warranty, which I believe has a three year warranty. Either way, the description needs to clarify this. Other large internet vendors (reputable) offer either types of lens and charge about 10 or 15 percent more for the USA warranty</review_text>
One thing about the otherwise excellent stock lens that comes with the D70 package is that the telephoto is not really very telephoto.  At 70 mm you are just about at life size so you don't get much pull for distance, and if you're taking people pictures, you want something that will enhance faces more, and give you more flexibility when shooting things farther away.  This is your lens.  The picture quality is excellent and it picks up where the stock lens leaves off, so in combination with the two lenses, you're going from an 18mm to 300mm.  Picture quality is excellent, what you'd expect in a Nikon lens in this price range.  Cons:  it's a large heavier lens, it has a funny hood over the front of it, which I haven't been able to divine the purpose, but it's not that obnoxious, and at f/4-5.6, you really need a good quantity of light for it.  But if you're looking for a lens that will give you the magnification you find missing in the stock lens, then this is it.  The price is very good for the quality you're getting</review_text>
Have had the camera about 1 year now & I LOVE it. It takes every good pictures. Bought the camera dock later but I LOVE that to. The printer dock prints out the pictures every good.Going to Vegas  this year so I will be taking alot of pictures with the camer</review_text>
I bought the camera and picture printer for my 9-year old grandson.  He quickly mastered it and is taking beautiful pictures with minimal supervision.  The only problem is that the paper and ink kits are expensive</review_text>
This camera is fantastic! When I compare printed photos from this camera with other 5MP cameras, I find the quality superior. The battery lasted for a week in the Bahamas with no recharge and several hundred pictures taken (just follow the directions and use the proper batteries!!) The printer dock is easy to use and prints very nice quality pictures fairly quickly. The cost is about $0.30 per print, but a great deal if your looking for high quality prints immediately! I think this camera is great!!</review_text>
I used them last night to see sky at 20:00. I saw very clear Orion and its Nebula, Pleiades star cluster, saturn, venus.Not very good to use holding them by hand. So make sure to use a heavy tripod.Next step: a reflector telescope.</review_text>
I bought these for my boyfriend so that he could use them to watch everything from shore birds to stars, and they are perfect. This is a great product, you can see anything with these binoculars and focusing is very easy.  Does take a little getting used to the weight, but they are a great, much more flexible alternative to a telescope, and so is the price</review_text>
Just be aware the maginfication is such that it takes very steady hands, especially for distance viewing.  Sure, you can bring it to a ball game and count the players' nose hairs, but the field of vision is better suited for fixed sky objects, long-distance spotting, or (fairly motionless) birds.  A tripod is strongly recommended</review_text>
I was looking for a good set of "cheap" binos for astronomical use.  Most reports suggest not going over 10x magnification in order to ensure stability while hand-holding the binos, but there were enough reports that these were usable while held that I went with them.For my money, these are absolutely amazing.  While it is true that the outer 25% (give or take) of the field of view is soft and blurry, the field of view itself is so large that this was of little impact.  The optics are multi-coated, and honestly, the coatings leave a bit to be desired, and while my daylight testing made me wonder whether or not these would be passable binos for stargzing, first light with the night sky blew me away.The light gathering power of the 70mm objectives is sufficient to bring the Milky Way to new life even from my light polluted suburban skies, M42 is a wonder to behold, and I actually found that, even only about 1/4 visible, the moon was so bright I couldn't look at it for extended periods.Hand-holding these binos is not a problem.  They're lighter than I expected, and I actually had an easier time hand-holding these than I have had with other, much lower power binos.As an all-around pair of binos for stargazing, these things get my vote for "best value."  I haven't had them long enough to talk about longevity and that may ultimatley influence my opinion, but for under $100, it's hard to go wrong with these</review_text>
I ordered these about two weeks ago and just started using them to view the moon (YOWZER--do they bring in the light!) and to view raptors, ducks, and other birds a half mile across a section of the Susquehanna River below the Conowingo Dam.  I was floored by how well these did. I can not only see incredible detail on birds in the middle of the river on small islands, but birds completely on the other side sitting in trees.  My husband was able to identify a blue jay sitting in the shrubs on the opposite bank.  They are NOT heavy to use without a tripod.  I have arthritis in both hands and could use them easily, propping my elbows occasionally on a nearby fence, but that was just to steady myself in the brisk wind, NOT because they were too heavy.  I am very happy I did not go with my first instinct to get a spotting scope and tripod.  I was walking from spot to spot easily, picking out different winter visitors, while another fellow viewing birds had to keep folding up his spotting scope and tripod, moving, unfolding tripod, resetting scope--too annoying!This works very well at the half-mile distance I am using it, and closer distances are a delight!  Very pleased with this buy</review_text>
I purchased these binoculars for night sky viewing.  I had a pair of 10X50 Bushnell binoculars and I was impressed with what I was able to see through those so I bought these for even more in depth viewing and they have not let me down.  They are ideal as supplements to a telescope or if you don't have a telescope, these are great for your first introduction to optics that will open up the night sky to you.  They are much easier to use than a telescope and you can see all kinds of neat things.  I viewed such things as the Orion Nebula, the Andromeda galaxy, the Pleiades, and double stars such as Mizar and Alcor in Ursa Major with relative ease and they looked stunning.  Focus these binoculars in on the Milky Way and you will tons of stars you wouldn't be able to see otherwise.  I was even able to look at Saturn and with some steadying of the binoculars against my chest, could slightly make out the definition of the rings.  These binoculars also do a magnificent job of viewing the moon.I had read some reviews that they are really heavy and bulky, but I found that they were surprisingly light and easy to steady free handed.  They are quite large, which means that they will take up more space than a normal binocular, but this is to be expected.  Mine did come with a carrying case and a tripod adapter (which I haven't used yet, so I cannot comment on its quality).Overall, for the price, you can't go wrong.  I've used these binoculars in the daytime and they are great--crystal clear optics.  They also seem very durable and with some care, will probably last you many many years.  If you are new to stargazing and are considering a good pair of binoculars that will show you all kinds of wonderous things, look no further than the Celestron Skymasters--you will not be disappointed.</review_text>
Like so many before me, I've experienced the white-screen problem with the DSC-S40 as well...fortunately, it happened after 10 months of use, so I was able to make use of the warranty.  I had my parents send it in, they had a few issues and frustrations with getting it sent back to them, but it worked fine afterward.Until now, that is.Yesterday, out of seemingly nowhere, the screen started to act strangely.  I usually take black & white pictures...while the white portions would remain somewhat intact, the black areas were replaced with various ugly shades of blue and there were streaks all over the image.  When I uploaded the pictures to my computer, they turned out fine, but now I'm scared that the screen will die on me again.  A little tap on the logo was enough to fix it for now (I give thanks to whoever put the suggestion out there), but these problems shouldn't even exist, especially after not even 15 months of use.As much as I may like the camera for its ease of use and the quality of its pictures, and although it has served me well through over 15,000 shots, I'd advise people to stay away from it...it's more trouble than it's really worth in the long run</review_text>
Although, I haven't gotten the white screen...yet, I had a problem with opening the battery latch. Maybe a spring broke or something, anyway, I called sony to have them fix it. They were going to charge me over $100 to fix it...finally today, I got a butter knife and pryed it open.FINALLY AFTER 4 MONTHS OF BEING CAMERALESS, IT OPENED! And I was going to pay for them to fix it. Battery life is minimum, but other than that ish, great camera :] lasted me in Japan, and got great pictures</review_text>
I bought this as an extra battery for my new Kodak EasyShare One.  It lasts a long time and recharges quickly.  If you are in the market for a quality camera battery, this is it</review_text>
I haven't received the charger that I originally payed for as of August 18th, 2006.  I keep getting updated messages to review the shipping date.I just want the charger since I purchased 2 canon cameras.  Please getback to me an update on the charger. I still want it.Robert. W. Lov</review_text>
Why ?Because i never recieved the item i ordered.I recieved a " Globe Trotter" charger. It charges okay but runs hot</review_text>
Have only used the charger and batteries for a couple of months but can say that the charger works quickly. It charges 4 batteries in 2 hours or so. The charger is compact and light. The batteries last a long time--for 500 shots or more--in a Cannon 2S IS camera. I haven't made any comparison to similar chargers or batteries</review_text>
This charger works great.  compact design with flip down plug, and a indicator light that shows it charging and when its complete.   Very Happy with this product</review_text>
This charger is very compact and sturdy.  The prongs to connect to the electric outlet fold into the case which is a very nice feature</review_text>
I had a Kodak Easy Share 7300, which I loved, but the pieces on the battery compartment broke off and it wouldnt stay closed, so I had to buy a new one. I spent a few days researching cameras within my budget, and my mom had an HP and she liked it, so I decided to try it. I love it. Its so simple to use, the software is easy to install and easy to use once you try to transfer your pics from the camera to computer. I have not yet tried to print a pic, but everything else about the camera is wonderful.Its small and fits in your hand, the zoom is decent, the picture quality changes when you use max zoom, but the pics still come out pretty good. The only feature I dont like as much is that when you are looking through the LCD display, when you move the camera, its a little blurry and doesnt focus right away. Everything else is wonderful and I am very very happy with my camera</review_text>
I actual bought this for my 15 year old niece, got it for just over $100 @ circuit city. I gotta say so far I'm impressed, it take's great pictures, can zoom in before/after picture taking, and has audio/video capability's as well as web cam. Now I have a Canon Powershot A75, which I love, and has more ability's then this camera, but for the price and if your new to digital I would recommend</review_text>
There's really not much else to say.  Perhaps I can review a hex nut next. ;-</review_text>
This is my first SLR camera.  I'm pleased I choose the Sony A100 Digital SLR Camera.  I purchased the Sony 75-300mm f/4.5-5.6  Compace Super Telephoto Zoom Lens for it. I've taken wild life, landscapes, luna, and celestial pictures.  I have been amazed are the sharpness of the photos.  I would recommend it to a friend.</review_text>
Recently, I moved from the SONY DSC 707 to the SONY A 100 DSLR.  The change in cameras from the Cybershot to the DSLR took some getting used to.  I purchased the SONY 75-300mm Telephoto lens from Amazon and as soon as it arrived I attached the lens and began to use it.I am definitely pleased with the lens, the price and it's capabilities.Having used a SLR for almost 30 years, moving to the DSLR takes some time and patience.  The SONY A 100 is a solid perfomer, and it is my fourth SONY digital camera.For the avid photographer, the SONY 75-300mm Telephoto lens is priced well and will provide exceptional performance.  Once you attach the lens you will discover when in maximum telephoto mode, the lens is quite long. If you attach the lens shade it's even longer and takes some handling considerations in tight spaces.The extreme focusing speeds of the A 100 are rapid and vary as it adjusts to the optimim focus.  The lens in AUTO mode is in constant adjustment. This focus issue takes some getting used to.  The lens balances quite nicely on th A 100. As with most photographers, you need to find the best hand positions on the camera body and lens so you can feel comfortable while you shoot.  The lens is ultra depth of field sensitive.Having had the lens on the camera now for a month, I am beginning to adjust to its "sometimes hyper adjustment activity"!  I am in no way disappointed in the lens because the telephoto shots I have kept and recorded are first rate with the SONY A 100 and the SONY 75-300mm lens.As with all new cameras, it takes time to become familiar with the camera settings and lens activity.  I highly recommend the lens with an awarness of it's sensitivity and length.  After hours of shooting I am pleased with the lens, and SONY's attention to detail in both lens construction and performance.  If you own a SONY A 100 DSLR, or plan to invest in the SONY DSLR system, this lens will not let you down.  You will review your photos and be pleased with the results the SONY lens provides you.I intend to invest in other SONY lens in the future.  As for now, the two SONY lenses fulfill my photographic needs quite nicely.  SONY has entered the DSLR market with an outstanding camera and quality accessories.</review_text>
According to a photo magazine, this is a cosmetically re-labelled Konica Minolta 75-300 (D) zoom telephoto, which is a lens that I own (it certainly looks exactly the same as the KM 75-300 lens, but with the 'Sony' name).  In which case, I have the following review:(1)  Excellent construction quality, this is a very nicely made lens, excellent finish, not too heavy but solid and without the 'plastic' feel of many medium-priced lenses;(2)  Excellent optical quality, with good sharpness even at the longest 300mm focal length where most zooms begin to show poor quality;(3)  VERY UNUSUAL:  near-zero distortion throughout the entire range of focal lengths (very different from some Sigma zooms that I own, which have conspicuously visible pincushion distortion).  This may well be the lowest-distortion 75-300 telephoto from any maker.(4)  ONE CAVEAT:  AUTOFOCUS IN LOW LIGHT: on my Minolta Maxxum 7 film camera, whose autofocus system is apparently quite similar to the Sony Alpha 100, the camera has difficulty autofocussing the 75-300 lens at the 300 mm setting (where the aperture is only f/5.6) in light weaker than direct sunlight.  This is probably the same with any f/5.6 or slower lens.  I have found myself switching to manual focus at the 300 mm setting if the subject is not brightly lit.NOTE:  the Konica Minolta 75-300 (D) lens is still available, for about $140, and reportedly will work with the Sony Alpha 100 just as well as the similar lens labelled Sony</review_text>
There isn't much more to say here. This is a superb little camera, definately worth a 10 on Cnet, not the 7.0 that their review gave it! They completely got it wrong with their rating because this camera definitely deserves at least an 8.0! On here, it also gets my 5 stars!As far as the Pros go on this camera (28mm Wide Angle, 10x Optical Zoom, 3'' LCD, IS, Built-in Lens Cover), it's exactly as good as it sounds! Real life needs for real life situations for real people that loves superb photos and having the right camera to capture those moments.On the Cons side (No manual controls, No zoom in Video Mode, Average Battery Life), those are practically the only things a more ADVANCED user would care about. Manual controls are mostly for expert photographers as white balance and exposure settings are already in this camera, so I don't know what else you need. Zooming in video mode isn't important to me since I don't particularly take much video footage. And I only say average battery life because I tend to look through the photos I already shot pretty often without using the power save on the LCD, therefore, that's particularly what drains the battery. However, you usually get @ 250-270 shots per charge, without frequent previewing.Panasonic has basically taken the original TZ1 and made it even better. There's not much missing from this camera. As I've said, 28mm Wide Angle LEICA Lens, 10X Optical Zoom, 3" High Resolution Screen, Excellent Image Stabilization, etc. All this in a fairly compact camera. Panasonic has also improved the "noise" on higher ISO's. Low light performance is much better than on previous Panasonic models. The most important this is, the camera takes fantastic pictures.Another thing I'm extremely impressed with  is the construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. I love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously can't believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen without even printing them with the high resolution output. Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness and want that "Canon-like look," you could always use the camera on "Vivid Mode."It's also not much bigger or heavier than your overpriced Sony's. Plus, on here, I found it for three hundred, with a high speed 1GB Panasonic card included. What's better than that?! The only accessory I have to buy now is just the DMW-CT3-K, the leather case specifically for this camera.You really can't find the perfect digital camera, but this comes as close as you can get. Overall, I am extremely pleased. If you are looking for a great zoom camera in a small  enough form factor, you should seriously consider the DMC-TZ3. This is the best compact camera I've ever owned</review_text>
I really like this camera. It has 10x optical, image stabilization, a 3.0inch lcd with 230,000 pixels, and more. The size is great for a 10x zoom camera. Image stabilization and is great for getting shots that would come out blurry with my Canon Powershot A620. My other favorite feature besides the zoom and image stabilization, is the wide angle. It is great to finally get cityscapes and have the whole skyline in one shot!! And with the camera set to 16X9, I can get a 24mm shot!What I don't like about this camera is it's short battery life. Even with the1300mAh battery I bought, I get less shots than with my Canon. And the colors of the photos from this camera are a lot less colorful than on the Canon. That is something I will have to get used to. I was very disappointed to find out that this camera has no zoom in movie mode, unlike its predecessor, the TZ1. Luckily, that did not stop me from buying this camera. Overall, this camera is a great buy, especially if you want i.s. wide angle, and long zoom</review_text>
I have to get on the bandwagon here.  This is a superb little camera, definately five stars!  I also have the TZ1, which showed promise, but has  limitations. In my review of the TZ1, I noted it had lots of "noise" and pictures shouldn't be printed much beyond 4x6 inches if they were to be sharp.  I also wanted more manual controls.The TZ3 fixes and improves almost everything about the TZ1 and adds some new, very useful features.  The noise has been drastically reduced, the lens is better, the sensor is bigger, and the processor is not only faster, but produces better pictures.  The TZ3 adds a very handy "function" button - or I should say function capability - the number of buttons is the same - which gives immediate access to five or so "most used" settings without having to go into the menues - of which there are several.The TZ3 keeps the Mega Optical Image Stabilization and adds Intelligent ISO, increases the sensitivity without adding noise,(I have not tried the 3200 setting yet.), increases the size of the viewing screen, etc., etc.The TZ3 is a "well-rounded," and very capable camera.  There is simply no comparison between the TZ1 and the TZ3 as far as the quality of the pictures.  The TZ3 wins hands down.  In my opinion it also beats some big name, higher priced digicams - a couple of which I own - rather handily.Of course, the big selling point for the TZ3 is still the 10X lens - now with wide angle capability - on a pocket-sized point and shoot camera.  This lens is SHARP, and combined with larger sensor and the new processor yields some excellent results.While there are no manual controls, per se, the camera seems to do very well without them.  Pictures are sharp, exposures seem nicely done (haven't tried it at night yet, but low light forrest shots were excellent), colors were accurate, appropriately saturated, and vivid (OK.  I like the vivid setting.), good contrast, etc.  There are a variety of AF settings, settable focal points, and focus modes.  There is also exposure compensation, and exposure bracketing available - and they work well!  The live histogram is a welcome bonus.  The TZ3 focuses down to about 2 inches in macro mode - again with excellent, sharp results.  The TZ3 is very well speced out.One nice thing that is gone is the lens cap on the TZ1.  It was  really not to inconvenient, but seemed always to be swinging in the wind to add yet another source of camera shake.  The TZ3 lens includes an built in lens cover.  Very welcome.I currently own five top flight digicams (including this one), and have owned about that many others, I am most impressed with this one - for combined convenience and results.  It is a quantum step forward.I also have a couple of quite nice, and fairly complete DSLR kits.  They are wonderful, and in a class by themselves, but when I want very nice pictures and the convenience of a pocketable point and shoot with a 10X, wide angle lens, or a back up for the DSLRs, the TZ3 is now my camera of choice.</review_text>
Extremely impressed with the TZ3. This gem should get 5 stars on construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. Love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously cant believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen w/o even printing them with the High Res output. Navigation is so easy on this camera. Something not surprising though if your already coming from another panny (FZ7 here). Picture quality is great. I tested it out today on standard and I would say its just as good as my FZ7 in daylight and better in lowlight (indoors). Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness you could always use the camera on "Vivid mode" or add a little with some post processing. The pics in Standard and natural mode PP very well. The wide angle is something new to me. Took some neat shots that looked very nice with the extra viewing angle. Very distinctive and after having this i'm not sure if I could go back.If your looking for a do it all camera this may very well be your tool of choice. Combine it's extreme versatility coupled with excellent image quality, superb lens, build, and finish you have yourself a winner.</review_text>
Upgrading to the TZ3 from a 4yr old Canon 3.2 megapixel. Waited a few months to purchase when I heard the TZ1 was being updated. With the TZ3, Panasonic has fixed the main complaints about the TZ1 which were: No build in lens cover, noisy images at higher ISO speeds. IMO, the build in lens cover alone is wirth the price permium over the TZ1.As others have said, this camera has a great build quality, easy operation, and a high-quality look. I ordered the black model and was pleasantly surprised when I opened the box. It has the look of a retro 35mm cartridge camera, which is cool. The chrome (or polished stainless steel, cant tell), is first rate and looks great with the matte black case. The LCD is huge and bright. The camera's "Simple Mode" does a great job the the other modes are fully customizable. The zoom is fantastic, but you need a really steady hand at full zoom, even with Optical Stabilization turned on. I did take some surprisingly sharp shots zoomed way in from my car as I came across a herd of deer. Shot to shot speed is really great, unless you are using the flash. The red-eye reduction works better than any other digital camera I have used. Overall, I am extremely pleased. If you are looking for a great zoom camera in a small form factor, you should seriously consider the DMC-TZ3</review_text>
I went to Ritz Camera today and took a good look at the TZ3. I'll tell you, its pretty nice. The build quality is really  good, as a previous person mentioned. The body is metal. The dials and buttons click with precision, and have a nice resistance. It has a nice weight to it.I took some nice shots in the store. I must have clicked off 100 pics. I'm impressed with it. If you want something relatively small, powerful and tough, this camera is for you. The 10x zoom is great, but on such  a small camera it is difficult to hold it steady enough(at least for me) to use the zoom too much.I love the build quality and style, so I may be biased. It's a nice piece of equipment. I cannot speak to the photo quality only having seen pics on the camera's LCD</review_text>
I came off a Canon PowerShot S40, a little 4-megapixel brick of a camera that gave me 4 years of excellent results. That was my first digital camera after a closet-full of film Nikons.Many buffs claim that 4 megapixels is all you need, and I made a number of nice looking A3 prints. Now that I have 7 megapixels to work with, I see that I was wrong: Four is not enough. Seven is wonderful.DPreview.com points out strongly that above ISO 200 noise is a real problem--but you always wonder just how picky they are. Well not too picky in this case. Using a higher than 200 setting (i.e., most indoor flash shots) resulted in a lot of noise, making the camera almost unusable except for the simplest 4 X 6 snapshots.But I take almost entirely outdoor shots--scenics and candids. I set the ISO at 100 and get gorgeous results. It has taken some getting used to the different color rendition of the TZ3 from my Canon. The Canon seems more balanced while the TZ3 caused reddish orange to really pop out. There is something cool (color temperature-wise, not "fashionable") about the color that is not entirely fixed in PhotoShop. Sometimes the result are marvelous, especially shots of cloudy or rainy days. Other times they are not so great.  So I have been playing around with the various settings--"Natural" and "Vivid." "Vivid" is closer to what I want right out of the camera, but is less easy to spruce up. "Natural" is easier to modify, so that is the setting I am using now.I was pleasantly surprised at how small the TZ3 is: it slips easily into pants pocket (but not shirt pocket). The zoom lens stating at a decent wide-angle (28mm) is utterly fantastic and really makes the camera stand out head & shoulders from the pack.Thus, I am delighted with the choice. However, to answer my question "What more could I want?", here it is:1. The selection disk ALWAYS moves when I pocket the camera, so I ALWAYS have to check, when I pull it out, to rest the desired setting. Its detents need to be strengthened.2. The back side controls are too easy to activate accidentally when shooting one-handed with the fleshy part of the thumb. A headache because you then need to press "select" to get back in operation.3. DPreview is right when they moan about the Venus III sensor. It's good but, for an otherwise sensational camera like this one, not good enough</review_text>
I just received the DMC-TZ3A.  I love this camera.  This is my first camera ever.  I love the features, build quality, and menu system.  I am still getting used to learning how to take quality pictures.  For example, I have trouble getting it to focus at times.  I am certain this is just the learning curve for me.  One feature I am disappointed that it lacks is - auto retraction of the lens when in playback mode.  Most other cameras automatically retract the lens to protect it when viewing pictures from the camera.  This one does not do this and you have to turn the camera off to get it to retract.  I really wish they would update the firmware to support this important safety feature.  All-in-all I definitely recommend this camera</review_text>
I owned the first generation DMC-TZ1. The DMC-TZ3 has some welcome improvements; wider angle, automatic lens cover, maybe 25% faster shot-to-shot. In particular, the wider angle is a really useful feature.The camera's strength is in its versatile, outdoor shooting. It does best with lots of light. Indoors, the flash coverage is just ok. Shot-to-shot flash recycle time is sometimes a pokey 4 seconds. Digital picture noise is noticeable with lesser light.Setup Tips:1. Use 3x2 ratio if you primarily print 6x4 photos.2. Use vivid mode as normal mode looks washed out.</review_text>
Not the best UI (easy to figure out, but not intuitive in the slightest), but the picture looks great for the (comparitively) low resolution.  The scaling algorithm does a good job of taking high-res pictures and making them look pretty sharp on the low-res screen.  SUPER bright display!  I was impressed with that.  Never ran it on batteries so i can't speak for battery life, but with an AC adapter, it can run all day</review_text>
I bought my parents each their own digital picture frame from Christmas.  They are NOT technical geeks by any stretch of the imagination.  They love it!  The frame was easy to set up and easy to use with the SD card.  The only cons to this product... the resolution isn't to my standard (but more than ample for people who aren't self proclaimed photography-snobs).  I also wish that it had an option greater than 12 seconds between pictures.  30 seconds would be nice so that it doesn't make you feel like you're watching a Powerpoint Presentation all day.  I would strongly recommend this product.  For the price, you can't beat it</review_text>
I bought it to go snorkeling, but after a few days a realize that it can be very useful for rainny days as well to protect the camera. Very very useful</review_text>
As you would expect from Sony this case is extremely well made and the design is excellent.  All of the controls are still readily available and easily operated when the camera is in the case.  If anything, the camera is easier to use when it is in the case due to its small size otherwise.I bought this case mainly to make my T7 look like a cheap plastic camera so I am more comfortable wearing it around my neck when I'm wandering around places where a small expensive-looking camera might attract unwanted attention</review_text>
This is the BEST ACCESSORY I HAVE EVERY BOUGHT for any electronic device. It worked perfectly, and with the already small size of the camera, it was still pretty small and able to go in a swimsuit pocket.  EVEN MY WIFE LOVED IT.  We went snorkeling, swimming, water slides and it took great pictures and video.  WELL WORTH THE MONEY!!</review_text>
As usual,Sony did a very good job with that case.Last year i losted a similar camera ( a T33 ) skiing at Whistler because i didn't have a sport pack like this one.The whole package stills very compact yet.Very good stuff</review_text>
The Sports Pack case exceeded my expectations, which were originally fair already! Because the case was designed especially for the DSC-T7, it fits perfectly: Once the case is on, the compact camera becomes far more accessible. It is easier to hold and handle, and the case does not make it any harder to use any of the buttons. The case has a very sleek design and many people have already complimented it. Some people have even likened it to looking like a PSP! I am very satisfied with this purchase because with it, I can enjoy all functions of the camera without constantly worrying about dropping or scratching it. I strongly recommend buying this case for your DSC-T7. In the beginning, I had some reservations on spending $90 on a camera case, but it really is fantastic</review_text>
I bought this for my carribean cruise, and it fits like a glove.  I wanted to buy one for canon sd500 after I saw one in Cabo at Baja Unlimited</review_text>
This is really a nice point-and-shoot camera. Outdoor pics are really impressible and the clarity is also quite good. The only big problem I noticed about this piece is its night shot mode. Since it does not have any outside flash, the night pics are not good as expected from Sony. The indoor pics are also affected by the same problem</review_text>
The camera was exactly what I wanted.  The size is great and the quality is very good</review_text>
Very easy to operate. This camera takes beautiful pictures outside. The lighting has to be right inside</review_text>
excellent pictures, nice big screen, very good videos, very compact.The only complaints I have is that the charging cord is bulky and you can't download to a computer without the docking station (a lot to carry on a trip, for such a small camera</review_text>
We were early digital camera adopters so this model is now our 5th or 6th camera.  A requirement for us when we buy a digital camera is the availabilty of an underwater housing since we use these camera during scuba trips.  We have a larger Sony DSC-F707 with an Amphibico housing which does a great job for us but requires a crate when we take it diving.  This camera was purchased with the Sony brand underwater housing which is tiny and neatly organized so the entire package and is very compact to travel with.  Sony has made some significant improvements in their underwater housings since the first generation including double o-rings and ability to support the deepest recreational dives.  Camera and housing fit in a tiny backpack and easily goes under an airplane seat.  For serious underwater photography you will require heaps of external light and I'm not a fan of Sony's underwater lighting solution but other choices exist.My favorite things about the camera are the large 2.5" screen which allows me to easily see which shots I want to keep. The small, thin and light size also makes it easy to use.  The big selling feature for me was a 640x480 30 fps mpeg movie capability so we can email clips that people can actually see.  The docking station makes sure it is always charged and ready.  I've been very pleased with the battery life.  As far as "cons" go there are few.  I would like to see a better flash (which seems to be the case with most digital cameras) and more than the 3x optical zoom. Again, a larger zoom seems improbable in a camera this size.  On land, the unit is a bit inconvenient to use with a tripod since it must be in the docking station to mount.  I consider all of these to be minor since my primary goal was to have a small underwater-capable camera that would do 640x480 mpegs and bright 5.1mp shots.  For me, Sony met those goals in a small form factor and at an attractive price.</review_text>
If you're looking for style,size,picture quality and easy to use, then this sony camera is the one for you...this is my first ever digital camera and i must say SONY never fails to dissappoint me.The only reason they didn't receive a 5 out of 5 stars is because i have the sliver model and i really wanted the black model..but it wasn't available</review_text>
I've used several digital cameras in the past and this one is my favorite.  It has the fewest number of confusing buttons (especially no awkward, symbol-laden dial around the on/off button) and most of the menus are pretty self explanatory.  Its highly compact and very durable-- I took mine on a cross-country trip through the middle of the desert.  And, of course, it has the best picture quality of all the cameras I've used.  Admittedly, it is hard to get pictures in low light (the shutter has to remain open for a while to capture enough photons, resulting in a blurry picture if you hold it in your hands), but this camera does have a hole in the bottom for a screw-in tripod for stabilization.Plus, its one of the cheaper brands out there.  Best bet for my money.</review_text>
While I agree with others that this camera takes some pretty nice pictures and is easy to use, I've had the same problems as many have noted here. For starters, the thing eats through batteries like there's no tomorrow. I was lucky to get 20 pictures before the batteries crapped out. My biggest problem, however came when my son was handing the camera over to me at the dinner table and it slipped out of his hand. The camera literally fell only 10-12 inches to the table, but that was enough to render this camera permanently inoperable. Be warned: if you are a little bit clumsy or have butter-fingers, think twice before buying this camera! Red-eye reduction is also a bit of a joke with this one</review_text>
This camera was my second digital camera. It is very nice as far as price and picture goes. The pictures come out very clear but you would need to get an SD card because the internal memory will not hold more than 10 pictures. The functions are simple and ready to use. There is a single-button video function that takes long videos with audio. You can also add audio to still photos. The downside to this camera is that it uses a lot of battery. Do not use store-bought regular alkaline batteries as it will drain within 25-30 shots w/ flash. Please use at least a 2200 mah rechargeable battery. When using rechargeable batteries, you will find that you can get at least 150 to 200 shots, no problem. Still, the camera is a battery drainer. Also, the camera only tells you about low battery when it is low on battery. There is no battery scale on the LCD screen so you do not know when you would need new batteries. The LCD is enough for regular use to view pictures but I find it somewhat fuzzy in quality compared to transferring photos and viewing on the computer. The flash recycle time is longer than others and may not be able to take multiple shots within about 10 seconds.</review_text>
I love this camera! It is light and easy to carry, low in cost and takes GREAT pictures. Though I have heard others say it is a battery eater, I have been able to take over 100 pictures without needed to recharge. The picture quality is awesome, even when printed as 8x10's. Especially at such a low price I was very very impressed. I would most deffinetly recommend this camera for those looking for a great everydaa use camera, at a great price</review_text>
The HP Photosmart M417 5MP is an excellent camera for it's price! The only thing I recommend is to buy a couple of rechargeable batteries because as any other digital cameras... you will need them</review_text>
I have had the M417 for nearly a year now and have nothing but the best to say.  First digital camera I have ever had and found it so easy to take photos, transfer photos, and print them.  I have found friends and families cameras too complex to be bothered with, but the M417 is simple to operate and the quality is excellent.  If you can't be bothered to take a photography course and still want great photos, buy the M417</review_text>
RECEIVED ITEM AS PICTURED WITH NO DEFECTS NOTED</review_text>
Those card readers that the previous reviewer was talking about break after too much data has been transfered so DO NOT listen to him.  Canon makes quality products and their cables are the same I have never had a problem with them.  And you don't have to worry about losing the cables if they stay conneected to your computer.  If you don't have enough room purchase a USB Hub</review_text>
I just love this camera! The quality of the photos and videos are excellent.  The battery life has never been a problem at all.  It's very easy to store in it's dock.  The videos are great and so convenient that I find myself taking more videos with this camera than with my video camera.</review_text>
Do not buy this camera at $899 as listed by the above seller (maybe Amazon might correct the price after reading my review). It's priced at $299 or lower at many online and physical stores</review_text>
My first digital camera was a Sony cybershot, I had it for 3 years until last December it fell into a swimming pool, amazingly it still turned on and you could still view pictures just not take new ones. I was impressed and have always been impressed with Sony. So when it was time for a new camera I picked the Sony Cybershot DSC T 9.Sony, does it again! This camera is spectacular! I purchased it in December of last year and use it on a consistent basis every weekend. Fantastic detail and color in photos, very high quality.Incredibly POWERFUL FLASH, my photos always look beautiful.The camera is sharp, sleek, and modern looking. Fits nicely into a pocket or small purse. In my opinion it's one of the best digital camera out there right now. I love Sony!</review_text>
There was a reviewer who stated that this camera made an "annoying jingle" everytime you turned it on and was told by Sony's technical support that it was unable to be turned off. Don't let that sway your opinion on this buying this amazing camera because after playing around with it for about 5 minutes, I figured out how to turn it off</review_text>
Digital camera owners have a product very susceptible to obscuring dirt, dust, and grime coating not only the lenses but the picture composition veiwing area at the rear of the camera. Mavicas also have more moving parts than the stick storage ulilized by others.This product greatly reduces the cameras exposure to these environmental threats. It is thoughtfully equipped with storage areas and bungi straps. It is very well made. It's a classic example of form following function</review_text>
I just purchased the Sony Mavica 5MP Digital camera from Amazon and wanted to get a nice soft case to protect my investment.This bag is specifically made just for the Mavica cameras and is featured in the accessories book that comes along with the Mavicas. The design  and color scheme of the bag is black and blue and prominently features Sony and Mavica lettering on the case.You can carry the camera upon your shoulder with the adjustable carrying strap or the bag can be attached to your belt. It has a separate front zippered compartment with bungee cord for a couple spare CD-R/RW mini discs and also a spare battery if you like.A nice soft case camera bag that is sure to fit  and protect your Sony Mavica camera!Happy Carrying and Picture Taking!</review_text>
It's excellent dvd camcorder but has some problems with the execution of the edition software to keep the archives in little traditional formats. In general it's an excellent option of purchase</review_text>
This camera fulfiled my expectations as well as the seller who shipped it right away.</review_text>
It is a pretty good camera. Its my first camcorder, I bought it because I had a baby in October and need to capture everything, and my Nikon digital wasn't doing it for me. The optical zoom is great, its pretty easy to use, and I love that you can just press the finalize button wait a little bit and then play the dvd on the dvd player.The only negative thing is the price, it was a bit high, and Im not sure if its that much better than the other ones out there at lower prices</review_text>
I did a lot of research on camcorders before I decided to purchase the Canon DC-40. It has been everything I expected and more. The video and audio quality is far superior to our old videotape camcorder. The DC-40 gives me all the tools I need to get the best picture and sound under any condition I am shooting under. To get the same number of pixels the DC-40 offers, you might have to pay twice as much. I am amazed at how good video I get for a camera that I can carry in my coat pocket</review_text>
I bought this camera for general use and like it a lot.  Compared to other cameras ive owned this one has very good sound recording capability.   It's ergonomics are good and its pleasant to use for the most part.   Using the DVD options on the camera could be a little more refined but I imagine that will mature with future generations.   I'd recommend it for anyone looking for a DVD camcorder to use for family or low end presentations.The Bad:  The editing software included with it is rubbish and requires shelling out more money right off the bat if you actually want to create anything reasonably professional with any footage.  In my opinion its a technical support headache waiting to happen.  I checked it out then threw it in the trash.It also does not have firewire which is highly irritating and odd considering my older Canons/sonys all have firewire connectivity.  MAC USERS: This means it will not work with iMovie or Final Cut Pro / Express.Since my preference is for using OS X based editing suites I finish out the DVD and then put it in the computer directly.  Rip the footage off the DVD and then import it into either FCP or iMovie.   If only it had firewire...In short:  Great camera, very good sound, easy to use and pleasant to operate. Clunky, out-of-box-upgrade-requiring, low-end editing software and lack of firewire keep it from being the perfect little camera it should be</review_text>
I really do love this camera, yet, there are a few drawbacks, that I would have liked to know prior to purchasing:1) It does take time to initialize and finalize discs (and must be plugged in and NOT MOVED to do so) which isn't horrible, but somewhat annoying.2) Another drawback is the battery life which is pretty short... although it lasts about as long as the 30 min. discs.3) On the side of the camera is just says DVD R/RW, but you must buy the -R and -RW discs as the +R and +RW don't work (learned after buying 5 discs at Wal-Mart for [...].)  I assumed either would work since the camera doesn't specify either on the side.4) Another thing that is odd is that the camera says it's 4.0 megapixels, and all of the reviews and manufacturers descriptions says it's 4.3 MP???  I'm sure it doesn't make much difference, but it is a bit misleading.5) I also have a total of 4 DVD players in my house, and only one will play these little discs... and after I burned it to a regular size DVD, only one played that, but it was a different DVD player, so go figure???All in all, though, I really do like this camera.  I love the still pics it takes and I love the sound quality which is in stereo!!!  It sounds so good on surround sound!  There are lots of neat features on this camera and with the software... I made a little Halloween video and added titles and fades and such and made it look "old".  If you'd like to see it here is the link... it's fairly short, but I got lots of compliments on it, and I'm no camera expert!!!  [...]Just copy and paste the link if you'd like to see what you can do with this package</review_text>
I wanted to buy a camcorder that records with high quality.This camcorder does just that...Wonderful quality and easy to use controls makes it very user friendly....Also finalazing the video to dvd takes just 2 minutes which is good.Overall the performance is too good and it is a must buy for people thinking of a quality camcorde</review_text>
This is the machine you have been waiting for.  It is so easy to use.  It will do almost anything you can imagine in terms of still photography. It is as if you have the best digital compact camera.The quality of the DVD movies are amazing.  It is like looking through the window when you watch your video on the TV.  It is as close to High Defonition as I have ever seen.It is worth while to read the instruction manual first, as there are few little things that have to be done in the correct sequnece to finalise DVD's, but it is very simple.The sound is crips and clear with out any noise interuptions.  I would say that this is the best DVD camcorder available at the moment</review_text>
I've done my web research and it pointed me to buy the Canon DC40 among other dvd-camcorders in market.  It was such an amazing experience using it to capture moments during my nephew's birthday party.  The still shots were absolutely fantastic!  The video was like no other...it was very clear and sharp.  You may want to tweak the settings to get that film look versus the homevideo look on your video shots. Also, tweak the stills settings as well to get that SLR-like shots.  I love this product and I highly recommend this to all of you who are planning on purchasing a dvd-camcorder.  Cheers!   -- Joel Pelay</review_text>
This is a very sturdy tripod. It made my old tripod look like a dinosaur. Didn't think such an inexpensive product would be so well made. It was delivered on time too</review_text>
I carried this all over Hawaii in my backpack to get those lava shots and waterfalls. Lightweight and easy to use</review_text>
I got this tripod so that I could use the quick-release plate, yeah, it's real nice..</review_text>
This is perfect for our digital camera, lots of adjustments and a quick release mount, good height, and a compact size makes this  perfect for us, not being pros or anything</review_text>
When I recieved this tripod, I was amazed at how sturdy and professional it was. I am no pro at photography, but I am very happy with this purchase and would recomend this tripod to anyone looking for an awsome value</review_text>
I'm not a professional photographer or videographer.  I just wanted this product to videotape my new baby and other family events on my digital camcorder.  The tripod is easy to set up and use.  Panning the camera around is fairly smooth and easy.  Overall, for the price, I don't think this product can be beaten</review_text>
I paid ~$20 for this tripod and I have to say that for the price, you just can't beat it. It is highly adjustable, stable, and has nice, removable camera footings. I've used this tripod quite extensively since I bought it, and it has held up very nicely</review_text>
The price here was the best I found and the charger works as well as expected.  It's great to be able to charge both my batteries and it charges in good time!  A great item for a great price</review_text>
The best thing is the LCD displays all information you need to know in charging batteries - how much longer will it go?I've used this product for more than six months and it works as stable as it does.  Great product!A little con is the misleading in the web page, as others mentioned, it can charge only ONE battery at a time.Since it's not product's fault, I still rate it as a 5 stars product</review_text>
This item works like it's supposed to. Place battery in charger, plug charger in to wall, charges battery. This can't be any more simpler. Good product. (Will also power DCR Cameras, but why?)</review_text>
I bought a HC3 HD camcorder.. And this charger because it'll charge 2 batteries.. Wrong.It will charge one(1) battery at a time.. It will give you the LiInfo to let you knowhow long til the battery is done (fast and full).. And it is accurate.. It also comes with a cable that goes to the camcorder.. So.. You can run the camera and charge the batteries at the same time from the same unit.. Sony did good with this unit. Very satisfied.</review_text>
You get 200 pictures for under $60.00. Or you could buy the 40 pack for around $28.00. The 200 bulk, is a better price for the money. Can't go wrong</review_text>
*the item received was exactly what I was looking for*the shipping and handling was very reasonable and the delivery was       quicker that I imagined it would b</review_text>
The product arrived in a timely manner.  I have not used it as yet, I still need time to learn how to use my new photo printer.  The Kodak name and reputation got the photo printer purchased in the first place</review_text>
I won't comment on the camcorder itself. It is great, and it fulfills all the needs I had.The only problem came when I upgraded my computer (I was forced to, not a voluntary move) to Vista.Not a single item in the bundled software is compatible with Vista, starting with the USB driver. As of April 24th, Panasonic doesn't even provide an ETA on the delivery of upgraded drivers.Just remember it before you purchase it. For a piece of hardware over $1000, you expect full functionality in your environment</review_text>
Just to clarify a few other differences between the GS500 and GS300 besides those mentioned in the review below.  The GS500 does indeed offer an additional MP for still shots (4.0 MP) and a 12X zoom, but that's not all...It also has a bigger and longer lens, with 1/4.7" CCD (1070K x 3 pixels) sensors instead of the 1/6" CCD (800K x 3 pixels) on the GS300.  The filter diameter is 43mm instead of 37mm.  The GS500 has an aperture range of from F1.6 to F16 as opposed to the GS300's F1.8 to F16.  This all may not make a huge difference, but the optics are technically a bit better on the GS500, and the low light ability is rated as more sensitive too -- minimum 5 lux vs. 12 lux on the GS300.  The GS500 also offers a manual focus ring on the lens (the GS300 has "manual," but it is operated through the LCD menu/joystick), and an actual hot (as opposed to cold on the GS300) shoe for mounted accessories such as lights or microphones.  The GS500 has the ProCinema shooting mode, designed to give the widescreen footage "film" appearance.  The GS300 doesn't.  The GS500 does not have the automatic lens cap of the GS300 -- a toss up in that the auto is a bit more convenient, but more noisey.  The GS500 also has a real door for the memory card instead of a rubber cover over the port on the GS300.  And Panasonic lists the weights as GS500 3.17 lbs vs. 2.98 on the GS300 -- hardly a big difference.  Finally, there is also the "freestyle" remote in addition to the regular remote with the GS500 -- this is a plug in remote that is useful when the camera is on a tripod, and doesn't come with the GS300.Of course both models are no longer available from retailers, but these days the price difference on used models is more like $250-300, so consider that as well...  Despite all I've said, I ended up getting the GS300 myself.Unfortunately, Panasonic's 3CCD DV camcorders have been in decline since the GS400/250, and currently there is no successor to the GS500 and only the GS320 currently left in the Panasonic 3CCD/mini DV category.  The GS320 loses a few key features of the GS300 (like an external mic in), and doesn't touch the GS500.  Perhaps Panasonic will get a clue and introduce a good HD mini DV camera one day..</review_text>
I have researched both the PV-GS500 and PV-GS300. They have the same exact picture quality. These are the best quality camcorders you can buy if you are an average consumer. If you are an amateur or aspiring filmmaker you need to go with higher end cameras. Not even Sony HD can touch the image and picture quality of these Panasonics because it is only 1CCD. 3CCD is what is in pro models and this gives you a color rich professional looking picture. Yes HD camcorders have more lines of resolution, but without the richness and color quality of 3CCD, the picture doesn't look as good. PV-GS500 or GS300 can't be beat by any other camcorder in it's price range. Another drawback to going with HD or a hard drive based camcorder is that you will be very limited when it comes to editing. Most editing software aren't even compatible with HD yet.Most importantly, if picture quality is most important to you, there is no reason to spend an extra $500 on the PV-GS500, just buy the GS300 since they are both 3CCD. Paying more only gets you 12x zoom instead of 10x, and 4.0 MP instead of 3.1 MP. For $500 I can live without the extra 2x zoom and 1 MP. I'm not buying a camcorder for taking still pictures anyway. Also the GS300 is only 2.7 lbs which is important for taking handheld shots. The GS500 is 4 lbs which is a drawback compared to the GS300. If your filmming your kids soccer game handheld for an hour that's a big difference! Bottomline, is Panasonic needs to come up with more important features to put into the GS500 to make it worth the extra $500. As is it just isn't!!!So that's why I give th GS500 only 4 stars, and the GS300 5 stars.</review_text>
So far I like everything about this camcorder.  I have to admit, I haven't had alot of time to do any video editing on the computer.  The still pics seem to look good and are easy to download to my existing Kodak Software.  I have downloaded a couple of clips to my PC.  The editing software that comes with the camcorder sucks though.  The camera is light and compact.  It is alot easier just carrying one camera to video and take pics.  The price is high compared to one model below this one.  I wish I knew how good the quality is on the other model, but I thought the the extra zoom and MP's on the digital would be worth the extra expense.  Overall, I am satisfied</review_text>
I've had this camcorder since Nov. and have used it several times.  I love exploring the features and playing around with its different uses.  It takes excellent video with excellent color and sound.  I've also successfully transferred video to my computer which is easy.  I love this camcorder and the clear video it makes of my family</review_text>
Great camcorder, excellent lens, image stability and functions... all the package is very functional and ergonomical. The zoom is amazing. Great for outdoors recordings.</review_text>
We purchased this camcorder for our son because he enjoys movie making.  This product offers an excellent picture quality. The video editing software that comes with the camcorder is easy to use. I would recommend this product</review_text>
I've used lots of prosumer and professional video cameras over the years as a video production teacher, a producer and videographer and the quality of this camera is outstanding.  Both video and stills.  Great for 'grab' shots.  I am pleasantly surprised at the great point and shoot pictures this camera produces.  Excellent white balance, exposure and focus under nearly every lighting condition.  I've been using it for nearly a month now and am completely satisfied</review_text>
I bought the camera as a present and this was a great addition.  Very nice looking case; stylish and reasonably priced.  Not bulky at all.Highly recommend</review_text>
I received this item within a week of ordering it.  The case looked exactly like what was pictured.  It is real leather and the quality is great.  The only thing I dislike about the product is that it is a perfect fit for my camera which leaves no room for my spare set of batteries.  Can you really complain about a perfect fit though?</review_text>
I wouldn't have paid full price for this but at a little more than the cost of a spare battery it was a good buy.  I have two regular 8800 batteries but when traveling and away from a charger I wanted something I could fall back on and AA batteries are available anywhere. Another reason is I don't know how long Nikon will continue to carry the battery designed for the camera.  I already have a JVC camcorder that it is impossible to buy a battery for, leaving me tied to the power cord it came with, as well as a few other appliances with propriatary "rechargeable" batteries that have expired and can't be replaced.I attached the battery pack to my camera to test it out and using a mix of NiMh batteries was surprised at how long it lasted.  As somebody already mentioned, with the battery pack on the camera is does not fit in the Coolpix carrying case, it does fit well in my Lowepro case I used to carry around my 35mm SLR cameras in.  The batteries also add quite a bit of weight so you need to consider that if you are doing a lot of hiking.</review_text>
Foe $20... I thought, this must be a piece of junk. But upon receiving it and hooking itup up to my CP8800... I was quite happy and impressed. Not only did it make my CP8800 look like a much coolerPix... this darn this works! Made it much easier to hold the camera. The vertical shutter feature. Now all my Nikons have an Motor drive or a battery pack. He, he, he</review_text>
With this battery pack, I can make more pictures then before without changing batteries. I also have a better grip while taking pictures</review_text>
Great item, quality and fit up to Nikion standards</review_text>
I am used to using vertical grips with all my other Nikons.  This adds an extra shutter release and zoom control to the camera.  It also adds bulk to give the camera better balance in your hand.  The only problem I've encountered has been losing the screws that hold the tripod mount.  They just backed out in the field and I had to Super glue it.  The camera is apparently discontinued, hence the ultra-low price for the base.  The camera is useful as a backup, although I purchased it as something of a replacement for heavier 35mm systems in the field.I am still using it, but only as a back up to a D80, which is an excellent camera and works with all my Nikon lenses (I ordered a base for it too!) I just ordered an extra MB-CP11 to carry for quick switches.  The price makes it a wonderful buy</review_text>
This is a well made battery pack that adds some heft to your CP8800.  A wonderful camera, this battery pack adds to your ability to sty in the field longer.  It takes at least 300 pictures with a fully charged set of NIMH batteries.To install, you take out the Li-Lion battery and twist off the battery cover.  Don't lose this cover!!  I put mine in a baggie and stuffed it next to my spare Li-Lion battery in my camera bag.You then push the pack into the battery cavity and screw the bottom pin in to the tripod place.  It fits very neatly and solidly.If you have a very close fitting camera bag, adding this unit may create a problem, but otherwise it will be a plus for you.  It fits nicely in my hands and if you can find the battery cavity cover, you now have to sources of power.  You can choose which one you want as a back-up.Now being sold at B&H for $149, it is much more reasonably priced</review_text>
I bought this as my first digital camera. The picture quality is decent, and there are a lot of settings for the user to tinker around with (though I haven't really had much use for them... yet.)My only problem with this camera is that it eats batteries like candy. I recommend buying at least 2 pairs of rechargeable batteries, as well as a fast recharger if you're the type that takes a lot of pictures. To alleviate this problem, you have the option of turning off the viewing screen, which does help conserve battery life</review_text>
Camera is really easy to use in any setting. Flash is great even in really dark rooms. Pictures are crisp and clear. Very user friendly. Still getting used to the 4 second delay to take the next picture. I know there is a setting for it some where but have not figured it out yet. Otherwise a great camera for everyday use for those of us who are not professional photographers by trade</review_text>
This was a gift for my daughter, so I haven't used it yet.  She uses it all the time and loves it.  She easily transfers photos from the camera to the computer.My only complaint is that it does not come with rechargable batteries.  We have gone through 4 sets of regular batteries and its only been 3 1/2 weeks.</review_text>
I found this to be a GREAT camera, and not just for it's price. It's simpl eto figure out how to use, the multiple settings cover any occasion of picture takeing. I love that it runs on AA batteries. I bought a cheap compact battery charger coming with four rechargable batteries so all i have to do is keep both sets charged in my camera case (i don't keep the batteries in the camera to keep both safe and leaving batteries in there takes some of their charge) so wheni want 2 use my camera i put one set in and if that set runs out (but the set lasts a good long while) i have the other set at my disposal and start chargeing the dead batteries at the 1st outlet. this solved any problems that might have happened with short battery life for me. the only other problem is the delay from when you push the button to the actual picture takeing. However in this delay it focuses the picture for you so ur shots almost always turn out well and in focused, as opposed to a friends camera who does not have the delay but it takes many more tries to get a focused one.I LOVE THIS CAMERA AND RECOMEND IT TO ANYONE, especially first time digital camera users</review_text>
This is not a fitted case for the 8800 as I had expected, but that also makes it usable for cameras (or what not) of about that size.  Nice quality product</review_text>
Love this case - tried store brands before and lost my compact flash cards.  This case hold the camera, usb cable, card reader, remote control, extra cards, is lightweight and easy to carry.  Wish I would have purchased it when I bought my camera</review_text>
I love this camera bag. It is very well made, and very compact. It fits perfectly inside my larger camera bag, so I can take everything I need with my larger bulker bag. I can just pull this camera bag out with room for a spare battery and acouple of memories. It has room for change and a credit card. It is not large. It fits the camera to a glove, which is what I wanted. If you want storage room this is not for you. If you want a camera bag that is very light weight to go with this awesome camera this bag is for you</review_text>
Perfect size and well made. makes it easy and compact to carry the camera and a battery and extra memory</review_text>
There is enough room in the outside pocket, and a mesh pocket inside the top cover, for memory cards, an extra battery, even the USB cable. A set of two belt loops would feel more secure than the single centered belt loop provided. I still want a larger belt pack (or small backpack) that will accommodate the camera, accessories, and other supplies for an all day outing</review_text>
A very nicely detailed and well put together Leather custom fit Nikon Coolpix 8800 soft case.Plenty of room for the extra cards and extra battery you will need for this outstanding newly added Coolpix camera.The case meets the quality of the newly introduced Coolpix 8800 camera and protects your investment in your fine camera equipment</review_text>
This battery got me though many shoots for my many DV Films. It does last about as long as it specifies. Too bad I had to sell it as I am about to buy a new Canon as my Pana died. It's a great battery though, and a great price from J and R</review_text>
The product was a genuine Canon battery and fit my SD550 as promised. I've bought a cheap one off eBay before after losing my OEM one, and was HIGHLY disappointed with it's 5 MINUTE battery life. This battery is legit as they come and lasted just as long as my original battery, Great deal for the price. Deifnitely a MUST BUY if you're looking for a similar battery</review_text>
Shipping was speedy and product works great.  i have had no problems since my purchase</review_text>
Excellent value for the money.Its a genuine Canon product at half the cost. fantastic deal. Worth every penny. Highly recommend</review_text>
When I first got my camera, I tried to save money by getting the generic 'equivalent' battery.  Big mistake.  After fully charging it, the camera would take a few pictures before showing low battery.  I kept on shooting anyway, just to see what would happen.  It didn't turn off, but I noticed that the side of the camera became much hotter than when shooting with the Canon brand battery.  I tossed the generics and bought the real one, and have had no trouble since.Don't try to be cheap; go directly to name brand.</review_text>
Well at time i have recharged the battery 3 times and still i have a lot of time to take pictures and movies, because is new the battery is working good, so no problem at this momen</review_text>
I bought two after-market batteries for $12/ea.  What a waste!  After charging them completely the camera displayed a low battery warning.  Don't waste your money on cheapo aftermarket batteries that don't work.  The Canon batteries are worth the extra money</review_text>
Same as the battery that came w/ my Canon SD550. Works great, never had a problem</review_text>
I've bought THREE different NB-3L aftermarket batteries for my Canon SD500 and none of them will actually function properly...they indicate fully charged but when put into the camera they immediately show as "discharged-replace battery pack". I even bought an aftermarket charger thinking that might be the problem...same result. I've given up on the 3rd-party batteries, I'll get this Canon brand unit and lick my wounds.  (Yes, the Canon is overpriced but since they seem to have engineered the camera to only work with their own batteries I'm kind of stuck...has anyone else had this problem?</review_text>
What a great buy!  This is light, comes with its own carrying case, is very smooth and versatile in its movements. We have more expensive tripods that are not as nice.</review_text>
Very impressed with the picture and the colour, even in low light with much less granularity than other cameras we looked at.  There aren't too many bells and whistles, but for a basic camcorder, you can't beat the quality</review_text>
GREAT product, and even better for the price!!  I'm thrilled with the quality and the ease of use.  I love it!  Great for birding, and recommend very highly !!</review_text>
I bought these for bird watching in the yard. The focus on them is a little stiff but I see as well with them as any other binoculars I have used. Overall they seem a good product for the money</review_text>
I bought this so we could get a better look at the birds in our backyard.  We keep it by the kitchen window, and find ourselves using it at least once a week to peek at a feathered friend who is visiting.  Nice clear lens, pretty easy to find objects through them.  Certainly does the job we need it to do.  Don't buy this if you do your birding out in the field - these are not particularly portable nor leightweight and are not meant to be; buy a binocular specifically made for that purpose.Only complaint, and it is minor, is that I find the lens caps to be flimsy and a little hard to use.  We generally just keep them off</review_text>
1. I ordered this very close to Christmas. The data said there would be a three to five business day  delay. The binoculars were mailed out the next day. I recieved notice of the mailing and they arrived in time for Christmas. I am very impressed.2. They were shipped carefully and arrived in good shape</review_text>
This set of binoculars performs as it said it would, and was a fantastic purchase for the price</review_text>
I recently went to New York and found it quiet amazing to watch things from Empire State building. It does not have that adjustability but than that is mentioned in the product description. For the price it goes for it is definitely a very good product</review_text>
We had a bushnell that finally wore out after twenty years, and tech out paced it. I bought a pair of glasses from another vendor, and these. This is a superior set. Easy to adjust, powerful, in fact too powerful for our backyard feeders, we use the compact pair for the yard, and save this for the beach and bird walks. Bushnells are not super compact, but the compact 8 x40 model I bought is going on Ebay this week.good buy, should last another twenty years.If you are a new birder,keep it simple, buy these and several birdbooks, have fun</review_text>
I have bought a few binoculars in the past couple of years. And have been satisfied with only a couple.  These binoculars I am very pleased with. The clarity is very good and the price is terrific.  I have wasted alot of money on some not so good Bushnell binoculars. But this pair was a pleasant surprise</review_text>
A little expensive, but it looks really cool, and it is very good carrying case for the DCR-HC90</review_text>
Best quality light tent on the market. It was extremely hard for me to retire my home made light box but I decided to give photo light tents a try. I remembered a few years back, home made light tents made of abs pipe and nylon were pretty common among product photographers. Rave reviews on products such as plastic domes, housings were nothing but a pile of super expensive junk. Not to mention setting it up is pain in the butt and some how cleaver marketing pushed out a bunch of these junks.This is not the case with XPro's photography light tent. Not only it performs better than and of my home made tent, it is easily folded and stored in the small carrying pouch that comes with the tent. To sweeten up the deal, 2 backdrops are included in the package.I recommend XPro light tents to people who does trading and selling of jewelry, glassware, or highly reflective products online. It is also recommended for photographers that specialize in product catalog photography. XPro light tent is easy to use and even amateurs can start taking product photos like the pros</review_text>
It is very easy to install the sender, but the picture quality is really low.  Most of time you get the interference from other wireless objects like mobile phone, 900MHZ cordless phones, etc.  Will not recommend to buy for the once who are looking for good quality picture and sound transfer</review_text>
I bought this because I have DirecTv wired on one side of my room and wanted the TV on the other side of the room. I could have paid someone to run the cable up the exterior insulated wall, through the attic and down the other wall but this was just plain easier. Plus, I occasionally like to watch a game in my garage while working so I plan to try it with my small tv. I have no problems with interference but it is about 15 feet line-of-sight and I have no 2.4Ghz wireless networks or phones and the nearest neighbor is about 70 feet away. When I try broadcasting to the garage, I will update this review on that performance. The setup was trivial. It would be nice to be able to buy additional matching receivers because I would like to broadcast the DirecTV commercial free radio to my stereo on another floor. One more thing, the website says this is Sylvania but the box is labeled &quot;Lorex&quot;. Not a big deal since most electronics are rebranded anyway</review_text>
The product was delivered in time, according to the purchased.The Quality of it is excelent.</review_text>
Docking Station had to have its software updated in order to provide excellent pictures on our TV.  If you purchase this item be prepared to download and update the Docking Station software</review_text>
Excellent product and accessories.  I am very happy with this and was able to find it on Amazon.  I looked several other places and could not find what I needed.  Thanks Amazon!</review_text>
The R818 camera will not fit the port on the R-series dock.  Just call HP and request the adapter, they will send it to you for free. Part # C8887-40003  Nice camera, and HP service was excellent</review_text>
Incase anyone purchases this dock for the R818 camera - you will have to call contact HP and they send you a part for the dock so it will fit the R818 camera. I purchased the dock and as a previous person reported it won't fit the R818 camera. HP is sending me this piece that will allow me to connect properly</review_text>
The dock is very easy to use in connecting the camera to your television or computer or printer for uploading your pictures.  Just as important, since the battery that came with the docking station was defective, it showed me that HP customer service does indeed stand behind their product.  I had a new battery within days of contacting customer service</review_text>
This cable is a unique USB cable for a Nikon digital camera. The only problem is I couldn't find the darn thing anywhere.  It is a functional piece of equipment for certain but nothing super special.</review_text>
It was great they had it stock and they immediately sent it out to us Nikon didn't have it in stoc</review_text>
I'm not entirely sure what there is to like or not like about this product...one end fits into the camera hole, the other into the usb port, all is well</review_text>
This has turned out to be an excellent bag for the PV-GS500 I purchased.  It has a detachable bottom section to store the power cord and charger in it which is nice.  It is able to hold the camera, spare tapes, pretty much everything you need but a tripod with no issues.  Only thing it is missing is a shoulder strap, and I personally do not consider that a big deal</review_text>
This is the perfect case for travelling, it is very good, fuctional and practical. It is small enough to travel with and large enough to fit everything related to your cammera (cables, batteries, etc)</review_text>
The bag is solidly made. I am using it for my iWay 500C GPS. It fits snuggly into the main compartment. With a really heavy touch screen unit, I needed the best padding I could get. The walls of the bag are firm, thick and soft (yes, all at the same time).Having the side pockets is very useful for accessories.The detachable storage bag at the base of the unit can be used separately. It is sizable, but provides little protection for the contents, so it's nto good for fragile items. Detaching and reattaching is straightforward, but takes a minute to accomplish. You would not want to re-attach/detach this compartment on a daily basis. If you have camera accessories that you take on vacation, but generally want to leave in your room or vehicle - it's perfect</review_text>
Perfect fit for my SD500 and the cheapest one I found on the internet.</review_text>
This was the first item I bought some thing from Amazon.com. The Camera SD450 is really good. The picture clarity is amazing. The screen is little wider than other digi cameras. If you want to take this as an option dont keep a second opinion just go for it</review_text>
If you're looking for something to protect your camera from getting scratched and THAT'S ALL, then this is a great product. I throw my camera in my purse, so I wanted something to keep it from getting banged up. There's an old review on here from 2004 that says it's like a leather glove. It's true, the leather is very soft, but it's not completely soft-sided. There isn't any padding and it's light weight, but it's slightly reinforced and holds it's shape when it's empty. If you drop your camera from a high level, no, this will probably not protect it from breaking. But if you accidentally knock it of the table, this should keep it safe.There is not storage, FYI. It has one hole on top for the wrist band to stick through and it has a leather loop on the back so you can wear it on your belt if you like.I think for the price and if your purpose is simple everyday wear and tear protection, then this is a good product. If you're rough on your camera, don't get this; find something that is padded</review_text>
My original SD500 and PSC 50 leather case were both stolen during a burglary. Since they were gifts from my girlfriend I tried to replace the exact items. After buying the leather case, however, I suspect Canon made versions with better quality leather.My original case seemed to be made with a much higher grade of leather. It was more smooth and elegant than the one I just purchased. Even the small metal 'Canon Powershot' emblem on the front is made with a different kind of metal (is not brushed steel like the original).With that said, the case is fantastic. I personally would not care for the extra pocket/space for a battery or memory card, and instead am driven by what is the most compact and stylish. (But then again, when it comes to traveling  this case fits inside a very nice Lowe case I have for a massive Canon SLR.</review_text>
It's a pretty good case. I bought it to keep my Canon SD450 free of scratches and so far it has done that</review_text>
I have purchased at least ten of these cases as I have helped friends get these fine Canon S500 and SD550 cameras.  The only thing I wish Canon would do is put a pocket on the side for an extra camera battery which you should absolutely have at all times.This case is my favorite as it protects this fine little camera and is not intended to carry half of your belongings like ladies sometimes do with their pocketbooks!This is still the best choice to give your camera protection and can be worn on your belt very comfortably.</review_text>
Real leather and smooth to the touch. I am so glad i got it. It's perfect</review_text>
Holds camera, additional battery, and mem card.Leather feels good.Recommend if you don't have a handfulof extra batteries and memory cardsto pack in it</review_text>
I needed a case to protect my Nikon camera when traveling. The case works great. The soft leather feels nice and protective, it even has a pocket for memory and/or battery. The only negative is the black leather has faded big time. It looks like I have used it it for 7 years instead of seven months!!! Oh well, I didnt buy it for looks</review_text>
This case is very well constructed and designed.  It is made of very soft leather and lined with a nylon type material and a soft fleece or micro suede.  It has three pockets inside of varying sizes to hold SD cards and/or batteries.  The cases fits snuggly and closes with a full width velcro closure.  Easy to open and close without looking.  There is a belt loop on the back that will fit 1.25" wide belts.  I love the soft leather but after about a month of use, some wear is showing on the corners.  I will buy another one when this one wears out!  Amazon shows that this is unavailable, I bought mine on April 1, 2006 at a local camera store for $24.95.  Although designed for Nikons, I use it for my Canon SD600.  It is much nicer than the small Canon case which is a hard pack style case with a chrome snap.  The Nikon camera is easily pocketable while using the camera</review_text>
The case arrived promptly and seems of good quality.  I received what I ordered.Good product</review_text>
Great to carry your camera and to keep it new, the case is easy to carry, great product</review_text>
This 58mm adaptor arrived very quickly in brand-new condition, and works precisely as expected and specified. I purchased 58mm filters locally, and have no problems. I am pleased with the transaction</review_text>
I bought one of these to protect my LensBaby 3G, and other than the occasional reflection from a very strong light source it does a great job</review_text>
The Filter was received absolutely on time and the use is as expected. I am completely satisfied with the product</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.</review_text>
If your Kodak camera can fit one of these, and you have a wireless network -- or are near them when you take images -- get this card. I use it MUCH more often than I thought I would, and it's great to be able to send images to friends and family just after taking them</review_text>
Good product, had it for a year now.  Wish I had bought the one with a jack for an external microphone.  Consider that if you are buying a camcorder that will be used for recording teachings or other educational event.  It has good sound pick up but not good enough for proper recording of teachings</review_text>
Haven't used it A LOT...but so far...easy to use...works in low light...decent sound...great video..</review_text>
Great for those of us who are new at this type of camera and affordable</review_text>
This camcorder was bought in September 2005 and is still working well. I was talking a film class and didn't want to have the hassle of borrowing my school's $1000+ camcorder. Knowing full well that Canon and Sony, especially Sony, would be the best camcorder for people wanting their shots to look professional, I looked on Amazon and Circuit City to see reviews. I went into Stereo Advantage and well, walked out with a JVC due to the fact that it was a little less expensive then some of the other camcorders. So, the advantages and disadvantages:Advantages:1) It is pretty decent in low light. It does have a light on it and this does help.2) I never noticed the motor noise mostly because when I film stuff and edit it on my Powerbook with Final Cut, I usually add music. I read reviews with motor noises but I guess that if there is complete silence in a room, you'll hear it.3) Firewire cable and AV cables are easy to find and connect.4) Easy to hold.Disadvantages:1) Firewire does NOT come with camcorder. You'll have to buy this separate. Best place to find firewire cables is online (Amazon, Ebay). You'll play way too much in stores.**By the way, if you don't know what firewire is here is what it is. Mac computers almost always come with firewire outlet, just like PCs come with USB outlets. For PCs, you can buy a firewire card and insert it in your PC. The purpose of firewire is to transfer video from your camcorder onto your computer. USB plugs(which comes with this camcorder) just transfer photos.2) Taking pictures on this camcorder does not turn out good at all. I would stick with a digital camera instead.3) Battery is horrible. It lasts like 50 minutes fully charged. I plan on buying another one.</review_text>
I paid $250 for this thing and didn't expect much, but I love the picture quality----like the local news quality---and it performs well in low-light. Also, pics up voice very well. Fits in hand perfectly.I really do like this camera a lot and I'm going to stick with the JVC brand.If you don't want to deal with tapes, you can get a 30 Gb JVC camcorder for twice the price of this one</review_text>
I decided that since I have no expertise with cameras, and I needed one for my new job, I would go for a factory refurbished one. So far this camera is everything I could possibly want.Good battery life with Nimh rechargeable batteries, great clear pix, easy to use. The LCD came with some minor scratches, but I guess on a refurb thats to be expected. I like this camera also because it has a viewfinder which a lot of the new cameras do not have.I would recommend this camera to anyone who is looking for an easy to use well made, inexpensive camera to work with</review_text>
made a photo so clear and good the whole house was gone.Keep up the work fuji seems like your real good company</review_text>
I was a bit worried about this camera after reading a bunch of complaints about lens error and some other issues.  Maybe those were early versions or a bad batch, and maybe  the design got tweaked ??  But I have had no problems at all.  I just came back from two weeks in Portugal and have shot over 1500 pictures in the four weeks or so I've been using the camera and it's been bounced around a bunch.  I tried to get the lens error (before I left and after I found the "fix") but it never happened.  Maybe if you actually stop the lens from moving or pushed it back?  but that would probably break most cameras.  So either that issue is fixed or some users were being violently rough with the camera to get the error.THe images look great, it's fast and it was great to have along</review_text>
My nephew was thrilled to recieve this for graduation.  He took it on his trip to Spain and got great pictures.  Good camera for the price</review_text>
I'm a bit obnoxious when it comes to my pictures.  I'm not a professional photographer by any stretch but I'm a mom and I want GREAT pictures of my kids.  This camera delivers.  Point, shoot, get a great photo.  The "delay" time is a bit long, but I've used other digitals and found this to be comprable.  Easy to use, takes excellent photos, really what more can you ask for?  I like the fact that this camera is small, but not teeny-tiny; there's still something for you to hold onto to steady the shot.  I really don't have a single complaint about this camera</review_text>
The camera takes good photographs.My issue is its recharging system.It was purchased with a cradle CP FX-A10, after about 9 months the battery would no longer charge fully. I discharged the Nickel Hybride battery fully with no success. I purchased a new battery... same problems.DO NOT BUY a Cradle, it is a waste of money.I now recharge AA batteries with an external charger</review_text>
I have had the camera about 2 years and all in all it is an exceptional camera for its many advanced features. The designers must have felt that because of the wide range of f-stops, very slow/fast shutter (3sec to 1/2000) and the fantastic film speed range (auto or ISO 80 to 800), why have a large flash. The E550 is designed as a available light camera. True the flash only works when the autofocus and autorange feature can work. It must see something well or you get no flash. Somethings I like are the unlimited movie time. (card limited)  The almost none existant shutter delay is very unusual in a digital camera. While driving I can pick up the camera, turn it on and shoot with one hand a shot of a deer on the side of the highway. I just preset it on speed prioity shutter, preset on 1/800 or 1/1000. With the dial on top you can set priority to amperture, speed manual or program all. I also like the feature of automatic exposure bracketing. Also the rapid shooting feature to get a object moving. Also I like the feature to prefocus (by pressing the shutter half way down)then waiting for the instant shot. What worked in Alaska to get a whale which was only for an instant at the surface. It is a very capable camera as well as a 'point and shot'.  I have taken about 3000 photos with it. It is a great camera but if not set correctly you may not get a good picture</review_text>
A bit tricky to set up, but nothing special by the standards of today's technology.  Excellent feature</review_text>
What a purchase!! Simple and easy to setup and a great Christmas gift. Now it holds our wedding photos and is proudly displayed in the living roo</review_text>
The picture and video quality is great! This frame was a hit at our last family gathering! It was also very easy and intuitive to use, with a sleek look</review_text>
Large Sharp Photos amd the MP3 Player is cool too</review_text>
This is the best frame i have seen, good price, awesome quality, a lot of functions... i really recommend!</review_text>
I ordered the Ziga 8" digital picture frame when another one I had wanted was out of stock.  It was a christmas present for my wife.  Over all I am very happy with the operation of the Ziga.  It has a lot of functions and the picture quality is good.  The only comment I have is about the frame on the Ziga.  I think it would be better if it didn't have the clear outer edge part.  If it was all white or all black I think it would look nicer.  The clear part makes it look cheap. Other than that I am happy with it</review_text>
I was dubious after reading reviews of frames.  This frame was a gift for my parents, who are nearing 80.  It had to be easy to set up and use.My expectations were exceeded!  It is simple to plug in and go!  It is easy to insert a memory card and launch the slideshow and play music as well.My parents were delighted, there is virtually no computer savvy required to make this thing work.  The remote is easy too, and accurate.  I can imagine my parents setting this up in their living room or family room, with a constant slideshow running for themselves and their guests</review_text>
This digital photo frame has reasonably good picture quality and once set up, can be used by anyone in the selected mode.  I have it set for slide presentation mode and people enjoy looking at it.  I could easily see giving it, already set up, to people who are not computer savvy, such as grandparents.  To give them new pictures, send a new card and they slip that in.  That said, the cost is still fairly high and the buttons on the top of the frame useless unless you have them memorized or really good vision.  I would recommend this product</review_text>
I have had a Canon S40 for several years and it always worked flawlessly yielding great pictures.However, I did want to upgrade it to a more modern camera. Unfortunately, the S80 has been discontinued apparently without any replacemnet e.g. S90 in the works. I then purchased a used S80. It is a great camera and is markedly improved over my old S80. The large LCD screen, wider zoom range, smaller size, improved movie mode are major changes.I always keep it in a case when not in use, and like a prior reviewer would be pleasantly surprised if it was not damaged by dropping</review_text>
This camera was almost a five star camera.  Disabling the RAW capability (that was available in the previous model) and some clunky controls and operation keep it at four stars for me.For many of you, RAW makes no difference.  And that is great.  But for those folks who own Digital SLR cameras, and want this camera as a powerful, easy-to-carry utility camera - lack of RAW support cripples this camera.Next, as other reviewers have noted, the side mounted mode-knob is easily jostled and can result in the camera being in a mode that you did not plan for it to be in when you are shooting.  It is EASY to accidentally move this knob.The lens cover and using it as the power button is a poor design as well.Finally, since I seem to be listing the problems first, like most point and shoots the noise level at anything over 50 ISO is very high and makes the camera almost unusable in settings where you would like to set the ISO higher.  Basically, very low light settings are compromised by this inablity to set the ISO at 400 and be confident that the pictures will have a low enough noise level to be usable.On to the good.  As a point and shoot camera, this offers a huge amount of control over the shot.  You can shoot in aperture and shutter priorities and you can - in theory - do almost anything that you could do with a DSLR.  Your biggest limitations are the lens (unchangable) and the sensor (small, high-noise at high ISO).In 90% of the typical point and shoot settings, this camera will outperform your current camera.  It takes beautiful pictures.The wide angle lens gives you the ability to get more in the shot when you need to do so - making it a great "vacation" camera.The zoom is decent, but not outstanding.Colors are outstanding, and this is a typical Canon strength.Reading through other reviews here, I also note that several people have complained that the camera did not fare well after being dropped - with a particular emphasis on the large LCD cracking if you drop it.  I'm not sure how to respond to that... I guess that I would just say that I would have expected that to happen.  I tend to treat $500 (when I bought it anyway) cameras carefully.  I purchased an inexpensive camera case which I use always (and find easy to use, since it attaches to my belt) and I use the camera strap when I use the camera.  I haven't dropped the camera yet in the year I have owned it.  If I did, I'd be pleasantly surprised if it survived - not upset with Canon if it didn't.  There are many different types of people with many different expectations in this world, and product reviews are a great place to see these many different attitudes!Overall, a very good - almost great - point and shoot camera</review_text>
This is my third Powershot and they just get better. The video quality is a great improvement and the mute really works. Extraordinary value for money</review_text>
I purchased this camera about 6 months ago. So far so good. This is my 4th digital camera in about 5 years (I take about 20-200 photos a week). I started with a Canon Digital Elph 2MP. Right before my year warranty was up, the door for the compact flash card broke off and the zoom was sticking at times - but they couldn't duplicate the stick so they just fixed the door. 6 months later the zoom wore out. I did drop it several times, someone bumped into me with a beer and it got a little wet. Besides the sticky zoom, the camera still works but I need more megapixels. Then I bought the 4 MP elph and it lasted 2 1/2 years before the button broke (to switch between viewing photos and taking photos). Then a friend talked me into a Casio because of the longer battery life, big screen and he showed me the great photos he took with his. So I switched from Casio - BIG MISTAKE. I enjoyed the long batter life and big screen but the flash was week and a lot of the photos I took in dark dance clubs were horrid. The Casio lasted 6 months before the zoom got stuck when I bumped it - not covered by the warranty. I switched back to Canon but I wanted something with more control, more manual functions. So the Canon S80 seemed like the best match. It is a little bigger than what I'm use to but the quality of the photos makes up for it. The video is amazing - it's great you can take small videos, easy enough to email - or high quality video - better than any camcorder I've owned.Definetly get a 1 Gig card, especially if you want to use the high quality video. So far the camera is pretty solid - no problems as all and I think the bigger size is easier to hold onto.My only complaint is that the dial to switch between modes moves too easily. If I have the camera on the setting I need for the night, I'll have the camera on, waiting for right moment to take a photo. While I'm holding the camera, I accidently touch the wheel with my thumb and change my setting without knowing it. Then when I go to take the photo, I miss the perfect moment because the setting is wrong. That's my only complaint - if it wasn't for that I'd give this camera 5 stars</review_text>
Why is this going for $899???? It's listed at $400 at Walmart online.</review_text>
I bought this for my mom's new digital camera, particularly to ensure that the camera didn't break and that there was somewhere to store any extra cards.  This handy neoprene case does just that.  It's simple and functional.  My worry about leather, though it looks stylish, is will it be cushioned enough if the camera falls or gets bumped.  Well, this case, because of the neoprene, will cushion any blows and ensure long life and use of your camera.  Good purchase</review_text>
Tried it indoor and outdoor.. It works fine.. And dual voltage charger is a added advantage too.. Works great and a good starter camcorder.</review_text>
I realy enjoy this camera. What most impresses me is the charge time is very fast. It is a good quality camera for the price. I don't care about the lower reviews, like anything there will be a few lemons out there, but don't let that discourage you. I realy recommend this one</review_text>
Great single sensor Mini DV camcorder. Has the same sensor and image quality as more expensive models. Easy to use. Great first buy for families who are starting in video. Doesn't have LEDs for night shots, although in most case it isn't a major inconvenience. Sound is good.Pros:1. LOW PRICE!2. Intuitive enough for beginners.3. Large LCD.4. Good picture quality.Cons:1. No digitizer. Meaning no video in. The model up has it, although it costs a little extra. That's the major draw back form me. (Thus the 4 stars)2. Cannot confirm it'll be reliable over time. Bought it too recently</review_text>
This is a great camera has all the features you could want and its easy to use.It takes great movies and that was the most important thing for me. It has a manual lens cap which is a pain but for the money I can't complain.</review_text>
This camcorder is a great little camera that is easy to operate. The LCD is clear and the colors are crisp.  The needed buttons are easy access.  It is lightweight and fits nicely in the palm of your hand.</review_text>
I bought this camcorder for $300 which is a good price because this camera gave me tons of features and a clear picture. Great for shooting family videos or amature movies like I make myself. It's very small too. Over all im very happy with this camcorder. Yes I edited my review earlier there was a humming noise, but it turned out to be my fan. I love this camcorder!</review_text>
Of course like any person who spends 300 bucks on something you expect it to perform admirably, while knowing full well that there are more expensive models out there.  This little DV camera does quite the job.  Starting from the packing all the way down to the technical features.  In a world were you get less and less JVC seems to have done pretty well.  Instructions for the camera come in 3 languages, all of the peripherals; lens cap, multi-voltage power plug, RCA cables, and straps are actually well designed and usable. The camera itself is quite user friendly, and intuitive. After opening and sorting the contents I had the camera up and recording in less than 5 minutes.Pros:1. Very fast rewind and fast forward.2. Light weight, and compact.3. Clear display that you can turn and flip in almost every direction4. Great zoom features and very good recording quality.Cons:1. No DV tape included.  I was smart enough to pick up a two pack at the same time.2. If you have big hands it may be a little hard to manipulate.3. Although I didn't buy a tripod, it looks as if you can't eject the tape while the camera is attached.Would I buy it again? Absolutely</review_text>
The first one I got from Amazon wouldn't hold a charge, but they sent a replacement within a couple of days with no hassle or grief! YAY AMAZON111The unit does exactly what it is supposed to do, and does so with reasonable clarity.  Keep in mind that the pictures will be relatively small, so the closer you take the picture the better you will be able to see it on the screen. Make sure your focus is on the money and you will not be disappointed.  A great way to show off the children and grandchildren</review_text>
I got the Digital Keychain for my wife, so she could carry pictures of our 3 grandchildren. I had to download the Mac software from the Tao website to load the photos, but everything then went pretty smoothly. My wife really likes the result.The hardware gets 5 stars - it works as advertised, and the photos look pretty good for a very small screen.The software gets 3 1/2 stars. It crashed once, but since then it's been stable. It does a good job of letting me crop pictures (which is important, since only closeups are useful on the small LCD screen). It took some trial and error to find out the best way to use the software:1. Select each desired photo, and edit it to add to a "collection".2. Transfer the collection to the keycain.3. Save the collection as a file.4. When you later want to add more photos, do not open the old collection. Just start aother collection and add the new photos. Then transfer the additional photos to the keychain. If you add the photos to the original collection, and then transfer that, you wll end up with two copies of your original photos on the keychain</review_text>
This item is terrific for its intended purpose - small reminders of good memories that you can carry with you.  As other reviews indicated, though, do not expect awesome picture quality.  The sentimental value is not diminished by that, though</review_text>
I have gotten these for my husband for Christmas, my boss, as a thank you, and am planning to get one for my mom on Mother's day.  You can't go wrong with these</review_text>
Great gift idea.  Easy to download pictures and to use afterwards.  Just use close up shots to be able to view them easier</review_text>
The first thing everyone comments on in seeing this scope and then learning what I paid for it is: "Wow- that's a lot of scope for the bucks!". Indeed, it's got all the attachments for a well rounded amateur's scope not only for star gazing, but also for terrestrial viewing.Included in the accessories and all 1.25" diameter, is: (1) a Star Diagonal (90 degree angle adaptor). (2) a 20mm eyepiece. (3) a 4mm eyepiece. (4) a 3x Barlow Lens.  (5) a 1.5 Erecting eyepiece for terrestrial viewing. (6) a 5x24 Finderscope. (7) and an Accessory Tray for the various lens.By easily removing the accessory tray to allow full collapsing of the tripod legs, then tilting the scope to full vertical position, the whole assembly can be made ready for easy transport or storage. Celestron carries a full line of accessories from different eyepieces to filters, etc. This is a real bargain!</review_text>
Great product!  We love it.  Great concept.  My only Criticism is the instructions were a little lacking.  They assumed you would know exactly how to use the product.  Once we figured out a few key steps it was great!</review_text>
It is very use to use and you get what you buy. It is better for pictures with big images</review_text>
This is a nice bag, but don't buy it for a Canon S2 IS it will not fit.  The product compatibility lists the S1 IS since the S2 and S1 are very similar I purchased this bag.  I can't even get the thing in the bag.  It is a nice bag however and have put my smaller Kodak camera in it.  There is plenty of room for a typical point and shoot camera and all of it's accessories.  Good quality</review_text>
The bag is pretty good, but it's a bit tight for the digital camera I bought.  Not a flaw in the case, but not the best for ultra zoom type digital cameras</review_text>
I purchased this bag to carry my Hp photosmart Digital camera and photo printer along with , 100pk 4"x 6" photo paper, power cord and two chargers that each hold 4 AA batteries, and I still have room left. I'm very pleased</review_text>
Targus DPMV02 Pro Series Video/Photo Backpack.  I can put both of my digital cameras in, all my lenses, flashes, and my mp3 player.  Padded sections keep everything from getting scratched on everything else.  It also keeps everything nice and neat.  The pack looks small but it held all my stuff with ease.  The padded dividers also keep it very quit which is great cause i take a lot of wildlife photos.  The pack isn't small but it's compact and it stays high on my back when i'm walking through tall brush.  Also it's smooth so i'm not snagging it all the time on things. :)It has a convenient cell phone pocket that you can situate a bunch of places on the straps.The only thing i found it lacking was a spot for my tripod in or on the bag</review_text>
I bought this bag for a Sony DCR TRV19 mini DV camcorder. It has enough room for the cables , power supply, external mic and about three tapes. Not huge but sufficient if you want to keep size to a minimum. I have owned Targus laptop computer bags and found them to be of high quality and durability. So far this bag is living up to its legacy. I bought it on sale for 9.99. I would still pay the 12 bucks for it</review_text>
I was a bit concerned about buying an "aftermarket" equivalent but I was very wrong.  This battery performs 100% like the Canon brand.  You won't be dissappointed</review_text>
I bought this battery for as a back-up for my Canon SD630.This camera has no viewfinder so the 3" display is always on.There was no problem with using the Canon charger with the Lenmar battery. I didn't time the first charge, but I'd say it took about an hour.Over the next three days, I took 162 pictures and about 7 minutes of video with out recharging. About half of those pictures were indoors with the flash turn on.The only reason that I didn't give this battery "five stars" is that I can't yet speak to the battery longevity as I only had it a few weeks yet.I'm very happy with this battery. Save a few bucks and buy this one instaed of the Canon NB-4L.</review_text>
This item was received promptly and well packaged. Item works fine and is a quality item. Excellent service</review_text>
I'm very happy about this product, as I bought this even though I was skeptic about its performance but very much satisfied for the money. I used it with my Canon SD 630, I was able to take around 150 snaps and around 20 mins of video</review_text>
Love the battery life of this battery.  It's also much less expensive than getting the Cannon replacement</review_text>
Bought these from Amazon for only $7.99. I bought two and both are equally good. I got 320 pictures and 10 short videos from one charge of these batteries, which is more than the one that came with my Canon SD630. I only got 210 from the original so when I got 330 out of this battery I was estatic. For only $8 what a deal! Esp. when the Canon is $50. I got two of these so I have enough battery power for over 800 photos before I need to charge. Don't know about the longitivity of these batteries but even if they don't last as long as Canon's, I'm completely satisfied</review_text>
I bought this as well as other Lenmar batteries. I own the Lenmar equivalent of a Sony camcorder battery, two other different Canon camera equivalents, and now I'm getting the NB-4L and NB-5L as well from Lenmar.I don't have a doubt about Lenmar. The batteries I bought three years ago are still performing flawlessly, and while Canon has caught up to them in capacity (yes, the Lenmar batteries used to have more capacity than the Canon branded ones) they are still high quality and charging with the cameras' OEM chargers without any problems. And they cost a third to half the cost of the Canon and Sony branded equivalents.The Lenmar I got for my S400 Digital Elph actually outlasted the Canon battery, though I used them alternately and the Lenmar had more mAH than the Canon.I've had more quality and warranty issues (though resolved) with Canon than I've had with Lenmar, so for me Lenmar deserves all five stars</review_text>
this battery is so much better than the Canon brand that came with my camera. On a recent trip I got almost 150 photos with this battery..almost 3 times as many with the Canon bran</review_text>
for a battery of this size, the price was great.  i applied for an amazon credit card and got $30.00 off which made the price even better.  battery works great so far</review_text>
Just bought this for my Sony HDR-HC1, The battery is big, but it balances the camera better than the standard battery. I think that sony designed the camera a little heavy in the front to make this battery balance the camera so well. The price seems steep but it is less than buying three standard batteries, that it replaces.A great buy in my book! Buy two so you can always have one charged and ready to go. You will run out of tape before ypu run out of battery</review_text>
Hasn't run out of juice yet.  Will run the camera for several hours</review_text>
The good news is that I got what I wanted from this battery.  I can go on all-day outings to the zoo, an amusement park, or any place far from an AC outlet, and just keep my camcorder turned on without worrying about running out of juice.  Or, I can use my camcorder on battery power for several days running without having to recharge the battery.  Furthermore, that battery level indicator on the back is a neat extra added attraction that lets me see how much juice I have left without having to use any in the process.However, this extra security comes at a price -- and I don't just mean in dollars and cents.  Granted, none of the drawbacks I'm about to discuss are actual show-stoppers (and come to think of it, a dead battery literally would be a show-stopper, wouldn't it?), but they're worth thinking about if you want to buy yourself some additional battery time and you're trying to decide whether to buy it in the form of this high-capacity battery or several lower-capacity batteries.The first problem is admittedly the least important because you can get around it simply by either planning ahead or buying one of those separate battery chargers that does the job faster than the camera itself.  But if you do rely on the camera to recharge your battery, this baby takes a LONG time to go from fully drained to fully charged.  No big deal if you remember to start it charging the night before the day you need it, but if you forget, you can't start it before breakfast and expect to have a full charge by the time you've finished your eggsBut there's one other reason why this is a lesser worry.  Unlike some other rechargeable batteries*,  the NP-QM91D**  can be recharged before it's fully drained with no resulting loss in capacity.  My understanding is that if you try to do this with some batteries, the amount of charge they can hold at that point becomes the maximum amount they can EVER hold again.  For example, if said battery originally had a capacity of six hours and you recharged it after using up only four, the battery could then take only four hours worth of charge, and so would would only hold a four-hour charge from that point on.  Because the NP-QM91D**  can be recharged at any time, you never have to let it fully drain once you've charged it, and thus never have the LONG wait for it to fully charge after you've done it once..The more significant drawbacks for me come from this battery's increased weight and size ...The NP-QM91D's increased weight doesn't make the camcorder uncomfortably heavy by any means, but it does shift its center of gravity significantly, which took some getting used to.But the larger SIZE of the NP-QM91D, and its resultant shape, is what's really been causing me trouble.  The lower capacity batteries, such as the NP-FM50 I'd been using, slide nicely down into a recessed area on the back of the camera, and are held snugly in place until you release them because their back surface is flush with the back of the camcorder.   This higher capacity battery fits into that same recessed area, but protrudes beyond the back of the camcorder.  Yes, the viewfinder can be extended to accommodate this, and I usually use that LCD screen on the side of the camera anyway -- which I can now much more readily afford to do because I don't need to worry so much about the extra drain on the battery.   But the protruding battery it makes much harder to connect the AC power adaptor.More importantly, the battery isn't held in place nearly as securely, because it's a long, heavy rectangle that's being gripped only at one end.  I've actually had it come loose and fall off the back of the camera several times.  On one of these occasions, that meant  I missed a shot I wanted to get because I was reattaching the battery.  However, I admit this probably wouldn't have happened if the camera had been mounted on a tripod.So maybe the real problem is that this battery was intended for professional videographers, and I definitely ain't one.  If you definitely ain't one either, you might want to hesitate before buying this battery -- although, as I said at the start, it has been helpful, despite the problems.* Such as the one in my cell phone or my cordless razor.** Along with all Sony camcorder batteries, and most other camcorder batteries nowadays, as I understand it</review_text>
I gave them an A+. Delivery was on time. I will buy from them again, GREAT DEAL!!!</review_text>
i am an amateur photographer and this tool comes in very handy when shooting with my dsc r1 on a tri pod ....totally removes the possibility of "camera shake"</review_text>
Does what it's supposed to.  I use it with a Sony DSC-V1, no problems</review_text>
This little, inexpensive gadget is exactly what's needed to rid your videos of the shakes. I have a Sony tripod with the zoom feature built into the handle, and it's impossible to zoom without causing the shakes, even slight ones.This remote is the perfect solution</review_text>
I use it on three sony cameras I own with no problems at all. The Sony DSC-R!, HDR-HC1, and the F828.Allows better photos in low light settings, no more shaky fingers on the shutter button for me</review_text>
Nice having the zoom & record button separate from the camera.  Tried using the remote, but it's zoom goes too fast and looks jerky.  Only wish the zoom button had variable control like on the camera</review_text>
I don't know why people complain about the clip, its not that big to be a distraction. I'm glad that the thing is available so I can use my still camera on a heavier tripod when outdoors</review_text>
Like this little thing. I was especially impressed with the half-pressed shutter button, just like on the actual camera. Half-pressing gives the camera time to focus, a full press takes the shot. Seems very sturdy, zoom and telephoto are a nice touch. I personally like the clip, but I guess it would be nice if it was removable. Only reason I give this a 4, and it's petty, is I thought it would have been cool to include the jog-dial for the dscf717 to use the manual setting, or change the focus area.</review_text>
I admit I am a novice for the most part when it comes to cameras, but this is something everyone should have; Mainly for the case but also for the extra battery.  I was climbing a wall in Florence to get a picture and dropped my Sony DSC-200 (while it was in the carrying case) from about 15 feet up and it came through without a scratch.  Even if you are always carrying it around in a purse or bag, the padding around the carrying case is great to prevent scratches or damage.I know you can get carrying cases for less but the extra battery is great addition for anyone who is taking it on vacation or is worried about running out of battery power and is worth spending the extra money.</review_text>
The case for the memory is nice to have as it really will protect them.  The case for the camera is big enough to carry what you need but not huge.  Very nice set.  Would recommend.</review_text>
I ordered the Accessory Kit for my Sony DSP 200.After carrying the camera around on its own for a while, the Kit is a pleasure to use. The camera fits snugly and there's room for the accessories. All feels safe and secure.Handy for a days shooting, but there's no room for cables/cradles, etc, things you can keep in a suitcase.If you're going to get a spare battery anyway, the price is pretty good too</review_text>
the price i paid with amazon is amazing. battery alone through sony style whould cost me 10 bucks more. the case i got i gave to a friend of mine cuz i ot my self the aluminum case looks better and takes the duo cards, the pouch i can honestly say is ok but i'm not using it i'll go to another friend of mine.that lives me with the battery which i constantly use and rotate with the one that came with the camera</review_text>
this is a good kit for the p100. Its such a good deal because you are gonna buy an extra battery anyway so you might as well buy a kit that has that plus a case and memory stick wallet. i like this case is better than the leather ones. it holds a lot and i feel secure carrying this around</review_text>
Not all of the Permafocus Binoculars are this good, but these are fantastic. If you tire easily of adjusting the focus, you won't believe your eyes when you look through these. I have used these on the lake, baseball games and on the golf course. My son dropped a pair on the concrete and misaligned one lens. Luckily I had already purchased another pair and just had to return to the car to get them. I am writing this review because I am looking to buy yet another pair.Buy and enjoy! You'll be glad you did! Besides, for this price, what have you got to lose?</review_text>
I had a great experience.  The service and pricing were excellent.  The seller provided exactly what and when.  I would buy from them again without reservation</review_text>
I've had no problems editing content transferred from the camcorder to my PC. I don't use the software that comes with the camcorder, I use professional editing software and I have heard it is best to buy seperate editing software when purchasing any hard drive camcorder.The video image quality is terrific. I've edited my scenes and put together splendid DVDs, the transitions between scenes were smooth and impressive. MPEG2 isn't as compressed as MPEG4 (Divx), however it's still a good standard. Anyone who doesn't get good results needs to upgrade their PC - there is nothing less than perfect about this camcorder.The optical zoom is good, although I wish it was 30x or 40x optical zoom. The digital zoom feature is limiting, but that is to be expected and is the case with any camcorder.The controls are easy to use, you can perform the basic functions, zoom, record start/stop without using the touchscreen. Advanced functions are configuration options are in the touchscreen which is easy to navigate.The camera is light and petite, and transports nicely. It fits in one hand well - when recording you can use your other hand to stabilize the shot.</review_text>
There is one imporant detail with this camera, every time that there is a scene transition the image freezes for about half a second, as when your are watching a satellite image and the broadcasat gets momentarily interrupted.This will not be shown if you replay on the camera, but it will after you transfer your video to your PC or burn a DVD.This is mentioned in the manual as normal, I even contacted Sony customer support, and they told me the same thing.I believe you will not like it.I returned mine, as I was dissapointed</review_text>
Great handycam.  Fast and easy to use.  We received it at 5pm and used it at 7pm to record a concert.</review_text>
A superb piece of equipment. A delight to use. No problems at all</review_text>
I've been using the Sony Handycam for work and so far it's been working out pretty well. I'm not a manual reader and like things to work right out of the box. With a working knowledge of these new gadgets today, it was relatively easy to get it started. I'm able to export directly to my computer or create a dvd with only one touch of a button (although I haven't done this yet). I like it, it's easy to use, light weight and has a 30 gb hard drive so it never runs out of space.The only drawback is that I'm often trying to figure out where the connectors are on the camera. I'm figuring it out though</review_text>
Really like the camera. Just a little hard to download. My brother-in-law bought one after using mine. But he got the download kit from Sony for recording the videos(about $200).  That was money well spent. Does Ok on pictures, great on video recording. BEST PART, it is a 2 in 1 that fits in a regular digital camera case!  The Zoom is awesome on this camera!  And the 30GB hard drive records forever</review_text>
This bag is so perfect to fit your point and shoot digital camera in.  I bought a Canon SD 630 and this bag fits the camera, the extra battery, the extra memory stick, and even the tv hookup cords perfectly.  It's very light and very durable.  The shoulder strap is large enough but nothing about the bag is bulky.  I spent HOURS looking online at all types of digital camera bags, and this one was definitely the best one I could find.  It's not expensive, even good looking, and just a great buy</review_text>
I got this bag for a Panasonic DMC-LZ5k.  The camera has not arrived yet, but the case came within 3 days (using the cheapest shipping).  It is high quality and is weather proof.  The front pouch for batteries and such is not as big as I expected, but can probably carry 2 AAs and an SD</review_text>
The front compartment has plenty of room for SD cards, batteries, and other small accessories.  My Kodak DX7440 fits great in the middle, and my phone fits in it too.  I spend alot of time at the zoo, park... on the go with my 2 1/2 year old, so I just slip my ID, money, credit cards whatever in there too, it's became my new little purse and it's not on my shoulder, it's right there on my belt loop</review_text>
I love this JVC bag. There is PLENTY of room, and everything is padded for the protection of my equipment. Thank you, JVC, for a wonderful product</review_text>
This small sized Binocular is excellent for those who look for portable Binocular with huge capability and strong materials.</review_text>
This was a great purchase for my purposes - birding and wildlifing.  I had to get used to turning the center-focus with ring finger, as the zoom lever is in the index-finger position.  To use full zoom, you really need total stability, but half zoom is very useful even from a moving kayak. Right-eye focus ring is right up against the eyecups and hard to move unless you twist open the eyecups, in which case the focus ring is fine.  Focus crispness is not quite what I hoped for at full zoom, but still good for seeing field marks.  One big advantage is the light weight.  This set is as light as the smaller Nikon I lost.  Very nice</review_text>
I've wanted to purchase a pair of binoculars for a couple of years, but kept putting it off because I figured I'd have to dump at least $300 on a quality pair.  I wanted something compact, good quality, and affordable.  Not exactly an easy order.  But after reading the reviews for these bins, I figured I'd give them a try.  All I can say is wow.  These are exactly what I was looking for.  They provide a very crisp image at the lower magnification levels.  And even at 24x, although usually impractical, they are a lot of fun.  I find it easy to focus and change the zoom level with one hand which is a plus.  For general purpose viewing, these are fantastic binoculars.  The bins shipped with a black velcro-flap carrying case with a belt loop on the back, and a small carrying strap that you can attach to your bins</review_text>
Light, easy to use and amazing.  The zoom is unbelievable.  Great product at a great price.  Would recommend to anyone</review_text>
Having had binoculars in the past be either way too expensive or too cheap, I wanted a new pair that would replace a pair that was loaned out, then lost. The opportunity presented itself in the form of a trip to Canada this past September, which required something that would be able to capture the Canadian Rocky vistas, but also not be so heavy that I would feel like needing a cart to stow them in. The Nikon Eagleview Binoculars seem to fill the bill (not too expensive, but also not too heavy). They have a great zoom feature that is easily changed as well as being able to easily focus with one hand. My only complaint is that while zooming in on a subject, the light level is reduced, which occurs naturally due to the nature of optics. You can't have everything, but these were just right, allowing my wife and I to use them time and time again while observing nature. In summary, a good pair for all-around use!</review_text>
For the price, these binoculars provide unparallel carity and easy focus.  I like these binoculars so much that I showed them to a couple of co-workers right away.  One of them was so impressed that he ordered one for his cousin's birthday.  Great product, highly recommended</review_text>
Just took a two week vacation,took my binoculars along.Binoculars are very compact (easy to pack)Very clear view and the zoom feature is stellar,saw amule deer using 8 power,16 gave me a closer view and 24gave me a perfect rack view.All in all, the binoculars are even better for mypurposes than I expected )very satisfied!!!</review_text>
I ordered these binoculars for my husband's birthday. They arrived promptly and in excellent condition; well packed. We both were surprised by how powerful they are and easy to use, WOW! Very, very pleased. They are very light weight (nice for these old arthritic arms and hands). The only possible drawback is that they are not waterproof and need to be kept dry at all times, so DH will not be able to take them along on fishing trips unless he double zipper lock bags them.</review_text>
Oh my god~! This binoculars are AMAZING~! Nikon JAPAN did it AGAIN~!!! I travel all over the world, I attend all sorts of sports event, Nature Watch, and do some SPY work~! I have looked over 300 type and kind of Binoculars, and I FINALLY found this one~!! and bought it for $70 for Sale. It is even BETTER design then the previous model, very light weight, Ease of Use, Compact that fit in my pocket, and POSWERFUL enough to see Galaxy in the sky. I was little concerned if I would loose the Light as you power up the zoom, NOT SO~!!!! If you want ALL round binoculars that are made with QUALITY and right PRICE, this is THE ONE.</review_text>
I have bought a couple of binoculars in the past.  Always thinking the higher magnification was better.  That's not always true as keeping the object steady at 10 and higher with your hands is tough. The higher mags also suck up light making the image darker. Now I have an Eagleview Zoom and don't worry which model I should have chosen. For the most part it stays at 8 but when I really need to get close the zoom is great.  The turn and slide eyecups are a fine feature.Love 'em</review_text>
I had been looking for a case for my Canon digital and was glad to finally find one on Amazon.com.  The case was perfect!  Not only does it protect my camera but is beautiful.  The red leather case gets lots of compliments --- plus it matches my luggage!Thanks Amazon</review_text>
I really like the case.  Its stylish and well made.  Sort of looks like Prada.  Unfortunately Panasonic doesn't have anything like it.  So I bought the Canon.  It fits the F07 maybe a little snugly, but thats OK with me.  I like the easy magnetic closure and the stylish red strap with silver accent.  Panasonic please make a stylish case like this one for your products</review_text>
Love this!!  My new Cannon SD600 fits perfectly in this case.  I'm sure it will save the screen and camera from scratches and/or trauma!!  I ordered the RED.... and can find it easily in my handbag.  The quality is great and seems sturdy</review_text>
I am thrilled to have this beautiful red leather camera case.  It fits my SD600 perfectly.  Just like the camera, the case is stylish, elegant and functional.The leather is a rich red, and it is very well made.  (Matches my Coach red leather wallet wonderfully!)  The case features a tiny pocket that could hold an extra battery, a belt loop on the back, and a matching red leather wrist strap.  The case closes with a magnetic snap and it features a metal Canon logo on the closure flap.A great case for a wonderful camera.  I couldn't be more pleased</review_text>
since it is leather, you can put some pressure on the camera to push it in the case and it stretched perfectly in 1-2 days to allow the SD700 to fit and still snap the clasp. fits 'like a glove' which maintains the beauty of having a small camera yet still a case.</review_text>
Easy to open and close, durable, sleek design, and all around a great case for your Canon</review_text>
This is a very cute case for your Canon SD600. It's a hard kind of leather, which makes it durable and protects your camera. There is just one little flaw to this case, however, towards the top where you have to insert the camera, it is too tight. To solve this problem, I had my old (non- digital) camera shoved in there to kind of loosen it up. This worked and now I can remove my Canon SD600 without any problems. If you purchase this, you have to figure out a way to loosen the the leather at the top, that's all. Since then, I've had no problems with this case and have even received compliments for it. I don't regret purchasing this</review_text>
I purchased the camera case as a gift (along with camera) for my wife and, at first the case seemed too small for her Canon Powershot SD 630, as the flap would not secure, but the leather soon stretched and now it works fine.  Overall construction seems good and solid and it really got a thorough workout on a recent vacation.  Now everything works really well.Overall, the leather case is a good product, but has some minor pitfalls.  Since the fit is so tight you really have to be careful not to get sand, or any other debris, in the case as it will scratch the screen as we did to ours.  Scratches can be prevented with a screen protector, but we couldn't find one before vacation started.The other shortcoming is the strap.  It is a real hassle to re-feed the strap through the hole in the case every time we were finished with the camera and the strap is also not long enough to leave the case and camera connected.  We ended up using the original Canon strap and not the red leather strap because it fit under the flap better.Most importantly, the case is fashionable and that makes the child-bride very happy, indeed</review_text>
This case is awesome.  Not bulky at all and a nice shade of red.  Not too bright, but not to dark so that it looks feminine.  I love it.One small complaint - it's a little tight for my SD630.  Yes, I know it's not advertised for that one, but it's an Elph, so I thought it would be fine.  And it is fine, just a little tight.  It takes maybe two extra secs to make sure the case closes.  I'm hoping the case may stretch a little with use and then it'll be great.  Right now it's a tight fit, but it fits.</review_text>
This is the first electronic gadget I have bought in years that I was able to figure out in minutes!Out of the box, after a 2 hour charge (gave me a chance to watch the tutorial and scan the manual) I wasmaking movies! I have not used the high quality setting yet but the mid-range is pretty darn good! Themost impressive feature is its "anti jitter" filtering. Any other Camcorder I have ever tried makes mymovies look like I am in the middle of an earthquake! Not with this one! (unless you are at max zoom) Theoptical zoom is far more than needed so I never expect to even use the digital zoom. There is an "easy"mode that automatically sets the camera to adequate settings. And it actually works.The only thing I am having problems with is getting the camera to connect to the PC. The camera says"connecting" and just hangs. I have a call in with Sony and will report back. I suspect better editingsoftware will cure that. The software provided is very basic. The workaround for now is to just insertthe DVD directly into the PC then use the software to read and edit it. It would be nice if you could"finalize" the DVD on the PC rather than in the camcorder.Initialy, I purchased the Camcorder alone to see how I like it but I just ordered ALL the options</review_text>
I research the daylights out of everything.  So I wind up usually buying a menage of names since I don't believe any manufacturer is good at everything.  Since my college days in the mid-80s, I've hated Sony products.  I've always believed they waded into far too many product lines and their quality suffered.  So, up until this purchase I've owned nothing Sony for 20 years.  Based on the reviews, though, I just purchased this camcorder and broke it in during a trip to Berlin.  You cannot beat the price for the quality.  Superb zoom (optical really counts as digital blurs the picture and is artificial), easy menu, great night shot capability.  All in all, a wonderful purchase.  Do not hesitate to buy this Sony.  Tip:  get a pack of DVD+RWs to play with since you can re-record and get a pack of dual layer Rs once you're comfortable because they have much more recording space but you CANNOT re-record on them</review_text>
I have had quite a few camcorders over the years (none of them Sony), and when I was looking for a new one, I did my usual 3-4 weeks of researching, etc. I chose the Sony DVD handycam because it was easy to use, the menu was pretty straightfoward, it had a 40x optical zoom (compared to 32x) and it was DVD. I was skeptical about the dvd part because I had heard about the minimal recording time, etc but I didn't understand the different disk formats I guess. Anyway, I am very pleased with this camcorder, and being able to shoot in a 16:9 format is also a nice feature I didn't even think about at first. So, although I am new to Sony camcorders, I am really enjoying this one. My only advice would be to go ahead and buy the memory stick and the disk pack when you buy the camera because you will want them</review_text>
I love this camcorder.  It's simple to use and I love the fact that you just hit one buttom and it formats the disc and then it's ready to go into your DVD player.  It has all the right features, but not so many that you'll never use them all.  I love the clear, precise focus and the night shot option for filming indoors and outdoors.  I've had this product for about 3 months now, I've completed one disc and I'm very satisfied with it's performance</review_text>
I am in the Military and I purchased this product online and had it sent to my wife so she can record my family activities cause I am currently in Iraq she said the camera is awesome it is nice to be able to view my family on dvd if my wife can work it without me being there therefor it is very easy to use. It is a perfect camera for the military family especially since you are away from home.</review_text>
I did some research regarding this camcorder and a couple of the cannons.  I picked this one because it has a USB port, a 40X Zoom, and was sold immediately when I tested it out in a local Circuit City. The touch screen is easy to navigate and I can use the memmory stick on my Sony VAIO Laptop. The only negative is it does not come with any memory;  Other than that, it's an outstanding value. I highly recomend this product</review_text>
This unit records video straight to mini-DVD disks.  You can plug the unit into a TV and play back, you can play back on the LCD, you can finalize the disk and put it into a standard DVD player, or a computer DVD drive.  The unit comes with software to install on your PC that you can then use to edit the video clips, then re-burn to a new DVD if you have a DVD burner on your PC.  The Zoom function on this unit it so powerful it's absurd.  It has a standard 40X optical zoom that is more than enough. On top of that it has a digital zoom that you can program for 80X or a totally insane 2000X.  I can zoom in on a single letter of a word, in a small print book, from 50ft away, and then the letter disappears and turns to pixels.It has a "widescreen" setting in the video options, and the manual does not say that this model records in widescreen, but it does!  It also has a really cool nightshot feature that uses Infrared Radiation so you can film in total darkness.  The sound quality of this unit is what most impressed me.  Very clear, and it has a dolby 5.1 surround converter.  It weighs less than 1 pound, and the battery lasts for 90 recording minutes on a full charge.</review_text>
I am in no way a computer geek, I had no idea what optical zoom and finalizing disc's meant.  But I am a mom that wanted quality home videos of my girls and wanted to spend less than $450.  So here is my opinion.  I returned my Samsung 164 for this camera.  It was the same price but this has the Super Niteshot.  The camera is very light and easy to control with one hand.  The lens is made of glass versus the Samsung which is made of plastic.  The zoom is amazing on this camera, I stood across my kitchen was able to zoom in on the small print on my calendar, AMAZING!  I am so glad I took the Samsung 164 back - the indoor quality of that camera was horrible.  This is excellent even in low light situations.  Very pleased.  I was also able to record on the DVD -R's which do not require formatting - just put the disc in and record.  Oh and finalizing is just when you are done recording you go the menu on the camcorder press finalize and it does in about 1 minute it says it is complete and your done.  Not as complicated as I thought it would be</review_text>
I bought this tripod after having mistakenly purchased the 480RM which is much shorter. The 580RM is sturdier and the carrying case is much better quality. The controls on the handle are handy for the camcorder while they prove to be useless (mainly the zoom button) for the DSC-F828 since it has a manual zoom/focus ring. The only problem we have had (and it seems to have more to do with the camera) is that the DSC-F828 causes the entire tripod head to tilt to one side due to the design of the camera (lens barrel not centered). You would've thought that the tripod would be able to handle off-center weights specially that of SONY products. At the end of the day, it is an excellent companion to our camera and camcorder. Would've given 5-stars if not for the 'tilt' problem</review_text>
Recien adquir este tripode para mi cmara digital sony DSC-V1 y trabaja exelente. De construccin resistente y estilizada, permite por medio del manubrio controlar el encendido/apagado, disparo de la fotografa y el zoom + y el zoom -. La altura maxima que alcanza es la necesaria para tomar fotografas que no queremos salgan borrosas por el temblor de las manos. Muy til tambien para tomar fotografas con el temporizador (timer) y ahora siempre salgo en mis fotos. Realmente es una muy buena adquisicin y su precio es bastante razonable. Altamente recomendable. Espero sea de ayuda. (En espaol es mejor!!</review_text>
This is a great little pocketable camera. I love it. To get the most out of it, it is important to experiment with the various settings. Some tips:- For outdoors, set the exposure to the middle setting, the white balance to sunny (or to prevailing weather, auto works well too.), I turn off image stabilization because it causes a weird distortion warping-like effect especially if you move, and make sure night shot is off. I also use the VGA setting for 640x480 tv resolution. With these settings, my videos look great even on my 42 inch plasma tv. But don't expect high-end results, but very good results, better than I expected for the price and size. By the way, the digital zoom is only ok up to about 1.5, after which it gets much too blurry. Also, make sure to set the lens focus to either long shot or close up, it makes a big difference in sharpness. You can switch it even while shooting.- For indoors, you can use nightshot to help in a somewhat dark room, but make sure to take the exposure down to at least one notch to the left of the middle setting. Night shot helps with making the picture lighter, but it also causes a lot of blurring when things move. Lowering the exposure helps to compensate and lessen the blurring. I found that the middle exposure setting causes too much blurring and is unacceptable. Just turn it down a notch of two from the middle, and you'll get acceptable to good results. Of course adding more light in the room helps. And don't use image  stabilization, it distorts the image too much.- For photos, use the same settings and you'll get good results. Some of the photos I took outside on a beautiful day came out stunning, and look fantastic on the plasma tv.Overall, I couldn't be more pleased with it. I also got a 2gb sd card and an extra battery, which I recommend. It's the perfect size and weight to just keep in your pocket to catch those spur of the moment shots, and for the price it can't be beat</review_text>
I purchased an Aiptek MPVR to use with a Twenty20 helmet cam while riding motorcycles offroad.  It serves that purpose very well.  The video quality is dependent on the helmet cam, as the MPVR is only acting as a recording device.  The unit is light, compact and not subject to the mechanical failures that can occur with tape or disk based recorders.Since it records on SD memory cards, it is easy to delete files to free up space and there is no need for cables to transfer files to a computer.  It uses standard Nokia 8210 batteries, which last for about 1 hour of recording.  A 1 gigabyte SD card holds about 45 minutes of video.You can also use the MPVR as a camcorder or a camera, although it's somewhat limited because of its fixed focus and lack of a zoom.  For the price, I feel it is a great product</review_text>
I always wanted a camera that could take great pics and record.  This camera has it all.  I recommend this camera to anyone who wants a camera that does it all.  The pics come out great as does the video.  This camera is great!!</review_text>
OK. This won't compare to even an inexpensive digital camera or a miniDV camcorder. But for having something small to carry around, it's great. I particularly like the AV in feature. I can record from a DVD, my miniDV, or cable box right into it in mp4 format. For the Mac users, you will need VirtualHub to convert the files as they're in asf format. But, it goes quickly. Over all, I recommend this product to anyone looking for something to carry around for those quick shots</review_text>
ROCKS!!! I used it to take a video of our band in a dark basement, it it worked great. I wanted a cheap video camera that i could thrash around a little bit, and this one went above and beyond. The features on it are great, the battery lasts, all you need, is at least a 512mb sd card. The only thing that i found that needs work is the nightshot. If your video taping some thing thats moving(a band normally moves quite a bit) it makes everything fuzzy, and really can ruin a video. This is a GREAT video camera, and i would buy it if it costs twice as much</review_text>
this is a very cool camera.  All the features work except the tv-dvd recorder and the mp3 player. i am still tring to get the MP3 player to work but it is very hard.(i wrote this review 2 days after i got it so i might figure more stuff out.)  for under $150, this camera is the one to get</review_text>
after reading lots of reviews, it is true, this little camera has power, remember, this is not the same as a 30gig HD camera but! it indeed is a soldier, very good picture and video, excellent mic, nightshot is nice.I'm satisfied, I got two of them to make commentary videos and catch two angles, Im please and satisfied</review_text>
I've been using this carrier to carry around my Sony Cybershot camera. It fits perfectly in it (snug....no wiggling). The camera I'm using is a Sony DSC-T100.I've been very pleased with it. I carry it on my belt. The only reason for the 4 stars out of 5 is the catch on the flap that holds the camera in. It's a magnetic holder and sometimes will pull loose (putting on a seatbelt in the car, etc.). I think a regular snap might have been a little easier.But even with that small difficulty, it's worked very well and I'm well pleased with it. It's sturdy to protect the camera.I would recommend it to anyone.</review_text>
I purchased this case for my new DSC-T10 and it looks great, is of quality leather and fits on a 2 inch belt very snug, which equates to a very good carrying case.  You cannot even tell it's on your belt and the magnetic kepper strap works well.  There is room to stuff in an extra memory stick if you need, but no room for an additional battery.  I guess u gotta give up something for that sleek styling =)  I haven't needed my second stick yet, since I purchased a 1 GB and 512 MB, and if I did, I just put it in my pants pocket</review_text>
This case isn't the best out there but it looks nice and it offers a quick way to take out your camera with its magnetic strap.  The T10 does move around a little bit inside the case.  It isn't a tight fit.</review_text>
This case allows me to retrieve my DSCT5 for that moment that memorys are made of. The easy open strap allows for quick access with one hand when you ware it on your belt.</review_text>
This battery was definitely a good buy.  It last a long time...</review_text>
This battery comes standard with the Panasonic PV-GS35 camcorder.  It provides a few hours of service on each charge, even with the LCD in use and "stop and go" recording and playback.  It is superior to most other standard camcorder batteries.  Naturally, as with many electronic devices, you want a backup battery so you can keep recording - there is no need to spend $75 or more on a different backup or a more powerful one.  This one will be a great backup, or primary, battery for under $60</review_text>
Sony battery, good, long lasting battery. I have used many sony batteries with no failures and no problem</review_text>
I found the frame reasonably easy to use.  Did not have to reformat my pics.  Great valeu</review_text>
I bought this frame for my wife. She has alot of digital pictures and no good way to see them all. After reading the reviews by others, I decided to try this one. She loves it. With the little card reader we have for our computer, she can drag and drop her photos to an SD card. Then just plug in the card, hook up the AC power, and turn on the frame. It goes to the slide show automatically.We didn't bother to re-size or crop the photos. The 1/2" black bars on each side of the photo just aren't that bothersome to us. No remote controls or sound features but if you're looking for a simple frame to just show off all your digital photos, at a reasonable price, this one is great</review_text>
I was lookin for a big frame without the big price, this is perfect!! Very easy to use I bought a 256m sd card filled it with about 130photos and just put the card in, after adjusting the brightness I was all set, its very simple to use, and for the price well worth it!!</review_text>
I have been looking for this traditional look photo frame for quite a long time.  I search no more.  I have found it.  I love this unit and it's very user friendly.  Pros--nice frame design and clear widescreen.  Fast slideshow.  Pictures don't distort like others.  Internal memory can store up to 20 hi-res photos.  on-screen menu and shown buttons.  Best of all:  Last memory!  Cons--buttons on top and can be just a few.  No CF.</review_text>
I am pleased with the purchase.  Very good value.  Picture quality is good and it is easy to operate.  Only negative is that it was advertised as wood frame when in fact it is plastic.  However, it looks good.  This is my second purchase of this product: one for myself and one as a gift</review_text>
purchased as a gift and well received.  seems to handle larger chips in a timely manner.  runs everyday, all day and no problems encountered.  displays vacation pictures clearly.  like that it is big enough to view across the room.  frame is more compatible with decore than the 7" model previously purchased</review_text>
I purchased the Axion 10.4" frame for my wife to replace a defective Polaroid frame from a different source.  The Axion stacked up quite nicely to the other "more expensive" frame.  The Axion is viewable from more angles than the Polaroid frame with a cheaper price tag.  Quality of the display is BETTER on the Axion and we have not had any technical issues.PROS:Brightness controlColor and Contrast of displayEase of setup and operationGood sound from speakers on music playbackCONS:Slide show transitions are from top to bottom only.  Different transitions would be a nice feature.Remote does not control volume of music.Overall the advantages of this frame outweigh the disadvantages.  We have been very happy overall with this purchase</review_text>
This is NOT a high-tech digital frame. It doesn't play MP3's.  It doesn't come with a remote.  It simply reads your digital pictures from a card and displays them in a slide show mode.  There's an "on" button and an "off" button.  There is no manual to read in order to learn how to operate your frame (though it does come with a one-page instruction sheet).  It's great for your office desk when all you need to do is reach over and turn it on or off.  If you want to display it in a difficult-to-reach location, or choreograph your pictures with music, then this is not the frame for you</review_text>
The frame is a good deal for a 10 inch LCD, at least when I bought it about a month ago.  Pictures look great, and a slide show that I converted to an mpeg played with no problems</review_text>
I received the frame today and I already loaded it up with pictures. I resized my home pictures to 640 x 480 which is the highest resolution you can do on this product. The pictures look awesome on the screen.  Love the fact that on Slide Show mode you can determine how long you want the picture to display for. ( 5 seconds or longer.)  The frame is beautiful.  The online pictures do not do it justice.  It also feels nice and sturdy.  I have not tried out the sound yet as I was too excited to take the time to do that.  I am hoping they are as good as the rest of the product.  If you are in the market for a digital picture frame and do not wish to spend $200 and up, this is the frame for you! In my opinion it is a VERY good item for the money</review_text>
Small and quick to use, this cable is easy to use. No more need for card readers when you can carry this cable to save space</review_text>
Cannot say much about a USB cable except it works fine, the price was right and service was fast</review_text>
This product is exactly whats advertised.   I've found good quality at an affordable price and would definately recommend these to anyone looking for the same</review_text>
Just returned from visiting a couple National Parks in Utah where I used the glasses.  They have already paid for themselves.  Very pleased with the quality and picture of the product for the price paid</review_text>
- Field of view : 5/5 ( 170 feet/ 1000 yards ).- Clearness: 4/5 ( I also have Barska Gladiator 12-36x70. It cleare than Bushnell 20x50 ).- Weatherproof: 1/5 : without waterproof</review_text>
These are the best batteries I have ever used in a Digital Camera. I own a Canon PowerShot A640 and take a lot of pictures and it is so nice to have battieries that last such a long time and it has also helped the speed of my camera inbetween shots</review_text>
I bought two sets of these so that I would have a backup set to put into my Canon S3 IS when the first set ran dry. Last year, on a trip to Portugal, Spain, and London, I was quite pleased at how long these batteries lasted before having to install the replacement set. I was able to take the majority of 500+ photographs using just one set, fully charged</review_text>
I bought this camera for my granson and he has alot of fun and is learning alot about how use it . I also saved about 25% thru Amazo</review_text>
This is a great camera - especially for the price.  HP makes the camera-computer interface software very user-friendly and it takes great pictures as well.  It has a nice big LCD screen and the Lithium-Ion battery lasts for a long time for me.  I recommend this camera very highly</review_text>
I have had mine for over a year, I *love* this camera! It is so easy to use, takes great pictures, is very easy to use and program etc...I love everything about this camera.ps: unlike the other poster, I have not had any battery problems at all</review_text>
Now that I've used the camera for a few months I'd like to update my review (scroll down to see original).  The problem I mentioned about using the camera in bright sunlight can easily be fixed by increasing the screen's brightness.  Battery life has been great, far better than my last camera with rechargeable AAs.  Camera is super easy to use and gives great pictures.  For example, I frequently change modes depending on the lighting and that feature is easily accessed from a button on the top of the camera, not through a series of menus.  Friends have been impressed that you can zoom in video mode, something there cameras cannot do, and the built in help screens.  Used the panorama feature on a recent trip to Vancouver and was simple to use and gave great results.  I highly recommend this camera for its size, features, and ease of use.Original: I'm really enjoy my new R817.  It's easy to use and the buttons are all in the right places.  Menus use are easy to follow.  Friends I've showed it to all liked the feel and ease of use without no dials.  I bought it for the size and zoom and I'm not disappointed.  Like all cameras without a view finder, it can be hard to see the screen when shooting into direct sunlight, my only negative.  Also bought the quick charger for the extra battery and case and like the case.  Looked at the new Nikon L1, but the one in the BestBuy was broken so I have no idea how it works.  I figured this was not a good sign</review_text>
It works in the camera. This is the second Lenmar battery I have used.They do not seem to last as long as Panasonic but a good value</review_text>
I see no difference at all between my original Panasonic battery and the one from Lenmar. Excellent price/value ratio</review_text>
Not lenmar brand but very good long lasting at praction of Panasonic OEM battery. Very satisfie</review_text>
It lasts same that the original battery of Panasonic. Excellent option price/quality. The seller fulfilled the treaty</review_text>
Before i bought my FZ20 i did alot of research not only about what assecories to get with the camera, but where to buy them from. Read alot of reviews.  I ended up ordering1.) Two Equivalent to Panasonic CGA-S002 Camcorder/Digital Camera batteries (same ones i'm doing the review for.) I'll go to a concert, take a hundred pics and only go through one battery. Panasonics offical battery costs around 40 something plus shipping and handling if you order it online. I paid 50 altogether for 2 batteries that last just as long as the Panasonic (actually a bit longer then one they sent me with the camera.)Can't beat that value.Here's what i also recommend:a Permaraal 72mm to 62 mm adapter ($40 bucks) and a 62mm filter UV filter of your choice ($15- 30)(mainly to protect the lens, i keep it on all the time.) 62mm filters don't affect the picture or lighting quality, and they're cheaper. Plus you need at least a inch and a half long adapter so the lens has room to move. The 72mm one they send with the camera is TOO long.Also, get a micro fiber cloth. I seriously recommend MicroTear. Awesome brand.For a case, go with Tamrac, i got a Tamrac 5314 Travel Zoom 4 Camera Holster bag. Fits perfectly even keeping the  62mm adapter on. And when i want it off, i keep it at the bottom of the bag, no big deal. I got mine from bhphotos for 17[...]I suggest getting your camera from butterfly photo, i got my FZ20S for 388 for a grand total of 397.80, no tax. If you get it from Best buy or Circuit city expect to end up paying around 550. From amazon; 500.Look into getting a tripod as well, i can't stress how important they can be. If your not serious about getting into photography i don't recommend the FZ20. Get a cheap  Cannon dig ;). Or go with the compac series of Panasonic's Lumix brand. Yah the ones with the crappy lenes.Hope this review helps</review_text>
Unlike another no name gereric batttery this one fit in my pansonic digital still camera perfectlly and works well.   Can't comment on battery life  compared to the pansonic brand yet</review_text>
I was expecting to get the Lenmar brand shown on the website but instead received the Accesory Power brand, However, I have been satisfied with the battery. It is rated at 800mah vs the 680mah of the Panaonic battery. It fits my FZ5 and charger as well as the OEM battery and it seems to last longer</review_text>
I bought this battery as a backup for my Panasonic Lumix FZ3; specifically to shoot 90min plus soccer games.  Overall this a great battery and I am happy with my purchase.  I've owned it for almost a year now and have no complaints.   The battery performs up to standards of the Panasonic battery that came with my camera.  It lasts as long as the Panasonic battery, charges up fine; overall a good battery especially for the money</review_text>
I used the Nikon 80-400mm lens with my D200 for the first time last week at my kids lacrosse game.  Before purchasing this lens, I was a little concerned about some of the comments here that the autofocus is slow to react.  I took about 100 pics at the game, and had one that was slightly out of focus.  All other pics were incredibly sharp.  I think this is a great lens</review_text>
I like this lens.  I use it for landscape photography.  I find the images I take are sharp, and the VR works nicely.  Being a telephoto lens, it is bigger than my wide-angle lenses and heavier (about 5 pounds).  Definitely a workout when I am hiking</review_text>
I have this lens for half-a-year now.  Pricy, of course, but it is worth it.  It allowed me to take some pretty interesting pictures which would not be taken any other way.  Most of the time it is necessary when you `shoot' animals, e.g. birds, or butterflies, who would not allow you to get close.  Another example is to shoot an alligator, where he probably would not mind, but I do.  Then, some architectural shots from a big distance also become possible.  The VR (vibration reduction) is totally amazing.  The thing, however, eats batteries for lunch, so I've started to carry a second battery.  The lens comes in a nice cylindrically shaped bag, and because it is pretty big and heavy, I carry it in it's original bag, instead of trying to stick it into the same bag with camera, so the load is spread. Of course, you really need to love this type of shooting to carry it around.  Overall, the lens is a miracle of the modern technology, and the quality is exceptional.  This is a great fun, and if money allow - I highly recommend.</review_text>
I have to agree with most of the reviews here. It's heavy and not particularly quick focusing, but makes great pictures. I moved up from a 70-300 Nikkor, and it was well worth it. Having the extra 100mm is wonderful (essentially it's like a 600mm lens on a 35mm). And the VR is fantastic. One of the best endorsements for it is the number of times I've heard "You took that handheld?". Closer minimum focusing distance would be nice, but I have no real complaints about this lens.I posted a couple of photos here, but you can't really see the detail.Some Nikon lenses feel like they're made for the masses. The 80-400 has the 'pro' feel you come to expect from Nikon. You won't be disappointed</review_text>
Bought for a safari in Africa in large part based on other Amazon reviews - and am very satisfied.  Contrary to one of these reviews I find the lens quite light for what it does.  Only issue is that it really is a bit slow and not ideal for very low light situations.But it's compact and the optics really are great. Highly recommended</review_text>
Yes, without a doubt this lens is worth the price.I have not used it with film but I couldn't be happier with how it performs on mydigital D200.There is a reason that the pro's use lenses from the manufacturer of their cameras.The same reason that these lenses cost more! Quality, durability and performance!When you hook this lens up to the new camera technology the performance is quick and responsive.  Yes, the autofocus does hunt at times, usually as you focus the first time. It is an easy switch to manual focus and also can be slightly adjusted manually during exposure lock. Images are crisp and colors are superb!Personally I like the weight and substantial feel of this lens.  When extended to full zoom the balance is not quite as nice  but certainly manageable for me.  I am over 6ft tall and could see where someone of smaller size would find this lens to be heavy. As far as I am concerned the size and weight are as they should be for a quality lens with this range.Build quality is very good!  Controls are in the right place and quickly become intuitive.  I have to disagree with other complaints in regards to the tripod collar.The one that came with my camera fits tightly and securely.  It also removes very easily and since it is heavy the weight reduction is noticeable.This lens comes with a very rugged pouch and strap as well as front and rear caps and lens shade.  The lens shade is big!  Suffice it to say that if you are using the lens shade on this lens it looks like something from the sidelines of an NFL game.Bottom line is this is my favorite lens!I thought long and hard about getting the 70-200mm AFS and the 80-200AFS  nikkor lenses. Not a day goes by that I haven't been glad I put my money towards this lens with it's much bigger zoom range.  Remember the 1.5 factor when using with digital sensor.Good luck</review_text>
I bought this for my 8 year old and she loves it. Its easy to use. She and her friends take pictures with it all the time. She has even dropped it a few times and it still works no problem. The pictures and movies aren't great but good enough. I wouldn't get it for my main camera though. Its really more of a toy</review_text>
the only problem with this video camera (and I do mean only problem) is that it wasn't the color I was expecting (grey all over instead of black accents). Other than that it is amazing. Granted, it doesn't take the greatest quality video, nor does it take night shots at all, but if you're going to buy a video camera for this price, you better not expect those things anyway. This camera is perfect for catching moments in your life and making fun little videos for fun.</review_text>
I purchased two of these cameras at the same time with the intentions of making anaglyph (Red/Blue 3D) movies.  While I will agree that the picture quality leaves a bit to be desired, these cameras are just too much fun.  The ease of use is great, and having a dual-camera rig for 3D movies at $200 is great.The picture quality is akin to about 3MP, so don't let the advertisement fool you.  Even still, I've printed off a few of these pictures on photo paper and I found the results more than satisfactory.The audio quality is subpar to my ears.  However, this wasn't a factor for me, since I'm using my audio studio to capture all of my audio tracks.  I later combine the audio with the video through editing software.If you're serious about your film projects, you're probably going to want to get something with a higher quality, as this product's quality is like a digital version of VHS (ie it's pixelated and is a little bit blurry on fast movements).  However, if you're looking for a fun video camera for making your own home video or amateur project, this thing is fine.  Plugged straight from the camera to the TV, a semi-stationary video will turn out just fine.I would recommend getting a good tripod for most applications.  The quality of picture is directly affected by how much the camera moves, so a good, smooth tripod will eliminate a lot of that</review_text>
what amazed me as soon as i opened the box was how small this camcorder is about the size of a woman's hand.  it came complete with tripod stand, carrying strap, carrying case, software CD, cables and even batteries.The software is easy to install and has all you will need for viewing and editing your pictures or video.the viewing area for this camcorder is small(like the product itself) but is surprisingly easy to view.  it comes with a 4x zoom that you have to see to believe.  there both manual and auto focus on the camera as well as settings for indoors, outdoors and low light.  the cam comes with a built in light that does a remarkable job for such a small cam.the pictures and video are great and with a 1 gig card you have all the room you could possibly need.  the features on this are so numerous that i can not list them all.  following along with the instruction manual is the best way to learn how to use this cam properly.  it comes with both a full manual and quick use guide.  trying to "wing" it is possible because this camera is so easy to use but you will likely miss out on many of the great functions that are available.everyone that i have shown this product to was amazed at the quality of the cam and the low price.  this is one great deal and i suggest impossible to pass up.many digital camera's that are much more money only take clips and do not capture better pictures than this cam.in summary i highly recommend this camcorder, you can not go wrong with it :</review_text>
great first camcorder/camera for our daughters bday, eats batteries like crazy, sugguest  a rechargeable battery set up. But very satisfied, and good price to</review_text>
I like to take pictures, and my husband wanted a camcorder, so when we saw this at Wal*Mart for under $100 we thought we'd give it a try.  I've been using it as my main camera for a little over a year and it isn't too bad for just family photos.  The camcorder is fun to play with, and I sometimes use the MP3 player.  It was worth the money.However, eventually you are going to want a better camera.  Indoor shots all come out slightly dark and yellow.  But don't expect to get a better camera for this price.  I am looking at $300-500 for the quality I really want.I am trying to decide if I will give this camera to my 8yo daughter when I am done with it.  She's a budding photographer and she will enjoy taking videos, but honestly I think the camera she has now is better quality than this one</review_text>
this product was a great replacement for my canon sd630. it works great. and it was much cheaper than buying it directly from canon. thanks amazon</review_text>
I accidentally misplaced my original one, and the company shipped it out very quickly, had no problems.  Service and product are great</review_text>
It charges the battery as promised, quick and efficient. It's small and easy to hide. This makes it easy to pack for vacations and adventures, however, it also makes it easy to lose, which is why I'm purchasing another charger. Go figure.</review_text>
This compact charger works great. Gets me up and running again in no time</review_text>
Service was wanderfull and the produt is what i was looking for plus is less expensive .Im happy</review_text>
This order was a bit confusing.  I tried repeatedly to contact via email the company shipping this item but they were very slow in responding to my inquiry.  Turns out the shipment had already arrived but one of my family members had failed to let me know it had come and where they had put it.  So, while it turned out there was NO problem with the shipping, or the product, the company was slow to respond to my emails when I THOUGHT it had not been shipped.  Eventually after I had sent 4 separate email inquiries I did hear from them and they said it had been shipped and I should have received it.  That is when I started questioning all 6 family members about deliveries.  I wrote the company and apologized letting them know I had received it but never heard back from them again</review_text>
Not too much to say about this item except TRY NOT TO LOSE IT</review_text>
I bought this camera to start my production business with and it was the best move I could have made. This camera is great for a beginner like me. It is user friendly while still allowing for ajustments. The HD is also amazing, my customers that have there videos in HD are absolutely floored we they get their finished product. A few things that I can recommend are getting a tripod as well as an extended battery. The stock battery only provides about 45 min with LCD and if you add anything other then the shotgun mic it lowers it even more. Make sure you use only high quality tapes. (I found out the hard way) Good tapes for this camera are going to cost about $10 to $15 but they are worth it when you reduce the time for re-tape due to drop-out on the film. All together this for me is a great camera for the price. Anything better is going to run you about $8000 or more</review_text>
This camcorder is from the Sony Professional division with pro level warranty support.  Sound is 70% of the experience and this camcorder delivers pro level XLR connectors with 48V power.  For best sound results manually set the volume as high as possble keeping the peaks below 0db.  The CMOS sensor produces amazing HD quality.  A head shot of a person wearing a ball cap facing into strong direct sun with a deep  shadow across their face does not blow out the highlights and shows full details in the shadow.  I'm using Sony Vegas 7 to edit the results and I'm very happy with both the camcorder and Vegas.This is bigger than the small consumer camcords but is about the same size as my old Sony Digital 8 camcorder and it's smaller than any other pro camcorder.  Pro shooters are always amazed and comment on how small it is.  Nothing produces this level of pro results without spending a lot more money.While as good or better than the current crop of small HD consumer camcorders for shooing in low light there are better pro models such as the Sony Z1 and V1 for low light.  The manual settings are via the touch screen and a not included PDA stylus is a must have to keep finger prints of the screen.  24fps can be done but you need Cineform Connect HD to do the pulldown from the Sony CF24 as the native CF24 is choppy until you use Cineform.  If 24fps is a must the Sony V1 is a better choice</review_text>
The Sony HVR-A1U CMOS High Definition Camcorder with 10x Optical Zoom performs as advertised.  It is very versatile to answer the user's various demands on it.  When High Definition DVD recorders (Blu-Ray or HD DVD) become standardized and widely available, I expect this technology will be the norm.  The pictures in Hi-Def are wonderful</review_text>
Had a problem trying to extend an emitter and the "Blink Back" LED. Due to my errors with polarity I had problems. Tried to resolve by e-mail. Marcus sent me another unit and I still could not get it to work! Then  I called the direct phone number Marcus gave me and...Problem Solved!! If only 10% of suppliers were as responsive as this company is, the world would be a much better place. Also, the Hot Link Pro works as advertised and in my case is a life saver!</review_text>
The installation couldn't get any easier..but, it didn't work right away and then it did for some reason.  There isn't any troubleshooting in the directions, so they may want to consider putting that in.  The product is a must have if you are putting your equipment in the closet out of sight. We still have one little glitch, we can get it to turn the tv on and off but not the cable box</review_text>
I think it is great that Amazon is carrying this product.  The price is right and this is a great solution for hiding A/V components.  I used it on my WOW! cable box behind my wall, and mounted the eye just below my Bose Center Channel speaker.  I have a 42" panasonic plasma display, and mounting the eye behind the display does not work as recommended.  It needs to be in clear sight of the remote control when in use.  I also purchased the Terk Leapfrog and the Radio Shack version of the leapfrog, and they were both horrible.  I was looking for a wireless solution and this was not the way to go.  These products also worked, but the range was not as advertised and quite poor (had to be less than 5 feet away with my remote control).  I highly recommend the Microsmith for the do-it-yourselfer</review_text>
I rate the system as excellent.  I might rate it as outstanding if I were familiar with all other systems that perform the same purpose.  I have an extensive Audio/visual system and have found that universal remotes cannot fill all my needs or that adjustment/tuning is always in doubt.  On the other hand, you have to get up and open your cabinet to have direct visual contact with whatever system(s) you want to use.  The Hot Lint Pro system takes all those issues away and with all the necessary remotes at hand I am able to use any part or combinations of my system with ease and reliability.  It is remarkably easy to install and is not obvious to the eye.  This is a system that simplifies and is unobtrusive.</review_text>
This product is one of the best purchases I ever made.  Works like a charm!  If you are in the market for this type of product, this is the brand you should get.</review_text>
1)Good thingsImage qualityGreat Zoom  with ISDecent pictures for a camcorderAutomatic turn off when you put 90 down2) Panasonic Savings (things to improve)Plastic lens capNo SD Card inlcudedNo microphone jackNo blue light in the jostickNo built in flashIt is not un upgrade for the PV GS 300. The image quality with the 3 CCD is great but "Panasonic savings" in such things...not a very smart move.HD camcorders (Sony or Panasonic) with the same image quality cost addtional $400. Buy if you have no time to wait that the HD Camcorders prices decreases o try to get a PV GS 300...</review_text>
I have been in the market for a HD camera at the best price. I looked into the canon HV-10 which is priced at 1000 dollars which is HD quality. I compared this camera as a baseline.Online I read about the Panasonic PV-GS320 which is the upgraded model of the GS300 released early 2006. This camera has 3CCD , what does that mean? each ccd is a processing chip that allows the image to display at it's best.How do you test this? Go to your local Best Buy or Compusa where they have this camera. On the 1 CCD camera zoom in at 25-30X digital zoom. You will start to see blurry. Do the same with the GX320 you will see much clearer and crisp image.You will notice the difference right away.</review_text>
Great product, I can always say that DV recording much better quality than recording to hard drives. Battery life is short but I got the bigger battery so, I can record up to four tapes with CGA DU21</review_text>
I just bought 2 Handycam 505 from Sony.  Spending so much on a product I wanted something to protect it and I got it with this accessory kit.  From the extra battery to the extra disk, I was able to start recording the first day</review_text>
Amazon updated the info on this case incorrectly. This is the ACC-DVDP case for the DVD 203/403 mini DVD camcorders. I mean, this is the perfect case for the camera. The camera fits into the palm of your hand and the case goes right around it with space for your batteries and mini DVD's. The entire world can tell that this case was made just for your camcorder.---Note: Don't buy it for the DVD 7 as listed in the product info.They have the wrong camcorder listed. THIS IS FOR THE MINIDVD 203/403 CAMCORDERS!!</review_text>
I'm a beginner who still wanted the longer reach that this lens offered. The difference between this and a 70-200mm lens was amazing, especially when the effective zoom is equivalent to more than a 300mm -- more like 450mm, I'm told. By only complaint was the length of time it took Amazon to get this product to me. It arrived at my house while I was on vacation, getting by with a 70-200mm lens and cursing my bad fortune</review_text>
Not a pro, but this was a really good value for me</review_text>
As others have mentioned, the autofocus is a little slow and sometimes won't focus at all in really low light. But you should be manual focusing anyways. Other than that this is a great lense, especially for less than 200 dollars. I've used it for photographing motocross and surfing so far. The 300mm is good for getting close up with the surfers while standing on the beach. The colors are crisp and this lense seems to be a little sharper than the 28-80mm Nikkor that came with my D50</review_text>
This lens is one of Nikon's "best bang for your buck" products.  It's a very good telephoto zoom, unbeatable for the price, and most amateur photographers will find it quite satisfactory for their needs.  Would I like to have a $5000 telephoto?  Would I like to have VR?  Sure, but this is the best way there is to get a very nice piece of long Nikkor glass on a tight budget.D40 owners, forget it, this is not an AF-S lens</review_text>
I am very pleased with how quickly I received the order and with the product. I used this Lens while attending a Seminar a few days after receiving it and was very pleased with the quality of the pictures</review_text>
I just recently got a Nikon D40 for christmas, and i wanted to get a nice zoom lens that would suit my needs, as well as be really inexpensive, and i think this lens fits that to a "t".  contrary to popular belief, this af-g lens does work with the new nikon d40, the only thing is that it does not autofocus. which isnt a big deal really.  I rated this lens as a 5 because it takes amazing pictures.  I love it. you really cant beat this lens for the price.</review_text>
The lens was just what I wanted it was awesome, Shipping was extremely fast and this was ordered 1 week before Christmas I had the lens 3 days after I placed my order. Thanks</review_text>
The lense does everything it was advertised to do and at a reasonable price</review_text>
Don't be fooled by what people say for this item.They say things break by using it or just fall off of this product. So where do I begin, well first off I could not be more happy with this product then I already am. I got this in a nice box and opened it right away. First thing I noticed was its size. It is nice and small and thats the way it should be. However when I saw how small it was compared to what I originally thought, I was worried about video quality. Then onced I recorded things in different lighted areas, I found it to have great quaslity. One problem I did found was when It was dark, this camera deos not do so well in the dark. It just lowers the quality of the video. So after trying it out I was confused a little at how to work it but I found out how to use it right away. I bought the 10 dollar 1G memory card with it and they work perfectly together. The clip on lens protector is a little unsatisfieing but it will do good in the short term. I have not tried the MP3 player because I did not buy this camera for that, however I did try the voice recorder. Everything works great from the Pictures to the videos to the Voice Recorder. This camera also has nice small features like changing the formats of things you record, and all those little things. For about one-hundred dollars this is a must buy. This camera is perfect if your looking for compatibility, and recording movies. Believe it or not if you record at 30 fps on a 1GB card you can record to about one hour and thirty minutes.Pros:-Price (Camcorder is about 100$ HOWEVER buy the 10$ GB card because not all cards can go into this camera, believe me its worth the money. The card is cheap and works perfectly for the camera.)-Quality (Good quality for such a small thing and you can chose from different frame rates.)-5.1 Megapixels (This is good for cameras, some expensive cameras might not even have this.)-Memory ( With the card this is a good amount of memory that will allow you to film for at least an hour.)-Cables and Programs (A CD comes with the camera to install some programs to save the things you took onto your computer, if you don't have anything already.)-Compatibility (Nice light weight camera.)-Included Carrying Case (Comes with carrying case to protect your camera even more.)Cons:-(Confusing to use at first, it is possible to delete thigs without you knowing what you are doing, however everything is explained in the manual.)-Clip On Lens Protector (It is kinda bad after a while, because it deos losen, however camera comes with carrying case anyway so thats good.)-Memory (The built in memory is not that good at all, so buy the card or you won't enjoy this camera.)Anyway this camera is perfect for filming those little moments in your life, like on vacations or other things like that. You can easily tuck it somewhere where it won't bother you. However if you want PERFECT quality you won't find that here. This camera deos have great quality but its not perfect.This is a product that most likely you will love or hate, however I really loved it</review_text>
I love this camera. For what it does--it works great! It's ultra-compact and fits anywhere--in a coat or pants pocket--and the pistol-grip style make it handy to shoot stuff without missing the action. This makes it super-convenient for traveling--where you don't end up spending so much time looking through an eyepiece that you miss enjoying the view yourself. And the MP3 player comes in handy on long plane flights. No, it's not an HD camera and it shoots poorly under low light conditions. For the price--I was pleased and happy with the shots it took. I'd love to see a higher quality version of this, too. But it's not garbage like some of the other reviewers stated. It has some nice features (the price!!) and some limitations. So if it fits your uses--get one. You'll be glad you did.The best things about this camera/camcorder:-it works great in daylight/outdoor conditions-it is super compact-it let's you point and shoot pistol-grip style (so you can enjoy what you're viewing)-it's ideal for video that's going straight to the web (it uses avi, mov, asf)-you can replace the AAA batteries whenever you want/need to--not a proprietary battery that requires a special charger, handy when you travel in countries outside the US-you can replace the memory cards when they fill up (and I think the cheapest place to get them is Amazon)-it doesn't attract attention to itself like large camcorders with flashing led recording lights-it's nice to have an mp3 player, camera, camcorder, and audio recorder all-in-one--truly a multimedia recording deviceBut, also beware that there are some things it doesn't do really well...-it really only works in daylight/bright light conditions (don't even try shooting outdoors at night)-the flash doesn't really work unless you're shooting within 3' of subject-the battery and lens cover are plastic and will wear out if heavily used/misused-there is no external mic jack-the menu for the mp3 player is limited-the manual is somewhat lacking and the print is really small</review_text>
Overall, this is a nice digital camcorder for under $150. My only complaint is that still images always look blurred when taken indoors. If you are buying this for taking still images, I suggest you buy a different camera.I suggest you purchase a SD card with this camera, because the 32 MB built-in memory just isn't enough to fully enjoy this camcorder</review_text>
I am amazed at the complaining about a $150 camera/camcorder. When you buy one of these, don't expect it to be like the $900 ones! I have taken several pictures that were clear and high quality. The camcorder does exactly what I want it to do and I am extremely pleased with this unit. DXG is on to something here that will help us all, but they are not perfect. This unit is exactly what I wanted and I will recommend it to anyone in the market for a camera camcorder that is easy on the pocketbook</review_text>
I have own this 3CCD one for 1 year. I had another 2, 1 from JVC and 1 from Panasonic. They are not working indoor most of time because of the dark and bad light. However, this 3ccd one makes a real difference. I am more than happy to have it.The only problem is the poor still image quality although it says 2Mb resolution. But I always use dedicated digial camera, so not a big deal for me</review_text>
I would put this camera in 5/5 rating if the it could work fine in low light. In day light or in electric light even if not so bright, this camera does a good job.The look and Feel: Perfect. Its fits on the palm of my hand and its very comfortable to handle.Movie: Wonderful quality in broad daylight 5.0/ 5.0. In low light 2.0/5.0 Average night light 4.5/5.0Picture: 3.0/5.0 But this is not meant to be a digital camera. But still does a decent job on that side.Over all: 4.5 /5.</review_text>
I use this camcorder for my own videography business and have never had any complaints about the video quality.  To get a better camcorder, you would literally have to pay twice as much money.Some people have complained about the low light capabilities, and in my mind this is the one problem with the camera.  You will need to find a good camcorder light to make up for this problem.  But images shot outdoors look similar in quality to my friend's $2000 cannon camcorder!If you're looking for a "pro-sumer" camcorder and you're on a budget, or if you simply want a top of the line regular camcorder, buy this camcorder</review_text>
First off, this is an awesome camera for the price.  There is no other camera in the same price range which will deliver this much performance and quality for the money.  Those who talk about the low-light quality needs to go out and purchase themselves hotshoe light.  Who in their right mind would shoot at 15, 30 or even 60 lux without an external light anyway?  Picture quality will be greatly hampered.  I believe that next to a spare battery, an external light source is probably the most valuable accessory you can own.  This camera comes loaded with all the standard features of the other camcorders in this price range and also has a remote control included, which some of the competitors do not have standard.  And on top of that, 3 CCD sensors!!!  Simply put, you will not find a better camcorder for the price!  Period.</review_text>
Am very pleased with this purchase. Very fast service and shipping. Will shop Amazon again. Found this camera to be easy to setup and operate. Takes great stills and movies. Thank Yo</review_text>
My wife and I went on our first cruise and I wanted a camera that would take video and still pictures. After wearing out the internet,I finally selected the Panasonic PV-GS150. I was amazed at the number of passengers on board that had the same camera! I couldn't be happier with the results of this camera. The color reproduction is fantastic! I used it in alot of different applications such as; daylight, night shots, even sunsets. It did a great job! The still shots were OK. The more light you have the better the picture. The flash is awesome! So many digital cameras have a weak flash compared to this camera. But keep in mind your priorities. My first priority was video, then still shots. I don't think that you will be disappointed</review_text>
I did quite a bit of research on video cameras but I am by no means an expert.  I selected this camera in the hopes that the image quality would be a lot better than my older JVC camera.  Although the colors are a bit better, that is all you seem to get for the 3CCD.  I love the small compact size as well as the features and ease of operations.  It is a bit uncomfortable to hold in my hand, it seems better suited for someone with smaller hands.  I wish it had a built in Lamp for low light</review_text>
This camera has a lot going for it, the quality is great as is the low light sensitivity which is important for me for indoor shooting. I can get used to the cradle thing as I don't normally stream live to a PC so that is not a big concern for me. The camera IS compatible with XP SP2, just because the driver doesn't have Microsoft's "blessing" it still works perfectly. The still imaging capability is a little less than I was expecting, the flash is very close to the lens which forces you to remove any kind of additional lenses when using the flash. I didn't find the small zoom range to be very limiting but as with all my camcorders, a wide angle lens is a must if you don't want to force yourself up against a wall trying to get everyone in the video when shooting indoors. The time lapse feature is great! Also very good is the speed contol of the zoom lever, it's very smooth. I wouldn't mind having a "couple" quick access buttons on the unit itself rather than having to use the touchscreen menu each time, but being able to customize the quick menu helps make the most commonly used features more accessible. The battery supplied gives me a little more than an hour of constant use, will certainly need another one! No memory card supplied with the unit either, that's consistant though with other Sony products. Overall I'm very happy with this camera, it is replacing a previous model from Sony which quit working just over the 1 year warranty so I didn't think twice before buying the 4 year extended warranty</review_text>
Perfect video camcorder for outside recording. Crisp picture and excellent sound. Wide screen mode looks great. Extra battery is a must on long vacations or shoots. Do not forget about shoulder strap because you do not want to drop this baby. Also excellent still photos with memory stick option. Easy button is just that EASY. Indoor shooting a little rough without proper lighting so be careful. Overall, great piece of electronic</review_text>
I bought HC96 to replace my five year old trv11 which was Sony's top line consumer model at the time. After using HC96 for one week, I have the following observations.1) The camacorder and the charger are much smaller than trv11. The build quality seems to be decent. I don't like the docking station design, but it is not a show stopper.2) The video quality for in door/out door shooting is only slightly better than trv11 despite of great reviews I read on the internet. Widescreen is a nice new feature to have compared to the trv11.3) Focusing under low night is a bit slow, I really wish to have the manual focus ring when taking my daughter's Christmas stage performance.Potential shopper should also check out the GS500 which is a close competition</review_text>
I've had this camera now for a few months and love it.  The picture quality is great, the 16:9 view works great.  I haven't taken too much low light movies yet so I'll have to wait and see how the picture quality is for that scenario.  The only difficulty I've had is getting the still images off the card.  I have a firewire cable that I've used to capture the video but the image software that came with the camera doesn't seem to recognize the camera when it's attached to the firewire cable.  I'll have to get a USB cable and see if that resolves the issue</review_text>
Yes, this is a great Camera,as many of these in depth reviews show, however the bundled software is incompatible with Windows XP service pack 2, which makes editing impossible as the operating sytem will not recognize the hardware because sony's drivers haven't passed Logos tests. After spending hours on the phone troubleshooting it turns out that Sony's drivers are not service pack 2 approved and they've done nothing to release updated compatible downloads on their website which would solve the problem. So I lodged a complaint and am considering getting rid of the handycam as it is not very handy when you can't edit anything. Basically it's a great camera but the software is plagued with compatibility issues and is not user friendly. I am really upset that I spent this much on a camcorder that claims to be compatible with my system and it turns out that it is not, and it would seem that it would not be very hard for Sony to release an updated driver that would fix this problem. Shame on you Sony.</review_text>
I actually originally went to this page through Google to see if they were still selling this model.  I have to say that this is a really good camera for casual photography, and is even still a good camera for being a 4.1 megapixel camera (considering you can purchase 6, 7, and even 8 megapixel cameras now).I bought this camera for myself in January 2005, and it's reaching its two-year mark, and still works close to perfectly.  It'd actually still be working perfectly if I didn't accidentally drop it so many times on hard surfaces (more than three hard falls!).  In my opinion, it takes great quality pictures, slightly above-average video if there is good lighting, and takes great pictures even without flash.  It's definitely a better camera than my dad's Fujifilm 7 megapixel camera, too.  I think my camera still has another year or two on it, if I could be less clumsy.  I've also gotten a lot of comments of photos I've taken.  People have said that I have a really good camera, and that it takes excellent pictures.I used to take a lot of pictures of bands, and they've always been pleased with them.  It does surprisingly well in dim environments.  Lately, I've been taking a lot of still life pictures for fun, and got a lot of good feedback on the quality of this camera.There is only one problem I have with this camera, however, and it's that it eats up batteries really fast.  I'm not exactly sure of what is considered good battery life for a digital camera, but I have to charge my batteries every day.Overall, this has been a really good camera to me through concerts, parties, film shoots, landscapes, still lifes, and amateur "artsy" photos.  I'll be incredibly sad when I have to part with it</review_text>
I received this camera as a gift a few years ago and I ended up falling in love with photography because of it. It's great for beginners because it's not that expensive... obviously what the camera lacks in megapixels and zoom are what you save in dollars.  But I have taken hundreds of gorgeous photos.  It's extremely user-friendly, unlike HPs I've used, and action shots have never been a problem.  Just note that you can't zoom in while shooting movies (MPEG) but it does pick up sound cleanly.  I also found it to be very durable... it's been dropped countless times, used outside during the (Wisconsin) winter, and exposed to both water and sand but the picture quality hasn't decreased. (Make sure you get a case for it- it doesn't come with one but they're cheap.)  I'm now looking into freelance photography as a career, but until I save up enough for one of those fancy $ 700 deals, this one will definitely get me through</review_text>
As others have said it: This is an all around very good camera. It's got a decently sized sensor (4.1MP), 3X optical zoom is not a big WOW, but most film point-and-shoots come with no zoom at all.LCD viewfinder is decently sized, though more expensive ones are, of course, bigger. The video mode is great and it's a good thing to have that AV cable for a quick share.If you are an average to sub-average picture-taker, like me, you will most probably not have a tripod around, so that alone will guarantee you blurry shots at sub optimal lighting conditions, unless you use the flash. So most of the enhanced scene modes, including nightime modes and also the manual control mode will most probably get blurry results. The good thing is that the camera will tell you when your shot would be prone to "shake" blur. That way you can decide to either not take the shot, adjust lighting conditions or get (if you have one) a tripod.It's a sturdy camera. It's over a year old and has survived at least one major fall, with some bumps here and there.The only thing I've noticed is that lately the pictures are turning up with a slight greenish feel on them. I'm pretty avid on photoshop and know how to correct the pics to get them lifelike colors, and the difference isn't bad. Not many people notice it, but I do, maybe since I like to edit photos very much.In the end, if you don't have alot of money and want to get the most "bang for your buck", go with this one - specially if you are just starting in the digital camera world as I was at the moment of purchase</review_text>
I bought this camera Christmas 04 for a trip to Ireland.  The picture quality and ease of use was great.  The battery life was also very good.  I took over 600 pictures of my vacation and almost every one turned out perfect.  The quality is good enough for a flawless 8x10 print.  I have not had any problems with this camera.  I have also owned an older model Sony, a Nikon, and a Kodak digital.  This one in my opinion is the best of all of them</review_text>
For the kind of people that just want to record life's precious moments, this camera is for you. Recording quality is so-so and suffers mildly in low-light situations, this goes for photos as well.I find this camera very neat, as it is extremely light weight and easy to use. However, this is my first DV camcorder, and I have yet to figure out how to transfer video from tape to computer. Until then, my 1 gigabyte memory card will have to do the trick.All-in-all, I recommend this camcorder to anyone with something small, yet simple to use. It's great for use outdoors, as well as indoors, as long as lighting is plenty</review_text>
I like the camera, but dont have remote control, not its so much important for me.I used indoor and the quality is poor, but its amazin color outdoor, the fact that have mp4 its very funciolannly!!If you like upload the videos in youtube. this camera is for you</review_text>
This is a great camera if you're looking for something basic.  I bought it to start videoing my baby, and the picture quality is great.  One thing though, this model doesn't have a "spot light", so if you'll need extra lighting, upgrade to the SC-D363 model</review_text>
very compact and great mini dv at an incredible price.My old sony died and got this at a fraction of the price that I paid for the sony</review_text>
The cameras is great. Good seller, fast shipping. Come with the box, new condition. I am satisfy with the product</review_text>
This camera is so much good looking that you can afford to have a bad picture quality or bad power management.It's not for those who are really concerned about pixels and zooms.It's a camera for people on the go</review_text>
I've been working as a professional photographer & cinematographer for over 10 years; I have tons of exp. with every kind of camera on the market past and present and this is the camera I love to carry with me when I'm out and about.  Its slimmer then my cell phone, smaller than my wallet, and rugged enough to be carried with my most every day of the week.  I've had my for over a year now and had little to zero problems with it.  The T7 reacts fast to changing environments and distances.  I have the underwater housing for the camera which I use on a weekly basis for filming surfing videos & images.  This camera also has a special function that I have yet to see work well on another camera, the burst & multi-burst functions.  I can captured 30 or so images in a split second thanks to this function or switch it to capture an every 1/4 second for 8 seconds.  It is an ideal function for fast action photography or a sports photographer on their day off.  I highly recommend this camera to anyone from novice to professional because of its ease to use and adaptability to the situation.  The only thing I would ask of Canon would be to make their newest version of the camera to be just like this one and add a shockproof and waterproof housing to this awesome camera</review_text>
I bought this camera a few days ago for the purpose of going travelling with.This camera is great.  While I could have bought a 7 or 8 MP camera, there was really no point; this camera is 5MP and can be easily blown up to an A4 size...who needs larger than that?I find that the battery does not last for long, so I bought 2 spare. (shop around for cheap prices though...Sony wanted to charge AU$70 (US$50) or so for the 'NP-FE1' 'Infolithium Battery', but I found a website that sold them for only AU$24 (US$18)!The LCD screen seems to drain a lot of power, but who really uses their Viewfinder now anyway?The sound quality on the Video mode is not the best, but still legible.All in all,this is a GREAT camera. I would recommend it to anyone just wanting a small camera that is great quality and travels well.</review_text>
We used to have a Fuji and their menus were so no intuitive at all.  I think the Kodak line as the best menus and the Sony cameras have the best LCDs.  But the overall picture quality has to go to the Canon line.  We have the SD400 and there are no complaints at all.  The menus are easy to follow and the LCD is a little smaller than we wanted, but it still takes a great picture.  And the color swap feature is a cool advantage</review_text>
I bought this for my teenage daughter and she has loved it. It has been easy to use and is tiny, yet durable. In some pictures I did notice a blueish outline around people (their aura???) which was mentioned by some other reviews I had read, but I think that this is par-for-course with many of the digital cameras with a tiny lens. Since she primarily uses it to take pictures of reluctant parents, friends, family and her dog, this camera is just right</review_text>
It's great when a product just "works".  Read the manual to get the full benefit of this great camera</review_text>
I bought this camera for my girlfriend, but  I love it so much that I always ask to borrow it. I think it takes great pictures and if you use the tips in the manual, it works great in almost every situation. I do wish it was the casing was made with a protective coating or special cover because it gets scratched very easily. I have had no problems with it over the year since purchased.</review_text>
This is a wonderful camera! I got it for christmas '05. I took somewhere close to 6,000 pictures with it. The digic II processor in it is a beast! You could just take photo after photo after photo with it. Very little shutter lag, maybe just a smidge. Has a bunch of helpful modes making it very easy to use.My only complaint though is that mine died suddenly, just wouldn't start one day! No amount of charging or monkeying would bring it back to life. I believe it was some sort of lens error, but I really won't ever know. Handed it to customer service, the looked at it, told me it was broke and that I needed to buy a new one. That was upsetting..</review_text>
You will read reviews, saying that the LCD broke, and other things just dont work. Personally, I have had no problems whatsoever. Yes I have a nice case that is padded that we keep the camera in when we are not using it, and no I am not a professional so I am not too incredibly pickey when it comes to the camera. The quality is great, eveyone enveys this camera who uses it. O also let me mention that we have had this camera for a year now and with two kids handeling it a times and have had no regrets so far.Pros:* Small* Sleek* Exellent picture quality* Great video playback* Good in-camera photo catalog* Durable (This is my experience..remember 1 year 2 kids, and a good case.* Good battery life & cheap batteries, I bought 2 extra batteries for like   $20 on ebay.* Simple user interfaceCons:* Red eye could be better on this camera* Get the 7.1mp version if you plan on cropping pictures and blowing them up to be large (using picasa2)</review_text>
I have been using this camera for well over a year and have found no problems with it. I get great pictures either at work or play. I have taken over 1500 pictures. The fold out viewer a great plus</review_text>
I love my camera. Here's why:1. The pop-out screen. Perfect when you are in a crowd. You can just tilt the screen, rais your arms and you KNOW what you'll be shooting. (Rather than just shooting blindly.)Also, to get the kids/pet shots. You tilt the screen up and you can shoot from your waist or knees without having to bend uncomfortably. The con: It probably makes the camera a bit chunkier, but to me it's worth it.2. The pixel size. It's around 5MP and it is just right for all-around shooting. It isn't too small where I lose details but it isn't too big where I'm having to always free up space on my computer. The con: I would prefer more MP's but, for this camera, it will do fine.3. The controls. I found that it is simple enough for all-around 'point & shoot' shots but it also has features that you can control. I choose to use my manual shutter and aperture settings to control my pictures. But if I hand my camera to somebody who has no idea how to use one, they could just hit the button and shoot. The con: The settings can seem to overwhelm the beginner...at first, but after reading the manual for a bit, it should help with that.4. The size. I am comfortable with it's size. But I know many would prefer a smaller one. (I guess that would be the con of it.) It feels solid and well made. The screen is not too small and the lense does a decent job in getting the shots you want. I use a cushioned carrying case for it and it can be a bit bulky BUT I'd rather protect it with something like that. This can be a bit chunky for your pocket but it can still fit. (Don't forget to grab yourself a camera strap for added protection against drops!)5. Canon. I've owned Canons for a while and that is the brand I will stick to. I found that they are well made and the cameras are awesome. This one is a favorite. I can take it anywhere. Hopefully you will too.Enjoy</review_text>
bought this as a replacement for my jvc original battery that did not hold a charge anymore.  i wanted to get it for a wedding that was coming up and unfortunately it didnt arrive on time for that, but i did finally get it and it is exactly what i needed.  charge holds with no interuptions.  good buy</review_text>
Although I have not used this tripod for a serious recording with my old digital video camera, this tripod is not difficult to connect into my digital handycam. I tried it once after Christmas and it was so easy. I should have bought this long time ago. I got this tripod as one of my Christmas presents.</review_text>
This is an excellent tripod for Sony Video Camera.  I am using this with my Sony Camcorder and remote is working pretty good.  Its legs are strong.  I am using the same with my Nikon D50( remote is not usable).  And I am satisfied with the performance.  only one issue is the base where you attach camera is plastic. So sometimes I am not comfortable with my DSLR with its zoom len</review_text>
I AM VERY PLEASED WITH THE SONY VCT680RM TRIPOD IT IS A JOY TO USE AND THE PRICE IS AFFORDABLE</review_text>
This product deserves a 5 star review. The tripod itself is very sturdy, supports a wide range of heights (including its lowest height which works nicely for macro shots), and it is light and compact (which makes it great for travel). Top that off with a great price, and you've got a great tripod. Here's why I gave it 4 stars:The product's accessory list is categorized incorrectly on Sony's website. If you look up the Cybershot DSC-N2, and click on it's supported accessory list, the VCT-D680RM Remote Control Tripod is listed (currently, as of writing this review). Furthermore, if you open Sony's description for the VCT-D680RM Remote Control Tripod, it directly lists the DSC-N2 as compatible.Note that the DSC-N2 is only HALF compatible. It will fit just fine on the tripod itself, but it will NOT work with the remote control features. The DSC-N2 doesn't have an ACC jack, which is necessary to make use of the tripod's remote control features on a digital camera. I've called up Sony and discussed the problem, and they agree that the product is mislabeled. They've been very helpful as far as customer service goes, considering the fact that I didn't purchase the tripod directly from them. They even offered a full refund on the product directly from them. Hopefully they'll update their website soon so this doesn't confuse anyone else.This is why I'm giving the tripod  a 4 star review. The tripod itself is great, but the documentation is incorrect. On that note, this is still an excellent choice for a tripod. If you're willing to spend more money, you can upgrade to the VCT-1500L tripod, which will give you an extra 2 inches on the high and low end of the tripod, but I found that the VCT-D680RM gives me plenty of flexibility and travel accessibility, and saved me some money. Even without the use of the VCT-D680RM's remote control features, it's still an excellent tripod, especially at Amazon's price</review_text>
I found this tripod on Sony's website, but was a bit put off by the price, both there, and at Circuit City.  I was thrilled to find it for much less at Amazon!!!  The tripod itself is super... we mostly shoot video of our baby at home, so we don't need anything too sophisticated.  We love the controls on the arm of the tripod, and the bubble-level thing is a good feature to have.Highly recommend</review_text>
I bought this tripod for video tapping an upcomming family wedding and have tried it a couple of times to get used to it.  I like the the smooth operation of the controls on the handle.  The panning operation is likewise acceptable.  The telescopic locking legs work well, but are light weight and can rock a little during panning.  The lightness is also a plus because it collapses into a small over the shoulder bag for easy toteing. One hand on the tripod for stabilization and one on the control handle during panning works well.</review_text>
The tripod is well built.  Each leg has 4 sections, not 3. This tends to help with strength and stability.  The controls on the handle make capturing video very easy.  It is not a professional tripod built for 40-pound cameras, but it will very easily handle any Sony consumer video camera.  The only minor drawback is that the speed of the zoom through the handle can be a little tricky to manage.  However, if your are tired of the cheesey cheap tripods that sell for $30-$40, spend the money on this one.  It is well worth it</review_text>
This tripod is simply amazing. It is light-weighted enough (1.3kg or 2 lbs & 14 oz) that you would not feel burdened at all when you take it out for a hiking. Moreover, it works on other types of cameras instead of limiting it on Sony's products exclusively. I tried my 5 years old Olympus 2020 digital camera and it stayed there rock-solid. Keep in mind, however, that the attached remote only works with Sony-branded cameras/camcorders since the remote requires you to plug a cable into the equipment that you intend to use. I also try my newly bought Sony Camcorder Mini-DV DCR-HC42 and it worked flawlessly. The included air bubble was an ingenious device in that it allows you to see whether the tripod is level with respect to the floor. Thus, even if the floor is uneven, you can always find the best balanced spot by looking at the air bubble that's directly beneath the tripod's center leg. Like another reviewer said, this tripod gives the user almost unlimited control in that you can rotate it any angle you want, and with a range between 19 - 57 inches (or 48 -145 cm), it can almost satisfy any kind of everyday use. Finally, it was great to buy from Amazon because most people on ebay is selling roughly the same price, minus the great return policy from Amazon.I would absolutely recommend this tripod to anyone who needs it for any purpose.</review_text>
I love this camera.  The color is great, so fun and makes me feel unique.  The screen is a great size, and it takes great pictures.  Good with the red eye issue.  The menu is great too, when you scroll thru things, it tells you what it does so you don't have to memorize it all.  Takes fast pictures, but not one after another, like I was hoping.  But it does open fast.  Don't be fooled by the big memory, you will still need a larger card.  Depending on the size pic you want, you can take about 30 to 50 pics on the memory alone.  But all in all I love this camera and it was a great buy</review_text>
The Sony Cybershot is a great camera. The colors and the features are amazing. Is very easy to use. The only thing I dont like about the camera is the zoom in and out button. If you zoomed in you wont be able to zoom out.</review_text>
This is my first digital camera, i did a lot of search and finaly i decide for the DSC-W55 in black, and is what i was looking for, small enough to have it in my purse, have a lot of functions, and is very easy to import pictures to my computer, you only connect the camera with the USB cable and you don't need to install the software that came with the camera, I have windows vista and i didn't have any problems transfering the pictures, is the best camera and the price is great, and you can choose the super saver shipping and save more.you will love this camera too, is small, very pretty, have lots of options, and take great pictures.Some one wrote in a review that this camera feels like plastic, and that's not true, looks very durable to me and I think is a good product and worth every single dollar you spend.Is easy to shoot pictures in the Auto adjustment mode, to start taking pictures the sooner you charge the battery, because this camera have an internal memory you can buy a memory card later.Well hope you have lots of fun taking pictures, Good luck..!</review_text>
I am just an average guy when it comes to using a camera. Probably below average. I started trying to use 100% Sony electronic products because my computer was a Sony and Sony-Sony linkages make for easy use. Given that, here is what I think of the product:1. It is amazing how much camera you can get for the money. Compared to just 6 months ago, or a year ago, this is a lot of camera for the money. It is very small, fits easily in your pocket, but takes great pictures. Also, it is very easy to use and recharge.2. A visit to the Sony website, suggests that Sony has new cameras coming out constantly -- new cameras that are very similar.  This makes it hard to compare cameras, even within the Sony brand, and makes you feel as if your camera is obsolete the minute you buy it.3. A problem with this camera, given it is so small -- do not shake. Your pictures will be blurry. I am a typical guy, with very little fine motor control. My hands have trouble holding small objects. Holding this camera in one hand and taking a picture -- well the results are not pleasant.4. I tend to be disappointed by the telephoto capabilities of these small cameras. I guess if you really want to zoom in, then you have to go to a big camera. But it still seems like the small cameras could offer more.5. Having said all of that, in the end, this camera is small and easy to carry, light weight, durable, and it is also easy to use. When you look at it, it looks well made. I ended up giving the camera to my in-laws, because they lost theirs. My in-laws tend to be technologically challenged. I said to them, just leave the dial set to the little green camera, and snap away. I have to say - they love this camera.Overall. For the money, a great purchase, technology is amazing. Just grab it with two hands or develop a steadier aim than I have.</review_text>
I bought this as a present for my wife.  I was looking for something that she could carry in her purse.  the automatic functions are easy and functional.  It is not an enthusiasts camera:  too hard to get into the menus.  The screen is easy to turn off(this sucks battery power).  and it even has an optical viewfinder(a rare finding lately)  the optical viewfinder helps to get steady pictures for those of us with the shakes.  The pictures are clear and the colors are excellent.  The drawback is the that sony batteries cost an arm and a leg.  The wire for downloading pix is multifunctional and very proprietary(read that as expensive if you lose it</review_text>
The Sony W55 is the followup to the successful and popular W50. It's a very good compact camera, easy to carry and easy to use, and reasonably priced - so most people will be happy with it.Not much has changed from the W50, which in this case is a good thing!One change is that the W55 is a 7 MP camera, rather than the W50's 6MP. Honestly, that's not a big plus, as they haven't made the sensor that catches the light any larger.  Same (good) lenses, same size sensor = the same (good) pictures, but not better.  (Though it might help a little on features like Smart Zoom.)The obvious change is of course the colors.  Don't make too much fun of that!  There are 4 DSC-W series cameras in our family, colors would have kept my mother-in-law from taking my sister's camera home with her.  A little personalization is a good thing.The internal memory has been expanded (to 56MB), but I've never used the internal memory on the cameras that have had it, so I'm not sure that matters much.  It might be worth knowing how to use as a backup, for another dozen or two shots if your card is full, or you have some other problem.The controls, menus and interface on the W55 are reasonably easy to use.  For example, the W55 has easy access to the various scene modes (twilight, etc), with some explanation on the screen of what those mysterious little icons mean (so you might actually use them, since it tells you what they do!). If you're new to digital photography, there will be a learning curve.  But if you've used other cameras much, especially Sonys, you can pick this up and use many of the features right away.Read the short introductory guide that comes with the camera, though!The rechargeable battery should easily last you for a full day of shooting - hundreds of shots - with no problem. (Be a little wise about turning it off when you're not using it!) So you probably don't need a second battery, unless you're going into the woods for a while.  It's nice not to have to mess with bulky AA rechargeables. Also, lithium ion batteries don't have a memory effect, so don't worry about partial recharging. Just charge the battery each night. So - before getting a second battery, try it for a while and see if you need it.But get a case - something to protect the screen, at least.  A fully closed one might help resist rain and splashes a little, too.You'll also want to get a Memory Stick Pro Duo card - Pro cards are faster, and you need the smaller Duo size with this camera. Get a 1-2GB card so you don't have to think about running out of memory too much - if you shop carefully, you can find them for so little these days that it's well worth avoiding running out of memory.  You might want a spare card if you plan to travel for more than a week, or use the video mode often - which is surprisingly good (though a bit dark) if set to fine, but uses enormous amounts of storage at that setting.You can stretch your memory, and your hard drive space, by using one of the lower-resolution settings to take snapshots.  You don't really need 7MP for all your photos!The W55 will take better photos than those credit-card type cameras that have a tiny lens system - optics will always make a difference in a camera.  Any reasonable person will be very happy with the pictures from the W55, given the size of it.The camera will be a little slow and often take disappointing pictures in low light and dark situations.  Try the High ISO mode in low light no-flash situations - the picture quality suffers some, but most people will find it useful. Realistically, no ultra-compact camera will work really well in that situation - if you need that often, think about something with a bigger lens and bigger sensor. Good light always gives the best pictures with any camera. There are limits to what you can currently expect from any ultracompact camera.The W55 offers enough controls (through the scene modes and the Program mode) to allow a fair amount of control over the pictures, for an automatic camera.The charger is fairly compact and rated 100-240V, so while you'll need a plug adapter overseas you won't need a voltage converter. The battery charger is a little slow, though probably OK.Keep this camera charged and handy, and you'll find you take a lot of pictures because it's easy to carry and easy to use</review_text>
I really love my first digital camera! I searched and I searched and I finally found what I wanted.  The pictures are crystal clear, the movie playback is exceptional - you only hear what you're supposed to, no loud background noise or static, no muffled noise.  The pictures come out so clear that after you take the picture you can zoom in 5X and count the pores on your face! I love it! I don't think I could ask for a better camera.  I hope this camera will last me atleast 4 years or more or until I graduate from college.  If one is in the market and can afford it, get this camera! There are cheaper cameras but if you want to get a camera, get a good one, that doesn't mean it has to be expensive, but in my opinion you get what you pay for. Thanks for reading. Happy buying</review_text>
Befores having this camera I was a cybershot user; since that I believe this camera has great characteristics as: a good flash level to take close pictures, several especialized modes, compact size for a 10x zoom, great outdoors pictures (vivids and colorfuls).My main complain is about software: I can not choose diferent flash intensity levels (shots in not well iluminated indoors are really poor)and I can not choose the ISO mode (to avoid bad pictures of objects in moving).Besides the night shots mode is not as good I expected.My general opinion is that this camera could be really better if the software would be more versatile</review_text>
I can not find anything negative to say about this camera.  I wanted a small pocket sized camera a tried brands such as Casio's Exislim.  Even though this camera is not as small as the Casio, it is far superior of a camera.  Size why's, it is still small enough to fit in a pocket but is also big enough so that it isn't awkward or difficult to use.  The pictures from this camera turn out spectacular, the 10x zoom is by far the best feauture of this camera.  The lcd screen is also very clear, unlike the Casio and other camera's similar to this one.  You can't go wrong with this camera.  Highly recommended</review_text>
I've had this camera for about two months now and I really like it. The fact that it has image stabilization means that I have yet to take a blurry picture. Also, the zoom is quite impressive.Another nifty feature is that you can overlay a grid to help with photo composition(the "rule of thirds").The only caveat with this camera is the lack of an optical viewfinder, so you can't really turn off the LCD to save battery power. I have never had the batteries die out on me, so I don't really consider it a problem, although you may</review_text>
I own various digital cameras, from cheap point and shoot to pricey SLR's and for a small camera, this one is great. 10x optical zoom on a camera that fits in your pocket is awesome.I took it to a wildlife sanctuary along with a 10.3 meg SLR, and the pictures from this camera were almost as good as those taken with the 300mm zoom on the SLR (at least 4x6 and 8x10, I didnt try anything bigger yet).Easy to navigate the screens, and loaded with options.I would definitely buy it again. Dont let other brands 3x and 5x optical, plus a digital zoom fool you. Digital zoom is degrading the pixels. This is the one to buy if you want a camera that fits in your pocket and can zoom in close.</review_text>
This little gem of a camera packs a mighty 10 times optical magnification into a small but sturdy case. The Leica lens is a marvel of design. It has good easy to read LCD screen and very intuative menus. I have now had the camera for a few weeks and it lives up to Panasonics claims.  I wish I could have waited for the new models but I needed it for my vacation.My wife refused to entertain the idea of such a large magnification range because of the lens size she envisaged, based on past experience. she is now completely won over</review_text>
I'm not a pro by any means, but this camera is fantastic. The zoom is really impressive and the clarity is great (again...I'm not a pro, just someone who loves to take pictures). For the folks who have complained about the detachable lens cap... it's really not that big of a deal. There is a small strap packaged with the camera, which is very simple to attach, that will connect the lens cap to the camera. The same strap also attaches a wrist strap to the camera</review_text>
I got this camera when the price on it took a nosedive.  I found that I wasn't carrying my Powershot S2 around outdoors as much because of the size issue.  This one I can bring anywhere.  Picture quality at low ISO is just about as good as the best of the superzoom cameras,  The Leica lens gives a very clear rendition of any scene.  The build quality is fantastic, solid metal with a large, bright and high resolution screen.  Focus times are decent, on par with other superzooms.  The lens hardly extends outward at all, the folded optics really do shrink the footprint of the camera.However.....shooting indoors or at high ISO is another issue entirely.  Noise is a BIG problem above ISO 100.  The flash is pathetically weak.  At ISO 80, the flash is only rated to around 3 feet!  This is not a camera for the indoors or low light.Movie mode is decent, but nothing to write home about.  The widescreen 848X480 mode is interesting, but overall quality is a couple of steps down from a Powershot S2 or S3.  The sound is especially weak in comparison.  On a positive note, you can zoom during filming.The TZ line of cameras is designated for "travel".  If you plan on using this camera for that (in the well lit outdoors), it's a great choice.  As an all in one solution, I can't fully recommend it.</review_text>
This is the best digital camera I've owned.First, I believe that a camera should fit into my jeans pocket so that it will be with me when photo opportunities arise.  It's not the smallest camera on the market by any means, but it fits comfortable into my Levis.  I use this camera all the time.Second, the ZOOM is amazing.  10x optical zoom on a camera that fits in my pocket!  Because the camera has built in image stabilization, deeply zoomed pictures look terrific.Third, my wife finds it easy to use.  This says a lot. I'm the techie, but she thinks the dials and menus are intuitive and easy / quick to use.Fourth, the camera takes 16:9 aspect ratio movies (or regular 4:3 if you prefer).  The image quality is much better than I expected.  The image stabilizer probably helps improve the quality, but I have played the videos on our 42" TV.  The quality appears just about as good as our normal cable signal.  Definitely not HD, but good enough to share short videos with friends on a TV and more than sufficient for emails and YouTube postings.Fifth, we have been very pleased with the image quality.  Because we are amateurs, we take pictures under all sorts of less than ideal conditions (low light, moving subjects and cameras, long zoom shots from rocking boats, etc.).  This camera's sharpness, colors, and details are better than any of the other digital cameras we've owned over the last ten years.    A pro might not be satisfied, but we are.Sixth, it works great with iPhoto, Mail, iWeb, and iMovie on our mac, so sending pictures or videos via email, making webpages from them, or editing them into movies / slideshows is very, very easy.Battery life has been sufficient, but I would rather that it took standard batteries (AA's or AAA's) so that I wouldn't have to bring the charger on vacation.  The charger is small, but takes valuable space in tight suitcases.  At first, I was not thrilled with a manual lens cap.  However, I veiwed this at a camera store before buying at Amazon.  The salesperson convinced me that the integrated / automatic covers provide less protection and are likely places for mechanical failure.  The big lens that lets the Lumix pull such a massive zoom definitely needs good protection.</review_text>
Great little camera. I also have a DMC-FZ30, and this one has almost as many features in a much smaller, less expensive camera.  Hard to beat</review_text>
camcorder works as expected, nothing too wonderful but is what I wanted. the still pics are a little fuzzy, but it the rest of the features are easy to use. I use it for track and field filming. I have many different kids use it with little trouble.</review_text>
This is a cute little perfect camera.  Other than the fact that the CCD Base Assembly needed replacement after a few months (generating a LENS CAP ON error even though it's not in place), it has always been an excellent camera.  As far as the CCD, just call the 800 number mentioned above, give them your serial number and other pertinent info and you're set.  I live near the factory in Cypress and I had camera back in one week!  That's service!  And it was free</review_text>
A bit more info on the program. It does exist. It is free. You send in your camera or, if in a big city, take it in to a repair center for the free replacement. It does not matter if your camera is out of warranty. The replacement program exists in other countries as well (at least the UK and Canada). JVC is standing behind their product and you really have to respect them for that. (This problem of the bad CCD occurs in a dozen or more models manufacturred during 2002 and 2003.)The number to call for more info in the USA is (800) 858-6442.In Canada it's (800) 964-2650.Oh, btw: the camera, aside from breaking, has been excellent. Low light shooting is so important during family events, I can't see why other manufacturers don't follow JVC's lead and improve notoriously bad performance. Image stabilization does work well for landscape sorts of shots, not so well for moving targets like your two year old. Sound could be better, but this is an excellent product at the price point.Good luck,Fran</review_text>
I dunno why ppl would have anything bad to say about this camera period.. For the price you are getting Luxury for a wal-mart price Lo</review_text>
Please go into this purchase knowing that you aren't going to get the quality of a $1,000 camera for $350 and I think you will be pleased.yes, some things are annoying like the LED lights being spotlight focused on a small area and the "night mode" slowing down the shutter so it is choppy.BUT compared to the previous Canon I owned, it is great.Low light shooting is much better even with out the light, and the colors are much more vibrant and distinct.I burn my movies to DVD and the difference between this JVC and my Canon are substantial.There is VERY little to no pixelation or rough dithering in low light with the JVC.It is somewhat grainy but ALL cams are at low light.As for the drivers not working, as mentioned in some reviews, XP Pro AND XP Home both recognized cam as soon as I plugged it in and driver disk wasn't even needed.I work for a company that sells consumer electronics and 70% of the returns we get are NOT because the product is defective, but because the user can't figure it out.Go with a retailer who has at least a 14 day return policy and try it out. if you don't like it, return it and try something else.Just don't expect Corvette performance at a Chevette price and you'll be happy with this.</review_text>
From what I've read from some of the reviewers I might not have bought a JVC. Now I'm glad I did. Taking the time to learn the pros and cons of the various menu settings has allowed me to avoid all of the pitfalls they encountered, especially for low light shooting. If you shoot in electrically lit areas, do NOT use NightShot or Auto-A menu settings if the camera or a subject might move. Use the AGC setting. AutoFocus and Image Stabilization only work well in dim lighting using Auto mode, not Manual.The color balance of the videos outdoors is slightly toward the "cool" end of the spectrum, but can be made perfect by doing a manual white balance (carry a pure white card to set it).I have not encountered any unsurmountable problem yet. The only negatives so far (7 months of use) in addition to what I said above are: if you power on the camera and it is at a high zoom setting from last time, the autofocus has problems until you zoom out; the front LED light is of little use, it creates a keychain flashlight type of illumination, bright in the center and dim around the edges; the Wide Squeeze mode for 16:9 is ONLY good if you NEVER want to make a copy for a 4:3 TV.Best points: Excellent color quality outdoors and acceptable indoors with reasonable illumination and manual white balance, small and easy to carry, battery charges quickly and it's life is ok as I don't use LCD much or leave camera ON between scenes; good optical zoom range but you might need a wide angle converter in cramped spaces; sound quality is adequate unless you're recording musical instruments and want precise accuracy.Suggestions: Buy a 30.5-37mm step-up ring, a UV filter and a proper lens hood. It fits snugly in a Roots N5 bag (belt, hand, and shoulder straps), available at photo stores, leaving room for an extra tape (or two or extra small battery), the A/C adapter and a white balance card</review_text>
Mi DCR-DVD205 entra perfectamente, junto a 2 DVD en su respectivo case, el cable AC power entra con mucha dificultad, la correa de la maleta es un poco grande. Bateria perfecta</review_text>
Pro: This is the perfect day bag. It is not so bulky that it will be burdensome to carry every where. You can stow it in a back pack and the camera is protected. The battery they provide is the perfect back up to your original battery...and the small DVD bag can stow 4 DVD's but you can fit more into it. I also put my digi camera in there to...No Problem! The price is great and the bag is made from good quality material.Cons: If your looking for a large bag to stow more then the camera a spare battery and a few DVD's then look for a bigger bag</review_text>
This accesory kit is the perfect companion for your DCR-405. It's fits perfectly on the main compartment and it's very portable.It's a must for a Handycam propietary !!</review_text>
My SONY DCR-DVD 105 fits exactly in this bag. Not big but just right</review_text>
We purchased the Sony DCR-DVD405 and it fits fine in this case.  It's great to get a few DVD's to start out with too.  We are pleased with this accessory kit</review_text>
Sony has done it again....the need for a Digital....GET MY FEET WET Camera...the more i looked  WOW....Like a beautiful woman....Stands out in the crowd....She has the look   Confidents....etc   April 5, i ordered: Sony SAL-85mmF14Z 85mm f1.4 Carl Zeiss Planar T Coated Telephoto Lens    I Predict this lens will be HOT....LET the Magic Continue...Quimbyproductions  since 196</review_text>
The Sony Alpha A100K is the best camera I have ever owned.  The images are nothing short of spectacular.The lens mount allows you to use telephoto lenses from other camera's.  I have an expensive telephoto lens that was on my old 35mm Minolta and it fit this Sony digital perfectly.  You will notice a lot of Minolta features on this Sony since Minolta has left the camera business.The image stabilization feature makes it real hard to mess up a shot.If you are a beginner or a pro, this camera is easy to use for perfect pictures every time</review_text>
Well I dont think my money got wasted!!Cool one shooting great pictures, auto focus is good.Have a 2 GB card and start shooting memories...Recommended!!</review_text>
I am new to Photography but I have to say with out a doubt, I am so impressed with the pictures that I can take being a novice that I feel as If I could be an artist!If you have ANY KNOWLEDGE on how to work with the features of this Camera you will be BLOWN AWAY!This is a very good Camera, but do your research!</review_text>
Echoing what most others have said, this is a great camera. It's a dream to use, and the pictures are stunning.Since it's based on a Minolta design, it accepts the lenses from my old Minolta Maxxum 9000 (circa mid 1980s).  This is a huge benefit to me; I now have an excellent quality 70-210mm zoom lens for my new Alpha-100 for no additional cost!  The auto-focus and TTL metering work properly, and since the anti-shake hardware is in the camera body, that works with the old lens also.  Even my old Minolta cable release (a switch on the end of an electrical cable with a proprietary rectangular plug) connects and works fine.I'm very happy with the camera.  That said, there are a couple of annoyances. One of them might be significant to you, depending on how you want to use the camera.First, noise.  Not picture noise, as in grainy low-light photos, but acoustic noise.  The shutter mechanism is *loud*, much louder than my old Maxxum 9000.  If you want to be an unnoticed photographer taking discreet pictures like Cartier-Bresson with his Leica, this isn't your camera.Second, the lens shade.  This is a nit, but I find it more clumsy to use than the lens shade on the old camera.  The old one was held on by a spring clasp; you just squeeze on opposite sides to install or remove it, or to reverse it for storage.  The new one has to be positioned precisely so that tabs will lock into place when it is turned.  Not as quick or as easy to use, but not really a big deal.  I suppose it saved a couple of dollars, as the new one is one piece of plastic while the old one had several parts.On the whole, an excellent product.  I'd buy it again in a heartbeat</review_text>
This camera takes great looking pictures right out of the box.  It is very easy to setup and shoot.  You can go from using the presets built into the camera, or go totally manual.What sold me on the camera was the fact that I could use the lenses from my Minolta camera.I would highly recommend this camera to anyone that is considering buying a DSLR for the first time, or not.</review_text>
I have enjoyed using my camera. I have been able to get some great pictures. The stabilization feature work well</review_text>
Great camera, no wonder it was named "Camera of the Year".  Fast, clear and accurate describe the camera and the photos it produces.  I have had the camera for a month and it has been all I expected.  The super steady feature truly gives two f stops.  The kit lens is useful and quite a bargin.  I use it more than I thought I would.  I truly get the same feel and results that I did with my old Maxxium SLR</review_text>
I read all the reviews before buying this camera and there was some negatitve reviews.  I think this is great camera.  I love that you can correct the picture prior to printing it. It takes a beautiful picture. I have not had the battery issues, because I have used rechargable batteries. I have a printer dock, so it is great set up.  This is my third Kodak camera and I am very happy with it</review_text>
Just took it on vacation, pictures were awesome. Easy to carry, easy to use. No complaints</review_text>
I received this camera as a Christmas gift and waited a while to write a review.  I love this camera.  It is true that it lacks a view finder, a feature I did not even notice was missing until I read reviews.  It also does eat up AA batteries.  I bought special digital batteries by Duracell and they worked great.  Eventually I bought and CRV3 battery and really have not had any problems at all.  If you check out the product gallery I have contributed some pictures and they speak for themselves.  Great color, clarity and the ability to take some pretty good action shots</review_text>
This camera has made picture taking easy and fun again.  The only thing missing is a case/carrier</review_text>
It is easy to use and the picture quality is sharp and very good so far. I tried video recording with 2GB sd card which I purchased it together and it worked excellent so far. I recommend this to anyone. And the price, you can't beat it.</review_text>
I bought this camera because I was unhappy with my 3.5 megapixel one that produced grainy pictures. I am so happy I did. The C875 is very easy to use (even for a beginner like me) and produces crisp, superb photos. You can take one photo after another without having to wait too long between shots. I recently shared my pics when I got back from a vacation and I got a lot of comments about how clear and sharp the pictures were and how vibrant the colors were. I can't believe that I got such a great camera for under $200.</review_text>
I love it. easy to use , easy to work with in every area--You will love this little camera-It is my second Kodak and is so nice--Great buy</review_text>
There is a reason why this camera is rated number 1 on Amazon. I highly suggest buying it; it is easy to use and the quality is wonderful. Get the 2gb memory card, it's worth the extra few bucks, and you never need to delete pics again</review_text>
Bought this for my husband's birthday, he can carry it around in his shirt pocket.  It is great to not have to carry batteries, it recharges in it's own cradle.  Batteries seem to last a fair amount of time.  It takes pictures quickly also.  My son and I received different models of Casio cameras for Christmas and we are both very happy</review_text>
This little unit is a take anywhere camera that will do the job for just about anything.The kids can easily use it, and the back screen is large enough you can really see what you are shooting at without having to squint.The menu structure is basic but adequate.I have seen this unit priced alot more at other places of high reputation but once again Amazon and its other retailers come up with the goods. Thanks</review_text>
I bought Casio Exilim EX-Z1000 to see its 10.1 MP capability and slim look and now I am very happy with the performance of this camera.In 10.1 MP segment this is perfect choice. Picture quality is really very good especially for high resolution pictures (Large size photo) and Casio Exilim EX-Z1000 have good frame rate to capture video.Overall this is perfect combination of high resolution (Power) and good quality pictures.Box includes rechargeable Battery, Charger, Dock (Cradle), USB cable.</review_text>
I took this camera along on a week long trip to Florida.  I never lost a charge and made over 1.5 Gbs of content with this camera.  The video camera is not an SLR.  Please do not expect professional quality images from this camera.  However if you want to shot video, this is the camera for you.  Buy a 1Gb memory card and start shooting your favorite family moments.  I suggest using the 640x480 mode so that your video is DVD quality.Zoom... the video zoom was great.  I shot some offroad video of my Jeep and was able to easily zoom in over 100 ft away on the Jeep while shoting.I never installed the camera software on my Windows XP based PC.  Instead I used a secure digital memory card reader and pulled the files of the card.For $145 this video camera has replaced my Mustek DV4500.  I threw this camera around, ran it's battery down and let it sit in a black Jeep in the sun for two days.  After I did all this the camera was still running.  The controls on the camera are not complicated like other video cameras in this genre either.  All this being said, one could make the case that a cheap camera like this could easily be used by the younger generation, easily.Pros:1)  640x480 video recording was seamless with excellent audio streaming.2)  Long battery life (held a charge for 1.5gbs worth of pictures and video recording)3)  Video stabilization really does make video smoother.4)  Can take 1gb memory cards5)  If you can wait 1/4 of a second, the 5mp photos come out well for a camera with no real lens.6)  Best image quality of any solid state video camera in this genre.Cons:1)  Poor flash photography2)  Images: Shutter lag is over 1/4 of a second.3)  Battery charging requires removal of battery.UPDATE 9/7/2006:I am still using the camera.  I keep it in my Jeep during the hot Louisiana days, no problems.  I really like the quick boot time of the camera; 5 seconds or less.  I can instantly shot video or take a picture with the press of a button</review_text>
For the price, you really do get a lot of neat features: mp3 playback, short video, decent pictures, the use of SD cards, rechargeable battery, and so on.Regrettably, the quality of the hardware leaves A LOT to be desired. The buttons are flimsy and scream "Fragile!"I've had to exchange my device twice, as each has worked for less than 2 months before failing. I do not know if there is a quality control problem: some units work as described whereas others simply fail, or if there is a quality issues across the board. Either way, you may want to consider spending a few dollars more and buying a separate camera and mp3 player (iPod Shuffle is only $69!)......you'll get the same functionality AND much better quality.--Dad with a 2X disappointed son  :</review_text>
This item is awsowm. It plays mpg-4 format. It can  store music. You should buy extra memory</review_text>
For the price of $130, this is a great little camera. Of course, it's not going to be as good as the 400-600 dollar cameras but for beginners or people who just want to use it for a some fun & easy clips and pictures, I would highly recommend it. I am 12 years old and this camera works excellently for me but if you are looking for a long term professional camera, spend the extra money and buy a better one. It is simple to use and is good for ages around 11-14. :</review_text>
I need an extra battery for my PV-GS39. I can't seem to find it anywhere. Can anybody give some info on where to find one</review_text>
THerre are many camcorders in the market and many are superior to this one. However you have to pay much more money, In this price range it wouldbe impossible to find a better camcorder. Easy to use with a powerful zoom (better and more powerfull that more expensive camcorders) connects easily to a mac or pc it offerssomething that similar camcorders do not: the possibility to set your manual settings (if you wish to do so) and experiment. For the users that ewant it simple, the auto settings will deliver you an excellent result.  Again if you want something more than you should look elsewhere and pay more.  But for the price this is the best bu</review_text>
It was a pleasent surprise, because the camera is smaller than i thought. Easy to use, has a light for the night shots and the audio is good...I definetly would reccomend it</review_text>
This is a very nice little camcorder works best in out door lighting or well lit indoor areas. I have gone thru many camcorders and it seems that the  analog ones worked better in low light than what the new DV camcorders do. So when looking for a truly great low light camcorder that is DV do not expect to get perfect picture quality it won't happen. Over all the PV-GS39 will give you good indoor quality and outstanding outside picture quality . For the money you will not find a nicer camera than this one. Watch for deals I picked my up at Amazon for only $[...] shipped best deal around. My old PV-GS36 cost me $[...] at costco and the are almost the same camera except the 39 has a larger screen and records in true widescreen format. Get this camera it will perform well in almost every aspect</review_text>
Well I paid $330 for this a year ago. I thinks its the best camcorder for the value. The image quality is excellent in well lit conditions. If you are shooting in dim light I would suggest to use an auxillary light. I wish the camcorder came with a shoe for light attachment.There are lot of manual controls that if used properly can improve the picture quality a lot in dim conditions. The joy stick control is easy to use and the settings can be changed with one hand. All in all its a very good camcorder.Few tips to get the most out of this one.- use auxillary light in dim conditions.- make sure not to record directly into a bright light.- buy a extra capacity battery</review_text>
I tried digital. I really did. But I could never get the really gorgeous shots I got from my old Yashica SLR which gave up the ghost several years back. I also could not really "focus" on what I was shooting...just pointed and shot because there was no film to run out of. The result? Pointless pics that weren't even that good looking. Digital just didn't feel "right." So about 8 months ago I decided to go back to film. What to get? After much research, I finally decided on the Canon T2. Absolutely brilliant camera. My favorite feature? I can let the camera handle focus, etc. OR I can go COMPLETELY MANUAL. May not seem like a big deal, but it feels so good being in control of what the camera does when you want to be. And of course, that means letting your imagination go...something sorely lacking in digital. Couldn't be happier and no more pointless pics. Okay, maybe a few, but they still look good. And isn't that the point</review_text>
I recently purchased the Rebel T2 camera body only after my Canon EOS Rebel 2000 gave its "last gasp".  I had been a Canon user since 1979 with an AE-1 (that I still have).I liked the fact that the T2 body plugged immediately into the two EF lenses that I owned (28-80mm and 75-300mm), which protected my previous investments.  I was taking pictures within seconds of opening the package and loading batteries.  And although I have my sights set on a Digital Rebel at some point soon, you just can't beat the quality of traditional 35-mm film and photoprocessing.As an upgrade over EOS Rebel 2000, the LCD located on the camera back is easier to read.  Also, the T2 seems more "solid" to me, but lighter in weight.  I took the older EOS Rebel 2000 with me on a couple 75-mile backpacks (which probably led to its early demise), and so I now have a new-found respect for the lighter design.As a final note, I also appreciated the ease of ordering via amazon.com.   There are plenty of web sites offering the same Canon T2 camera back, including those which would have saved me a few dollars. But none had the long-standing relationship I have had with amazon over the past several years</review_text>
I got this after switching from a digital camera. The digital cameras didn't offer the depth I wanted and not having proofs was a big drawback.I am by no means an expert on photography, but I do know a great photograph when I see one, and this camera takes beautiful shots.This is a beautiful camera. Elegant in design; the grey body with black accents is definately an attention grabber. People will look at your camera.It definately has brains to back up it's beauty. Loading film is easy and quick. It has about 8 or so presets. There is the automatic "point and shoot" mode which you'll probably use the most. It automatically compensates for light, adjusting shutter speed and aperture for the perfect shot. The quick autofocus allows you to grab your shot quickly, without waiting for the camera to decide to take the picture.It also has settings for portrait shots, close ups, night, landscape, no flash, and many others. Those are settings that maximize the camera's features for those particular shot. It also has a program setting where you can program shutter speed, aperture, flash and film advance. Though with the comprehensive presets, I don't think you'll ever need to use it.The 28-90 lens that comes with the kit is nice, and has a selector for autofocus or manual focus. It also, of course, can be removed so you can add other lenses. The zoom is powerful and leads to beautiful shots.Overall this is an unbelievable camera. Great price, features, and pictures will be the best you've ever seen. They are very crisp, clear and have almost a 3D lifelike quality to them, something I've never seen outside of a professionally taken photograph. This camera is awesome</review_text>
After researching several cameras in this price range, I bought the Rebel T2 last month. It has met my expectations and perhaps then some. After recently trying out a friends camera in the 150.-ish range, I partially regret spending what I did. It all comes down to what you need, want, and how many bells and whistles you like. For the money though, compared to the competitors, I still think I made a good purchase. After all, if I use it for ten years, which I most likely will, I will have surely got my moneys worth. Bottom line: no complaints with it</review_text>
Some years ago I bought a Canon Rebel, one of the earlier ones, it was not so great, kept if for a while and then sold it.I have been into digital for some time now, but, its great, but it is not film, not by any chance.I have a very old point and shoot, I started taking pictures with either Kodak of Fuji film, I then brought it into my one hour developer and had the negs developed and digitized onto a CD.The results were gorgeous, at that point it was time for a new SLR, there are not so many left right now.I saw The Eos Rebel T2 with the 28-90 Mark III zoom lens, it was impressive, light, but with just a touch of heft, great grip,viewfinder, very fast autofocus, it even looks great.So forgetting my previous experience with a Rebel a long time ago I bought.This is a superb camera, this is just no way to praise it, I love this camera.Since getting it I,ve shot 10 rolls of film, all were digitized onto a disc, touched  up where I felt they needed it, (a simple procedure.I shot a roll in a hanger at a former Naval Aviation Base here, all kinds of aircraft were in different stages of reconstruction,it was a photographers paradise.The results I am getting are better than a very expensive  digital camera.I cannot recommend the T2 even more, if you want one get it now, I think these cameras will be gone soon.Canon you did great job.</review_text>
YO! This camera is just perfect for those getting into photogrophy! Although im only 14 years old, I know what i'm talking about. I have had this camera for 3 weeks now and it is just inspirational. I got into photogrophy from Transworld Skateboarding Magazine. The photogrophers have amazing pics! Truly inspirational! I'm leaving for christmas to go to England next week and can't wait to shoot some nice pics. I tend to favor fast action pics. With Al Servo (funtion automatically set in sports mode)  i can just point and shoot and the camera automatically adjusts the focus of the object during the pictures. I love to customize. The easiest customization setting that i always use for outdoor action pics is the Tv mode. This mode allows you to customize the shutter speed. First make sure you are in a bright lighted area to ensure fast shutter speed. The brighter the area is the faster the shutter speed you can set. I like to hold down the shutter button for a rapid fire of 3 frames per second. Awesome! I love the sound of instant photos. I cannot even descride what it is like. Try it out! The T2 is a great camera for begginers at a great price. Remember this review is only a "guideline". It would be good to make a decision on your own. If you try hard and can't come to a decision, that is when you can rely on other peoples opinions.If you want to see some cool pics from the magazine(...)</review_text>
I looked at digital cameras for months - literally - before I just decided to lug around a 35 mm SLR. As everyone probably already knows, megapixels matter a whole lot when you're talking about blowing a picture up to a larger size. What's great about film is that unless the picture was taken out of focus, or in bad light, you can use a negative to blow something up and the quality really doesn't start to go down until you're making HUGE prints. (How huge exactly I don't know, but the biggest I've blown up was around 4x4 feet, and still no trouble.) The prints I've gotten out of this camera so far have been stellar. ( I use fuji film -- I think it's better than Kodak, even though Kodak has better commercials. Give it a try!)The camera itself is not too heavy, granted, it's not the convenience of a tiny digital camera, but it's  not as bad as I'd expected to carry it around all day. The neck strap is nice, the manual is actually easy to comprehend.  I like a camera that has buttons for a lot of it's features on the body -- it seems complicated at first, but once you know how to use the features, they're much easier to access than they would be if you were scrolling through a menu.  The T2 seems worth the hundred or so more dollars than you would pay for the very similar Rebel K2 by Canon.One thing - make sure you take the batteries out if you're not going to be using it for a week or more. It seems like they go dead if they're in the camera, even if it is off</review_text>
I recently started a small photography business doing Black and White shots of kids in their natural environment. I wanted a camera that took quality shots, but was still cost effective.  I most definitely found it. My cannon takes great shots and allows me the mobility needed to chase kids around.  Very pleased.</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera and I'm loving it. As a whole it's very easy to use and carry. I'm a college student going into photograpy and this is a great starter camera. I have a feeling this one is going to be with me for a very long time</review_text>
Estou no Brasil.S compro na Amazon e sempre deu tudo certo.A entrega  imediata e sem burocracia.O produto  bom e atende s minhas necessidades</review_text>
I really like this camera and at it's current price it's hard to beat. There's been a lot said already but I think what it boils down to when choosing between the F20 and F30 is - do you want to pay more for a "dial" - more about that later.PROS (in order of importance to me)1. Excellent low light shots! I cannot emphasize this enough. But please don't compare it to a DSLR - that's simply not fair. I compared it to a Canon SD700 IS - I carried both for testing and took identical shots. The Fuji outperforms the Canon hands down in this department. The Fuji took clear shots inside libraries and museums using natural light which is specifically what I wanted. The Canon produced photos in natural light that were grainy and blurry. I prefer to use natural lighting as much as I can so this is probably the most important factor to me.2. Out of the box simplicity. I read somewhere someone saying this was not a good P&S. I do not agree with that. My SO was visiting DC and the Baltimore area and I debated which camera to give him - the Canon or the Fuji. This is the most un-technical person I know - he still has trouble with the whole "holding the shutter halfway down to focus" on digital cameras. However, knowing he would be in museums, memorials, etc, I gave him the Fuji and made sure that after I played with it, it was all set back to auto. He came back with beautiful clear shots! Far nicer then anything he's been able to achieve with previous digital cameras. Most indoor photos used natural light and his flash and outdoor photos came out great - all set on AUTO.3. Nice size and solid construction. This is not a "plastic" camera like a couple others we have in our house that cost nearly the same. It's metal and feels solid in your hands. It's not as compact as others (like the Canon SD700) but actually for me, it's better. I don't have big hands at all, but some of the smaller cameras are just too small even for me. It's small enough for a pocket or purse.4. Lots of scene selections for when you want to experiment. This camera gives you a lot of pseudo-manual controls to play with but not like an SLR where you can adjust shutter/aperture. It gives you enough to experiment with and manipulate. Read the specs - I won't go into them all here except to say that the Natural/Flash mode is genius!Which leads me to CONS1. Nearly everything is menu driven. I find this cumbersome at times. I think I would be happier with the F30. But I was new to Fuji and didn't want to sink that much money into a camera brand that I was unfamiliar with so c'est la vie. Here's an example of how it's annoyed me: We're in the forest and I've gone thru the menus to select the macro setting - minimum 6 clicks in the menu system. I am taking closeups of some foliage when behind me, my golden retriever does something comical that I would have loved to take a picture of, but I don't even try the shot knowing that in macro mode, there's little hope of a good outcome and it would take too long to get it back in auto mode using the menu system. With the Canon, I could have quickly moved the external dial to AUTO and tried the shot. I know that this is a bit of an extreme example but I wanted to share it knowing that a lot of you, like myself, want to experiment with the scene selections but will also use AUTO. If you think you're going to use AUTO most of the time, then it's probably of little consequence to you. But you may want to consider the F30 for this reason. Now there *is* a button on the back called f-mode which is there to allow you to make some quick settings changes. It's basically a smaller selection menu which means you'd get your settings done quicker, but what Fuji chose to place in this shorter selection menu is befuddling to me. I can see the value of the ISO setting there but honestly, the other two settings are (IMO) dumb. Picture quality (choosing between Normal, Fine, and a few others) is something I usually set once and forget about. This belongs only in the longer more tedious menu selection. Same with the other selection - Finepix Color where you can choose Normal, Chroma, and B&W. If I'm setting those I'm thinking about the shots - they don't need to be in the "quick pick" menu. I think Fuji should replace one of those with a quick pick setting that puts the camera in all auto mode. Maybe I just haven't found the way to do it - if there is a simple fast way to get into AUTO mode, then someone please tell me. One of the few external buttons is the anti-blur button and it is very handy.2. Like everyone else - I dislike the charging system. You can purchase a standalone charger however.3. xD card - everything else I have in life takes SD cards. My card reader doesn't read xD. A mild annoyance.4. I don't particularly like the slow zooming when in playback mode.5. Slower then other camaeras when deleting photos in camera and formatting the card.The rest - LCD quality, no optical viewfinder (the Canon has one but it is so tiny it's hardly worth it) the battery life, zoom, macro mode are all good enough - not spectacular on the F20, but not bad either. They really weren't much of a factor in my buying decision.All in all - I really like this camera and use it a lot. There are some annoying quirks but they simply don't overshadow the wonderful photos it produces - especially in low light when compared to other compact cameras.</review_text>
Once in a while a truly good bargain comes along. The Finepix f20 is such a bargain. Of course, there are better cameras and cameras with more features but not at the f20's price. It's not a camera that will meet everyone's needs, but it is an excellent camera.In addition to its quality construction, it features: 6.3 megapixels, Fuji's new CCD sensor, ISO 2000 sensitivity, Dual Shot Mode (with/without flash), 15 scene modes, good battery life, quick response times, bright 2.5 inch LCD, and more. There are some manual features but no manual conrols for aperture and shutter speed and no viewfinder.  All these features would mean nothing if it didn't take good photos. Some of the photos taken with this camera (particularly low light photos) are stunning. I don't see how you could go wrong with this camera at today's prices.The only negatives for me are the Xd memory card and no viewfinder. However, those are minor and nothing is perfect</review_text>
This is my second Fujifilm camera. I recently bought this one after my dog ate (yes ate) my older one... I have been pleasantly surprised with the quality of pictures I have taken with this camera in comparison with my older camera (not sure the model but it was 3MP). I'm also not a photography guru, and perhaps thats why I like Fujis, they are pretty self-explanatory. Outdoor shots and shots right before sunset seem to be the best!</review_text>
I call cameras like this PhD's (Push Here Dummy) because I can not work a camera with more than the simplest of systems.  This camera works great for me.  Very compact and light with good battery life.  It works in low light and bright and the image stabilization work well and I get nice sharp pictures now.The display on the back is nice and large given the small size of the camera.The image on the display is clear and bright even in the brightest light outside.I wish there was a docking station like I had with the Fuji Finepix F410.  It was a great gizmo and made charging the camera and down loading the pictures very easyBuy it and enjoy it and if you are like me, overwhelmed by complicated gizmos, this is a simple straight forward camera to use.</review_text>
This camera was purchased for my wife to replace an older Olympus digital camera.  The camera is very compact, has a great 2.5" display and easy to use controls.  The pictures taken too date have been sharp with great colors.  In short; my wife loves the camera, especially the ability to take pictures without a flash in low light conditions and the long battery life.  She will love it even more when she learns to use more of its many features</review_text>
A perfect holder for my HP Camera.  Love the magnetic clasp.  Though I removed the wrist strap, it's a nice option to have (I'll simply use the actual camera strap for toting).  Sleek look, and the extra pouch inside the case to hold an extra memory card is a nice bonus</review_text>
This is a nice carrying case, the magnetic closure makes it easy to get the camera in and out. The belt loop has a snap closure which can sometimes pop on other cases that I've used, but I have not had that problem with this case as of yet</review_text>
The alternatives to this leather case are plastic. I opted to spend a few extra $$ and get the quality. Well made</review_text>
I really hedged between a sky caddie and a rangefinder.  I've used both now and the convenience of a sky caddie is hard to beat with a constant readout of yardage.  However, given the fact that I often find myself in "unique" locations on any given course, there is much to be said for being able to shoot a specific target to get a distance, which the sky caddie doesn't allow you to do.  Sometimes you need odd distances for lay ups, getting the ball back in play, etc.  In short, I would recommend this product.  It's easy to use, and appears to be very accurate.  A definite time saver on the course</review_text>
I bought this rangefinder for golf, but thought it might also work for hunting. It is small enough that I can keep it in my pocket and pull it out when needed.I have tried it in heavy brush, but find mixed results at close range.  You can get good results on objects beyond 50 yards by utilizing the "Ignore close objects" function.I pulled it out at the rifle range today during a snow shower and was pleasantly surprised to get a reading of 101 yards to my target from the bench about 1 yard back of the firing line.  The snow did not affect the results of the rangefinder at all...probably had more effect on the bullet path</review_text>
I bought this rangefinder for golf. It is small enough that I could keep it in my pocket. It really helps me with the approach shots to the greens. It takes a bit of experience to be able to focus on the flag. I usually use a person on the green as my target. After I got an approximate read, I use the scan mode to find the exact distance to the flag. Be careful with the tiny battery cover. It came loose and I lost it on the golf course. Fortunately, I recovered it amongst the green grass. The cover is also green. I now put a tape over it to secure the cover.</review_text>
I use this for golf yardage when I'm in a location where the yardage is hard to determine. Very accurate. Does require a steady hand. Would not recommend more magnification than this one has as it would be very difficult to hold steady enough for a target as small as a flag</review_text>
This rangefinder is great! Much lighter than the big bulky other units. Has all the great features that is needed. This is one that you will take with you and not leave in the truck because it's too big.  I tested this against some of my buddies' bigger units at known distances and this one out did the bigger units in speed and accuracy. Great scan mode. Best buy.  Should be sold for about ($) more than asked for</review_text>
I just purchased this item, and I am definitely impressed.  I just had a baby, and it is the perfect way to showcase pictures of my baby without having to search through my wallet to find pictures! (Would make a good baby shower gift!)  The photo quality is not the sharpest, but it is good enough, even when I don't crop pictures.  BTW, the crop feature is not just one size, you can pull the box out diagnally from the lower right hand corner.  It took no time at all to download the software and upload pictures (and you can view the picture you are selecting from your computer if you click on the file name - it will show you the picture in the screen below so you know which picture you are choosing before adding it, while also giving you a chance to crop).  Overall, I am very happy with this product!</review_text>
Ignore all the glowing comments on this product. Resolution is TERRIBLE, even for fully cropped mug-shots of just a person's face.   You have to hold the device at arms length just to make out some images since they are so blurry any closer. Save your money on this one.</review_text>
Muy buen producto, buena calidad, facil de llevar protege muy bien la camara</review_text>
Bought this to go with the Canon 350xt we bought for our father in law. It's a perfect kit for a beginner and the quality of the products is good.</review_text>
For all of the previous reviewers who gave this camera 1 star, I can only guess they had far too high expectations or tried dropping it from the Eiffel Tower and then take a picture with it...this camera is incredibly durable, having survived many drops, and has good enough picture quality that my family members have brought it on several overseas trips and used its pictures in a PowerPoint.Summary--PROS:- Good picture quality, not grainy- Takes smooth video, although no sound- Flash illuminates dark scenes wellCONS:- If you take too many pictures in fast succession, it will take several seconds to "recover".- Zoom rapidly degrades picture quality -- but that's to be expected with digital zoom.- You have to install software and go through fancy picture transfer process, whereas most cameras simply show up as a Removable Disk in My Computer when you connect them.PRO/CON:- Mac-friendly/PC-unfriendly. Movie files are in QuickTime .MOV format rather than good old universal AVI</review_text>
It was alright at first. I was looking for a relatively cheap camera for occasional picture taking. Outside pictures are okay, but indoor pictures are horrid.However, after a while, the battery life drains too fast. Honestly, invest in a better camera even if you want a cheap one. This one doesn't last more than a month</review_text>
Excellent transaction. The seller is quick to communicate (automatic process), and they delivered the product fast and safely. So far, it has been working great. THANKS</review_text>
This is my first digital camera. The basics are easy to learn and simple to master. However, the Coolpix has so many capabilities, it may be months before I get to most of them. I did try to get it to download wirelessly initially, but was unable to master that, but with the included wire, it was a very easy download. Perhaps after using it for awhile, and re-reading the manual, I'll figure it out.I bought an extra battery to have when shooting many pictures at an event, but I have as yet to need it. The battery lasts a long time, even when shooting all pix with a flash. It does take a couple seconds to recover from the flash, but it seems good/acceptable to me. I have never yet needed a second battery even when taking 50+ pictues. One suggestion, though would be a way to see the level of battery charge.You definitely need a memory card. The camera is only good for about a dozen pictures or so without one.Overall, I'm very satisfied and look forward to learning much from my new Coolpi</review_text>
Great camera with many useful features.  No USB cable was included however which has led to a 4 week chase and no results yet from Amazon, Nikon, or Cameta Camera, the supplier.  Poor followup in this case.  Now I understand that Nikon no longer supplies this cable.</review_text>
I originally thought that having a smaller camera would allow for a cool "side-camera" for those times when I didn't feel like carrying my "regular-sized" camera around.After receiving the Nikon Coolpix P3 - my mind was changed! This is now the first and only camera I'll be taking with me.It is incredibly easy to set up and to learn. In no time, I was taking shots with lots of different pre-set scenes, allowing the auto feature to take control of the shot decisions, and even uploading photos to our secure wireless network.The most amazing feature that I never expected in such a small camera is the flash. I am 35 years old and have never in my life had a photo taken where my eyes weren't red. That includes all the digital cameras that have red eye reduction features that are supposed to correct for it. I was stunned to discover that with this camera - - - -no more red eyes!I can't recommend this camera enough. If you get one, you'll likely find that it is the only camera you'll need in no time</review_text>
I had a Sony digi camera for some time.  I found the features difficult to use in that one had to carry the manual around with you as a reference.  While the pictures were excellent in general, I often failed to get the shot I wanted due to some adjustment that I had forgotten or couldn't otherwise access. The delay in the shutter was excessive. Then one day, the camera ceased to focus.  Sony wanted in excess of $200 to make the repair and I decided to look at alternatives.  This camera was the result and I love it.  The menus are very well thought out and there are onboard instructions for everything.  The camera is a comfortable size.  The pictures are sharp and the mechanism is reliable.  The battery life is amazing. The size and weight are very convenient. The shutter delay is very short. Best of all, the WiFi feature is a dream.  Once you get it set up, you push a botton and the pictures are on your computer without wires or hassle. (You have to disable the Microsoft XP firewall however.)  I feel that going with a company that has been making fine cameras forever was the choice that I should have made from the beginning.  I am buying two more of a similiar Nikon model for my children who are off to college in the fall.</review_text>
I purchased this camera before our trip to Hawaii, and have not repented... It delivers clear photos, with a very flexible set of pre-programmed settings... A must purchase for folks on the move</review_text>
I bought this camera a month ago for our trip to Roatan, Honduras.  My wife and I are avid snorkelers and we wanted an inexpensive camera (not the throw aways) that take great pics of sea life with the vibrant colors we see through our mask.  This camera is the one.  The divers at our resort were blown away with the clarity of each picture.  Also, the pics I took on land were excellent as well.  One of the pics I've posted (sunset) is now a desktop background for one of my co-workers.  I read every review for this camera before I bought it and when I saw the pics from the reviewer in Hawaii, I was sold.  I hope my pics help.</review_text>
This camera is the best digital camera I have ever owned.  Being a very active person, I needed a camera that would hold up to anything.  Waterpoof, shockproof.... everything proof!  It's compact size makes it great for sticking in your back pocket during a night out on the town, or packed away in your backpack while traveling the world.  The large screen makes for easy viewing of your pictures and all of the functions are very easy to use and understand. This 7.1 megapixel camera taks great pictures that aren't too large so they don't take up too much memory which makes it espescially easy to upload your picutres onto social networking sites without having to reformat them.  You definately get your moneys worth buying this great all around camera.</review_text>
This camera does everything it says; yes, it's waterproof and I was very uneasy taking a digital camera into the water for the first time!!  Only reason I didn't give it 5 stars:  it is as slow as every other digital camera I've owned as far as focusing, multiple flashes, and then actually shooting.  You get your subject's attention and they smile, frozen, as you hold down the shutter release for a good 3 seconds until the shot is taken (in low light.) I was especially intrigued by its "Bright Capture" technology, but it honestly doesn't seem any different in low light than my old Sony U20 2MP tiny little snapshot camera.  Still that same flash-in-the-dark look.  There is a fill-flash low light program mode (among many many others), but the shutter speed sets itself so slow the background becomes a messy worthless blob, even if you hold your breath and try to remain still.  My ideal snapshot camera is portable, durable, quick, easy, and produces excellent results without having to think about your exposure modes.  This camera has 3.5 out of those 5.  It is way portable, very durable, easy, produces OK results but you have to mess with settings if you're not in daylight, and it's not very quick.Overall I am very happy with the purchase and will carry it everywhere</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera....I have yet to use it 10 feet under water but maybe someday...  I love the compact durability of this camera.  And the picture quailty is excellent!!!Very happy photographer</review_text>
Small size with rugged construction makes this camera very practical for traveling.The availability of numerous settings enables capturing high quality pictures under various conditions.This camera has produced many excellent photographs</review_text>
I picked up this product at a local electronics retailer, so that I could have an ongoing power solution for my Olympus D-40 Zoom. To my surprise, the batteries lasted much longer than conventional AA alkalines. I've used the charger with the batteries a number of times, both in the States and in Taiwan, with no problems at all</review_text>
Excellent, light weight and professional looking camera. Haven't used it long enough and so it will take some time  to be able to master it's full capabilities. I used to like the idea of removable lens, but with the Fuji Finepix fixed lens, it really doesn't matter that much, as there are additional lens that can be attached to it.</review_text>
Good pixel quality, fast focus, excelent color and contrast.Why spend a lot of bucks in expensives SLR's ?</review_text>
I purchased this camera about a month ago and have taken approximately 2,000 pictures to date. I've taken indoor, outdoor, telephoto, macro, everything except the video. Sorry I should have played with that too, but it is not the primary reason I bought this camera.  I wanted a camera that expanded the capability and control of my small point and shoot camera, an Olympus C-50 (which I am quite pleased with). I am very happy with the results of the S9100.This is a substantial camera.  It feels more like my Nikon 8008, so don't plan to put it in your pocket when you take it on a trip. I have had three Olympus digital cameras and was looking to purchase another Olympus but I was disappointed with their offering in the ultra zoom class.Because I already had several xD cards it was a plus that this camera gave me a choice of two different media types. I also liked the manual zoom because this camera felt familiar, like an SLR. Using AA batteries was another plus I was looking for. I see some folks say they are disappointed with the battery life, but I haven't found that to be a problem.  I use 2900mAh NiMH Rechargeable Battery and I have yet to run out of juice on  photo shoots of over 200 pictures.  I have not used alkaline batteries, but I understand they do not last nearly as long. I use the EVF more than the large digital display (probably from old habits of 35mm cameras) and that may have something to do with it too.  I think the manual zoom has to save a lot of battery power when compared to some of the competition.There is a lot of discussion about image stabilization, and I never had it in my other cameras, so I don't seem to miss it. I haven't had many blurred photos but I do use a mono-pod or tri-pod when it is appropriate. But even hand held, this camera produces excellent images even up at 1600 ISO.  There is some noise, but I don't think it is too bad.  Printed photos come out excellent.  I have several printers and a large format HP plotter that can produce 36" x 36" prints and I am very pleased with the results.This camera has excellent versatility, the zoom is great and the macro mode gives you wonderful capability to really get in close.  I have been shooting primarily .JPG  but have experimented with .RAW. From what I read this format it will extend my ability, but I need more time to learn about RAW processing before I can provide an intelligent discussion. I like the idea that RAW is there if and when I decide to use it.In conclusion, I am happy with my purchase and would buy this camera again. If you are looking for an alternative to a dSLR that provides a lot of versatility and control this one merits a close look</review_text>
THIS IS A GREAT CAMERA. THIS IS MY 2ND DIGITAL CAMERA.EASY TO USE RIGHT OUT OF THE BOX. LOOK AT A LOT OF OTHER CAMERAS GLAD I CHOSE THIS ONE.ONLY COMPLAINT IS THE LENS COVER WAS MISSING. I CALLED , E-MAILED FUJIFLIMEVERYONE GAVE ME SOMEONE ELSE TO CALL OR TALK TO. NEVER DID GET ANYONE TO HELP ME SO I GAVE UP AND ORDERED ONE FROM A CAMERA SUPPLY PLACE, WILL TAKE 3 WEEKS. I TAKE A LOT OF PICTURES AT HOCKEY GAMES. IT WORKS VERY WELL.orvill</review_text>
This is a very good camera, and it will certainly let you do a lot of creative work. On the downside, pics are sometimes a little dull. And I found after I bought it that for the same money I could have bought a Konica Dimage A200 with optical stabilization syste</review_text>
With this camera I have nearly all of the features of my SLR film camera with 5 lenses.  Additionally, the 9 MP Resolution allows me to crop and enlarge as much as I desire.The short battery life is annoying, but a minor price to pay for having so much capability in a small package</review_text>
A lot has already been said and there are some excellent reviews here (as well as elsewhere), but I just want to add my 2 cents. I purchased this guy a few months back, and have since purchased a light and a second battery for it (I'll talk about those shortly).My favorite features include:1. The 3.5" screen, which should be a must for ANY camcorder, as the 2.5" screens common today are worthless IMHO.2. The sliding door for accessing the HDMI port as well as the other video ports.  This is unique to Sony's UX1 and SR1 HD Camcorders (as far as I can tell) and is the BEST implementation I have seen to cover and uncover ports. Much better than the little plastic plugs that inevitably break-off and are lost.3. Beautiful, detailed video.My least favorite features include:1. The stupid little plastic cover plug for the power port.  As mentioned above, this camera has a great sliding door for all its video plugs.  Inexplicably, Sony used the plastic plug for the power port, which is right next to the video ports and could have used the sliding door.  Stupid. Mine is already threatening to break.2. Short recording times. It is hard to blame Sony for the short recording time on DVDs.  This is just a fact of life and the short time isn't limited to the HD DVD camcorders but it problematic for all DVD camcorders (though less so than here).  You make a choice and you live with it. While lots of the reviews mention the dual layer DVDs out there, they are MUCH more expensive and I don't even really consider them an option.  Luckily, the lower quality modes still look very good, especially when taping outside.  For lower light situations, I would use the higher quality settings.  Still, all of the video I take with this thing looks better than any standard def. stuff you may see. Also, related to the DVD issue is that the camera insists on popping up a little comment saying it recommends Sony brand DVDs every time I put in any other brand.  This is completely annoying and Sony should rethink the way they try to lock you in to their own brand.3. Automatic lens cover.  Not having to bother with a cover is a great little addition to this thing.Features I thought I wanted but could have lived without:I haven't yet used the focus ring or the mic in or headphone out yet.  I really wanted these, but in retrospect, they were unnecessary for my home use.  The mic on this thing is plenty good, and I just don't want to mess with the focus at the end of the day.Other notes:I purchased a light and an extra battery here on Amazon and couldn't be happier with them.  The light is the Sony HVL-HL1 and the battery is the same one that comes with the camera, the Sony NPFM50.  The light is just right to give a boost to indoor recording and makes the picture MUCH better in low light situations.  It's only 3 watts but seems VERY bright.  It attaches to the hot shoe on the top of the camera. It's priced right and works flawlessly.As for the grainy picture mentioned by many reviews, I haven't noticed anything distracting.  Every camera has positive and negative aspects, but I am more than happy with the quality of video this thing takes.I give this Camcorder 5 stars not because it is perfect, but if you weigh the price and the features, I'm not sure there is a better HD or SD camera out there right now.  It would not be worth the list price, but at the price they have it for now, you simply can't beat it, as long as you can live with the DVD format.  If that is a dealbreaker for you (it wasn't for me, obviously), it's a dealbreaker, but otherwise, this is by far the best buy at this price point</review_text>
FANTASTIC camcorder!!  Awesome stills and vids.  Highly recommended for beginning user based on low price and ease of use!!  Only tough part is converting video's.  Still recommend to any user looking for HD quality!</review_text>
This is an awesome piece of equipment! This cam produces some of the most stunning video and right now the price has to be the deal of the decade! The dvd format is outstanding and it really is the best of both worlds. I use -rw discs and copy my video to my computer then reformat the disc (which takes about 7 seconds) and use it over and over again so the price of media is virtually nothing, unlike tape which you have to keep buying and buying. The other benefit is unlike a hard disk based cam I dont have to worry about the drive filling up while I'm on vacation with no place to offload the video. And unlike A tape based cam I dont have all the problems associated with tape like head cleaning and trying to dig out tape that is wrapped up inside the cam or having to endure hours of tedious capturing or having to properly tension a tape before use or how big of a box I need to store all those old tapes in or worrying about recording over something I have already shot. I could go on and on and on about it but tape is just an old unreliable pain in the rear. As you can tell I have had bad experiences with tape based cam's so enough of that.The AVCHD codec is very efficient you will have about 4.5gb per hour of video compared to 13gb per hour of video from a tape based hdv cam and it records audio in dolby 5.1 surround which is alot better than the stereo only that you get with hdv.Others have mentioned the short recording time and I suppose it may be an issue for someone but it is not for me. Think about it when you are watching tv or a movie how many times does the cam just sit there pointed at one thing without a break for longer than a minute (or even a few seconds)? There is nothing I can think of that I can record for more than 20 minutes (hq mode) straight that I would want to sit down and watch anyways. Now if you have to record something like a childs school play sure maybe a couple times in your childs life you need an hour shot but I dont and even if an event took say 1 hour straight it only takes 15 seconds to change out a disc and be recording again so in 1 hour I would change twice and miss 30 seconds of video, not a big deal. Most all the stuff I shoot is like 1-3 minutes tops and I'm on to the next scene. I have shot a wedding and I was able to get all of it from the time the bride walks in to the time the couple walks out all on 1 20 minute disc. I think most of the people that complain about short recording times are just to lazy to change a disc! As far as the video being noisy in low light well give me a break, it does but so does every other cam that is priced south of $3,500.00! Besides that they do make these things called lights! In the daylight there is no noise at all in the video when played back on my HDTV, just beautiful high def video.The bottom line for me is that this cam is by far the best bang for the buck available today. Nothing in this price range even comes close to the video quality that this cam produces. It is a snap to record brilliant video and transfer it to the computer. Editing options are limited right now but they do exist and more are on the way so the editing thing is a non issue as well. It has pro type features that are just not found on other cams and I especially like the manual adjustment ring and I would never own a cam again that did not have at least a 3.5" lcd screen. Having used the smaller 2.7" screens before I can tell you that the big screen is way better especially when you are trying to manually adjust elements like focus and exposure. With the big screen you can actually tell what your video will look like, the small screens just dont show enough detail. This cam also takes beautiful still pictuers, I could keep going on and on but the truth is I really enjoy everthing that this cam has to offer and I would not trade it for anything else</review_text>
I bought this camcorder few days back and this is one buy that iam not going to regret. In spite of some of the drawbacks, seeing yourself in HD gives you real high. The picture quality is awesome. Its like stack of 5-6 mega pixel images put together. I have infact paused the video at few places and taken screenshots of them.Lack of video editing tools is a drawback. Sony provides tools to convert H.264 to Mpeg. So that I can use the Mpeg files on Sony Vegas. Audio quality is excellent. Great camcorder when shooting outdoors. Night time shooting needs improvement. Can spot lot of noise in the video when shooting in dark.I would recommend to buy a RW disk and dump all its contents to your computer, then erase the DVD contents.</review_text>
Yeah, the DVD storage should be longer than 15 minute for HD recording. However, the price/quality of this camcorder more than make up for it.  Plus i only do home movies so this fits my needs.  I am rewarded by this unit everytime i hook this thing up to my HDTV.I don't do a lot of low light recordings so i am not affected by a number of bad professional reviews in this area.If you are shopping for a camcorder now, this is one of the best buys out there.  I was looking for a camcorder for over 3 months and i finally settled on this one.</review_text>
But you do need a very fast PC for playback.  A 3GHz Pentium 4 or equivalent simply won't cut it.  I get jerky and poor video on my single core PC but the problem is fixed as soon as I move the video to my dual core AMD box.  Keep in mind that the AVCHD playback software is so demanding that both CPUs are running at about 90% utilization during playback.  The conclusion:  there is no way a single CPU system can pull it off.For people who complained about recording time and MAC incompability,  those are design and technical limits.  I am prefectly happy with 15 min of HD recording time per miniDVD.  If you need longer recording time,  you should buy a hard drive or miniDV based camcorder.   Mac incompatible?   Buy a PC.  They cost less than Mac accesories.</review_text>
Having a DVD burner build-in to this camera saves a lot of time to transfer movies to your computer or simply save them in a secure media (DVD). 30 minutes of normal quality and 20 minutes of HD is more than enough for my home-made movies</review_text>
This ball head is great for my compact tripod setup.  Holds my Nikon D80 and 18-200 lens just fine.  Light and beautifully constructed</review_text>
This item is the one to get. It is roomy and very durable.  It stands  tought on the nature wear and tear that is in some cases unavoidable.  Not  to mention this will go with almost any camcorder plus you know for sure  that you are getting the best i quality because it is made by SAMSONITE. I  advice you to look no further than this product</review_text>
I would have done this sooner but we have a some family emergencies come up and I haven't done it. I got my item fast and with no problem. The tri-pod was in wonderful condition and the price was great</review_text>
This tripod is very good.  The only one bad thing I can think of is all the plastic.  The knobs and crank are all plastic, giving this tripod a cheap feeling.</review_text>
This is a good basic tripod.  Much sturdier than many others I've seen in this price range.  Smooth controls.  Very easy to use and easy for our children (ages 10 and 13) to use with the digital camcorder.  Comes with two parts to connect the camera to the stand, so you can pre-attach the connections to two different items (e.g., a camcorder and a camera) and quickly attach and detach each to the tripod as needed.  The level works OK, but is not positioned as clearly and is not as large as higher end (and higher priced) tripods (e.g., Bogen).  Overall, a good value for the price</review_text>
It's been a long time since I used a tripod but I managed to get it set up without reading the instructions. There are no instructions so save the box for helpful hints. Tripod is fit for my purpose: mostly indoor use planned. It is hard to get it truely static when pressing shutter release on Minolta Dimage X. I was also horizontally challenged - the base has a little level that is below (BELOW) the camera pad.  I would not take this on a rugged outdoor adventure with many uneven surfaces (They will need to make a titaniium one to get it this light but durable; start saving now.) I would not use it around kids, old folks, crowds,  or any combination of these because your expensive electonic gizmo is going to going to fly thru the air with the greatest of ease.  A nylon or tyvek travel case would be a helpful item</review_text>
I purchased this unit after I bought my canon zr25mc digital camcorder. I have used it often when filming sporting events and action, the adjustable resistance offers fluid movement when trying to follow action and if you speed up, the camera does not jerk (as long as the tension is set high enough). I recently bought a canon G2 digital still as well. Again, the extendable height proved usefull to get a good view of a group shot, or even a landscape or two. It is light enough that I can cary it hooked onto my camera bag (probably around 3 pounds) when I hike to take pictures in the mountains. It is not too stable in uneven terrain, but really it is not designed for that kind of work anyway it seems. Overall it has served me well, and I think someone looking for an inexpensive (virtually disposable) tripod would do well with this model</review_text>
Great camcorder bag, just the right size. I especially like the detachable storage for items you don't need on your outing.</review_text>
Bought this to use with a Panasonic GS 500. It does a great job of keeping everything tight and together, no bouncing around or loose pieces. I especially like the lower compartment that velcro's on. It's very handy for cables, tapes, manuals, microphones, etc. The whole package is very sturdy and a comfort to carry. Highly recommended</review_text>
This is nice quality built bag. I love the detachable lower compartment which I use to store extra video cables and miniDV tapes. My camcorder is small and fits snuggly, so if your camera is any bigger or you leave a tripod attachment on--beware as it may not fit. I would like to have a little more room, but overall I'm happy with the purchase</review_text>
Great product, good quality, size as expected and as said by manufacturer. The detachable compartment is great for carrying cables, manuals and other accessories. I'm using it for taking my Canon ZR700 camcorder and my Fujifilm S5200 SLR like digicam, both fits perfectly inside at the same time. Only one thing i didn't like, the main compartment separator is attached to the case leaving little chance to organize things as desired. Because this matter i am giving this product 4 stars and not 5</review_text>
I use for AAA and AA batteries, and no longer panic when batteries wear out.  One hour charging is super.  Only con is that just two AAA can be charged at a time.  But it does accept and charge four AA which makes it a win</review_text>
This is a cheap shotgun mic, also known as a boom mic.  Compared to a camcorder's built-in mic this mic is uni-directional, so it's less susceptible to ambient noise.  The naysayers here don't like it because they don't know what to expect or how to use it properly.  You need to read the manual and follow the instructions, silly.  And be sure to use it on one of the listed compatible Sony camcorders (although I also got it work with a Hitachi model).  The sound quality is about the same as a Sony camcorder's built-in mic -- that's why I said this is cheap -- but you imemediately notice the improvement.  The trick is to point the mic's front end at the sound source.  If I had more money I'd have bought a Sennheiser, but for 45 bucks, this is not bad at all</review_text>
This really isn't as bad as everyone's saying.  Compared to what you get standard on most cameras, this mic does a great job in picking up dialogue.  Just point and shoot.  I'm pretty satisfied</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera when my venerable Nikormat EL-W developed shutter timing issues during my Photo 1 class.This camera reasonably priced has preformed flawlessly thus far. I have shot multiple rolls of Ilford HP5 plus film through this camera and have yet to have an exposure not come out due to the camera. After reading the manual I was able to easily understand the different modes and how to change the user controlled settings. The on camera flash leaves a little to be desired as it rather harsh and its range is somewhat limited, an accessory flash will overcome this and there are other flashes that will operate with this camera not just Canon.I have not had the opportunity of shooting color film through this camera yet when I do I will update this review.The only thing I dislike about this camera is that there is no provision for a remote shutter release. The Rebel K2 with date is the only version of this camera that can use a remote shutter release, why Canon removed this feature from this model is unknown a remote release is very handy when photographing nature or when used with the timer for self portraits.If you have any plans for infrared photography do not buy a EOS Canon, the Frame counter uses an infrared sensor that will cause fogging on your infrared film</review_text>
I love this camera the first day I received it I took 3 rolls of film.  It has been the best purchase I bought this year. I got a real good price on it and i received it fast!</review_text>
it looks good takes great pics and the ease of use is good for a film camer</review_text>
I bought this a year ago and have taken many great pictures with it. It's light, has many features and can be used as an automatic when all you want to do is point and click. I can't recommend it enough.</review_text>
I am really satisfied with the purchase of this camera. Good quality workmanship. Canon has been a leader in photography in my book. Easy to use controls for any one</review_text>
The photos are exceptional. It was very easy to learn how to use the features. I have taken some great photos with it, much better than my digital. I have not encountered any problems.  I took it on a long (over a month) trip where it was subjected to rough treatment and extreme weather.  It came through with flying colors.  Rock solid</review_text>
Soy un principiante en esto de la fotografia, esta ha sido mi primera camara slr, por lo tanto me ha tocado experimentar con ella para obtener las mejores tomas posibles a la vez que han aumentado mis conocimientos en el area, el desempeo es excelente tanto en tomas fijas como las que he realizado a objetos en movimiento,tanto sus funciones automaticas como las profesionales ofrecen un desempeo excelente, he tomado mas de 300 fotos en poco menos de cuatro meses, el zoom que tiene es rapido, los botones tienen una disposicion excelente para manejarla con una sola mano, lo unico que necesita es un flash de la serie speedlite, tuve oportunidad de conseguir uno prestado de un amigo y el cambio fue estupendo ya que este tiene mas alcance para el lente que la camara trae,ya que el flash que trae carece de potencia el cual ofrece su mejor desempeo en los 28mm del lente(no le podemos pedir mas a un flash integrado),  por ultimo les dijo que posee el mejor sistema de medicion de luz que existe en el mercado (E-TTL)y esta disponible tanto con flash integrado como con el flash externo</review_text>
If you have a 35mm SLR camera, it's hard to beat this film. It's plenty fast enough, and the grain is amazing. Even if you have a small, compact camera, while you may have some trouble, this film is great. Make sure you DON'T get it developed at a grocery store or wall-mart type place: this will make any film look horrible. At least go to your local ritz/wolf camera, or use a lab. You'll see the difference. Ultimatly, A superb film</review_text>
Kodak makes great film, and Gold Max is one of their best amature films.  This film provides maximum versitility for outdoor sports, and for the decently lighted indoor shots.  Grain structure is good, holding well up to an 8&quot;x10&quot; print.  Best part about this film is the price...I think Kodak and Amazon.com have a real winner here</review_text>
This is a great little camera. We had an Olympus 3.2 meg still camera with a 10 time optic zoom and it was a great camera although it was a little slow to focus and had a small LCD. This panasonic is real fast as a still camera and has a much larger LCD It also has a 10 time optic zoomand doubles as a video camera that record to DVD. It is real easy to use and we love it.What more could you want? Amazon had a great price and you can trust them</review_text>
I've tried several other Camcorders and returned them to the store.  This Camcorder is easy to use as well as being easy to download to my computer</review_text>
The picture quality is exceptional and it is very easy to use.  So much nicer than punching the screen for menus like the Sony 405.  Who wants to worry about finger prints and scratches all over the screen with those touch screens?  It is also priced better than the Sony 405.  We researched these cameras a lot before settling on the Panasonic, with picture quality being our #1 objective.  We are more than pleased with our purchase!!</review_text>
We are pleased with our new Panasonic camcorder.  We have only used it a few times at Christmas, but was pleased with the picture quality.  We knew from looking at different models in a store that we wanted the joystick operation that only Panasonic seems to use.  It could not be more simple to move between and choose options and functions.  The image stabilizer works well and image looks good even at 10x zoom.  As many reviews stated, under very low light conditions you will loose picture quality, but we have found that to be the case with lots of cameras that friends of ours have.  We are having to upgrade our computer drive to read the mini DVD-Rs, so I cannot comment on the software yet.  But we love the menu funtion on playback, no fast forwarding or rewinding, just shoot, finalize, and put it in the DVD player and choose what scene you want to watch, it is very simple.  To us the simplicity and not having to convert over from tapes every time is worth the cost of mini DVDs and the short record time (about 20 minutes per disc).  We are very happy with the camera so far</review_text>
I have been using mine for about 2 months now. The picture quality is very good. I purchased a Sima light as an add on. It enhances the pictures even better. The still pictures are amazing too. I was trying to decide between Sony and this one. Finally decided on this one because of the picture quality.</review_text>
I reviewed many DVD camcorders over a 4-5 month period and feel this was the best choice. I almost purchased the Sony DVD405, but color was one of the first priorities on my list of wants with this new camcorder. Although the Sony has a better chip, the fact is that the Panasonic, with 3 chips, according to many reviews I had read had better color. The ease of use is nice also. Finalizing DVD's takes only a few minutes and not really a big deal, my only issue so far is the fade control which requires the operator to select it via the joystick control each time you want to use it. Selecting this control while recording requires a steady hand so that the camera does not shake. None the less, it puts my eleven year old, 8mm camcorder to shame. Love taking videos again</review_text>
This is my first DVD camcorder and I absolutely love it!  It's also my first 3-chip video camcorder.  The image quality is just really good, like the other guys said.  The machine is also apiece of cake to use.  I e-mailed "gadgester" and he recommended TDK 8.cm dvd-r blanks from amazon, so I bought them and now I just pop one in and go!  No formatting needed.  Finalization in the camcorder is needed to make the dvd-r compatable with my Sony dvd player at home as well as my Thinkpad.One gotcha to look out for is the slow start-up times, from power off to on.  It takes anywhere between 5 and 10 seconds for the camcorder to be ready to record, after you insert yoru dvd-r.  If you use dvd-rw, the manual says it might take up to 20 seconds!  Other than that, I have no problems with the camcorder.  It's high quality, and I just love the conveneince as well as image quality.</review_text>
This is the first 5 star rating I have ever given on Amazon!I chose the HV20 in preparation for a week long shoot in North and South India.  I was ready to purchase the new Panasonic HVX200 (for approximately $5,000); but the $1,100 HV20 camera actually has some major advantages that convinced me it was a better choice for my project.The biggest factor in my choice of the HV20 is editing capability.  The HV20's HDV format is compatible with editing packages like Adobe Premier Pro, whereas the formats recorded (i.e. AVHCD or HD50) by other products from Panasonic and Sony are not very compatible with editing packages and may be impossible or require extra steps for post processing.Regarding image quality, the camera earns a WOW!  I think this camera is currently the very best option for a solo shoot on the go.  Other reviews say it all regarding image quality, color, etc.  External and hot shoe audio are also a big deal for high quality shooting.  The LCD screen is sharp and the feature to impose a horizontal line or grid on the screen (but not recorded) is very handy to maintain level shots.The camera is not tiny, but is small enough to be slipped into a very large trouser pocket; this allowed access to more spontaneous shooting opportunities than larger HD camera options.  With a large fanny pack, I kept the camera (with extra tapes, batteries, monopod, and DM50 microphone) with me at all times and was ready for anything.  This portability factor transcends price point.Regarding storage, the HV20 records HDV directly to DV tape.  The much more expensive HVX200 will record HD50 format (which is an equivalent or possibly superior format) but will only record SD (not HD) to tape; with the HXV200, proprietary P2 cards are required for HD recording (and an 8GB P2 card costs approximately $1,100).  I bought this camera for the price of one 8GB P2 card!Recording to tape seemed like a disadvantage at first, but the advantage in India was huge - I did not need to transfer anything to my PC or need a PC) until I was good and ready (so I could maximize shooting time on site and deal with all post production later); in addition, archival is handled up front with less compression and no spaces constraints - that more tapes could not solve; after shooting 10 tapes, I realized this is also a significant advantage.  I also took over 1,000 3.1 Megapixel still shots with the camera on a 2GB card.The camera layout is quite good.  The tape and battery can be swapped out without removing from tripod or monopod mount.  In unplanned situations, this was a major advantage.A few ways the camera could be improved:1) the lens width varies when switching between video and still modes, so I expect editing stills into my video will take extra time2) with an after market wide angle lens, a wide shot shows the black edges of the lens, a settable zoom stop would help when zooming back to wide.3) the manual focus is not intuitive, more feedback on the dial would help4) switching from auto to programmable mode would be better if some auto functions could set to stay on5) an auto backlight feature would be handy6) the miniSD card was a strange and inconvenient choice for still photo storage, since I could not reuse SD cards I already own (note that no memory card is included with the camera)7) video input (like the Samsung product), so that I could keep the camera in my pocket and shoot with a lipstick cam when necessary (to avoid looking like the typical American tourist or for action/sports applications)8) battery life was shorter than expected,  I got 1 hour from each battery.Net net, this camera is fantastic and I believe the video quality is sufficent to qualify my project for my first film festival submission</review_text>
I received the HV20 yesterday and after charging the battery I hit the woods. I wanted to see how  well it worked on a cloudy day in the outdoors. It surpassed what I expected the picture quality to be. I also tried it in a dark basement corner and under normal lighting inside. The dark corner needs an additional light on the HV20.With a 100 watt bulb turned on it really surprised me. The detail was far better than what I expected.The reason I gave it a 4star rating was the power switch and the cap for the HDMI plug. Both are not very well thought out in my opinion. From my point the quality of HD is outstanding and when I played the film back I heard birds singing that I had not notice in the woods.The sound was outstanding!!I agree with one other review about the power switch hard to operate.In retrospect if you want an excellent quality HD picture I would recommend the Canon HV20. After all it has a excellent picture and reasonable price for a High Definition camcorder. And I would think, that is what most people want from a consumer camcorder.I viewed the film on my 42" and 50" plasma tv's (sharp as a tack)04/12/07 I used my HV20 over the Easter holiday and was more impressed. In my outdoor shots it is better that any camcorder I have had. Inside it took outstanding video with no external video light attached. The still photos I took were as good as one of the first 3 mega pixel digital camera I use to have. I purchased it for video alone,but it is nice to have a quality still photo too.</review_text>
I got my Canon HV20 yesterday. Just post several problems after testing it.1. Handling. The handling is quite awkward. My hand feel very uncomfortable when holding it, it alway slips. I have to use the other hand to adjust it from time to time. Also it is quite hard to switch on the camcorder when using only single hand.2. Building: This camcorder is not that sexy as the previous one. It is not cute, and it is not professional. But given its excellent video quality, this is OK.3. Noise: I shoot some video indoor with a 300W light bulb, I should say the light is fairly enough, but when I play it back using my 30 inch LCD monitor, I can still find quite a bit of noise although their grain size are not that big. I tried "neat video" plug in and sony vegas to reduce the noise, it seems to work pretty well.4. Manual control. The manual control part is the part really disappoints me. Because I used to do a lot of photography. The manual control of this camcorder is far from a SLR camera. Especially the manual exposureit is funny. Say when I shoot video in bright place, I set exposure to -1, then I moved to a dark place, then the video will be very very dark. This means when you adjust the exposure, you adjust its "absolute value" while not the relative value. It doesn't mean that you can get less exposure all the time.In a SLR camera, if you adjust exposure to -1, it means no matter where, the camera will measure the light and then decease the light coming in relatively -1 to its measured value.5. Another thing I recommend is when you use this camcorder, try to adjust the contrast to lower level, brightness to lower level, no sharpening. This will definitely give you a lot of flexibilities for the post editing</review_text>
I have a sony FX1 since 2 years and then I had bought a sony HC1 which I had to return due to unacceptable video noise in low light conditions. When you have used sony FX1 you know how the low light videos are supposed to look, so I had something good to compare the hv20 to. I got this hv20 camera and I have played with it checking its potential outdoor and indoors. I switched between 24p and 1080i for same shot with same lighting conditions and see that the 24p does really make the video cleaner in low light, it was way better than the sony HC1 which I had bought.  Of course the sony FX1 low light footage is much better than hv20, but  using 24p in low light does make the hv20 acceptable. I could not really make out the difference of FX! and HV20 in bright daytime videos other than that the hv20 has more color saturation.My fears were laid to rest and I like the hv20 low light and daylight videos.For 1/3rd the price of sony fx1 this camera is a keeper.24p is something which some people will like some wont. Action or movement of objects will appear a little jerky in 24p which is as expected, but it does look different from 1080i. Non moving shots with 24p looks great.If you pan the camera in 24p mode the video stutter is pretty apparent.TO give you a idea what 24p  looks like  imagine watching a video on a monitor which has low refresh rate you see a ghost object follow  the object after it moves. I took the camera and drove around in the night to see how it handles the nightlights... 24p mode is not something you would use in that situation as whenever you pan the camera the blurring effect becomes very pronounced due to the lights. But still the video was pretty good. 24p mode with cinema effect added makes it little bit better. 1080i mode looks pretty good without the 24p motion blur while I took the drive.I connected the hv20 to my 42inch 1080p lcd TV through HDMI and it looks really good. I was surprised. Outdoor videos are very sharp and colorful. Indoor videos are also pretty good. More saturated colors than sony fx1 but very nice to look at. It is difficult to get steady shots with the camera as it is lighter. If you can keep you hand steady during the shots the footage is as good as in hd channels. But it is great to take it to disney or vacations without having to carry the sony fx1 bulk.It has a neat little timer which displays for 10secs when you start to record so that you do not make a shot too short or too abrupt.Battery life is little more than an hour with the lcd open so I bought an extra bp-2L14 battery.Hopefully they will come out with the great FX1 low light performance in such a small package soon.overall this was a very good buy. You will love playing with the 24p mode.conclusions ..very light , pretty fast auto focusing,small form factor, 24p mode video, good low light videos,really great daytime videos and the wife loves this camera as it is much smaller than FX1!</review_text>
Considering what most people will buy this for, including myself, it's a great little camera.  Not too large, not too small as to be unusable.  The quality when hooked up to an HD monitor is quite amazing.  I switched between footage shot during the day from the cam and our local HD Pbs channel.  I could not tell a difference.  This was in 1080i through the component connection, not HDMI.  I can only imagine what the hdmi looks like.  I also like the tape vs hard drive.  If you go on a 3 week vacation somewhere, you can buy tapes or bring extras instead of portable hard drive storage.  And from what I understand there is less compression on tapes.  The tapes actually get you better quality.I also use pro cameras for videography and do miss the ability to have a constant shutter speed and aperture.  When pointing up at my daughter against a blue sky, it adjusts for the bright sky and my daughter's face gets dark.  There's a backlight button which will probably do the trick, but an instant exposure dial would be great.  Another con, the zoom rocker is TINY.   Even my little fingers have a hard time zooming smoothly.I also noticed when editing, it takes more CPU to even preview the footage due to the compression.  If you have an older machine and are wanting to edit, just be aware it may be a tad slower.Other than a few nitpicks, the quality for price is a bargain. I've been waiting for a consumer 24p HD cam for vacations for a long time.  It has arrived and for relatively cheap.</review_text>
I work at a local camera shop, and we just ordered a few of these cameras in. I've had the chance to test it out over the past few days, and I am quite impressed. I've worked with many different video cameras over the years, including a few high-end cameras such as the Canon XL2 and Panasonic DVX-100 and I think it's safe to say that the HV20 is the best video camera you can buy for under $1100. It's comparable to other HD cameras from other brands such as Sony and Panasonic, but there are a few more professional features that enable it to rise above the rest. The main feature that it has that got me so interested in the camera is its ability to shoot in 24 fps progressive. Normally, this feature could only be found on cameras starting at about $4000 and above. This is a very cool feature, as it lets you shoot feature movies that look like film, and achieve quite a few effects that can only be done in 24fps. Another feature that I found quite useful was the ability to switch between variable and fixed zoom speed. This will let you zoom at a set speed, no matter how hard you push down the zoom button. There are countless other features that this camera has, but I suggest you just try it out for yourself. Without further ado, I think I'll get back to admiring this wonderful camera</review_text>
My Fuji camera will "only" take Fuji brand batteries - it will not take anything else comparable so I rate this as excellent.</review_text>
My FujiFilm F700 takes great photos, but runs low on battery before you even get to fill up the card. I bought a 650mAh generic equivalent from an Amazon seller and it works great. It is light enough to carry around just like a memory card and it's really easy to change batteries when I need. Product is a little pricey at $40, so buy from an Amazon seller. If you find one cheap this is a must-have for your camera</review_text>
I bought this as a gift so I can't say personally how good it was, but the recipient stated that she loved it.  Especially the ability to change frames to match her decor and that it came with a remote</review_text>
This is a great little frame for the money.  It was easy to use.  This one was to replace a TruTech one that I purchased locally and returned.  The TruTech was difficult to operate and poor quality screen.  The Matsunichi was very easy to use, much less expensive, and showed clearer pictures.  I'm sure that there are some out there with much better resolution, however, for the money, this one is great.  I am very pleased</review_text>
Worked as advertised right out of the box. Would buy another for family as well as r</review_text>
This is my third digital camera after a Ricoh very early model that is less than 1 mega pixels and Nikon D1 SLR. I bought this one mainly because it's almost impossible to use the D1 on every occasion we like to take pictures of our little boy who is only 2. The D1 with a zoom lens is way too bulky, heavy and sometimes hard to use for my wife. She loves this Coolpix camera. With 5.1 mega pixels, the picture quality is very good for family photo albums. The battery lasts surprisingly long than I expected and I use the monitor all the time. I always try to avoid using the monitor on my D1 in order to save the battery. We carry it alot more than we would with the D1 now since it's so small and light. I never had any problems with the camera. It works with the Nikon View software I had for the D1 with some updates, of course. The only "complaint" I have is that there is a delay bwteen you push the button and it actually actuates the shutter. I am used to my SLR cameras (I also have Nikon film SLR camera) that the picture is taken the same micro-second I press the shutter release button. Also the AF is much slower than the SLR which is expected. Overall, it's very well made and can produce good quality pictures for family and daily use</review_text>
I have a Kodak EasyShare and this camera.  I really love this camera.  The smaller size is a real bonus and photo quality is fine for a casual photographer.</review_text>
This was a great addition to the "Photography Basket" I made my grandson for Easter</review_text>
The first one I got from Amazon wouldn't hold a charge, but they sent a replacement within a couple of days with no hassle or grief! YAY AMAZON111The unit does exactly what it is supposed to do, and does so with reasonable clarity.  Keep in mind that the pictures will be relatively small, so the closer you take the picture the better you will be able to see it on the screen. Make sure your focus is on the money and you will not be disappointed.  A great way to show off the children and grandchildren</review_text>
I got the Digital Keychain for my wife, so she could carry pictures of our 3 grandchildren. I had to download the Mac software from the Tao website to load the photos, but everything then went pretty smoothly. My wife really likes the result.The hardware gets 5 stars - it works as advertised, and the photos look pretty good for a very small screen.The software gets 3 1/2 stars. It crashed once, but since then it's been stable. It does a good job of letting me crop pictures (which is important, since only closeups are useful on the small LCD screen). It took some trial and error to find out the best way to use the software:1. Select each desired photo, and edit it to add to a "collection".2. Transfer the collection to the keycain.3. Save the collection as a file.4. When you later want to add more photos, do not open the old collection. Just start aother collection and add the new photos. Then transfer the additional photos to the keychain. If you add the photos to the original collection, and then transfer that, you wll end up with two copies of your original photos on the keychain</review_text>
I got this for my mom when I got the Digital Frame for my husband it is very easy to download pictures on and she can show off all of her grandbabies this is an awsome gift for anyone the color and pictures are great</review_text>
This item is terrific for its intended purpose - small reminders of good memories that you can carry with you.  As other reviews indicated, though, do not expect awesome picture quality.  The sentimental value is not diminished by that, though</review_text>
I have gotten these for my husband for Christmas, my boss, as a thank you, and am planning to get one for my mom on Mother's day.  You can't go wrong with these</review_text>
Great gift idea.  Easy to download pictures and to use afterwards.  Just use close up shots to be able to view them easier</review_text>
The camcorder does not have remote control but there is a battery  in the box with remote control written on it. You can not copy the recorded movies on the camputer. other than that it is easy to use abd sufficient</review_text>
Some times there are problems getting the DVD to finalize especially if you let the battery run down.  The run time on the battery is only about 20 minutes max, be prepared to purchase additional batteries</review_text>
This camcorder has lots of great extras and is very easy to use.  You can record using only two fingers on one hand to control most all aspects.  It's very simple to use and has very good picture quality.  Still pictures turn out great too.  I would recommend to others</review_text>
I love this camera!  I was looking to buy a new camcorder since my old JVC one broke.  I got this one because of the sale price, but I'm so glad I did.  Video is clear, it is lightweight, small.  Basically everything I'd want in a camcorder.  Obviously I'm not using for any professional kind of stuff, but for family and vacation filming, its great</review_text>
This is a good camera for the money......I use a 35mm at times instead of my digital...this is great for the price</review_text>
I loved the size of this camera when I received it...I just tossed it in my purse and it's ready whenever I catch my two-year-old doing something cute!  The picture quality was fine for me.  I am slightly disappointed that it takes lithium batteries, but not enough to go to 4 stars.</review_text>
Fine 35 mm camera, simpicity of design; photos turned out beautiful.  A camera which is very easy to use.Diane Carde</review_text>
One of the reasons I bought this camera was the description of the power source: "Requires two AA batteries--included". I was sick of buying expensive cells at a camera store, and I always have a sleeve of AA batts around the house. Sounded great.Oops! When the camera arrived and I opened the battery door, there was nothing inside, and when I checked the manual I learned that no AA's need apply. Back to the camera store! Ten bucks for a pair of lithium cells.A battery, says the manual, should be good for ten rolls of film. So add that to the lifetime cost of the camera.It's a neat little camera, and I'm not planning to return it. But I was a wee bit disappointed</review_text>
Actually this is not any perticular camera that I want. I just bought it because the the average customer rating was five star and this was the only cool camera that I could afford.I still like it, because this is my very first own camera.I've even ask for accsesories for my birthday!the are a few scratches, but that's only because I made them. when I put the battery in, everything fuctioned normally, even though I had no film. at least buy an olympus camera</review_text>
This camera  was bought  for  my  wife for christmas  and  I  must  say  that  we  loved  everything  about  it,  from  it's  ease of use  all  the  way  down  to  the  solid  feel  of  this  small  well  crafted  camera I  only  wish  that  It  came  with batteries  so we  could  have  gotten  pictures  X-mas  morning</review_text>
This is a great little camera that you can take on the go.  It's SO easy to use.  I have several cameras, but I find myself grabbing this one when I'm running out the door and think, "I should take a camera."  I like the way the cover slides over to protect the lens.  When you open that, it turns it on and you're ready to go.  The zoom is adequate for 95% of the shots I want to take.  The photo quality is very good for a compact camera.  I like mine so much, I just ordered another one to give as a Christmas present</review_text>
The bag is pretty good, but it's a bit tight for the digital camera I bought.  Not a flaw in the case, but not the best for ultra zoom type digital cameras</review_text>
Targus DPMV02 Pro Series Video/Photo Backpack.  I can put both of my digital cameras in, all my lenses, flashes, and my mp3 player.  Padded sections keep everything from getting scratched on everything else.  It also keeps everything nice and neat.  The pack looks small but it held all my stuff with ease.  The padded dividers also keep it very quit which is great cause i take a lot of wildlife photos.  The pack isn't small but it's compact and it stays high on my back when i'm walking through tall brush.  Also it's smooth so i'm not snagging it all the time on things. :)It has a convenient cell phone pocket that you can situate a bunch of places on the straps.The only thing i found it lacking was a spot for my tripod in or on the bag</review_text>
I bought this bag for a Sony DCR TRV19 mini DV camcorder. It has enough room for the cables , power supply, external mic and about three tapes. Not huge but sufficient if you want to keep size to a minimum. I have owned Targus laptop computer bags and found them to be of high quality and durability. So far this bag is living up to its legacy. I bought it on sale for 9.99. I would still pay the 12 bucks for it</review_text>
Found out I had to use a little liquid lubricant to adapt my zoom lens to the adapter.  Minor issue, works great.  Highly recommend the zoom, remember to have the adapter or the zoom will not mount</review_text>
I needed a Lens adapter for my Kodak P712. this one fit the bill and the price was right.fits like a glove with my telephoto lens.great price, fast delivery. very happy</review_text>
Although it seems to me Kodak made a mistake with a different lens physical size, this converter fits perfectly and allow you to use all external lens from wide angle to telephoto</review_text>
This product worked exactly as it was supposed to. I had tried using the cable that came with the camera (USB cord) and found out exactly what many others had said on blogs.....IT DOESN'T WORK!!!Once I got this cable, it worked perfectly. I was able to easily download video from my camera to my computer. The only frustration I had was that I would rather have paid a little more for the camera and gotten this cable with it in the first place</review_text>
This is a must have cable if you're going to transfer your videos to your computer.  Sony does not supply the cable with its HD camcorders.  If you edit your videos and/or make DVDs, you will need this cable</review_text>
It's a cable, what ever they want to call it.  It works like it's supposed to</review_text>
This was the right cable for matching my Sony Digital8 Camcorder to my computer's 1394 port for high-speed data transfer. It was much cheaper than buying from Sony</review_text>
This battery stays charged for a long period of time.  I have two of them so that my camera will always be ready to use</review_text>
I needed an extra battery for my Kodak P880.  This was the battery that was recommended by Kodak.  It works like a charm.  I like having 2 batterys, I never worry about my camera dying.  If you're looking for a replacement battery or an extra battery for your Kodak camera, this is a great one</review_text>
I was very pleased to get this battery which I am using as an alternate for my P850 digital camera. The battery lasts a very long time, so long in fact it is easy to forget just how long you have been using it since the last charge. The power meter on the camera doesn't show a gradual decrease, but rather shows a rapid loss at the last dozen shots. As a result I keep one in the camera and one fully charged in the camera case. When one goes down I swap and then charge the other when I get back where I can. The charge cycle to full charge seems long, about 4 hours. But the way I am using it (swapping) and the way a charged battery lasts in the camera there is no problem. No regrets</review_text>
I look all over at local retailers and could not find this battery for our camara.  This was a better buy than some quoted if they ordered it for me</review_text>
I cannot evaluate this product now. It is an item that i bought to use in reserve and it has not been used yet</review_text>
Got what I feel is a great price. These batteries, the Kodaks ones, haven't tried the knock-offs, but they seem to last forever. You go out into the boonies with 1 in the camera and a charged backup, I seems incomprehensible to me that you could run out of resources.JbGTucso</review_text>
The rechargeable battery for my digital camera is perfect for my camera and the service was excellent</review_text>
I needed a replacement battery for my camera and this fit the need perfectly, shipment was timely, everything was great. Have no fear purchasing this product</review_text>
I bought this battery as a spare for my Kodak Z760 (excellent camera), and now I use the 5001 more than the original 5000 (which is now the spare). It's a better battery by far. Its longer lasting charge means more pics, and charges in about the same time as the 5000. I would buy this battery [...] again, with no second thoughts. The price is right, too! Definitely a 5 star winner</review_text>
the picture quality is great one of the best I have seen. The optical zoom is pretty good but I wish it was like 25X or more. The 3CCD is really a great improvement ot regular picture quality. I give 4 stars because the zoom could be more but overall a great camera. I have a problem using DVD RAM so I am using only DVD -RW which gives easier playback both on the tv and on the computer</review_text>
This camera isn't intended for the semi pro, and you probably aren't going to win photography contests with it, but for someone who wants a good point and shoot camera to take spur of the moment pictures, this camera works great.  I took 30-40 pictures and 5 min of video when I took the kids to the park today, and the camera didn't interfere with our fun.  I'm surprised at how much video I am starting to shoot with it.  The controls are extremely easy to use.  They even made exposure compensation easy.  The controls were very well thought out which is a large part of why it seems so simple/basic.  It also comes with a good manual.  Finally, I find it fairly fast for a digital camera.We have a higher end digital that does everything, but the controls are so cumbersome that it takes forever to get it set up.  Also, I have to take along a camera bag or at least carry it around my neck.  This thing goes comfortably in a pocket.  Yeah, this camera isn't capable of taking as high quality pictures, but in practice I am getting 5-10 times as many good pictures and enjoying myself in the process.The picture quality is good, and I've noticed no distortion with the wide angle lens even with the distortion compensation turned off.In regards to some of the complaints....1. Easyshare setup was annoying for a day or two, but if one keeps the dock near your PC, it is actually a nice feature.  I snap the camera in, press one button to download, and I am done.  Still not happy, then get a SD card reader off ebay.  They are dirt cheap.2. The battery life from the included lithium ion battery is good, and because they use the same battery in multiple models, aftermarket batteries and chargers are available for next to nothing.  This is a huge bonus with this camera.3. Yep, it is probably lacking when it comes to quality of night photography, and if you are planning on taking a lot of pictures at night, then get another camera.  This is a pretty common complaint of pocket cameras.4. Semi-pros will probably not be satisfied with the lack of alternative formats or the ability to tweak settings, but it is a point and shoot after all</review_text>
This is a great compact camera that is easy to use and at the same time is capable to do more.  The viewfinder or digital display is large enough to see your photos.  The resolution is great.  The dock is a wierd design, but you do not have to use it.  Overall I am very pleased with this camera.</review_text>
This camera works very well. It's small enough to fit in my purse (about the size of my cell phone) & it takes good pictures. The zoom works good & the preset settings are nice too. The panorama effect is nice bonus for the fact that you don't have to spend time putting a couple pictures together.I would definitely recommend this camera if you're looking for something small & compact to always have around</review_text>
Have used this several times now and LOVE the wide angle lens.Stitching of panorama shots is good (better with practice pivoting rather than panning camera)Quality is acceptable for a point and shoot but not as sharp or clear as my Canon DSLR.Battery life is good, start up time is decently quick (~1.5 sec.)Transfer to PC is one touch easy. Many (almost too many) picture modes.Cons: Flash is weak, and low light performance is marginal at best.Overall, good pocket camera for daytime parties, landscape and impulse photography. Superwide angle lens is a huge plus for those situations that warrant it (Real Estate pics, group photos, vacation panoramas).RGUARD</review_text>
I am probably repeating previous comments, but:1. The super wide angle lens is the nicest feature on the camera.  No more backing into walls to get everyone in the shot.2.  The camera doesn't handle low light situations well.  I consider most indoor situations without really bright lights or a large window nearby as "low light".  The flash handles close portrait shots OK, but everything else left something to be desired.  No matter how steady I hold the camera I will get slightly blurred image.  Even when the "blur indicator" indicates a good shot, it is slightly blurry on the computer monitor or 4x6 prints.  My three-year old Canon S400 yields better low light pictures.3. I put the docking station back in the box after one use.  Charge the battery directly with the cable included; use a card reader for the SD card.  The references to flimsy SD card cover are probably referring to the plastic hinge on the cover.  We have the same type plastic hinges on field surveying equipment that get heavy use daily and they holdup fine.I am keeping this camera to throw into a coat pocket/wife's purse when we want to travel light.  I'm upgrading to the image stabilized Canon SD800 when the quality of the indoor pictures means more.P.S. Check out the V705 for not much more $'</review_text>
This is a great scope for beginning astronomy--and beyond. It is sturdy and simple to operate. It has enough light-gathering power (more important than magnification) to reveal dim star clusters, nebulae, and galaxies and good enough optics to show you the surface of planets like Jupiter, Saturn, and Mars. Affordable as this scope is, there is no reason to give so much as a glance at the trashy 60mm refractors with exaggerated magnification claims that litter the market.Some advice on selection. Dobsonians come in a range of sizes; the bigger the instrument, the more you will see. A long-focus 114mm (4 ") like this one is a fine instrument, especially for children and others whose ability to carry large objects is limited.  A teen or able-bodied adult should consider going up to a 150-200mm (6-8") scope.  Bigger Dobsonians (250-300mm and above) are too heavy and bulky for some people.Some advice on use. Viewing through a telescope is less like playing a CD and more like playing a guitar. Finding objects takes a little bit of practice. To simplify it, I would suggest supplementing the finder supplied with this scope with a "red-dot" finder to aid in initial pointing.  You will also need to buy a star atlas (Sky & Telescope's Pocket Sky Atlas is the best available), a red flashlight to read it without blowing out your badly-needed night vision, and a guidebook to lead you to interesting objects. These investments will greatly add to your enjoyment.What more can I say? This is the kind of scope that experienced observers have been trying to steer novices towards for decades. Although, I recommend that you do your homework before buying any scope--learn the sky and get to know experienced stargazers who can advise you--when it comes time to purchase, this scope is a fine choice.For more advice, see my encyclopedic guide here on Amazon, "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
We received the SkyQuest XT 4.5 about two weeks ago and we absolutely love it.  My six year old daughter and I opened the two boxes, put it together, and within 15 minutes we were out in front of our house looking at the moon, start clusters, the moons and cloud bands of Jupiter, and the Andromeda Galaxy.  It is big enough to see all of these things from a big city yet it is small enough to easily fit in a closet.If you are looking for a light weight scope you can pull out of the closet on a whim, big enough to see the items mentioned above, and easy enough for a kid to use, this is the one</review_text>
I've had the xt4.5 for a year now, and even though I have since purchased the xt10, I still use the xt4.5 more frequently because you can just pick it up w/ one hand, carry it outside, and begin scanning the sky.  Even though a 4.5 inch primary mirror  is small for a dobsonian telescope, this is a serious piece of equipment for the money.  This is no cheap "department store junk" scope.Perfect for a quick observing session, or just to check the quality of "seeing" before you drag out the "big one".One of my nephews who has looked through this scope asked me what I was going to do w/ the little 4.5  now that I have a bigger xt10.  Looks like I'll have to buy him one of his own because I'm not parting w/ mine.</review_text>
This is, quite simply, one of the best buys in smaller, portable Dobsonian Newtonian Reflector scopes today.  Usually, the two terms (portable and Dobsonian) are mutually exclusive, but the 4.5 weighs in at only around 22 pounds, which makes it quite portable, and a pleasure to operate and turn and point with its Dobsonian base.  I have owned the XT4.5 and the XT8.  Both phenomenal pieces of gear.  Both capable of deep sky views.  Having used both, I can assure you that the 4.5 is capable of clear views up to around 200x.  It was even able to handle the increased magnification of a Barlow Lens and high power eyepiece, for utterly stunning close up views of the lunar surface on a really clear night!  Saturn's rings and the 'Cassini Division' was easily discernable as well. Of course it won't rival the views of the larger Dobsonians, but the 4.5 holds its own as a real, well crafted, quality telescope.  An adult will have to bend down a bit for viewing, but I solved that challenge by simply putting the scope on a milk crate, or using a small, portable folding gardeners chair, which is low to the ground.  No big whoop.  All in all, a GREAT tool for viewing the heavens for your kids AND adults</review_text>
After trying and becoming frustrated with department store telescopes, I spent a lot of time researching on the internet to find a scope that both fit my needs as a beginner and fit my budget.  No matter how I looked at it, this scope kept coming out at the top of the list.I've been using it for over a month now and have not been disappointed in any way!  It is ultra-portable, gives great views, and took a rank amateur (me) less than an hour to assemble and align the optics, thanks to a very good instruction manual.The small size is a plus for me.  I keep it fully assembled sitting in the guest bedroom and pick it up and easily carry it out to the yard in one piece.  I just lay out a blanket and sit on the lawn and observe - no need for setup, fancy chairs, or tables.  The eyepiece is at the perfect height for my 4yr old daughter to look through (she has already gotten a few glimpses of the moon) so it will be a great tool for us to share.  When she is a little bit bigger she will easily be able to handle this scope by herself.A bigger scope will give better/more powerful views, but if you are on a tight budget, want something simple and rugged, or want a very portable scope, this is your ticket!After your first view of Jupiter (and its cloud bands and moons) you won't regret this purchase.---------Update 1 year later!I just re-read this review I put up, and can't reiterate it enough - This is a great little beginner scope!Last fall I bought one of the books I recommended with this scope, "StarWatch" by Phil Harrington.  Just last week, I completed the seasonal sky windows in the book - allowing me to see all 110 Messier DSO's all using this little 4.5" scope!If a goofball like me can figure out how to use this scope and can use "StarWatch" to log all the Messier's in about a year - you can too!  Its a great combo!!</review_text>
I purchased this scope almost a year ago as my first scope and love it. It is easy to use and easily portable. At &lt; 20 lbs it is easily carried in one hand using the handle. It gives good views of the moon and planets, particularly if you add a Barlow lense to double the power of the provided eyepieces, but is also big enough (at 4.5") to begin to show the beauty of the deep-sky objects (galaxies, nebulae, star clusters, etc). I have viewed most of the Messier deep-sky list already. Because it is not on a tripod, it is also easy for kids to view through the eyepiece because they do not need to get on a step ladder. Now that I am sure that I will really be into astronomy as a hobby, I am ready to move on to a larger telescope, but I will keep this one and give it to my kids so they can start to enjoy the night sky</review_text>
This is a nice bag, but don't buy it for a Canon S2 IS it will not fit.  The product compatibility lists the S1 IS since the S2 and S1 are very similar I purchased this bag.  I can't even get the thing in the bag.  It is a nice bag however and have put my smaller Kodak camera in it.  There is plenty of room for a typical point and shoot camera and all of it's accessories.  Good quality</review_text>
The bag is pretty good, but it's a bit tight for the digital camera I bought.  Not a flaw in the case, but not the best for ultra zoom type digital cameras</review_text>
Even though Amazon specifically recommended this bag for the Panasonic Lumix (DMC-FZ20PP) camera, and even though I had to return it because it was too small, and even though my camera does not appear on the compatibility list shown in another customer's review, Amazon annoyingly CONTINUES to recommend this bag for my camera. To add insult to injury, Amazon tried to deduct shipping from my refund by claiming that the error was not their fault. (It took two emails to get the full refund, and that was even after I put a LARGE message in my return box not to deduct shipping -- aargh!)Regarding the bag itself, construction seemed sound and this might be a good bag for a small point-and-click camera that requires no accesories</review_text>
Targus DPMV02 Pro Series Video/Photo Backpack.  I can put both of my digital cameras in, all my lenses, flashes, and my mp3 player.  Padded sections keep everything from getting scratched on everything else.  It also keeps everything nice and neat.  The pack looks small but it held all my stuff with ease.  The padded dividers also keep it very quit which is great cause i take a lot of wildlife photos.  The pack isn't small but it's compact and it stays high on my back when i'm walking through tall brush.  Also it's smooth so i'm not snagging it all the time on things. :)It has a convenient cell phone pocket that you can situate a bunch of places on the straps.The only thing i found it lacking was a spot for my tripod in or on the bag</review_text>
I bought this bag for a Sony DCR TRV19 mini DV camcorder. It has enough room for the cables , power supply, external mic and about three tapes. Not huge but sufficient if you want to keep size to a minimum. I have owned Targus laptop computer bags and found them to be of high quality and durability. So far this bag is living up to its legacy. I bought it on sale for 9.99. I would still pay the 12 bucks for it</review_text>
I have this for more than a month now. Installed a 256 MB SD card, currently loaded about 800 photos, and configured my albums based on trips and occasions. I set the photo frame on slide show mode and with daily auto on and off settings.1 week ago, I bought another product, Pandigital (7 in) w/ 128 MB built in memory. Philips has far better picture display where Pandigital has an acceptable photo display. When you look closely or stare at the photos, you will immediately see that Philips does not have any of the grainy reproduction. It also has elegant slide show transitions; Pandigital needs to work on their transitions.You just have to be patient when transferring files from your PC to the photo frame, I find myself hitting the reset button more than I really would prefer. I find this no harm to my pictures. This can be resolved by just having your pictures displayed straight or transferred from your card. I just chose the PC method because for easier management of what I needed to be transferred.</review_text>
I've seen some bad digital frames- ones that stretch out the picture, making everyone look fat, or dim displays with bad color. The Philips frame is absolutely the opposite: it's delightfully easy to use and the picture quality is great. Pictures are automatically sized, cropped, even rotated when you turn the frame. I didn't need the software they included. I just dumped a pile of pictures on a CF card (using my camera wired to a computer) and then plugged the card into the frame. The menus in the frame are navigated with a little joystick on the back. It's not the nicest menu system, but I got the hang of it pretty quickly. If you are buying this for Grandma (of course) here's a tip: buy two memory cards so that you can switch photo albums when you visit</review_text>
This product is so cool.  Whatever your situation is, if you have a lot of digital pictures, then I recommend going out and getting an SD card...preferably up to 1GB (or even 512MB), for use this with this product.  Even if your camera doesn't use SD, you can plop the SD card right into the picture frame and upload photos from your computer TO the card!  It's like a little computer, this frame.  Another big suggestion I have is to find a program online that resizes your photos to the dimensions of the frame (photo size explained in other reviews). (I downloaded Visualizer Photo Resize).  This will take photos down from its original size (e.g. 1.8 MB) to a smaller size (e.g. 500KB).  This will let your store dramatically more photos.  So far I have fit over 1700 photos in about 430MB worth of the 1GB SD card that I have!  The picture quality is very good and the frame can swivel to basically any angle and could be used horizontally or vertically.  Plus, it is a Philips, which is a great brand.  I have a Philips HD TV as well and it is my baby...I love it.  This is a great present for anyone!  How can you go wrong with a picture frame that replaces its picture any time you want</review_text>
This is a good product.  I like the way it automatically resizes pictures to fit the full screen.  Image quality is excellent.  It's like always looking at your photo album.  One complaint - the colored trim rings are magnetic and don't line up perfectly due to the magnetism.</review_text>
The Philips 8-Inch Digital Picture Frame is an excellent, high-quality device.  Very easy to get it going - the included cable and computer software make it simple to select digital pictures already stored on your computer and copy them onto the device.  No need to mess around with memory cards - although the device accepts those as well if that works best for you.  Everyone who has seen ours loves it.  It looks great and the picture quality and size are excellent</review_text>
This is a FABULOUS gift for grandparents if you preload the pictures.  Just be aware that the customer support folks are not that knowledgeable, probably since the product is new.  Don't bypass their software to load the pix if you're transferring from your PC to the frame - their software reduces the memory needed for each one. And even though the software for different size frames is labelled the same, it is not compatible and you can only have one version installed on your pc at a time</review_text>
We had ordered this product as a retirment present for a co-worker who was leaving in about a week so we even had Fed Ex shipping.  The product kept showing up as in Order Status & never updated until almost a week later when it was delivered.  Product arrived in excellent condition but we were wondering if it was ever shipped...Amazon or Retailer needs to update shipping info instead of leaving product showing Order status & not shipped</review_text>
This Nikon charger works very well.  It always pays off to use the charger the camera recommends.  This charger works very well and charges the lithium batteries quickly!  Top shelf product</review_text>
I like the way that this charger keeps it simple.  It's small enough to pack and take it with you and it charges the batteries fast.  Great for keeping my backup battery charged and ready</review_text>
I've owned the Printer Dock Plus Series 3 for about 6 months, and found it to make better prints than I could get from my Canon 960. So I sold the Canon.  The Canon inkjet inks dried up if I didn't use the printer for a month or so, and the ink cartridges were $12 each.  The Kodak inks do not appear to dry up over extended non-use. So I'm saving a bundle on replacing the expensive ink cartridges. I did keep a 8 year old Epson ink jet just to print 8x10's, and I go on Ebay and buy the cheapest color cartridges that I can find which is about $10 for the color and black and white cartridge. It works great for the short term school and work reports.I teach digital camera classes at the local schools, and the Kodak Easy Share software editor is universally despised and loathed.  Don't install the Easy Share Software, and if you have to install it, go into the settings and make sure it doesn't run at start up.  You don't need the software if you are just printing from your camera.  Once this software is installed, it is programmed to automatically try to copy pictures from anytime you insert a device such as a USB, CD, DVD or another camera.If you want to use the dock from your PC as another printer, you can just hook it up via the USB cable and install the PRINTER DRIVERs. You have the option of NOT installing the EasyShare software editor.  Once this is hooked up, you can just manually copy photos from your camera's memory card to your PC via a USB card reader, and print 4x6s from your favorite photo editor.If you are looking for a photo editor to print from and do simple things like darken and lighten, and red eye correction, then use Google's Picasa. It is free, and has a terrific user interface, and you can easily print from Picasa to your Kodak Printer once the printer is attached to your PC via the USB cable.The prints are perfect, fast, and durable, and I have never had a problem with the print quality.  However you must order the 160 pack of paper from Amazon which will get your price per print down to about 25 cents a print. Amazon has the very best deal on this paper.</review_text>
I like the fact that I can recharge my camera on the dock, but I was a little suspicious as to the 'new' status of my product due to marks that were already on it. I also wish that I would've known that there was a rechargable battery included, because I also purchased one of those, now I have two. I didn't see that in the item description anywhere. I was disappointed that after 4 pictures it said that my ink cartridge was low...that's the only down side. The picture quality was really good. For the most part, I really like the product</review_text>
This printer is awesome.  It was easy to put together with the detailed instructions.  It worked perfect the first time.  Wasn't sure I could do it, but I did!!!  I would highly recommend this printer</review_text>
This printer works very well with our system.  It has great print quality and the speed is acceptable.  The only complaint I have is that you have to use the Kodak paper that comes with the cartridges</review_text>
works ok but kind of a flimsy commector for the camra hook-up.not the sellers fault.kodak should improve some of there products</review_text>
This is a very easy to use product that provides the same quality prints as you would normally receive from a photo store. Great for anyone that doesn't want the hassle of hooking up to a computer to print out your photos. Also prints from various memory cards for even more options. Prints are quick and easy and at a very reasonable price</review_text>
overall an excellent video Camera (VC). This is my second sony and will most liekly buy anohter sony when this one wears out or becomes obscelete. records digital on the digital 8 tape. I'd probably go ahead an get a DVD recorder or HDD recorder, except the price on thsi was much more reasonable and I kenw what to expect from Sony's DCR line of VCs. Would recommend to anyone who's looking for a basic VC to record those events in life... and children too...</review_text>
Got this for my dad for Christmas. My brother then went to Europe 1 week  later and took it with him. He had no trouble at all. I don't know if we find it easy because we both own the analog Hi-8 version of the camera and this was just an easy transition for us or if it is just easy to use. It does not play the old tapes from our analog recorders which we knew buying it so don't say nobody told you when you get yours and can't play back the tapes! No problems with video or audio either. Overall it is a great camera for the price.</review_text>
It's really nice, however can't play the old analog version of 8mm tapes. That was the real reason we purchased this model.  That was our lack of tech knowledge.  It produces a nice picture.</review_text>
I have 2 month with my camcorder and it's very nice, good stereo sound and great quality of video, the nightshot plus it's excellent to record fireworks because keep the real color. so far i don't have any complain it was the best way to spend my moneyTengo la camara desde hace 2 meses y me parece buenisima, tiene buen sonido estero y gran calidad de video, el sistema nightshot plus es excellente para grabar fuegos artificiales ya que mantiene el color real. Hasta ahora no tengo ninguna queja y pienso que fue la mejor manera de gastar mi dinero</review_text>
I have had this for a couple days, but I must say it is fairly dumby proof.  This is my first camcorder and I was able to figure it out and start taping in under five minutes.  It is a good starter camcorder as well as a good bang for the buck</review_text>
I really enjoyed using my camcorder. It's so small and lightweight and the picture quality is very good.  Maybe for lack of experience, the zoom function felt a little awkward.  A picture tells a thousand words, but a camcorder, well it was the next best thing to taking my mother who was unable to travel along.  She agreed when she saw the tape.</review_text>
The two-element close-up lens on a digital zoom lens pretty effectively replaces a very expensive MACRO lens.  This is an excellent workaround and results are very good.  Do NOT confuse this item with a standard single element closeup lens (or set).  It is a two element lens and worth every penny in lieu of the several hundred dollars you might have to spend on a true MACRO lens</review_text>
This is a must if you want to get great photos of delicate flowers, special small items and collections of all kinds. Stamps, coins, etc</review_text>
We received the closeup lens without a problem. Installs perfectly on the connector on our Sony camera. It's everything we wanted, very simple and effective, although one has to move the camera a bit along with the focus function on the camera to get a perfect image</review_text>
I have had this lens for about two months and I love it.  It allows me to get really close to subjects.  You can even have the subject touching the lens and still be in focus.  The lens is of great quality.Amazon was the least expensive site I found for this product.  Great shipping and tracking.I highly recommend this product to all DSC-H1 or H2 or H5 owners</review_text>
I am very pleased with Sony's Close up ring.  There was far less distortion than using the cheapie close up lens on the market</review_text>
Amazon is my first shopping on the net. I am satisfied with it.It is very perfect for my DC-H1. I used it and was servered for the return polity</review_text>
Great close up lens, would love to buy a telephoto lens for my Sony DSC-H</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera when my venerable Nikormat EL-W developed shutter timing issues during my Photo 1 class.This camera reasonably priced has preformed flawlessly thus far. I have shot multiple rolls of Ilford HP5 plus film through this camera and have yet to have an exposure not come out due to the camera. After reading the manual I was able to easily understand the different modes and how to change the user controlled settings. The on camera flash leaves a little to be desired as it rather harsh and its range is somewhat limited, an accessory flash will overcome this and there are other flashes that will operate with this camera not just Canon.I have not had the opportunity of shooting color film through this camera yet when I do I will update this review.The only thing I dislike about this camera is that there is no provision for a remote shutter release. The Rebel K2 with date is the only version of this camera that can use a remote shutter release, why Canon removed this feature from this model is unknown a remote release is very handy when photographing nature or when used with the timer for self portraits.If you have any plans for infrared photography do not buy a EOS Canon, the Frame counter uses an infrared sensor that will cause fogging on your infrared film</review_text>
I love this camera the first day I received it I took 3 rolls of film.  It has been the best purchase I bought this year. I got a real good price on it and i received it fast!</review_text>
it looks good takes great pics and the ease of use is good for a film camer</review_text>
I am really satisfied with the purchase of this camera. Good quality workmanship. Canon has been a leader in photography in my book. Easy to use controls for any one</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera. I especially like the light meter that tells you how many apertures you are away from the correct exposure. I am using this for my photo class and is easy to use</review_text>
The photos are exceptional. It was very easy to learn how to use the features. I have taken some great photos with it, much better than my digital. I have not encountered any problems.  I took it on a long (over a month) trip where it was subjected to rough treatment and extreme weather.  It came through with flying colors.  Rock solid</review_text>
Soy un principiante en esto de la fotografia, esta ha sido mi primera camara slr, por lo tanto me ha tocado experimentar con ella para obtener las mejores tomas posibles a la vez que han aumentado mis conocimientos en el area, el desempeo es excelente tanto en tomas fijas como las que he realizado a objetos en movimiento,tanto sus funciones automaticas como las profesionales ofrecen un desempeo excelente, he tomado mas de 300 fotos en poco menos de cuatro meses, el zoom que tiene es rapido, los botones tienen una disposicion excelente para manejarla con una sola mano, lo unico que necesita es un flash de la serie speedlite, tuve oportunidad de conseguir uno prestado de un amigo y el cambio fue estupendo ya que este tiene mas alcance para el lente que la camara trae,ya que el flash que trae carece de potencia el cual ofrece su mejor desempeo en los 28mm del lente(no le podemos pedir mas a un flash integrado),  por ultimo les dijo que posee el mejor sistema de medicion de luz que existe en el mercado (E-TTL)y esta disponible tanto con flash integrado como con el flash externo</review_text>
We bought the JVC BN-VF714U to protect us from the "dead battery at exactly the wrong moment" syndrome. On multiple occasions, we've used the battery for 2+ hours with the VF LCD in use the whole time.After 3 months use, I'd recommend the battery to anyone buying a camcorder</review_text>
"Simplemente indispensable para poder aprovechar el disco duro de la cmara, de otro modo est de ms tanto espacio</review_text>
I've had this battery for a month or so, and upon each consecutive use/charge, I'd have to say I'm pleased. When fully charged, the camera's battery indicator usually says about 170-180 min total-use time... which is about what it claims. It DOES take awhile to re-charge... about 2 1/2 hrs IN the camera, but that's not too bad</review_text>
This is much better than the battery supplied with the camera but I prefer the bigger battery available for this really cool camera, the JVC BN-VF733. CAUTION, don't be fooled (like I was) by buying so called "compatable" batteries, they do not work. The money you think you are saving is better spent buying the real thing.James HatsisJames1@OconeeAirService.co</review_text>
First of all, the camera that this goes to is slightly dissappointing.  That's beside the point of this review though.  The reason you are probably looking at this product is because you might be tired of the standard battery's short lifespan.  This product lives up to the three hour life when you use it in viewfinder mode.  The only thing I don't like about the battery is the size.  It extends further than the standard one and it's almost embarrasing to have it.  Other than the size the battery is a great and I would say must have accessory for this particular camera</review_text>
In my opinion a second battery is essential equipment for the camera.The camera comes with an external charger</review_text>
I purchased this product for my mother as a Christmas gift, since we recently found her a new digital camera (the Panasonic Lumix) that used only the rechargable batteries.  She is very happy with the battery and now doesn't have to wait to charge it when it runs out.  The price was also a plus</review_text>
I am so pleased with this battery, I hated the double a batteries, there  always low and this battery holds a charge so long, I bought an extra one just to be safe but have never had to use it</review_text>
I had left my camera charger at a hotel and couldn't get it back. This was exactly what I needed. The camera just sits right on it.  They sent it quickly and it was in excellent condition.  Hint: From now on, I'm putting a small tag on my chargers so that when people find it, they'll know where to return it</review_text>
The external battery charger works great so far.  I haven't noticed a difference in performance yet when comparing charges on the this product versus charging the battery in the camera on the cradle.  It takes less than an hour to charge completely.  Long awaited product since you don't want to carry the camera's cradle everywhere</review_text>
I needed this after my dog chewed my other charger to bits.  This one is perfect</review_text>
Works great; lets me recharge my Casio camera without having to use the dock which is really important when I'm traveling. Quick recharge time and deep cycling of the battery. Recommended.</review_text>
Using this is much easier than charging my Casio in the cradle. With this I never need to worry about running out of battery power since I can charge 1 battery while using the other. For someone like myself that uses my camera to shoot video, this is important</review_text>
I recently purchased a couple of items from Amazon, a Casio NP-40 battery and Casio BC-30L charger for my EX-Z750 digital camera.  I am happy with the products and impressed with the quick delivery and packaging.  You can be sure I will be ordering more items from Amazone with confidence</review_text>
Given that I typically use a cradle to transfer photos and keep my battery charged, I have not had much need to use this charger. However, it has worked as advertised on the few occasions that I have used it. For me the compactness of the unit and flip-out plug are great features</review_text>
The Casio S and Z series of digital cameras are nice little cameras.  Too bad they (some?) must be charged through a cumbersome cradle.  Get this and travel with a separate charger.  It's a bit pricey but well worthy it.  I never even unpacked the cradle for my Z750</review_text>
Good case for compact camcorder.  It is very compact and the construction is very good.  It has just enough room for my Sony camcorder(Sony DCR-SR100).  The external pocket is large enough for two or three extra batteries.  Don't expect to fit any other accessory</review_text>
I have always been an SLR photographer and have held off on purchasing a digital camera up until now because I have not been convinced of the resolution capabilities of digital.  I travel alot and sometimes due to space and sometimes due to the desire to be inconspicuous I have needed something smaller than my full size SLRs.  After a lot of research, looking at every model I could find, I settled on this Panasonic Lumix LX2 because I don't have to give up the control over every aspect of the photo. This camera lets you be a control freak, or you can leave it in one of several automatic modes.  It can store pictures in RAW mode, which is important to me (the Canon G7 lost out because it didnt have this) but the JPEG mode is great.  I have blown up some prints from this camera and I am completely satisfied with the quality, and I was skeptical before, expecting to be underwhelmed.I originally bought this as a backup to my SLRs but I already see this will be my primary camera unless I am a situation that calls for  a special lens, flash power, or super high resolution (like 25 or 60 ASA)My only suggestion to Panasonic would be to allow you to charge the battery while in the camera, like with a car charger, and make some sort of accomodation for external flash.  The flash on this camera is the weak spot - it's really not that bad for the size but if it could sync with an external flash that would be good</review_text>
I bought this camera after DPreview told me that it (well, actually, its Leica sibling) fits all of my needs, namely: compact, RAW, and aperture priority, plus optical stabilization.What I like: large screen, RAW, fairly decent flashWhat I dislike: it actually takes RAW + JPEG which wastes space on my card. However, it gives me an interesting comparison. 90% of the time, I prefer the RAW version, albeit tweaked. The JPEG colors just don't look right to me. I'm also unimpressed with the image stabilization, and the warranty is just terrible. 90 days??? What's with that? Also, the manual focus without a viewfinder takes getting used to.I won't argue that there's noise at higher ISOs, but it's not nearly as bad as I expected from other reviews. I haven't decided yet whether I'm keeping the camera; if you're not in a hurry, hold off and see if they release a new version in the summer. Of course, with their track record, they won't fix any of the problems, just squeeze a few more MP out of the chip</review_text>
While I am nowhere close to being a pro, I am not a stranger to photography or to digitals.  Recently I wanted something better than what I had for an upcoming trip to Italy and I bought the Lumix DMC-LX2 on Amazon after reading reviews, etc.It is no SLR, but it is far more than a "back-up" camera.  It is small enough to be handy without being a burden.  (A friend we were travelling with had a digital SLR with a 135mm zoom.  She had it in her bag most of the time because it was so big and heavy.)The lens quality is very good.  The absence of a traditional view finder is very nice.  The TV screen on the back works in all lighting conditions (its adjustable).  You can have as little or a lot of the technical data on the screen as you want.  It even has a couple of nice composition templates that I found useful at times.I bought one of the after market batteries and couple of 2 gig cards and I had far more capacity than I needed for a 2 week trip, but the second card is necessary if you shoot at max pixels as I did the whole time.  At max jpg a 2 gig card holds about 350 shots.  One battery was all I needed so long as I watched the charger carefully at night.  Sometimes the current converter one has to use in Italy would shut down mid-charge.  So my advice is to have a second battery and switch them out.This camera is very versatile.  It will do a lot if one takes the time to study the manual.  (The manual is not the best, however)  The SLR's do beat out its zoom, but that is not much of a problem for casual shooting because one can crop the tar out of the 10.1mg shots and still have a great photo.The flash works fine.  And one can fill flash with it.  I bought a small slave unit that works great but I never needed it.I found a handy, cheap, case at REI.  They have a padded cell phone case that hooks up to a belt or a back pack.  This camera fits the REI case perfectly.  It even has side mesh pockets for batteries and chips.  I forget the price but I think it was less than 20 bucks.</review_text>
This camera does what it says it does: it takes 16:9 pictures and video at 10.2MP for pictures and OK resolutions for video. It takes decent video, if you put it on a tripod. The built-in stabilization is worthless in video mode and you'll get a palsy type shaking no matter what you do. In other words, this will not replace your camcorder. In picture mode, it does a good job with most outdoors/indoors settings if you're not too picky about the lens distortions around the corners at the highest resolution. This is especially obvious if you take pictures where vertical objects appear near the left or right edges of the frame (like stop signs, light posts, building edge lines etc.)All in all, a decent buy for home use. Not something to look into if you'll be frequently printing your pictures for posterity or for use in professional publications</review_text>
I've had this camera for about a month.  I currently own a Nikon D50 and an 2 year old Canon Powershot.  I needed something small and handy to use as a walk around camera.  I've been reading reviews for months on various digital cameras, poured through thousands of images posted on flickr, and I decided on this camera.  I loved the look, the size, the price, and the leica lens.The images are sharper and the colors are more vibrant than my Nikon D50 and my Canon Powershot.  I love the manual settings available on this camera.  I mostly use the P setting.  Although adjusting shutter speed and aperture can be awkward using the joystick, the menu is very simple and offers a lot of control.I also like the fact that people stop me on the street whenever I use my camera</review_text>
Meets all expectations.  Questions of noise are greatly overblown.  Image stabilation reduces impact of noise in low light.  Do people really expect to get a great image at very low light condition?  Regardless of noise contrast will be too low to get a quality image except in very special circumstances.  Up until last few years ISO 400 film had similar problems and ISO 800 was virtually useless except to get a image.  When I got this camera I took numerous pictures at night inside and got very good quality pictures without flash.  Far better than my old ditigal and better than my film camera.  LCD size and image quality is really impressive.  The best I have seen</review_text>
Very pleased with the tripod - it has a very nice silky feel to the catches and threads that hold the head in place.  I wouldn't call it 'heavy duty' by any stretch, but it can handle my Nikon D50 with a Nikkor 70-300mm zoom on it, without much problem.I have used a video tripod with my camera and it kept everything pretty tight and steady, for even long night-time shots.  This one does the same, but isn't as heavy or bulky to carry.However, if you have an older, heavier camera or use heavier lenses, this might not be for you. For all-purpose serious amateur use with modern cameras, it's fine.  Pretty lightweight for travelling and fits very nicely in the bag, which I also bought (from separate Amazon vendor).Minor irritations - I probably could use a few more inches on this, as I'm 6' 2", but it's manageable.  Also screw plate that fixes to the camera needs to be screwed down quite tightly to prevent movement.  Otherwise all fine so far - very happy with the product and vendor</review_text>
It does everything it says.This tripod is light, and can fold to less than half its height.I use it with my Nikon 8800, and have taken many portraits and close ups with this wonderful Tripod</review_text>
I love this tripod! I am extremely happy with my purchase. It's built heavy duty (like its name implies). All controls operate easily and stay in the position you put them in. It's a trust-worthy piece of equipment that will definitely make my 'shooting sessions' easier, with a higher quality of photo. Quick shipping and well packaged. I'm happy all the way around with this purchase. The bubble level and feet which allow a soft stand or spiked stand are nice as well and can actually be used (unlike on similar ones that are not dependable). Most definitely worth the investment</review_text>
I bought this item for my father for Christmas.  He uses it for his video camera.  For the money this tripod has everything an average person would need.  The quick release is a great feature that he didn't have with his old one, he likes that a lot.  I don't know about professional use, but for personal use it's great</review_text>
I'm not a professional photographer, I have a Canon S3 IS and a Lensmate adapter with a couple filters, that's about it.  The main things I photograph are my artwork, friends/family and things for reference images/ideas (objects, landscapes, etc.), this tripod works great for all of those.  It's sturdy, looks nice and works exactly like it should.  I don't drag it around with me all the time and I treat it well, I expect it to last me at least a couple years.  If you pretty much just do a lot of miscellaneous amateur photography and you'd like something better than those cheap, generic tripods but don't want to spend a ton of money then I'd highly recommend this one.  I think it's great and I was actually pretty impressed with it when I opened it up.Two things to keep in mind, it isn't the smallest tripod in the world and it doesn't come with a bag or strap to carry it</review_text>
The tripod is easy to adjust, just the right height, fits in my large suitcase and is very attractive. I wish it came with a carrying case or at least a built-in handle. I was leery of its low price and "D" shaped legs but it is well made and very sturdy. The legs are easy to set-up at different lengths, in case you are working on a non-level surface. I'm concerned that the handle is plastic and the pan-head is tight when trying to move up and down</review_text>
This tripod is heavy duty, allows for easy adjustments in many directions, holds your tripod at a variety of angles, is light and folds easily.  My only regret is not buying the $15 bag (available seperately from Amazon) at the same time, but I'll get that with my next Amazon order</review_text>
I am not much of a filming specialist, but I am very happy with this tripod.  It is very sturdy and easy to adjust.  The quick release for the camera mounting plate is a nice feature.  For the price it is a good choice</review_text>
Me encanta esta camara, antes de sta estuve cambiando cmara cada 2 o tres meses, ahora me quedo con esta, es muy atractiva, funciona excelente, los videos son buensimos, talvez se compara con la calidad del Hi8.Como la mayora de las cmara compactas, las fotos nocturnas no son muy buenas, el flash no tiene mucho alcance, aunque es mucho mejor que el de la Sony, en general, un producto totalmente recomendado</review_text>
I bought this camera to replace the Kodak EasyShare 5.0 MP digital camera that I had (it was stolen, unfortunately).  This model is very much like the previous 5.0 version.  It is very easy to use, which I consider it's strong point.  The process of taking and reviewing a picture is simple and doesn't require the user to go to menu screens and such, as do some digital cameras.  I like the Easy Share Software included with the camera.  It makes downloading pictures from your camera to your computer quick.  The battery life is very good too.The only complaint I have is that some pictures in dim light come out a little fuzzy, even with a flash.All in all, I think it is a good camera for the money</review_text>
awesome camera! looks good and takes good pics. Only down side is lag time between pictures</review_text>
This is my second Kodak compact digital camera.  The previous one I owned was a V530 which was very similar to this camera.  I was hoping that the V603 would correct one problem that plagued the V530 -- consistently dark pictures in full automatic mode.  Turns out this problem persists on this camera too, probably a result of using common software within both of these camera models.  But at least the V603 has a "Perfect Touch" picture fixup capability which, when applied to a dark picture, generally fixes the problem.  But you have to fix each picture individually using Perfect Touch which can be somewhat of a hassle.  The other nice thing about this camera in comparison to the V530 was the ability to charge the battery in-camera.  The camera has a nice, sleek body with a good, solid feel.  Overall not too bad a camera</review_text>
This camera is great.  It's small and sleek, fits in your pocket, and looks nice too.  It turns on extremely quickly, and snaps pictures faster then any other digital camera i've seen.  If you're looking for a camera thats ready to shoot at a moments notice, this is the one for you.  It has a variety of preset modes for various conditions, and most of them work fairly well.  The battery life is decent, and if you need more you can purchase additional batteries for only ten dollars on amazon.  It uses standard SD memory card which can be had for a very low cost, in comparison to other typed of memory cards.  As far as the cons go, the only one is that occasionally the pictures come out darker then you would like when using the auto mode.  This tends to happen occasionally indoors, and can be fixed by choosing the appropriate mode.  However this occurrence is rare, and easily made up for by the speed that the camera takes pictures with.  Another thing i found strange was the fact that by default, the auto focus assist light was constantly on when taking video, leaving a green light in the center of the video you shoot.  However, this can be turned off in the options menu.  Overall, this is in my opinion the best camera you can get in this price range</review_text>
Bought this one for my wife. She loves it. The handling and look/feel are impeccable. So is the size. The shots we took are great when all works: flash, focus, etc. But sometimes the flash tends to be slow to recycle and the shots turn out to be dark, as the previous reviewers mentioned. The trick seems to be, don't take try to take consecutive shots with this thing. It's what it is: a toy like small mug shot camera. If you want something serious, go for DSLRs. Again, when the camera does work, the pictures turn out great.It has the usual shortcomings of this type of cutie cameras - no view finder, vulnerable big LCD, short battery life, weak flash, and so on. But so do all the other competitors. The important thing is, when it works, the picture quality is of DSLR quality. And it does work most of the time, if you are patient and careful.I found the USB clipper and the power cord without the craddle to be fantastic. My Sony DV cam requires that craddle to do everything, driving me nuts. I like just plug it in and get on with it, hassle free, great!As to the more "advanced features" on the camera, modes and customization etc. I advise is - try it at your own risk. Didn't work too well for me. I stick with the fully auto mode on this one. If you are serious about using thse fancy features, you really should try DSLR. This type of cutie cameras are not cut out for it. Oh, the video quality is fine, but nothing special there either.My only complaint is it doesn't come with a cute little case that matches the camera.By the way, I didn't have high expectations to this Kodak camera (or any Kodak camera) when I bought it. It was purely for its cuteness (gift to wife). The picture quality really exceeded my expectation by a big margin.Highly recommended</review_text>
About the only thing not to like about this camera is the included software. It does what it is supposed to, but feels clunky and a little slow. I purchased an additional SD storage card and card reader. This allows you to upload and edit your images into your PC/Mac using whatever photo program you prefer. On the other hand, if you are going to make use of the EasyShare features such as instant emailing of photos, flagging favorite  shots while they are still in the camera etc.,  then you will need to use the supplied software.LCD screen is large. It is easily smeared with fingrprints, but when camera is turned on, you cannot see this at all.Sold feel. Picture quality is outstanding, battery life is good, and it is very trim. Excellent macro feature. Fast start up and writes images quickly to memory. No complaints</review_text>
This camera was actually purchased for my teenage daughter.  This is our 4th Easyshare Camera and I would highly recommend it to everyone.  I purchased a different Easyshare in March and, although it is wonderful, once I saw how small and easy to use this one is - I wish I would have waited and got this same one instead.  I find myself borrowing this one from my daughter and using it more than my own (which is also a wonderful camera)..</review_text>
Great camera when I don't want to lug the SLR. Fits nice in a shirt pocket but it feels a little heavy. Very fast startup, so you are ready to shot in a hurry. I bought an extra battery and a universal charger because I do a lot of indoor, flash shots. Gets about 100 of those pics on a charge. I suspect you will get many more without the flash. Be sure to bring a charger on your trips</review_text>
I bought this camera when my old one of the exact same brand and model broke. I loved it too much to try anything else!!</review_text>
The Lumix DMC-LZ2 5MP digital camera is easy to use and takes great pictures.  The only gripe I have is that the flash could be stronger.I set the ISO at 400 and take indoor pictures without a flash.  The resulting pictures are usually superior to the ones taken with the flash.It is worth the money</review_text>
A very good compact camera. Excellent to take around and fits perfectly in pocekts</review_text>
I wish I'd had this adapter long ago. Shooting video is more fun because of how much more I see with it. My camera movement seems more fluid, too, because of the wide angle. I also seem to be able to frame shots more interestingly because of the greater field of view I have</review_text>
Well this is not my first digital camera, I had the G5, G6 and A620. I am used to them focusing real well the first time around most of the time. I expected the R1 to focus well the first time I shot, it didn't though so I was very dissapointed in this. I found out that some of the auto focus features need to be turned off in order for it to focus better it does help alot but focus is slow. For the money I spent I expected better in the focus area. The lens is great and the photo quality is very good. It's just not that quick. Battery life is very good. The camera feels pretty good in the hands but I would have liked to see metal. I don't like plastic on cameras. I want to feel I own something when I hold it. I don't care about how light it is. I am happy with my camera at least by the fact that the quality of shots is as good as any digital slr. I am glad it has a good lens I don't like having to buy alot of lens so Sony did good in this aspect with the R1. If I knew what I know now I might not have bought the R1 maybe I would have went for something else. If something else was a little better in the speed area and focus. But when I think about it there are not many choices with something that has a good lens already and is not a mirror reflex where one has to worry about dust. This one is better in that respect. This is why I give the camera a 4 because Sony could have perfected this camera but they did not.</review_text>
well, i finally bought the sony r1, after along wait for the price to drop, and read all reviews on it..i got it for 565$.what i like about r1:build quality, good zeiss lens, 24mm wide angle, iso change on cam just a botton..great colors balance, low noise and high iso, big cmos sensor, use both pro stick and cf card, long battery life , displays batt life in mins, useable high iso at 400, top view and swivel lcd, manual tele zoomring, good raw files.what i dont like:battery charges in camera is a big draw back, while you charge the batt, you cant use the camera to shoot, bad feature, hope sony improves it on next camera. the camera design is so weird, the grip is over size, off balance on hand, view finder housing is over size, to use external flash you have to go to menu and change it everytime, and change back to use pop up flash, cant use both flashes, missing OIS(opical image stabilizer), its heavy and big, tele at 120mm is at f4.8, AF is not that fast, its kinda slow, especially in dark, sony should learn from this cam and improves it on next camera, im sure they will.the price is abit too high for a point and shoot, no video mode, macro is too far from subject, about 15 niches.other than that i love to use it, its my main camera to walk around with, i love the image result quality, thats why i bought it, i know no camera is perfect yet.for the price i paid im not complainning. its a dslr wanna be, very close to dslr results.i strongly suggest to any one who wants a back up to dslr.</review_text>
I recently bought this camera as an upgrade from my Sony 8.0 MP 828. This is my third Sony SLR-like camera, with my first one being the 5 MP 717. I upgraded to this one in order to get photos that were as clear and as sharp as possible from the miniature items that I buy and sell.As I found with the 828 when upgrading from the 717, there was a significant learning curve over previous cameras. However, now with my third Sony camera, I've discovered that the learning curve lasts for about a month - then one can start taking photos with good results.The learning curve with the R1 was as predicted. Out of the box, the camera is impressive, if only just in size! It is probably double the weight (or at least close) to a 717, and is probably 25% larger than the 828. The lens is a whopping 67mm - a full increment larger than the 828. The next thing you notice on the camera is the lack of an LCD viewfinder, which Sony took off the camera and placed on an adjustable screen on top of the camera. Quite novel.A quick walk around the camera shows that Sony learned from the cumbersomeness of the 828 with regard to adjustments on the camera and made the R1 very "user friendly." The camera is easy to hold (though heavy) with one hand, and the photographer is able to make the adjustments with his other - definitely making it two-handed operation. It seems that just about everything has a button on the back or side of the camera, and once you learn where everything is, it is easy to change the exposure, etc., with just a quick adjustment.For what I do (and if you're planning to use it for photographing small objects, this is something to keep in mind) the major initial drawback was the focus length of the camera. Unlike the 828, where you could be within inches of the object and shoot beautiful closeups, this camera requires at least a foot, if not more, in order to focus. Once you get it to the right focal length (and after the purchase of a macro filter - a must have) the shots are glorious. HOWEVER, what does a long focal length with detailed photos mean? You MUST have the camera stabilized (tripod, etc.) in order to get good shots. Hand-held detail shots are a no-go with this camera. Also, if you like to take .mpg movies through your camera, you'll be disappointed. This camera does not have that capability.As far as plusses, the camera is super high quality, and is relatively easy to use. The lens is fantastic, and the rest of the camera seems to be as equal in quality. I've gotten used to the LCD viewfinder, and have been able to use it for some great shots that I might not of otherwise been able to view with the fixed viewfinder.I will also add that my wife has gotten quite savvy with this camera, which is a first for her.  She has been able to get some phenomenal photographs, particularly portraits, thus far.  She loves this camera!Would I buy another? I'm not sure. I'm a fan of getting new toys, so I had to have it. However, I think my 828 may take better (or at least easier) close up shots. I must admit that I haven't taken this camera on a road trip just yet to take outdoor photos, and I can only imagine that with the lens and processor that it will be terrific. My word of advice would be: if you HAVE to have the highest-end quasi-SLR, then this camera is for you. Overall, I'm happy with this camera, but I just don't know if it might just be worthwhile moving over to the quality SLRs that don't cost much more than this, such as the Canon 20D. Though I'll happily use this camera for now and am giving it five stars as there are no significant detractors that I have found with it, I believe that my next upgrade will be to a quality SLR.</review_text>
I just had my R1 for a week now and I love it. In summary, it's an awesome camera. Takes great quality pictures with true colors and great details. I got it for $650 and at that price, I'd say it's a bargain. If you're in the market for a full size professional digital camera, R1 is the camera you've been looking for. In addition to the awesome quality pictures it takes, 5X zoom, long battery life, CF and memorystick options, swifel LCD screen, etc.. makes this camera even more competitive</review_text>
A great travel camera. I leave my Canon D20 kit at home. In fact, I find myself using this thing all the time--it's very easy to use, love the ergonomics. The only caveats--high ISO ratings are way too noisy, not nearly as good as the Canon. Also, the excellent lens is too short at the telephoto end. Otherwise, one of the best lenses out there. Battery performance is excellent. Bulky, but light. Buy a high quality protective filter, like a B+W or Hoya. Use it and enjoy</review_text>
I have owned numerous digital cameras, but have never found the "perfect" one, until now. You will simply not believe the incredible photos this camera will produce. It's not small, but it fits great in the hand. I have simply not been able to take a bad picture with it yet. The photos aren't just a little better than other cameras, they're absolutely superb. You will not regret buying this camera</review_text>
Waist level finders have always appealed to me whether using an SLR or a medium format camera.  So when the R1 combined a waist level capable finder with a giant CMOS imager and a wide zeiss lens, I had to give it a try.  I am not disappointed.While it is not the fastest focusing camera out there,it is great for anything short of quick moving subjects.   Images are sharp, sharp, sharp.  Image stabilzation would be nice, as well as faster focus.  But with even these shortcomings..the R1 is worth every bit of its price.Am now hoping for an R2 upgrade of the R1---will be on it like white on rice</review_text>
I have had this camera since July 2006 and have grown to love it. To see what kind of photos it can take, take a look at Eric Pouhier's work on pbase.I took it on a three week tour of Europe with my 14 year old son in August. I took along two memory cards (1 and 2 gb) and also took along an 80 gigabyte portable Wolverine drive which worked flawlessly (I only used up about 6 gb). The Wolverine's charger had no trouble working on overseas voltages (nor did the Sony's). If you're used to travelling with an slr, the sony will pleasantly surprise you. If you're used to travelling with a compact point and shoot, the Sony will seem huge.I also have a Canon 20D SLR which is also great. I mainly use the Canon for bird photography with a 300mm image stabilized lens. The Sony is basically useless for bird photography (unless you have an extremely cooperative- or dead- bird). For most other purposes, the sony is better than an slr. It takes great portraits and landscapes. It's fabulous in cities and for photographing buildings (great wide angle). It is also fun for candid shots using the lcd view finder</review_text>
I won't go with a no brand name battery again.  Frankly, I don't think any battery holds a charge as long as it should.  However, this one does ok but it's not generic either.  Spend the money and get the real thing.  Otherwise you'll spend the same amount in quantity of the other just to get the same amount of time</review_text>
Does the job just as advertised. Plus having an extra can sure be a day saver</review_text>
I own 2 of the Nikon EN-EL1 batteries and have taken a total of over 6,000 photos with my Nikon 4300 in the past 3 years.  About half of the photos are with flash.For my typical use, I get about 50 photos per battery.  For vacation photos, I am using one battery, while charging the other.After about 3,000 photos/battery and 3 years, I have not noticed any degradation in the battery life.Good value for the money.</review_text>
Yes thats right,just what I mean.With this battery fully charged in your Nikon camera you can actually take the time to do both take the picture and smell the flowers ,without the worry about changing the battery(this can be done many times on same charge).Received this battery, charged it up and started  taking pictures right away.Have taken about 75 pictures, about 65 of them with flash.And at the time of writing this review battery is still in camera on its same charge.( PS. Always use save battery function,if your camera has this feature)</review_text>
Its good to always have a spare for your coolpix camera as these things run out when least expected (and when you're nowhere near your charger).  i would recomend buying one of these to keep with your camera when out and about</review_text>
I have the nikon coolpix 4300 digital and two of these batterys. They work great as long as they last which is not 2 hours in my case. Maybe it is because I leave the monitor and flash on most of the time and take my pictures in a large size. All in all with two of these battery's I never run out of juice</review_text>
If this Battery is the one for your Camera, Buy at least Two of these and get a recharger for AC and one for DC.  I have taken hundreds of 5.1 MP shots on just two batteries.  Recharging one while using the other.If I missed a shot it wasn't the dead battery fault.If you buy two of these batteries you can take pics like you just don't care, and you won't have to either.  What more could you ask? it is a no brainer</review_text>
I was looking for a basic pair of binoculars for our everyday use. I have some really expensive Leupold binoclulars that are my favorite, but for all around family use, especially with the kids, this is a great option.They are waterproof, rubber coated for protection, powerful (10x), and the focus is easily adjustable. For the money? It's a great buy</review_text>
These binoculars are amazing they are completely crystal clear and the perfect size is you are going hiking or walking.  I would completely recommend this product</review_text>
The plastic O ring on the carrying case which holds the large shoulder strap came in broken. Thus it renders the case un-useable.By the time, and my cost it would be to file a complaint and ship the case back is not worth it to me.However if Bushnell would send me a new carrying case, I would be very pleased with the transaction.Howard F. Rutkowski</review_text>
These are great binoculars. I've owned much more expensive binoculars and truely don't see any difference.  Great buy.  They are 100% waterproof since I flipped my canoe and they were not affected in any way</review_text>
very clear,bright day, strong magnification quality seems to be good . very well priced at around $100.00.i will know more over the passage of time .my firstimpression is good mj schra</review_text>
This is a great set. Eyepieces are high qualiity. Case is very durable as well. I have not played with the filters yet, but they screw easily into any eyepiece. For $60.00, you can not go wrong. Amazon is a great place to save on this item</review_text>
Well , let's start with the free shipping , this item arrived to my house in 3 days after i have placed my order , that was fast..Secondly , the case itself is just greatly designed to protect your items that are 2 eyepieces,an LED flashlight,moon filters and the barlow 2X , umm , also keys for the locks of the case which i wouln't use , so i threw them away already , altogether 9 piece...i mean its 8 now without the keys :)i am currently using them with my Celestron Firstscope 114EQ 114mm Reflector Telescope but there is something missing in this accessory kit and that is a 4mm eyepiece , thats right , this telescope has a max 227.5x of magnification and how come this kit doesn't have 4mm (225x) eyepiece ? Instead of whining i have decided to get omni series 4mm eyepiece from celestron and looks like i am all set now.Thirdly , i wanna talk about the Celestron Tech. service , its great to see double magnification with Barlow , but unfortunately its screw drove me nuts 'cuz in the middle of the night i ve lost it (easy to lose it btw) and then they sent me a new one without interrogation..Overall i am satisfied with this item & i would recommend this accessory kit for you..</review_text>
I am very pleased with the quality of this set. Everything is multi-coated and is well made. The case is heavy duty and has room for other eyepieces. The 2X barlow lens doubles the eyepieces turning the 32mm into a 16mm and the 12.5mm into a 6.25mm eyepiece. You'll get plenty of use from the red LED flashlight as it will save your night vision when looking over your star chart.This is a great starter set for a needed upgrade from .965 eyepieces. The amazon price beats other online retailers by a mile.</review_text>
I bought one of these cameras because it was cheap, and Kodak has a pretty good reputation.However, I found that the quality of the pictures it takes is rather low, and it consumes batteries very quickly.  It doesn't zoom, so unless you're close to something, it won't take a very good picture.  Once the picture is scanned onto the computer, or printed, it's very grainy and pixellated. You can get other brands for a similar price that are much better quality</review_text>
This was the first decent digital cameras I have ever owned. I am not sure what the deal is with people complaining about battery life. Buy a recharger. I used the same batteries for the two years I have owned this camera. I have run into glitches from time to time that are most likely due to me putting the batteries in there when they were not fully charged(yes I am inpatient) Sometimes the camera looks like it took a picture and then it crashes. Other times it will not turn off. Opening and re-closing the battery door always fixes it. I am sure that both of these issues are due to me putting the weak batteries in.As for durability? I am not sure what the deal is with people complaining about no lens cover. Who cares? I have dropped this camera so many times I cannot even begin to count! This thing is built really well!! I never worry about putting the camera down with the lens up. I just toss it on my desk when I am done with it. Still takes great pictures. I have bitched about this camera from time to time but I have taken nearly 1100 pictures with it and it is still going strong. Now that memory cards are so cheap, I finally bought one for the camera. A 1 gig one will let you take 4000(!!!) low definition pictures. Of course low def is like 1024x768 on this camera. My only beef is why not have VGA resolution anymore? I always have to shrink the pics down to use this with eBay.</review_text>
I've been using this camera for over a year. I'm pretty satisfied with this camera - taking in account both the price and the performance. Yes, the lens does not have a cover, but I've always been careful with it. A number of reviewers complained about batteries - in my case I did not encounter such a problem - the provided batteries served well for half a year and then I just bought new ones, no problem really. It's perfect for taking pictures you want to send by e-mail or post online - while the previous generations of digital cameras failed to capture large landscapes or anything at a distance.For high quality printing it would not be as good though.Still, to me it's a pretty good camera within its potentialities and price</review_text>
I purchased this for $100 less than at Best Buy. I am very happy with the Kodak Easy Share. It was easy to set up the printer & works like magi</review_text>
Case fits all the camera gear and isn't too bulky or large.  We're very happy with our purchase</review_text>
This case hold my Elura 100 and accessories perfectly. Not too big, not too small. Plus it's well padded. The movable divider lets you snug the camera to one side while making room for accessories on the other. Tip: The upper flap will hold two Mini-DV tapes in it's zippered pouch, which adds an extra layer of protection up top</review_text>
This Canon camcorder leather bag is really good, high quality, easy to use and looks sexy! It fits my Elura 100 perfectly and all the needed accessories. It provides not only convience to me, but also extra protection for camcorder. Highly recommend</review_text>
I really enjoy this small, high quality camara. I purchased a 2.0 GB memory disk so I could take advantage of the 7.1 mega pixel.And I get great pix everytime.  I have lots of fun with it. Since its so small, it's easy to take everywhere with me. I also get lots of compliments on it's "Fashionable" sleek design.  I highly recomend his camera.</review_text>
I just got this camera for Christmas.  I hate reading directions, so I popped the battery and memory card in and I was off!  Very user friendly, and has all the right options. Plus, its about the size of the average cell phone. The coolest thing about the powershot is that it knows which way you're holding the camera, so if you hold it vertical to get a tall shot, the viewer turns all by itself.   I also love that you can edit video on the camera and set up slide shows.  Its very easy to load pics onto my computer with the USB connection - or to set up a slide show for the TV.  It even holds voice memos and has cute sound effects when I take pictures.  This is really a great camera</review_text>
i bought this for my teen age daughter for xmas, and she loves it. it's easy to use and takes super great pictures. thanks for helping my make her happy</review_text>
I got this camera bag hoping all the camera stuff( charger, cables and tapes) will fit in it , the photos on the net were not clear enough, but I found the product of good material , suitable color, and took every thing I need even my digital camera bag.I faced only one problem that my Canon elura 100 camcorder is too small compared with the space inside the bag, and I have to put it upside down ( lense facing bottom ) , so I added another soft pad on the bottom to apply more protection as the bag by default has a normal bottom layer that not giving a shock absorbtion if the bag fall down and hit the ground</review_text>
this battery was getting hard to find. i found just wnat i needed. good price and was delivered on time.........</review_text>
I bought three batteries, and they are all in good state.I once bought rather cheap batteries from Ebay. They were all made in China, and were terrible. They didn't last five shots.But this time they are original Japan made and works great.</review_text>
You can't go wrong buying from this seller! Item was as described. I am very happy with my purchase!</review_text>
thank you, so much easier than to look for it in the store, very happy with the produc</review_text>
I ordered 3 EN-EL2 batteries.  They arrived before the estimated delivery time and in great condition.  I am very happy with the price and service of this company</review_text>
I have an Olympus 750 and it fits this case just right.  The strap, when open, reveals an opening in the case that allows you to push the camera out of the case from the bottom.  Camera slides in and strap lays on top.  Good leather and stitching. All hardware is top notch.  The magnetic closure on the strap is strong and  easy to open and close.  The loop on the back fits most mens belts, including the bigger leather ones with the novelty buckles.The memory cards slots are for square and not rectangular memory like Olympus uses but I do not carry extra memory cards.  I do carry an extra battery, but not in the case.  This is a camera holster and it is sweet.</review_text>
It provides the essentials I was looking for to store my camera and extra battery.  Perfect size</review_text>
I was looking for a basic pair of binoculars for our everyday use. I have some really expensive Leupold binoclulars that are my favorite, but for all around family use, especially with the kids, this is a great option.They are waterproof, rubber coated for protection, powerful (10x), and the focus is easily adjustable. For the money? It's a great buy</review_text>
These binoculars are amazing they are completely crystal clear and the perfect size is you are going hiking or walking.  I would completely recommend this product</review_text>
The plastic O ring on the carrying case which holds the large shoulder strap came in broken. Thus it renders the case un-useable.By the time, and my cost it would be to file a complaint and ship the case back is not worth it to me.However if Bushnell would send me a new carrying case, I would be very pleased with the transaction.Howard F. Rutkowski</review_text>
Bought these binoculars for my husband. He loves them. They are very powerful and he loves the way they feel - not too heavy. He can look at stuff across the creek and is amazed at the clarity in the things that he sees</review_text>
These are great binoculars. I've owned much more expensive binoculars and truely don't see any difference.  Great buy.  They are 100% waterproof since I flipped my canoe and they were not affected in any way</review_text>
This lens is very fast on the auto-focus and very smooth to use overall.  the quality of the pictures is great and it adjusts well with the use of a flash.  The price point and performance are great</review_text>
I like not having to change lens very often.  Pictures taken with this lens have the high quality that I expected</review_text>
If you're looking for an all in one lens, this is a good one to take.  Weight conscious travelers who want just one lens to keep on at all times will be happy with this option from Tamron.Upon getting it, I put it on my 20D, and it hasn't come off since.  I took it on a trip thru SE Asia and it worked great in nearly all light conditions.  Some focus lag if you start at longer focal lengths, but that can be fixed either by switching to manual, or just being patient.The long end was good for unobtrusive people pictures, while the short end was great to capture some stunning wide angle shots.  It was also sufficiently bright to get some decent handheld pictures in low light.  Other pros are the zoom lock that kept the lens from extending when you don't want it. The flexibility of wide angle and zoom without having to take off the lens and risk getting dust on the sensor was well worth it.Other than the slow focusing, there are few things I can think of that would make me consider switching it other than using the IS lens for low light photography.  I'm not sure I'll ever use the lens that came with my camera again...anyone want it</review_text>
I have owned this lens for over a year now and it never ceases to amaze me when I see the photos it produces.  Over this last year I have come to learn a thing or two about how to use this lens.1)  If you are going to shoot indoors, or in low light, with a long focal length (like 200mm) use a tripod or plenty of ambient light.  This lens doesn't have a built in image stabilizer so you are going to steady the lens with the tripod or use a real fast shutter speed to minimize your hand jitter.2)  Use a smaller aperture.  I have found that my best photos come from an aperture of 8.0 thru 16.  These apertures aren't great for bokeh (background blur) but they sure do allow you to take razor sharp pictures.Praise.Focal range.  With one lens you are able to take nice wide-angle shots (18mm) and with the twist of zoom ring you have a nice telephoto lens (200mm) Definitely a good walk around lens for the day at the botanical gardens, museum or amusement park.Build quality.  This lens gives you a nice solid feel in your hands.  Give it a shake and it doesn't make a sound.  The zoom and focus rings move smoothly without being sloppy.  With a lens this well built you would expect it to be heavy.  Not so with this lens, it's quite light (which is something you really appreciate after a long day of carrying it around.)Minimal chromatic aberrations.  The lens' three hybrid aspherical elements and two low dispersion glass elements correct for almost all lateral and on-axis aberrations making most of your images optically clear.Size.  At it's lowest focal length (18mm) the lens is small enough to fit into a mid size top loading camera bag while still attached to the camera body.Complaint?Well yes, I do have one minor complaint about the lens.  Auto focus is slow.  How slow? Well let's just say you won't want to try and photograph a two year old on the move.  I have found that I can keep fast moving objects in better focus by switching to manual</review_text>
I recently updated my camera gear and bought the Canon 350D. I have used Tamron lens for the past 20 years, always opting for a multifunctional lens in preference to carrying 3-4 lens around, particularly when travelling the world.  The 18-200mm XR Di II does it all for me, it is a fantastic all round lens</review_text>
I purchased this lens to reduce the amount of lens changes in the field while traveling.  The 18mm to 200mm range gave me the one lens I could travel and shoot with great results. I am totally satisfied with my purchase choice, and my first results of a recent vacation trip were rewarding</review_text>
I've purchased other bags but this one beats all & it was a great Price to</review_text>
I've had Canon digital cameras for the past two years and with my first, opted to purchase the accompanying Canon camera case. Though it's a good fit, it has a couple of flaws that caused me to look elsewhere for a case when I got my second digital camera this year.This time around, I chose the Tamrac case because, unlike the Canon, it zips closed. The Canon has a flap closure that creates two big gaps on either side of the case, allowing small particles to get inside the camera itself. Second, the Tamrac features not only a belt loop, like the Canon, but a nice shoulder strap. This means the user can carry the camera hands free without having to put it in a purse or backpack.This case fits many small film and slim digital cameras (go to Tamrac's website to download a spec sheet that lists camera/case compatability), so don't expect a custom fit. For my Canon A510, this case is a bit on the long side, but no so much so that I have to be concerned about it shifting around too much in the case. It's a good bag from a great manufacturer for a decent price. Recommended</review_text>
I am extremely pleased with this camera. I have used it for a variety of different photographic situations such as: Sport events, low light and no light, indoor without flash, beach, indoor with sun shinning in windows, close ups and zoom, and it has excelled in every one! I like it much better than my 35mm SLR (Pentax ME Super)</review_text>
There are so many choices out there, especially if you're relatively new to digital cameras. I purchased this camera about a year ago because I had heard from old timers that the Schneider-Kreuznach lens were as good as Leica lens. Also this featured 6.l Mp with a 10x zoom. I publish a magazine and from time to time I have to take photos of sales staff members for an auto dealership and various other photos of buildings, people and street scenes. One day, a rooster was at a car dealership about 20 yards away. I didn't want to scare him away so  shot him from 20 yards and despite the distance there was no blur and the quality was as good as if only 5 feet away. I have owned Nikons, Pentaxs and Minoltas, and these lens are as good if not better. It comes with  Kodak software that makes it easy. Good solid feel. The color quality is outstanding and if you use the enclosed software or Photoshop you can enhance any photo that appears a tad dark or light for optimal results. I've been using this camera now for almost a year all the time and it is a reliable performer for work or play. I have never used it in real dark situations, but the flash does work automatically if more light is needed. Highly recommended</review_text>
My experience with amazon is very good almost excellence. The products are like description and specifications are exactally functionality of the products.I brings my thanks to you for the great services and fast work to complete the orders</review_text>
I purchased these because I don't like taking my $100 binoculars to football games and rock concerts. These are perfect. The optics are a little cheap, but at $20, I think it's a steal</review_text>
these glasses are small, protable and good for concerts and quick bird work. I keep a set in the car, but they do not replace my larger busnells for birding. please don't expect to do more than a little backyard birding with these, and i am now adjusted to my larger set, so i use those in the yard. You get what you pay for</review_text>
I actually purchased 2 of these for Christmas presents.  I gave one pair to my son at a "early christmas" gathering & my husband was so enthused by the quality, I ordered another pair for him....AND received them before Christmas!  Per my husband:  "Very good quality...and compact so that they take up very little room in the glove box of my car!</review_text>
One of the reviews I read before purchasing these suggested that the reviewer should've had them for her Celine Dion concert.  I took the suggestion and they were perfect!  They fit nicely in my evening bag and brought Celine closer to me as I sat in the Second Mezzanine at Caesar's Palace!  Not only that - but the price was right! I couldn't be happier!  Plus, now I have them for our next trip to Rocky Mountain Park to get up close and personal to some wildlife</review_text>
What's not to like? Light, compact and comes with the strap, case and wipe cloth.  They are perfect.  Keep in mind 12 power can be more challeging to hold still</review_text>
Used this on a trip to Hawaii - brought the lava much closer (looked great at night). It's not difficult to focus, and provides clear images. I was not disappointed in the least.Compact size makes it pocketable - perfect for any traveler/casual user.Recommende</review_text>
These are great little binoculars that I use quite often.  They are so compact and lightweight that I grab them whenever I leave the house - whether it be for a boat ride around the lake or just a quick ride.  I don't see quite as well when I leave my eyeglasses on and it does take a little bit more adjusting to get the focus right with eyeglasses, but they are a great pair of binoculars for the price.  I am very impressed with the quality of them.</review_text>
This is such a great product.  The case fits my camera perfectly and I love that it comes with an extra battery and a tape.  This is just perfect for a first time owner like myself!</review_text>
If you bought the camera, you need this kit. It gives you the extras you need. You still have to buy a card for the photos</review_text>
This starter kit was great.  You received the larger more usable battery and mini-dv tape.  Just don't forget to get a firewire too.</review_text>
Great Camera, bag, and accessories. Just wish it had come with a fire wire as well as the AV hook up</review_text>
The starter kit was a better value than buying all these items separately.  The bag was able to put all the essentials like spare tapes, cables, and batteries.  If the bag was just a little bit bigger with more storage that would be perfect. Overall good value especially since the extended battery lasts about 4 hours of regular use compared to just over 1 hour with the standard battery</review_text>
I am delighted with my purchase.  The bag is big enough to hold two mini DVs, three different cords, an extra battery, and of course my camcorder.  I need to purchase a firewire cable, but as soon as I get it, I will be able to fit it in the bag as well.  From reading the reviews, I thought this bag would be quite large, but I was wrong.  I am 5" 0', and this bag does not appear huge when I take it with me (it is about the size of a medium handbag).  If anyone is looking for a camcorder bag for her Canon ZR modle camcorder, this bag is it because it has everything a novice camcorder user would need.  It is a great deal too. If you add up the cost of a mini DV, a good camcorder bag, and a battery, you will see that this is the best option if you are looking to save money</review_text>
The Battery is good. Though it protrudes a bit outside my zr700 and adds bit of weight, I like it. Makes the camcorder handy for my hands :-) The case is really nice. It really took everything - zr700, 2 batteries, AV cable, charger, one casette, wireless - easily and is compact and soft. The DV casette that comes with it is just a souvenir ! other two are good.</review_text>
All in all, great value, but the bag could be just a little bigger for all of the accessories</review_text>
I was looking for a basic pair of binoculars for our everyday use. I have some really expensive Leupold binoclulars that are my favorite, but for all around family use, especially with the kids, this is a great option.They are waterproof, rubber coated for protection, powerful (10x), and the focus is easily adjustable. For the money? It's a great buy</review_text>
These binoculars are amazing they are completely crystal clear and the perfect size is you are going hiking or walking.  I would completely recommend this product</review_text>
The plastic O ring on the carrying case which holds the large shoulder strap came in broken. Thus it renders the case un-useable.By the time, and my cost it would be to file a complaint and ship the case back is not worth it to me.However if Bushnell would send me a new carrying case, I would be very pleased with the transaction.Howard F. Rutkowski</review_text>
Bought these binoculars for my husband. He loves them. They are very powerful and he loves the way they feel - not too heavy. He can look at stuff across the creek and is amazed at the clarity in the things that he sees</review_text>
These are great binoculars. I've owned much more expensive binoculars and truely don't see any difference.  Great buy.  They are 100% waterproof since I flipped my canoe and they were not affected in any way</review_text>
very clear,bright day, strong magnification quality seems to be good . very well priced at around $100.00.i will know more over the passage of time .my firstimpression is good mj schra</review_text>
I bought a third party charger to save money instead of buying this one. The third party charger died after about 3 months for no obvious reason. Then I bought this one. It works perfectly, I expect it will for the foreseeable future, I've never had a problem with official Canon merchandise. AND, it came with power cords compatible with just about every type of wall socket in existence (very convenient if you travel like I do). Don't waste your time and money on a third party piece of junk. Buy this charger instead</review_text>
I bought it as a gift for a digital camera/video I'd gotten a few years ago, so that I could send it to a couple who had a new baby boy. They are pleased with it and thanked me for such a great gift not only of the camera but also the charger and a battery that would last 8 hrs to shoot their Christmas 2006</review_text>
This charger does exactly what is supposed to, very quickly.  There is a cordless model that is a bit more compact</review_text>
I purchased this product reading other buyer's reviews but when I used this product, I was fully satisfied.</review_text>
It is just what a charger should be : light weight,  simple to use, dependable. I would recommend it over any other charger</review_text>
It is exactly as the original that I got with my camera AND I got an adaptor for the car, for a 220 plug and the "Y" socket type. COOL</review_text>
I've owned my Rebel now for almost a year and this is the charger that I use for both my batteries! (One at a time.. :-))As one person stated, once you learn how to put the battery in it becomes second nature. (It doesn't just slide it, but has to be started near the top.)I have no problem recommending this charger</review_text>
It was unclear at first how to slip the battery in to the charger, however, once I did it charged the battery very well</review_text>
This is the original charger that came with my 10D. It also works with the D30 & D60, it does not work with the 300 or 350. It is a fast charger and works well with generic batteries. One advantage of this charger is the number of multinational power cords it comes with, with 5 different types supplied</review_text>
I bought this battery charger in addition to an extra battery for my Canon G3 Digital Camera. The reason being that Canon was really short-sighted in not shipping the camera with at least an external charger. With the price I paid, they could have at least done that!It's a really good camera with 1 or 2 quirks that you get used to. Excellent quality photos.But you can't use the camera while it is charging the battery.After 2 years I finally gave in and bought this charger. Someone must have been suffering from a guilty conscience at Canon, cause it came with 5 different power cables, so I can plug into almost any power outlet in the World.Just be careful to note the difference between the cables for the USA and Japan, because they are almost identical</review_text>
I got this lens mainly for low light photography, and was initially disappointed as I could never seem to get sharp enough results.  This was because wide open the lens has a very narrow depth of field.  Work within this limitation, or better yet stop it down a little, and it becomes amazingly sharp.  Focus is a little noisy, and on a digital SLR 50mm is more like 85mm, but it's a fine general purpose lens</review_text>
To get a 1.8 aperture, super sharp, prime lens "with" the coveted Nikon name on it for under $100 dollars is still hard for me to comprehend.  I continue to be awed as I go out shooting in a dreamlike state...  Wake me when its over...  My only lingering question... "Will it last?"... Hey Nikon, how about offering up some more of this prime candy for some of us who consider a great value an important part of the purchasing equation.  Thanks. enjoy :)</review_text>
Fast lense at a decent price. Can't go wrong with this one</review_text>
You cannot even BELIEVE this lens.  Every time I put it on my D200 I kick myself for using anything else.  And it is just as good or better, btw, than the 50 mm 1.4.This is the lens all others should be measured by and should aspire to equal. And it basically costs nothing.P.S.    I didn't buy this for the price.  I also love my $2,000 lenses, but use this little one more, honestly.PPS. there is ONE other lens you may want to consider in lieu of this: the Sigma 30mm f1.8.  That is the equivalent of 50 mm on a 35mm camera, and captures more of the scene, still with great bokeh (sexy blurrying of the background).  Either way, you'll get stunningly great pictures in all kinds of light.  And, it's also a great discipline to use a straight lens rather than zooming all the time.  Truly.</review_text>
If you buy this for a Nikon D40, please read the title AGAIN.  If you quick read the other reviews, you may not get to read that some mention the fact that this lens WILL NOT AUTOFOCUS WITH A NIKON D40.  If you don't care about this, you'll find this little lens great.  The pictures are crisp and clear, full of light.  Great addition to your lens collection</review_text>
I purchased this lens to supplement my kit 18-55 which I found wasn't fast enough to capture indoor shots of my two little girls without flash.  I have to say that EVERYONE should buy this lens. As one of the first additional lenses I purchased for my Nikon D40, I was absolutely stunned and blown away by the tack sharp images and speed of this tiny little gem. While it is manual focus only with the D40, everything else works just fine. It even tells you when the image is in focus via the green focus light found inside the viewfinder.  Keep in mind that at 1.8 its easy for your main subject to slip out of focus. For portrait shots, 2.8 is usually plenty to get a fast shutter speed with plenty of bokeh. For those split between this and the 1.4, if the price difference wasn't so big, I'd say go for it.  But at 1.8 you're getting an extremely fast and capable lens at a price that just cannot be beat.  I'm filling up my hard drive every day with pics that I simply could not have captured with my kit lens.  There are some shortcomings like the manual zoom, manual focus with the D40 and that it's small plastic casing probably won't survive a fall (my 70-300 VR is MASSIVE next to it) but it more than makes up for its shortcomings with the amazing shots it takes.  I promise you, you'll be hard pressed to find any other quality glass in this price range</review_text>
Sharp, cheap and fast 50mm prime lens. The f/1.8 aperture allows you to take great pics in low light situations without using flash as the lens can gather more light. Good for potraits, indoor weddings, fast action shots etc. The small DOF is wonderful for potraits and the bokeh is also nice. It also comes with a 5 year warranty. A lens every Nikon user should own.As far as negatives, nothing to complaint about, though having a macro feature would have been the icing on the cake.I use this lens on my Nikon D80.</review_text>
I like this len's light weight, sharp focus and ability to shoot in low lights. It does make noticeable sounds as it brings to focus, but not untolerable.If you are single and love photography, get it....you know you want it.If you are married, then convince your spouse that $100 is worth about a month of Latte, and you will stop drinking Latte for a month to get this lens.....that's what I did and I did not regret it a bit.</review_text>
I have tried many different camcorders/digital cameras before landing onto this one from Samsung.  Both camera and camcorder let me make excellent quality pictures and movies of my own.  Sounds are also real and great without any noticeable mechanical noise.  I was also impressed with the way it adjusts the brightness and flash light automatically depending on the places.  Controls and buttons are easy to operate but took me a couple of days to get used to it.  When compared with ones from JVC or Sony, SCD6550 is the clear winner with unbeatable price and the quality.  I am not a professional photographer so I cannot evaluate the machine in too technical terms.  But, by and large, this dual functional camcorder fully serves my needs in the most portable way.  I can strongly recommend this product for personal and family use</review_text>
Anyone who says this isnt a great piece of equipment is talking complete rubbish! For the price and size it's excellent. Good quality stills and camcorder for when needed.Yes, if you want a very small and very high quality camera - then simple, buy a camera!But for 2 in 1 this is the best on the market.I took my one for first real use to Disney, Florida recently and it lived up to all expectations and was easy to carry, did all I asked and I came back with some very good shots (482) and a great deal of footage which is easy to play around with through my pc. 99% of shots of perfect and as good as my small canon SD400.Yes, in a year or two I am sure something better will be around (as a previous reviewer says) but isnt there always???Go for it</review_text>
I bought this scope for an amazing bargain of just $30 at a Christmas tree shop. I had read  lot about it and was sure that it was a great buy. As soon as I brought it home I took it out of the box and gasped in awe. It was a high quality peice that looked great. This model has an equatorial mount so you can synchronize it with the celestial pole(poloaris) and it gives you the ability to track objects across the sky.It has a large solid tripod that can be adjusted easily. The two lenses it comes with can magnify objects either 45 or 125 times. When I first took the telescope out with my dad we found the moon and I was amazed at what I could see on the lunar surface at just 45 times magnifacation! The moon took up nearly the entire field of vision at lowest magnifacation and the detail was amazing!Using the other lens was even better I could see craters the maria and all sorts of amazing things. Just a few days ago I used my Night Sky magazine(which is a great magazine by the way) and was able to find Saturn for it is high in the sky right by the beehive cluster and close to Gemini right now. After a few minutes of searching through the low power eyepiece I found it. A bright blob of golden light in the eypiece.Hands trembling I carfully adjusted the focusing nobs and I saw it. Saturn in all its glory was in my eypeice. I could just make out  the rings and though it was small it was clear and sharp. I hurredly popped that lens out and put in the more powerful one and I saw Saturn in even more detail. I could see the Cassini division! Fortunetly the atmosphere was coraperating so I could see somthing most would need a large reflector to see. I was amazing and I could see it with so small a telescope. And in my Night Sky magazine it says in the March/April issue that you can see nebulae,galaxies,clusters and amazing things in just low magnifacations such as 30 or 50 times. I can even see M41(the beehive cluster) in just binoculars! I saw  that cluster when I was looking for saturn.So if you see this telescpope even at 50 or a 100 dollars buy it and you wont be disapointed</review_text>
I've played with this camera a few weeks now and the zoom is great.  It has various scenes to choose from to help you take pictures in different settings, lighting, scenery, etc. and it works very nicely.  I haven't installed the software, but loading pictures to my computer is very easy.  The battery seems a little high maintenance, but its just a matter of not storing it inside the camera.  Overall, its a nice, easy to use camera for snapshots for novices, and the extra zoom makes it all the better</review_text>
I do a lot of hiking and was looking for something lighter weight than an SLR that would still allow me to take telephoto and macro shots.  This camera is the smallest and lightest one I found that has a 8X or higher zoom.  I have taken very sharp telephoto photos of wildlife and macro shots of flowers that people thought were taken with a high-end camera.  This camera does well with conventional landscapes and indoor flash snapshots.  The menu controls are very easy to use and there are enough presets for special situations to compensate for lack of manual controls.  However, if you mostly take snapshots that do not require 8X zoom, I would look to other models.  While, this is small for a long zoom camera, it is still too big to easily fit in a pocket or purse.The primary flaws of this camera:  It is only 4 megapixels.  The battery charger failed and had to be replaced about 18 months after purchase (This was particularly a problem since the camera takes a propietary battery rather than AAs).  The delay in taking pictures is longer than many competitors.  Occasionally the lens cap does not open completely (easily fixed if you notice it before snapping your picture).</review_text>
I had a HP that took okay pictures but close-ups were blurry. I tried the Kodak Easy Share. The pictures were "okay" but it took a very long time to transfer them. Close ups were a little blurry.Deceiding that Kodak was not a wise choice.It was then I recalled the best photos I have ever taken were with a Nikon Pictures that looked as good and some even better thanpostcards. Seriously! I ventured out one more time to buy a digital camera I would try one more. Thankfully, Nikon stopped my camera blues. This camera has alot of great features. It works great on small items like jewelry. I am very happy withthe quality. Although it is a little bigger than the other twodigitals I bought, I do not mind. If you are not concerned with quality and want a camera that will fit in your pocket then buy HP or Kodak. Do you want Sharp vibrant pictures? If, yes.Here is your answer.</review_text>
I just bought this camera so this review might be changing in the near future.What I love:-8.3x optical zoom. Enough Said.-Menu systems. They are pretty self explanitory, though reading the manual is helpful, especially if your not electronics saavy.-Lightweight. It's lighter than my smaller Kodak digital camera.-Macro Mode. My favorite feature. The macro mode is absolutely amazing. I love being able to photograph jewelry with much sucess along with insects and flowers. A great feature and that alone is well worth the money.-The Price. I got a great deal on my camera at just 214.00 at a major retail store. I wanted something that I could take to sporting events without dragging around my heavy, professional SLR. I think I've found it.-I like the way it feels. This might sound a little weird, but the camera fits well in my hands. It's comfortable to use.What I don't like:-Size. OKay, I'm not really that conserned with the size, mostly because I drag a Pro SLR almost everywhere I go, but it's a big downfall for this camera. Bigger and bulkier than most of the camera's in it's class. Not easily able to fit in pockets or purses.-Software. I'm really not to fond of the picture project that came with the camera. I'm a big fan of the EasyShare (Kodak) software that came with my second digital camera. The layout for picture project just doesn't appeal to me.-Slow transfer. It took forever it seemed like to transfer my pictures. I have a top of the line computer, so I know it's not my computer. Right before I transfered my Nikon pictures, I had transfered my Kodak pictures and they transfered much quicker.-Rechargable Battery Pack and 2CR5 batteries. I don't really have  any trouble with the battery life (I'm actually amazed at how GOOD it is) but I'm just not in to the rechargable packs. I like the AA battery type. They are easy to find both regular and rechargable. My real gripe is that this camera does take a throwaway battery: the 2CR5. They are expensive. They are hard to find. They don't last very long.</review_text>
I bought this Nikon 4800 last month(NOV)for my trip to Disney. It took great outdoor pictures, inside some pictures turned out blurry. The battery life is very good. The in camera redeye reduction worked pretty well. The menu is very easy to navigate. My main reason for buying was the 8.3x zoom, it worked great. Overall I'm very pleased so far with the Nikon 4800</review_text>
I bought Nikon Coolpix 4800 digital camera about two weeks ago.The most important feature I looked forward to was the 8.3x optical zoom. The picture quality has been great and the menu is easy to use. The camera body is very handy and user-friendly. The battery charges quickly and lasts long. The user manual is simple and easy to understand. Excellent video quality is an added bonus!One improvement I would like to suggest to Nikon is making the lens cover more robust or providing an additional cap.For users, using a tripod for full zoom is recommended.All in all a great camera</review_text>
I had a chance to work with this camera for 2 months. It has a lot of options and I tried most of them. Panorama shots are cool. Camera takes nice pictures. It is relatively heavier and bulkier. Battery not lasting that long is always issue with digital c. I recommend Powerex Battery with charger. The best and longest lasting batteries.Huge number of megapixels lets you zoom in really close on computer. I took series picture of my cat as it was going to bite a hand and it was funny to look at facial expressions change in close zoom.I like Canon slightly better, because it is more handy. But as salesman said this is choice like between two very similar cars, just made by different company. Perhaps.</review_text>
I just received my camera 2 days ago and immediately I began to test it.It is very nice and it feels very nice to hold.I like that the zoom stops when it reaches the maximum of the optical zoom (if you keep pressed for 1 second it will go to the digital zoom).The battery last for more than 200 shots which is not bad at all. It charges in less than 2 hours.The quality of the pics is excellent.Please read the manual so you can obtain professional photos</review_text>
This is a great digital camera. I have no problems with it. i got it for my 1st anniversary 2 yrs ago. Its great! You can take pictures, and put xmas, valentines or birthday borders around them b4 you take the picture. It does video too, you can play back the video, but there is no sound because there is no speaker on the camera, there is a mic thuigh. So when you download the video, it will play the sound too. The camera has survivied being dropped many times. I would like to take long videos, so I am going to purchase a 4gb sd card. I feel sorry for all the people i saw complaining about the camera because i have no problems for 2 years now. The only thing is that the  batteries die quickly ( using the flash really drains the battery), so I went and bought high quality rechargable batteries, or the disposable duracell meant for digital cameras. also to the people who complained about blurry pictures, it depends what setting you have the camera on. I do not like all those different setings, they just mess up the pic. And do not use the auto feature I always use the non auto, egulr pic, with flash. All those other settings are confusing . Oh yes and great self timer for when you have noone to hold the camera</review_text>
I was extremely impressed with this camera; I felt the only not exceptional feature was its nonwithstanding aptitude for steady shots. Other than that, I felt it was fantastic, and exceeded all expectations</review_text>
great size and shape for taking along places. feels good in your hand. boots up pretty quick. like the color. impressed with features. takes decent pictures. has internal memory, as well as taking a memory card. i suggest getting a set of good rechargable batteries.</review_text>
There were no instructions with this tripod and being an amateur I found it a bit puzzling as to how to attach the binoculars this is suppposed to support - the binoculars don't stay pointed at the angle I want.  I may be missing something about how to use it, so I'm going to try to get help from the web or a telescope store.  Other than that it seems like a nice solid tripod</review_text>
I received the merchandise in working condition promptly, and at the lowest price.  I will use Amazon again</review_text>
With the red light off, after about an hour - if you quick charge - the batteries are perfectly charged. Although not an exclusive feature, i do appreciate that when the batteries are charged, even if you're away, the charger will shut off, thus not overheating the batteries.</review_text>
charger works great, i use it for my flash which holds 2 of the 4 batteries, so i always have 2 on standby. the quick charge works great as well</review_text>
I bought an Olympus c-750 ultra zoom camera 3 years ago and this charger and batteries were included with the package. I have been able to take up to 400-500 pictures per charge.(that includes taking alot of pictures with the flash). The batteries do take 9 hours to charge completely but it is well worth it....just charge them over night as you sleep. I never have to worry about carrying spare batteries or running out of battery life. I took the camera along on a 2 week vacation through the midwest and was able to take all my vacation pics plus more personal pics when I arrived back home and still had plenty of battery life left!!!!....buy these....you wont regret it!!!</review_text>
If you own an Olympus Digital Camera this is a smart way to keep a fresh supply of batteries. It is simple to use and fairly quick. It charges both AA and AAA batteries</review_text>
I  first used this combo binoculars/digital camera on a recent vacation to Kenya.  The quality exceeded my expectations. I expecially liked that we could also take mini videos (up to 30 secs) of the animals as well as stills.Negative: The battery compartment is not well designed and inserting batteries is sometimes frustrating.Overall, I am really glad I purchased this product.It is a alot of fun to use</review_text>
I was a little dubious when ordering this, as to the quality and clarity of the lens and the view they would give, I should not have worried, they are top class. And the units quite light too! Now add the camera functions to it and it is top shelf. I use it for Deer hunting in New Zealand, and during a 'stalk' you see some interesting things, animals fighting, bonking, doing different things which I always thought if only I had a camera! Often I can come out of the bush and say I saw 4 today 18 and a 21 pointer a spiker and a hind, some give you a look of disbelief, now its 'Hey look at these ones I saw today' Oh and cop the size of this Boar I saw across the River.The only reason I didn't give this 5 out of 5 is I feel the conttrols could have been done, easier, once you are used to them, they are good but its fine tooth thru the instructions, to get it right. GOOD UNIT RECOMMEND IT TO ALL</review_text>
You should think of this as a pair of good binoculars with the added bonus of taking digital pictures and 30 seconds of video - rather than a camera with good zoom (8x). The reason is that it does not zoom, it's fixed at the 8x optical magnification.Setting up and using the binoculars is very easy, much easier than a normal digital camera. It took me less than 5 minutes to get a good handle on how to use it...rather than an hour or two for most other digital camera. Taking photos and film is a snap. And the photos look really sharp.I wish it was a little smaller and sleeker, but other than that, I have no complaints. It's a great product that works perfect for watching sports, being in the outdoors, or even at a concert/opera.Highly recommend.</review_text>
These binoculars are awesome!  Clear view and easy to focus.  The camera is a really neat feature and is easy to use.  The photos are clear, but a little on the grainy side (which I expected they would be).  All in all - the binoculars rock and the camera is fun, even if it takes less than perfect pictures.  I would totally recommend the Bushnell Digi-Bino's</review_text>
I was really excited to receive the Bushnell Instant Replay as a birthday present. However, I quickly learned that it's an incredibly difficult binocular to operate.  First of all, I had trouble opening the battery compartment cover.  I had to pry it out with a knife after many unsuccessful attempts.  Then I had a hard time installing the Flash Memory card.  The instruction booklet was terrible and did not mention the right way to instal it.  I installed it the wrong way and it got jammed so I had to pry it out with a pair of pliers!!  After doing all that, I got the camera to work.  Then I decided I had to instal the software - the driver and the Photosuite.  The driver was installed easily.  Not so the Photosuite.  After three attempts, the icon did not appear nor did it appear on Programs.  I'm returning the camera</review_text>
I have been a firm believer in the Digimax line since they were first introduced. I have owned both the Digimax 201 and Digimax S600 and I loved both of those cameras, however, the S800 more than exceeded my expectations. I use this camera for photographing handmade items that I sell on Ebay and it captures details exquisitely. I also use the S800 to photograph family events that come up and it has worked well in many situations, even those that were held inside or had particularly dark settings. I'd recommend the S800 to anyone who is looking for an easy to use, effective camera.I haven't found any problems with this camera</review_text>
This is a fabulous camera!   The item description does not do it justice by a long shot.  This is my first digital camera and before purchsing it I went to the WalMart web site to check out their digitals.  The had a 7.1 MP for $50 more so I came back to Amazon and placed the order.The camera has a nice large screen on the back for previewing, 20 MB of internal memory. This is large compared to others for a similar price.The pictures are superb quality.  My grandson connected it to the TV for a slide show preview with special effects like an expensive video.  I am very, very pleased with this camera</review_text>
i bought this camera looking for a better 1 than i had ... it works great , was priced good for the .. M/pixels , features , can be a little complicated for someone that has never used 1 , plz read the manual ...</review_text>
I have to agree with J. Pauley's review. I've owned this camera for about six months and taken it on several long trips already. The pictures I've taken have been stunning regardless of lighting, and I couldn't be happier. I'd buy this Samsung again without reservation. 8MP for this price--with great quality photos--can't be beat</review_text>
I bought this camera to take on a Mexican vacation and could hardly take a bad picture, even at night.  Our company travel agent even suggested I submit some to our newspaper's travel editor...  A 10X zoom would be nice but it seemed to do well, even with the whale watching -- I couldn't see what I was taking due to the sun's glare but was pleasantly surprised by the pictures I got.I'm only a little peeved because I bought the camera as an Amazon gold box special and the price has gone down another $20 since I purchased it</review_text>
I spent many many hours of research before deciding to buy this camera and I am so glad that I did.  The photographs are beautiful, it is easy to use on "auto" if you are a beginner or has all of the manual controls that you would need if you are a professional photographer.  The nature close-ups are just unbelievable.  You won't go wrong buying this camera</review_text>
I've always had Kodak camera's and this one is really nice.  It takes crystal clear pictures and I couldn't be happier with it.  I haven't had any problems using it and am very pleased with my purchase</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera, though I am still trying to learn all the features. This is my third digital camera an hopefully my last. It takes fantastic pictures.</review_text>
Got the P712 as an upgrade and gift over the holidays. I think that the learning curve is past me at this point and now have a handle on how to take a decent photo with this super-zoom. Here's what you might like:*Excellent zoom lens with world class optics.*Shooting a photo in Auto mode makes picture taking easy.*7.1 mp provides for good detail.*Very good battery life. 200+ shots using the rechargeable included.*Manual mode, Shutter priority mode and aperture mode are great for the serious amateur.*Uses SD cards which are inexpensive and easily found.*Does all it's metering through the lens so filters and add on optics work well.*True optical image stabilization.A few reviews mentioned Kodak's add on lenses. I have both the telephoto and wide angle and must say they really extend the optical range of the P712. The telephoto turns the camera into a 635mm lens, the wide angle down to about 20mm. The Flash that Kodak markets with this unit is also pro level with enough "oompf" to light a auditorium.I'm pleased and impressed with this camera. I'm getting great shots with it. I think you will too.Any downshots? A few:*Video is marred by sound of auto-focus. Forget about using the zoom while making a video, it sounds like a truck is driving by.*Tends to overexpose a  little in bright sunlight in auto mode.*Not pocketable-this is a substantial camera.</review_text>
Bought as a gift.  Recipient was extremely pleased with camera and resulting photos.  Was exactly as described.  It arrived timely</review_text>
I used to be pretty good with an SLR and B&W film.  I thought I was a decent photographer and could do a lot with a camera.  WHen Digital came out with all the automatic settings and 'no thinking required' settings, I lost enthusiasm for the sport. The P712 has brought my interest in photography back to life.Along with all the good things everyone else is saying about this camera, it has the ability to give the photographer complete control over every critical factor in making the photograph.  Not just aperture and shutter speed, but white balance, 'film speed', quality level, color, B&W or Sepia, and a multitude of other user controllable features.  This camera is loads of fun for me as I enjoy messing around with all the settings.If you are a person who doesn't enjoy all the playing around I just described, you can be assured this camera will deliver the best pictures possible in it's Automatic mode.  It's is the best point and shoot camera I've ever had.  But it can do so much more.I like the feel of the P712 much better than the Z612.  The 612 has a plastic/flimsy feel to it, in my opinion.  It seems a bit larger and more substantial than the 612 although I expect the picture quality is about the same.  I am very pleased with my 712</review_text>
This is my third Kodak camera. I love the zoom and image stabilization on this one. Kodak cameras are so easy to use! The only thing I am a little dissapointed in is the shutter response time when the camera is on the highest quality setting and using flash. It's still hard to get those instant action shots. However, it is better than the cameras I have had in the past and the picture quality is fabulous</review_text>
Awesome camera.  Still trying to learn how to use all the features but even with the little we know it takes awesome pictures</review_text>
I gave the Fujifilm FinePix F650 MP Digital Camera with 5x Optical Zoom to my granddaughter for Christmas.  She loves the camera very much and uses it a lot!  J. Hal</review_text>
I love this camera so very much. The price was excellent.  This is everthing I every wanted in a digital camera. I have had two digital cameras in the pass and both were plastic and both doors where the battery and memory card goes broke, which made the camera unoperable.  I would recommend this camera to everyone.</review_text>
I bought this camera to replace another Fuji that I bought 3 years ago (which was an amazing workhorse of a camera until I dropped it one too many times...).  After much research, I chose this one because I was happy with Fuji, already had a great xD card, and this looked like it would fill the order.Did it ever!  First assignment? A family trip to Disney.  After one read-through of the manual, I felt comfortable using it for action, low-light, no flash, and fireworks pictures, and they all turned out beautifully.  Downloading the pics was quick and easy.  The display is HUGE.  Battery life had been a concern for me, and I was really happy, although I will be purchasing an extra battery for my personal satisfaction.  In a variety of light, zoom, and flash conditions, my camera took approx 120 pics at 2 megapixels before the battery became a concern.  I took many more on days where outdoor photos did not require my flash.I love being able to do some basic editing right on the camera, such as picture rotation and digital zoom.  Being a busy mom, it saves time.  I'm looking forward to discovering even more as summer requires more pictures, but consider this average picture-taking mom completely satisfied</review_text>
I bought this camera because of the large LCD.  In general, I am pretty happy with the F650, and the price was right.  It takes great pictures with very little lag between shots which is a big improvement from my last camera.  I purchased an xD card at Circuit City, they only sold Olympus cards and I figured the brand didn't matter.  I found that about 50% of the shots saved to the xD card were corrupted and garbled.  So, while on vacation I bought another xD card, this time a Fuji brand, and it's been working fine ever since.  I don't know if I just got a bad card or if you must use a Fuji card in a Fuji camera.The only other thing I don't care for is that it's not ergonomic and I always feel like I (or someone else holding it) will drop it.  I use the wrist strap every time I pick it up.</review_text>
This is my first digital camera. I chose it largely based on reviews I read here. I compared it to other reviews I read here for this price range. I've used it for over a month now and so far I'm very pleased with it. I find it pretty easy to understand and use. Pictures come out very well on the automatic or optional settings. I've gotten a memory card for it now, but could get 22-23 pictures on the internal memory.                               Thanks Ron</review_text>
This camera is great!  I've had other Fuji cameras but so far, this one works wonders for me.  It has a huge 3" LCD and if you have a 1gb or 2gb XD card, you can fit few movies and hundreds of pictures!  Get one, you won't regret it</review_text>
Amazon mistakenly sent an underwater housing instead of the camera.  In the mean time I ordered a different camera (Canon SD700 IS).  I returned this camera using downloaded UPS return labels and was refunded the entire amount I had paid since this was Amazon's mistake.  Kudos to Amazon!</review_text>
I wanted to replace my Fuji E550 and this was a logical choice. I wanted to be able to use my XD picture cards.  After reading all the reviews I opted to get it and I'm not disappointed.  I love the 3" screen on the back and the menu is very easy for me to follow since it is similar to my old one.  I am anxious to try all the new setttings that my old one never had like fireworks, sunset, and beach.  I think you'll be very happy with this camera</review_text>
I just got the F650 to replace my Olympus F-110. Being a senior, I needed something with a larger viewing screen. This fills the bill. Easy to use and takes great pictures. On a negative note, had to call Fuji for help when I started to download my first batch of photos. Was having a problem with the program not populating. Glad I bought the AC5V power adapter, which they recommend, but only state you could lose your pictures if the battery dies. Unknowingly, the problem was the battery was low. However, the manual does not tell you that even though you connect using the power adapter, it does not by-pass the battery. I removed the battery an there it was, ready to download. Recommend people get a power adapter and when connecting to the PC, remove the battery and your set to go.... Bottom line, this is a great camera I bought online for $150....</review_text>
I've had Canon digital cameras for the past two years and with my first, opted to purchase the accompanying Canon camera case. Though it's a good fit, it has a couple of flaws that caused me to look elsewhere for a case when I got my second digital camera this year.This time around, I chose the Tamrac case because, unlike the Canon, it zips closed. The Canon has a flap closure that creates two big gaps on either side of the case, allowing small particles to get inside the camera itself. Second, the Tamrac features not only a belt loop, like the Canon, but a nice shoulder strap. This means the user can carry the camera hands free without having to put it in a purse or backpack.This case fits many small film and slim digital cameras (go to Tamrac's website to download a spec sheet that lists camera/case compatability), so don't expect a custom fit. For my Canon A510, this case is a bit on the long side, but no so much so that I have to be concerned about it shifting around too much in the case. It's a good bag from a great manufacturer for a decent price. Recommended</review_text>
Item works perfectly.  I guess one should expect this since it is the OEM's replacement part</review_text>
These are great for bird watching. They make things very clear from a distance. Good buy</review_text>
After much research I finally found the binoculars that fit my every need.  The price was right, the delivery was right on schedule, and the product is excellent</review_text>
The only negative on these binoculars is that they come with a really cheesy plastic strap, which I promptly threw away.Otherwise they function fine for a bargain binocular</review_text>
The only knock on these binoculars is that the image can be unsteady, but that's a product of the 16X magnification, so it's not really a product fault. If you've got a steady hand, you'll love these things. Great for sporting events or the theater, and great bang for the buck. Highly recommended</review_text>
The first hotshoe bubble level I purchased survived a whole year and a half before it fell off my camera somewhere in northern Iceland (I did spend several hours back tracking but I was unable to find this bright green $30 piece of plastic in the snow). As far as tools go, this is one of the most frequently used item in my camera bag. I use it for the vast majority of my shots to ensure I have a level horizon (which makes stitching panoramic shots much easier). The only drawbacks are that the plastic may eventually wear away enough that it no longer fits in the hotshoe leaving it rather prone to slipping out without much force and the price: it's a $30 piece of plastic with an air bubble! In all fairness, it does hold up to abrasion rather well</review_text>
this is a bit pricy for what it is, but useful for handheld shots and if your triprod doesn't have balance indicator a good thing to use.  nice and compact and seems decent quality.</review_text>
This fits easily into the flash shoe on top of my SLR as well as digital compact camera hot shoe.  Comes in handy for making sure photos ehere there is a horizon line are level.Quality of this brand is very good</review_text>
I was looking for a basic pair of binoculars for our everyday use. I have some really expensive Leupold binoclulars that are my favorite, but for all around family use, especially with the kids, this is a great option.They are waterproof, rubber coated for protection, powerful (10x), and the focus is easily adjustable. For the money? It's a great buy</review_text>
These binoculars are amazing they are completely crystal clear and the perfect size is you are going hiking or walking.  I would completely recommend this product</review_text>
The plastic O ring on the carrying case which holds the large shoulder strap came in broken. Thus it renders the case un-useable.By the time, and my cost it would be to file a complaint and ship the case back is not worth it to me.However if Bushnell would send me a new carrying case, I would be very pleased with the transaction.Howard F. Rutkowski</review_text>
Bought these binoculars for my husband. He loves them. They are very powerful and he loves the way they feel - not too heavy. He can look at stuff across the creek and is amazed at the clarity in the things that he sees</review_text>
These are great binoculars. I've owned much more expensive binoculars and truely don't see any difference.  Great buy.  They are 100% waterproof since I flipped my canoe and they were not affected in any way</review_text>
I just got the kit today. I think it's a great deal for the price. My camera fits into the bag perfectly. I have the Kodak CX7300. If your camera is larger than that, I don't think it's going to fit in the bag. That's just my opinion. :</review_text>
The case is fitted well for the camera.  There is a pocket for an extra memory card storeage card.  Only wish that it had a carry handle.</review_text>
I really do love this product.  It works as great as I hoped it would.  The nightvision is amazing.  The screen on the monitor is small, but the picture is usually very clear.  One of my favorite features is the ability to put it on a standby mode.  Then when the baby makes noise the picture and sound come on automatically.  This way I don't have to have it on staring me in the face all night while I try to sleep.  But it comes on when I need it to.  We have a 5.8 Ghz phone and a 2.4 Ghz wireless internet system.  That is why I chose this monitor and it works great with no interference.  We can have the baby in her room upstairs and take the monitor all over the house and it works great.  It does run out the batteries pretty fast if you don't have it plugged in, but it's not much of a problem for us.  We just take the cord and plug it in wherever we need it.  I am very pleased.  I was a bit worried after reading some of the reviews for baby monitors, but I am very happy that we bought this one!</review_text>
The Mobicam ultra has lived up to every expectation I had about video monitoring systems.  I wouldn't have another baby without having the Mobicam ultra.  The audio reception is crystal clear.  Night video is a little hard to see but it is clear enough to tell if your child is moving around or has his eyes open.  The regular video is also crystal clear.  The only issue I have had is that the video starts having bad reception within the house if you get more than 50 feet from the camera but the sound works when I walk outside in the backyard or to get the mail. (About 200 feet)  I would suggest this model to anyone interested in a good quality baby video monitoring system</review_text>
I echo the previous comment.  We bought this unit so we would be able to see our daughter in her crib while she slept.  In reality all we were able to see was "snow" on the camera and we had to keep the volume all the way down so we wouldn't hear the static from the unit.  The only time we were able to get a clear picture was when the camera and the receiver were in the same room together.  I wrote to their tech support and all they could tell me is that there was interference with something else in our house.We have since spent a little extra money and purchased an AVTech Solutions monitor with much better results.  The screen is bigger and the images are much clearer.  It is well worth the extra money</review_text>
I bought this Mobicam based on a recommendation from a friend.  We really love being able to see and hear the baby vs. just listening on a monitor.  The infrared feature is awesome - you can see in total darkness.  I chose the 900mhz so that it wouldn't interfere with the 2.4 ghz wireless network nor the cordless phones in the house.  This one has no interference from any of these devices.  It does tend to pick up a little static from time to time, but is not really noticable.  I guess I need to read the directions as well.. because I have yet to figure out how to turn the monitor off during the night (it's really bright), so right now we just kind of point it towards the wall.  Overall, we love it and would purchase agai</review_text>
This is the best color print film there is. It is even better in medium format size. Just be sure to find a minilab with a Fuji Frontier machine to get the proofs made. It's not saturated enough for those cartoon colors that landscape photographers seem to have been obsessed with for the past fifteen years or so. But it gives consistent results with a fairly low amount of grain and my personal favorite color palette. Everyone should at least try it. It sure beats anything I've been able to get outta digital (imho).Alas, I'm not sure whether or not to order it online. I always make sure to get the film that says it is packed for the USA and Canada. The imported stuff may have been sitting in a hot shipping container for a long time.</review_text>
This is one of the better grades of film I have started using. It has great saturation and sharpness of colors, exceptional film</review_text>
This is just an MP3 card reader, with nothing else. If you are getting an SD card then it is great, but don't think your kid is going to change his Ipod! I paid around $30 so it was great. Sound is also good</review_text>
I have owned this camera since it came out on the market.  I have used many different digital cameras - and I believe this one has been the most user friendly and produces very fine images.  It is well constructed- I take mostly outdoor/nature photos and having traveled extensively with this camera it has held up remarkably well.I spent over 8 months in one year on fishing boats in the Bering Sea...no problems.  This camera captured thousands of images (intervolometer option - awesome!) inside it's waterproof housing while strapped to the steel gantry's of 100' ships in less than ideal weather...no problem.This camera went with me to the top of Ecuador's highest volcanos...only problem was the LCD freezing - now there are a few 'spots' on it...but hey...that was my fault and it wasn't exactly warm up there at 20,000'So, yeah...it's a nice tuff little camera.If you want to see some of my images from AK, check out - [...]you'll need to click on each underlined link...and of course the image size has been reduced to save space....Check it out</review_text>
A friend at work was just asking for advice on a camera as she had an early digital compact that was very un-user friendly.  The conversation inspired me to post a review as this camera is so easy to use and takes fantastic photos.Pros:- Easy to use- Picture quality is great- Video is pretty good (not amazing but better than most out there)- Size is good - not tiny but not big for the quality you get- Stylish; looks nice- You can buy a waterproof casing for itCons:- The only thing that is probably the case with all compacts is its not super fast taking a photo.  If you have used an SLR this will be a little annoying but overall its not a great problem and something you get used to with automatic focus.I've been very very happy with this camera using it for travel and family shots.  Thumbs up</review_text>
I purchased the S70 10 months ago and travelled with it throughout southeast Asia through harsh climate conditions and rough roads. The camera was flawless! The camera "build" is fabulous and the camera can be quite simple to operate even though it has many features found in digital SLRs. Two features that I like most are: 1) the panaorama feature in combination with the Zoom Browser software that can produce breathtaking super wide angle panoramic images and 2) the capability of shooting/storing images in RAW format for those special occassions when you know you are going to want to print the image in highest quality (its successor the S80 does nothave the RAW image feature). This is a very high quality camera and if you don't want the bulk of the digital SLRs on the market but want very high quality images----this is the camera!! This camera turned me into a Canon fan!I recommend at least a 1 gig memory card and one extra battery. At the highest resolution I was getting at least 350 images on a 1 gig card. I also recommend the LowePro case that is compatible with the S70 like the Rezo series pouches Very protective and holds extra batteries and memory cards</review_text>
I bought this Camera in October of 2004- when the product was first released. I have had zero problems with it, and have nothing but the best things to say about it's photo capabilities.I think that this is the best balance of quality for the price. Besides, you don't need more than 7.1 mp for any photography. If I shot photos in the full 7.1 mp I could make life size posters!The true test for this camera (to me) was when I went on vacation up the California coast. I shot the most amazing pictures in Big Sur. The detail was exquisite, and the color was amazing. Since I have purchased this camera, my PhotoShop days have been over. I never have to adjust the color of any shot I take, and that is why I love this camera so much.If you are looking for a camera that has the capabilities of an SLR without the size of an SLR, this is definitely the one to get.</review_text>
The canon powershot s70 is in my opinion the best point and shoot camera you can buy for the money.  It has all the shooting modes that an SLR camera would have but in a slim compact design.  Set the dial to the preset settings for different situations or tweak the more professional dial choices to get that perfect shot.  Though if you are not on the up and up with digital cameras these settings may seem a bit overwhelming.  With 7.1MP your pictures will come out extremely clear.  Most point and shoot cameras only have 3x optical zoom, but this baby has 3.6x optical zoom.  Though sometimes this doesn't get as close as one would want.  Add-on's are easy to find at any store that carries the camera.  I haven't had any need for an extra battery but I would recommend getting a 512MB compact flash II for even betting images.  If you are thinking you need a camera that has a substantial zoom then I would not suggest buying the telephoto lens that can be bought as an accessory.  If you want close up images you have to take the lens off then put it back on for the zoom feature.  Over all, this camera is great for the everyday use for those who want all of the features of the professional SLR digital cameras.  I would highly recommend it to anyone in the market for a new digital camera.</review_text>
This is a review that I could not wait to write. You simply can't go wrong if you're considering buying this incredibly intelligent and powerful camera-the Canon PowerShot S70 7.1MP Digital Camera with 3.6x Optical Zoom. With so many brands on the market and so many choices, where does one begin to find the right camera for their personal  and professional needs? Where does a photographer or the average enthusiast start to isolate the camera that they want to buy for themselves or as a gift?I really do hope that this personal and honest review will help you narrow your search and help you develop more faith in what you're buying. I'm assuming that you probably have a good deal of experience with photography or you're a person that appreciates great photography. So if you're looking for an outstanding digital camera at a Professional Level, you've found it with this monumental digital camera from Canon. This is a VERY dependable camera, probably in the top of the all the reviews I looked at while doing my homework. If you're a photographer, you know how great it feels to put a great machine in your hands. The Canon Powershot S70 is as sturdy and comfortable as they make them!This camera will always take color-rich and vivid photos for you-even if you make a slight mistake or move your hands just a tiny bit when photographing. It actually has a great deal of technology that is built-in and designed to compensate for anyone who might be in a poor lighting situation or someone who forgets to focus well before shooting the picture. I typically use the function that allows the camera to call all the shots. At first I wasn't comfortable in doing that. After I took my first 2 rolls to the camera store for developing, I soon discovered that I had nothing to worry about and I was dealing with a superb camera.Canon Powershot Digital Cameras are pretty hard to compare with others in the this arena. I've had Powershots for a long time and I've taken over five thousand photos with them-they stand up against my accidental drops or drops of rain when I've exposed the camera to water.Aside for requiring powerful batteries that use a good amount of power, there is no downside to this incredible digital camera from a great digital camera maker. I've been able to have these photographs enlarged to poster size and found them to be as vivid (even close up) as I could ever have imagined. With 7.1 Megapixels, sizes like 8x10's are not even a concern when enlarging.Canon was in the camera business decades before digital cameras were even on the market and they've really pushed the digital envelope with this camera. If you're looking for a gift for someone who is an avid photographer and like digital photography, you've found it in the Powershot S70. You can stop looking and place your order now. Your recipient will be extrememly satisfied with the ease of use and the high quality of this great camera.If you are an avid photographer, like myself, and wish to have a camera for digital shots-this is the baby you'll want to buy! If you're looking to take photographs that you will likely enlarge to 5x7's, 8x10's or larger, this camera has enough power and technology to do the job without looking like a digital photograph. Often my framed digital prints look better than my photographs taken with film-something I never thought would happen!There is a great deal of information that you can read about this camera on the Canon website and other review sites online. You can compare the camera with others in the same category. You might find some slightly better deals with other brands that might offer even larger amounts of Megapixels. That really is NOT what you should be looking for. Often the number of Megapixels is only possible with the use of special software to inerpolate the photographs. You don't want to have to worry about all of that. You are set with the Canon that truly delivers 7.1 VIVID Megapixels!Canon puts together an entire Kit or Package when you buy the Digital Powershot. I wanted to also let you know that the software that's included with the camera package is fantastic and is literally worth the price of the camera in itself. However, you're getting a super package with this deal and a camera that can depend on for as long as you want to own the camera. I've exposed it mine to rain about 10 different times, and I've not EVER had any even a small incidental problem. reminds me of the Energizer Bunny-It just keeps on Going and Going and Going and never stops! You will NOT be disappointed with your purchase and with the warranty from Canon.I hope that this honest review was of some help to you as it was a pleasure to write it for you.</review_text>
I received the merchandise in excellent condition, new, on time. Everything as promised. Thank you</review_text>
Price is low, then quality is high.My doughter take photo almost everyday.little bit bigger size camera but photo quality is much nicer than other compact camera.</review_text>
Found this camera easy to use,large 2.5 LCD monitor,good sharp pictures,suggest using Ni-MH rechargeable batteries rather than alkaline ones as more shots can be taken.Has voice mode & 30 second movies.Has many shoot modes</review_text>
I bought the Fuji S6000fd in December 2006 to help me take better pictures and to experiment with advanced photography techniques.  Initially, I had mixed feelings about this camera and several times even considered selling it to get a " better dSLR".  But after thinking long and hard and using it quite a bit and comparing its image qualities, I have come to the conclusion that it is indeed an excellent camera for what it is intended for.  The camera is now a keeper.I use this camera mostly for travel and family pictures.  Below are my personal views about this camera:PROS:1. Picture quality:  This is generally sharp with excellent color rendition (I use "chrome") for ISO 100-800.2. Noise:  This becomes evident only at ISO 800-1600, but they are still usable after running the pictures through Neat Image noise reduction filter, at 25% amount for ISO 800 and 75% for ISO 1600. I don't use ISO3200 because of loss of details.3. SLR-like:  This is the closest thing to an SLR with manual twist zoom, program mode dial and comfortable grip/ergonomics.  The fixed lens comes with a nice looking hood and allows for the use of polarizer filter for creative control.4. Live view/histogram:  This is without a doubt the BEST feature of this camera.  I use it every time to compose my shots and adjust my exposure compensation and white balance to "get it right first time".  As a result, I am getting very high percentage of quality pictures out of this camera without having to do much post processing.  To do this with a dSLR, you will have to take a shot first, then preview on the LCD, make the camera adjustments and then take the shot again. With the live view, it is close to WYSIWYG.5. Focal range of 28-300mm:  The 28mm wide angle provides excellent coverage for landscapes and in tight internal spaces.  I don't use the telephoto range as much but it's there when I need it to zoom in on the details.6. Face detection:  It works, so I use for all people shots.7. Movie mode:  This is a bonus feature, and works well enough that it has replaced my camcorder.  I get 30 minutes of video from a 1 GB card. The manual zoom works but you have to move it slowly to avoid "jumpiness" as the lens changes focus.8. AA battery:  I already use rechargeables, so not having to buy a spare lithium battery is a benefit.9. Price: At ~$300+ and for the quality/features, this camera offers tremendous value.CONS:1. No image stabilization: This is a potential deal breaker for many buyers. But compared to other non-dSLRs with noisy pictures at ISO400 and up, shooting at ISO 800-1600 on the Fuji S6000fd offers a "compromise" which somewhat compensates for the lack of a real optical image stabilizer.  But this is 2007, so I think it should be a requirement to include OIS on any lens longer than 200mm.  I personally don't use long zoom that much, so it is less of an issue.  But it would be nice if Fuji include this feature for its next release.2. No shallow depth of field:  This means you can't isolate the subject by creating a blurred background, and is a universal problem for all P&S cameras with small sensors.  With Fuji S6000fd, there is some work around, such as using telephoto focal length combined with macro mode, but the blur effect is not as good as what a dSLR can produce.3. Limited burst mode:  Continuous mode is slow and the buffer is limited to only 3 shots.  If you taken a lot of action photography, then this camera will be woefully inadequate.4. Electronic Viewfinder:  The brightness can be adjusted up or down but the resolution is only 135K pixels so it is not as sharp.5. Auto mode: This camera doesn't produce good pictures with Auto mode or even the Natural mode because of the tendency to use high ISO. Those looking for a simple P&S should look at Fuji F20 or Canon models.Conclusion:  There are trade-offs in any camera purchase.  Despite my initial hesitation, this is an excellent camera that offers close to (but not the same as) what you'll get from a dSLR. I recommend this to anyone who wants to learn photography but not ready to invest in a dSLR.This would have been a "perfect" camera (for me, at least) if Fuji had included optical image stabilization (for another 2-3 stop advantage) and a higher resolution EVF.</review_text>
This is a great camera. I love the onlg 10.7x optical zoom. It's a little bigger than I'm used to but the added features and that lovely zoom is well worth it. I'm not a professional but I do my best to utilize the feature</review_text>
I spent a lot of time researching cameras before I chose this one.  Overall I'm quite pleased, but I'm not through mastering this camera just yet.  There is only one big negative for me and that is lack of image stabilization.  This is not the best camera for action shots - I get lots of blurred shots when I try to photograph my kids or dogs while they are moving - which is most of the time.Other than that, I love the low light features - you can get a decent picture in a nearly totally dark room or outside under the moon.  I love the Natural setting where you can take 2 pics with one click, one using flash the other without and compare the 2.  I love the fact that my batteries last FOREVER!!!!  And I love the video capabilities of this camera.  I may never use my VHS-C camera again!  Macro is awesome as well, I like to photograph flowers.For the money I think this is a very good camera.  I don't use the face detection feature much, don't really see the need for it, but I suppose it is kind of a cool feature for those who want it.  I'd trade it for more image stabilization though.I would reccomend this camera for anyone who wants more than just a point and shoot camera but isn't ready for an SLR or doesn't have the money to spend on an SLR.</review_text>
What a great camera!  Easy to use and takes wonderful pictures. I've used almost all the different settings and have had no problems learning how to operate this camera.  It DOES NOT come with a memory card--at all.  FYI  It uses an xd memory card, too.  Also, I recommend a case with a strap.  Found one at Staples (of all places) for a reasonable price. This camera comes with an attachment to the lens that narrows the range and removes glare.</review_text>
I've only had the camera for a few weeks now, but I already love it. It fits my hand perfectly, the lens is excellent, and the startup time is great too. I've been having particular fun with the super macro mode, although I'm going to get an additional UV filter cover for the lens because I don't want to scratch the lens getting too close to something.  It has great possibility past the 'auto' settings, and isn't as heavy as some dSLRs would be. I find the EVF (electronic view finder) to be just the right brightness (some have said they thought it was too dark), and although the EVF resolution is a bit grainy, I know the photos themselves are coming out fantastic, so it's not a problem.  It's my first non P&S camera - I got this instead of the dSLRs I was looking at and am VERY happy with my decision.  Great bang for the buck</review_text>
You can't beat the features of this camera for its price.  Very light weight, ergonomic, and easy to use.  Takes awesome macro shots, as close as you want.  It is a little hard to stay steady with the telefocus lens all the way out.  Sometimes the auto uses to high an iso for my taste making the picture a little grainy during night shots.  Fully manual as well.  If you learn to use the manual controls you can take just about any shot you want to with clarity.  I love my camera</review_text>
I am happy to finally get the adapter for my camera and at a reasonal price. I used it right away. It is hard to get Kodak digital camera asseccories in a store. Now I can do more with my camera.</review_text>
I received the lens adapter in a timely manner.  However, I need to send it back because I mistakingly ordered the wrong item.</review_text>
I found out by trial and error that you must remove the adaptor to get a satisfactory result with the flash.  While the lens adaptor doesn't seem to impede the flash it does impede the sensors (exposure meter) to set the brightness on the reflected image.</review_text>
This adapter works well in natural light settings but doesn't work when using the built in flash on the camera. There's a design flaw that causes underexposed pics when using the flash. It is a great add on for using filters and protecting the lens otherwise</review_text>
The lens adapter works fine. I think there should be some link to additional lenses; that it is a must purchase when you order optional lenses. I bought a wide angle lens thinking it would fit the camera, later discovering I should have ordered the adapter</review_text>
We have the wide angle lens and needed the Kodak lens adapter for our camera.  Adapter and lens work well.  Fantastic pictures on vacation</review_text>
I've had this camera for about 4 months now and I am very pleased with it.  The pictures are clear, focus is quick and the options endless. This is my 7th digital camera and I have purchased 2 close up lenses and a T-con 1.7x for it which has really made it versital. The large manual zoom and anti-shake are the best part of the camera.  It is a very clear lens and I like that when the focus is on manual it gives a zoomed in look at what you are shooting. The FZ-50 is as close to a DSLR as you can get without all the expensive lenses to drag along.  The manual settings let you set-up the camera for you personnel needs.  I'm really enjoying this camera.</review_text>
What a steal this camera was! Just got it in the mail this week, and it's proven itself to be well worth buying. I love pretty much everything about it. Pictures, even in auto mode, are crisp and detailed. If you like the photography side, aperture, shutter, and focus settings are VERY comprehensive.I have never had a "real" camera before other than a cheap 35mm one, and haven't taken any photography classes or learned anything about photography. I only read a little bit online about the basics, and within 2 days I was adjusting the settings for the scene's needs and WOW the pictures turned out great. If you are interested in photography, this is DEFINITELY the camera for you.One thing to mention, however, is that the SD cards are really fast while in the camera, but once you connect the camera to a PC via USB, the pictures take a while to load in order to edit (with Photoshop). I highly recommend a fast SD card, like the SanDisk SD Extreme III.Battery life is pretty good, even when doing video. Videos look and sound great, and you can take pictures while you record video. I had been looking at this camera for 2 months and finally bought it, and it's well worth it.  If you're on the fence about this or a more expensive Canon or Nikon, I'd go with this unless you're super hardcore.5/5 Stars for an excellent product at an incredible price.</review_text>
I just received this camera as a gift.I love the idiot-proof menu.The instruction guide was actually readable.It feels like a film SLR, and the size is perfect for smaller hands (my boyfriend finds the buttons and controls a bit too cramped).Image quality is great, though I've not used it in a wide variety of settings (yet).Another feature which I LOVE about this camera is the flip screen. This appears to be the most "advanced" digital camera with this feature. As an artist and model, I shoot myself alot. The flexible flip-screen allows me to get odd angles and self portraits.My only complaint is that the auto-release is a maximum of 10 seconds (making complex self-portaits difficult). I got the remote shutter accessory, so hopefully this won't pose too much of a challenge in my self-portraiture</review_text>
I'm not entirely new to photography.  I had two canon pocket cameras (35mm) and a Sony digital pocket camera, so I had some expectations about what could be done.  I have to say that the FZ50 has blown me away.  In the automatic mode, it's great for point and shoot.  I doubt I'll ever use it for video clips, but I've been able to include pictures in my power point presentations that have been very helpful.  I have been slowly acquainting myself with the various modes and capabilities, such as the macros for closeups.  This process will take several months at least.  Well worth the price.Quality is outstanding and everything works as it should.  I'm not sure that the extra memory (10.1 MP) is actually necessary, and if you could get a FZ30 for less, that would actually be a better deal for most folks.</review_text>
I'm a former 35mm photographer who's a little older and not as spry as I once was and I eventually got out of the habit of lugging a case of equipment everywhere I went.  I got re-energized in photography with digital but a small compact point and shoot left me wanting more.  Digital SLR's are pricey and as a friend pointed out I'd be back to lugging a case of equipment around me with her.  She recommended this model and the more I looked at it the more I liked it.It is a fixed lens model, but with a 12:1 optical zoom what other lenses would really need.  It start up fast, zooms and focuses internally so there is no moving barrel to have to hold on to.  It has just about every feature an advanced amateur could want.  It does macro.  And it has an optical stablization system that works as advertised.So far I haven't come across anything that it can't do.  This is a nice unit for an advanced amateur or even semi-pro who doesn't want to go full digital SLR yet.</review_text>
For the price paid, this is a great camera.  Should last me for a long time.  Debated buying a SLR, but this seems to have all the features of an expensive SLR (actually it is a SLR, just no interchangable lenses) and a lot easier to use</review_text>
this camera takes great pictures for travel and outdoors.  If you intend to take family photo's indoors you will need a large room for group shots as it's 35-420 zoom.  Having said that I am very happy with this camera and it's long list of functions.  The software is better than some I've seen.  The camera is easy to use right out of the box.  Make sure you buy a memory card.  The battery ahs a very long life but I bought a spare so I wouldn't be caught without my camera. My only complaint is photo's load slowly to my computer compared to other cameras</review_text>
I am only an amateur photographer, but still . . . this small camera with the long nose gives performance one might expect from an SLR film camer costing a lot more, and a lot more complicated to use. I caught the digital bug sevearl years ago. My latest before this beauty was a simple little Canon SureShot 3mp. A great camera, but this camera has the same simplicity, but takes pictures which are much more refined in terms of sharpeness for not much more than I paid for that camera four years ago!! This Panasonic Lumix has a Leica Lens, which can' t be matched by any other camera but it's twin Leica camera--a much more expensive piece of equipment. The long lens might put you off if you are an average family photog, but if you want an all around 35mm-12X camera without a huge heavy expensive bag of lenses, like me, this baby is for you. It only looks massive. It is quite lite and manageable. I use it for bird photographsy, but it could be great for any situation where you need to get really close up in just about any lighting situation with ultra-fine resolution. Don't want to spend mega bucks for a mega-camera? This is the answer. I love it, and I think your will, too. Easy to use, and easy on the wallet. If you're not quite there, try the next model down, with the same focal length but 6 mp, for a couple hundred less. Another terrific buy. No, I don't work for Panasanic. I'm a retired print editor.Jim Isha</review_text>
I have had this printer for about six months and am very pleased with the results.  The printer comes with a "starter pack" that will print 5 to 7 pictures so you will want to get an additional paper pack.  The output is excellent - as an amateur, I cannot discern the difference between these photos and those from the photo lab.  They even have "Kodak" printed on the back of the paper!  I have printed about 50 pictures so far with NO snags.  This is the best photo printer I have owned (much more reliable than the PictureMate by Epson with its "cloggy" print head and you can touch the photo right away without smudging unlike the full-size HP Photo Printer PSC-2210).  The largest picture pack will give you prints for about $0.20 each - not too bad to get instant results</review_text>
This is not an ink jet printer.  It is a dye sublimation printer which means it produces the same quality prints as the local one hour--only it is in your house!  I did not have problems loading the cartridge or the paper. I have printed from my Kodak camera, computer and a flash drive.  The unit is small and portable and, in my mind, easily replace the idea of using a Poloroid in the classroom to display student's picture for "good behavior and work".  I like the fact that the paper and ink are coordinated because then I know when it will run out. These prints are far superior to ink jet and if you want commercial quality prints at home--this is it</review_text>
I bought this item in my last trip to US and it works perfectly. The cartridge will only print the exact same # of pictures that it is designed for and the only con I can think of is that in order for the cartridge to work, you have to twist one of the sides with your finger (haven't think of anything else) to get the ink ribbon in place for it to start printing and it's pretty hard to do so my finger hurt for a while. Other than that, this printer works like a charm</review_text>
This camera is exactly what it's suppose to be: convenient, reliable, compact, user friendly and above all else, it takes good pictures.  If you want a camera that takes great pictures, you'll need to buy something a little more expensive, and quite a bit larger.  I bought and returned several cameras in this class before realizing that no camera this size, and in the sub $200 price range will perform the way my SLR does.  That said, if you don't mind playing with the Exposure compensation and ISO settings, you can take some pretty great pictures even in low light.I learned a long time ago that the worst camera is the one you don't have with you when a great shot presents itself.  With the Z1 you'll never have that excuse.  Even in a case it fits nicely in my front pocket without protruding too noticably.The only issues I have are that it doesn't have a continuous shutter mode, and the dock is required for charging and downloading images.  That said, I'm still giving it 5 stars because as I said,  it's exactly what it's suppose to be.</review_text>
I was looking for a camera that was small and had a large LCD screen on the back for reviewing pictures that I had just taken.  This camera fits that bill perfectly.  For the most part, the daytime pictures are very good....and especially blown up to 8" x 10"....I was very impressed.  But what I don't think are up to par are the nighttime pictures, or pictures taken inside at night.  They are OK sometimes, but kind of dark in most cases.  Other than that....I like the camera very much.  Also, using the docking station to download your pictures to your computer is a pain....so buy a USB card reader.  I also found the battery life very good, so I don't have to charge it every day because I usually only take about 20 pictures at a time.Hope this helps you decide if this camera is for you....Stev</review_text>
I am not new to digital cameras. This camera, overall, is more usable than any digital camera I have or have had. I've owned and used the camera for 7 months as of May 06.I have owned Olympus, Sony and Fuji Digital cameras. This camera by far, as the easiest menus to navigate and are easy to navigate quickly without reading the instructions.  The back display is huge and bright, glass reinforced, which a lot of competitors do not have. This keeps away scratches and smashes.  The casing is real metal, so you do not have to baby it, and finally, the size and shape of this camera make it very convenient to carry in the front pocket of jeans with no problems.  This is the RAZR of digital cameras, in my opinion. It is ready to take pictures very quickly from when you open the lens cover.The rechargable battery has never died on me before I ran out a 1 GB memory card.The flash is adequate but a bit slow to recharge. This is not a problem for me however, because I chose this camera for two unique features, First-- "Natural Light Mode"-- a "flash off" mode that enhances pictures with natural light. I take most of my pictures, even indoors, with no flash, because I like the look of natural light. This camera is great at capturing under those conditions.The second feature I like about the camera is called "PhotoChrome" mode-- it richens colors and makes pictures sort of a "technicolor" look. Print worthy in many cases. I use this in conjunction with the Natural Light Mode.The only drawbacks I could think of with this camera is that because of the screen size/vs megapixel, sometimes you think a photo has come out clearly by looking at the screen, but if you didn't use flash and moved (which obviously makes pictures blurry) it will show up blurry at full size when you download it to the PC.The only reason I rated 4 stars instead of 5 is because in super low light situations the fact that a picture is 5 megapixels but you view it on the LCD tricks you to thinking the picture was captured clearly when you might have a slight blur at full size. This may be true of all cameras, I don't know.This is an auto focus camera.  You will get incredibly clear pictures of close ups and regular photos, but you have to let it focus.  This is not a "wail your arms around while on a dance floor and snap pictures" camera. Many people detract from the camera because they want it to be a fixed focus camera for situations like described above. Tempting because it is so portable and stylish, but this camera fills the needs of much more than a fixed focus.I have a 4 megapixel Fuji S3100 for situations where I need mega zoom, but, who wants to lug around a camera bag on the trip to the mall or walmart or work? I also own a Sony DSC-P72 which is not bad at anything, but isn't great at anything either, and is too big and hogs batteries. Previously I owned Olympus digital cameras.  I've found the 5 megapixels of the Z1 more than adequate, and I often shoot in 2 or 3.  I have the black edition. It does show finger prints. If I had it to do again I'd choose the silver only for that reason.I carry this camera often because its so convenient, and often those pictures I'd have missed by only owning a larger camera and not lugging it along are captured because of how convenient it is to carry this camera along. Its no burden at all to travel with, produces great results, battery lasts long, and is durable.</review_text>
I bought this camera after being tired of my current Fuji Finepix A340. The A340 is a great camera, but the time btw pix was painfully slow for me. Plus, I needed an excuse to buy a new camera!The Z1 actually was bought by mistake. I was after a different camera, and hastily bought this one and I am extremely glad I did. At first I was wary of a rechargeable battery and was going to take it back, but I opted to toy with it for a few days first.The rechargeable battery really is no issue. You get about 200px per charge and there's always the option of buying a backup off ebay for about $40. (Don't fall for the extended warranty crap at some appliance stores. They told me it was $60 and if the battery goes I can get a new one, well since I can get 1.5 batteries for that warranty cost, I opted to take my chances and save my money)I love the metal case and the practically instant on when sliding the cover. The size is smaller than a deck of cards but it doesn't feel fragile. There is no view finder, which is fine by me, I never use it since I went digital anyway. There a lot of settings and I found that for dark environments, this camera is slick!!! Easily the best dark environment camera I've ever owned.I'm not a photo expert, I take a lot of pictures, and as long as they are clear, crisp enough to print if I choose, I'm happy. I am sure there are other cameras that others will say are better for this or that but for a casual photo taking endeavor, this Fuji is perfect</review_text>
I found the frame reasonably easy to use.  Did not have to reformat my pics.  Great valeu</review_text>
I bought this frame for my wife. She has alot of digital pictures and no good way to see them all. After reading the reviews by others, I decided to try this one. She loves it. With the little card reader we have for our computer, she can drag and drop her photos to an SD card. Then just plug in the card, hook up the AC power, and turn on the frame. It goes to the slide show automatically.We didn't bother to re-size or crop the photos. The 1/2" black bars on each side of the photo just aren't that bothersome to us. No remote controls or sound features but if you're looking for a simple frame to just show off all your digital photos, at a reasonable price, this one is great</review_text>
I was lookin for a big frame without the big price, this is perfect!! Very easy to use I bought a 256m sd card filled it with about 130photos and just put the card in, after adjusting the brightness I was all set, its very simple to use, and for the price well worth it!!</review_text>
I have been looking for this traditional look photo frame for quite a long time.  I search no more.  I have found it.  I love this unit and it's very user friendly.  Pros--nice frame design and clear widescreen.  Fast slideshow.  Pictures don't distort like others.  Internal memory can store up to 20 hi-res photos.  on-screen menu and shown buttons.  Best of all:  Last memory!  Cons--buttons on top and can be just a few.  No CF.</review_text>
I am pleased with the purchase.  Very good value.  Picture quality is good and it is easy to operate.  Only negative is that it was advertised as wood frame when in fact it is plastic.  However, it looks good.  This is my second purchase of this product: one for myself and one as a gift</review_text>
I purchased the Axion 10.4" frame for my wife to replace a defective Polaroid frame from a different source.  The Axion stacked up quite nicely to the other "more expensive" frame.  The Axion is viewable from more angles than the Polaroid frame with a cheaper price tag.  Quality of the display is BETTER on the Axion and we have not had any technical issues.PROS:Brightness controlColor and Contrast of displayEase of setup and operationGood sound from speakers on music playbackCONS:Slide show transitions are from top to bottom only.  Different transitions would be a nice feature.Remote does not control volume of music.Overall the advantages of this frame outweigh the disadvantages.  We have been very happy overall with this purchase</review_text>
The frame is a good deal for a 10 inch LCD, at least when I bought it about a month ago.  Pictures look great, and a slide show that I converted to an mpeg played with no problems</review_text>
Binoculars work great and are lightweight and easy to carry around in my purse.</review_text>
Ordered these for my wife and found them to be so nice I have been stealing them for myself...We use them on vacation and hiking trips...even at a concert recently...very nice and easy to use...only downside was they do not come with lense caps for both ends...just for the eye piece nothing for the lense opening..</review_text>
If you like the idea of relatively inexpensive, lightweight, compact zoom binoculars, then look no further.  I just got my pair of Nikon Travelite V Zoom (8-24 x 25 CF) nocs, and I already LOVE them.Don't let the bird watching crowd talk you out of getting a pair of zoom binoculars, folks.  When binocular nuts say that zoom nocs "don't perform well," and try to discourage others from buying them, what they really mean is that most people don't know what to expect when they get their hands on a pair of zooms, and are sometimes unpleasantly surprised to find out they don't work exactly like their favorite fixed magnification nocs.As with all optical tools, zoom nocs are best for certain kinds of uses, and not so good for others.  Specifically, at the bottom end of their range, they "see" the same as any fixed mag nocs with the same focal dimensions and optic quality.  However, as you increase the zoom, three things happen:  1) your field of view gets smaller;  2) the visible light coming through the nocs lessens, or, the image gets a little bit "darker," and 3) it becomes more difficult to keep the nocs fixed on your target.Now obviously, if you are attempting to watch something like a small bird in flight, and perhaps even adjust the zoom while trying to keep the nocs focused on your subject at the same time, you will be VERY frustrated with the "performance" of these or ANY zoom binoculars.  That isn't because the nocs aren't doing their job ... it's because you're using the wrong kind of optical tool for the task at hand!If, on the other hand, you are looking at a well-lighted subject that is stationary, or not moving around too much, and you just want to get a little closer look at it, you will be absolutely thrilled with what you get from these nocs.Nikon's optics are crystal clear and first rate for the modest price.  The zoom mechanism is simple, smooth and cool.  To "zoom in" you simply turn the zoom ring located on the right eyepiece clockwise, and then back the other way to "zoom out."  The diopter (that's the adjuster that compensates for focal differences between the right and left eyes of individual users) is located on the left eyepiece.  The nocs are solidly constructed, with a nice "tight" feel on all the moving parts, and a black rubber armor covering most of the exterior, for a good grip.  They're very lightweight, fit in your hands like a glove, and come with a neck strap, eyepiece caps, and a custom-fitted, black nylon mesh carrying case with a belt loop on the back.Finally, if you have any difficulty holding the nocs steady at their maximum magification (and most people will), FEAR NOT!  Think about getting an adjustable monopod to rest the nocs on while you look through them, e.g., the PoleCat "Explorer" by Stoney Point, with their optional binocular rest.  This monopod can be adjusted to hold your nocs steady for you, whether you're standing or sitting.  It doubles as a walking stick, and has a standard screw mount on the top for use with cameras, camcorders, etc.  I've now gotten and used this little "extra" myself, and it has vastly enhanced my enjoyment of the nocs, especially at the higher magnifications.I personally think the negative press on zoom nocs is nonsense.  Just satisfy yourself that zoom nocs are ok for your intended use(s), and then learn how to use them the right way.  I took a chance and bought the Nikon Travelite V zoom nocs, sight unseen, and I'm glad I did.  These are GREAT compact binoculars for the price</review_text>
The application for this barlow on my 8i/GPS SCT/XLT was to gain higher magnification options from longer focal length and eye relief eyepieces (ELux and Xcel 25-18-15mm)and stay in modest price ranges for everything. COMMON TESTS with the barlow vs. short focal length eyepieces to 8mm was most favorable: a) using both common and wide angle FOV eyepieces and b)testing with and without eye glasses while c) viewing Polaris double, Jupiter & moons and the Moon. Seeing conditions were poor (Dallas, summer, early evening sky with a lot of Moonlight.) Never the less I am pleased with both the Celestron Ultima 2X barlow and the strategy and therefore I "recommended". Shipping was prompt - much better than prior experiences with amazon.com - improvement so noted</review_text>
This particular Barlow, along with the Orion Shorty, is highly recommended on several of the astronomy forums on the internet.  I got this one instead of the Orion simply because Amazon was offering it at about $52 at the time.I've found that I enjoy using the Barlow when viewing planets and a few DSO's.  It provides an economical way to virtually increase the number of eyepieces in your collection.  It does introduce a little light loss with my eyepieces (maybe this is normal with all eyepieces), but it is not troublesome.I certainly recommend this Barlow for those of you who want to cheaply expand your eyepiece collection</review_text>
Works the same as the one that came with my Lumix FX07.  No difference that I can detect.  And it's half the price.  I ordered two so am totally backed up wherever I go.  A no-brainer and it arrived right on time</review_text>
I bought this as a spare battery for a Panasonic digital camera and saved $35 compared to Panasonic's price</review_text>
The Lenmar battery is a third party alternative to the original Panasonic battery. This kind of batteries mostly use lower quality materials, which result in long charge times and short use. However, this particular battery is indistinguishable from the original Panasonic battery in battery life and charging times. It turned out to be a great second battery for my FX-01. It could have come with a case, but since I have the case for the original battery and I have to keep one of the batteries inside the camera, there is no need for one</review_text>
Not sure about the long-term life, but the initial charge shows that it's comparable to the much more expensive Panasonic battery</review_text>
Just do the math. It's the same specs as the official battery for just (about) 25% of the cost! You already have an official battery, probably, so save some money on the spare. Woops -- save A LOT of money on the spare! :</review_text>
This seems to be a wonderful camcorder for the money. I have had it about a week and have had no problems, except that my older dvd player does not support the smaller dvds. They work fine in my new model dvd player. Sony seems to have made a good product</review_text>
If you are trying to pick and choose pix off your camera card, any digital frame will be disappointing to you.  These are not $100 computers.  This one is a jpg slide show, mp3 player and bare bones mpg and avi video player!  For its primary use, you'll probably want to enhance your images        and shrink file size for display on a small LCD wide screen anyway.  What I do is edit images on a real computer and copy them to an empty flash device. I plug this into frame and copy pix to onboard memory.  Also great for playing videos from YouTube etc. off of plugin flash.  Only caveats are: 1. No support on company web site.  (business opp?)  2. On my Dell direct USB cabling is flaky.  Drive appears and disappears. If I'm quick I can make a transfer, but it's easier to use flash.  Of course if you just want to see what's on your camera card, just plug it in.</review_text>
I received this as a Christmas present, loaded it up on an old card that I do not use anymore, and it works great! I have changed the pictures on the card at least twice and I run it every night (2 months) with no problems. The picture is good and it has never frozen up. I am now looking to get my sister one</review_text>
I initially bought a digital frame from Target and had to take it back because the picture quality was SO BAD (not to mention a bad remote and lack of functions).  I got the Pandigital at Office Depot and I am so glad I did.    The pictures were a bit contrasty but I worked that out.  The video function was a plus - that I thought I wouldn't use- but it worked very well with my camera/frame combo.  The small videos that I took on my camera were never used until now. I love this function!  It was also easy to load (copy and paste) and my SD card worked straight from my camera (Panasonic waterproof digital.  I wish you could mix playing video and pictures, but then again, you don't want to be talking to a customer at work and all of the sudden hear a video from your picture frame. I'll use the remote. The rotate feature is also another feature that I like which the other frame did not have</review_text>
The conversion lens works great.  The delivery was quick, and painless</review_text>
This adapter provides the 58mm filter screw mount base for expanding PowerShot G6 versatility - tele or wide converters, closeup lens, filters, or power-user tools such as a (circular) polarizer. As noted, the adapter shadows the built-in flash, and blocks part of the viewfinder's field.  Pity that the LA-DC58B adapter for the G3 or G5 cameras doesn't also fit the G6</review_text>
Good product - but price is double the price of generic batteries.  And they are no longer made in Japan.  Now they are made in China.  At that price I would rather have Made in Japan.  Have not noticed a difference when compared to generics.  I guess time will tell if the generics stop holding their charge with continued usage.  Have been using the Made in Japan version for 2yrs and still holding their charge.</review_text>
This camera is fun to use and easy too.  It is a great size to keep in my coat pocket at all times.  Also with a 1 GB memory card I can take many many pictures and the battery lasted a few weeks before needing recharge.  Overall this is a good buy and value.</review_text>
I purchased for 9 yr old and it's a great camera.  Takes excellent qulaity.  Battery life is good.  My Cannon and Nikon are really no better.  she takes pictures of everything and never a flaw.  Seems to be a very sturdy camera built very well.  I bought becasue the Samsung name.  I have purchased many Samsung products before and was very happy with them.  I've used theri customer service for other products and I've found them quick in respnse and helpful.  I would recommend this camera for any age child or adult.  +++ The only thnig I don't like is the lens does not cover when off.  I have not experienced any problems but I am keeping an eye out just in case.  I still recommend this quality camera</review_text>
daughter has had a great time using it.Size makes it easy to take it anywhere</review_text>
I have a great DSLR that I use for "real" photography, but there are times you just want to throw a camera in your pocket and go.  The Samsung Digimax is great for that.  At 5 MP it great for family get-togethers, business travel, kids playing, pets being pets, etc.  I'm not thrilled that it didn't come with a case. It would be nice just to have a little pouch - even if it adds a couple bucks to the price.  And perhaps I'm spoiled with my "good" camera, the zoom leaves a little to be desired in the clarity department.  Transferring to your computer is SUPER easy.  I didn't even install the software that came with it on any of my machines.I bought one for my mother in law as well, so I recommend this camera for the non-tech savvy person.  She's been able use it with no issue.  I'd also recommend it as a second camera</review_text>
Hi....I purchased this camera for my daughter after looking at several "in person" at Best Buy and then looking far and wide on the net.  this camera was her choice and she has loved using it.  So, while, I've not used it myself I can safely say that this was a good purchase at a good price.  Also the black case makes it quite "hip" or at least I'm told since at 65 my "hipness" days maybe behind me! &lt;g</review_text>
This camera is small, easy to use, and perfect for the price. It has so many features. The one thing I love is that the date is on every picutre even when you print it out. I recommend this camera to everybody</review_text>
I found the frame reasonably easy to use.  Did not have to reformat my pics.  Great valeu</review_text>
I bought this frame for my wife. She has alot of digital pictures and no good way to see them all. After reading the reviews by others, I decided to try this one. She loves it. With the little card reader we have for our computer, she can drag and drop her photos to an SD card. Then just plug in the card, hook up the AC power, and turn on the frame. It goes to the slide show automatically.We didn't bother to re-size or crop the photos. The 1/2" black bars on each side of the photo just aren't that bothersome to us. No remote controls or sound features but if you're looking for a simple frame to just show off all your digital photos, at a reasonable price, this one is great</review_text>
I was lookin for a big frame without the big price, this is perfect!! Very easy to use I bought a 256m sd card filled it with about 130photos and just put the card in, after adjusting the brightness I was all set, its very simple to use, and for the price well worth it!!</review_text>
I have been looking for this traditional look photo frame for quite a long time.  I search no more.  I have found it.  I love this unit and it's very user friendly.  Pros--nice frame design and clear widescreen.  Fast slideshow.  Pictures don't distort like others.  Internal memory can store up to 20 hi-res photos.  on-screen menu and shown buttons.  Best of all:  Last memory!  Cons--buttons on top and can be just a few.  No CF.</review_text>
I am pleased with the purchase.  Very good value.  Picture quality is good and it is easy to operate.  Only negative is that it was advertised as wood frame when in fact it is plastic.  However, it looks good.  This is my second purchase of this product: one for myself and one as a gift</review_text>
The frame is a good deal for a 10 inch LCD, at least when I bought it about a month ago.  Pictures look great, and a slide show that I converted to an mpeg played with no problems</review_text>
Easy to determine which version of this product I needed. Easy to order, fast ship, does just what I wanted it to do.Great buy incredible savings</review_text>
Solid construction, good finish.  Works great when used on the Olympus SP-510 camera with the wide angle and telephoto lenses for this camera.  I leave it screwed on at all times and have purchased and attach a 55mm lens dust cover.  Although this arrangement makes the camera less portable it allows for more stability when the camera is held.  I feel that it will provide more protection to the lens assembly and help prevent accidental touching/smudging of the lens.</review_text>
Purchased to use with some Tiffen Filters and a Telephoto Lens.  The adapter worked fine.  I am going to try to find a 55mm lens cap so that I can keep the adapter on at all times instead of removing it each time I store the camera so that I can use the lens cap that came with the camera</review_text>
Good Price, Good Quality. Came in a reasonable time. The only difference was it didn't have the fancy cover, just cardboard, but the product was the same.</review_text>
Quality RC paper with gret surface for avoiding waterspots, medium weight awesome for durabilit</review_text>
Very good dealing with this supplier.  Would do business with them again</review_text>
I found the frame reasonably easy to use.  Did not have to reformat my pics.  Great valeu</review_text>
I bought this frame for my wife. She has alot of digital pictures and no good way to see them all. After reading the reviews by others, I decided to try this one. She loves it. With the little card reader we have for our computer, she can drag and drop her photos to an SD card. Then just plug in the card, hook up the AC power, and turn on the frame. It goes to the slide show automatically.We didn't bother to re-size or crop the photos. The 1/2" black bars on each side of the photo just aren't that bothersome to us. No remote controls or sound features but if you're looking for a simple frame to just show off all your digital photos, at a reasonable price, this one is great</review_text>
I was lookin for a big frame without the big price, this is perfect!! Very easy to use I bought a 256m sd card filled it with about 130photos and just put the card in, after adjusting the brightness I was all set, its very simple to use, and for the price well worth it!!</review_text>
I have been looking for this traditional look photo frame for quite a long time.  I search no more.  I have found it.  I love this unit and it's very user friendly.  Pros--nice frame design and clear widescreen.  Fast slideshow.  Pictures don't distort like others.  Internal memory can store up to 20 hi-res photos.  on-screen menu and shown buttons.  Best of all:  Last memory!  Cons--buttons on top and can be just a few.  No CF.</review_text>
purchased as a gift and well received.  seems to handle larger chips in a timely manner.  runs everyday, all day and no problems encountered.  displays vacation pictures clearly.  like that it is big enough to view across the room.  frame is more compatible with decore than the 7" model previously purchased</review_text>
I purchased the Axion 10.4" frame for my wife to replace a defective Polaroid frame from a different source.  The Axion stacked up quite nicely to the other "more expensive" frame.  The Axion is viewable from more angles than the Polaroid frame with a cheaper price tag.  Quality of the display is BETTER on the Axion and we have not had any technical issues.PROS:Brightness controlColor and Contrast of displayEase of setup and operationGood sound from speakers on music playbackCONS:Slide show transitions are from top to bottom only.  Different transitions would be a nice feature.Remote does not control volume of music.Overall the advantages of this frame outweigh the disadvantages.  We have been very happy overall with this purchase</review_text>
This is NOT a high-tech digital frame. It doesn't play MP3's.  It doesn't come with a remote.  It simply reads your digital pictures from a card and displays them in a slide show mode.  There's an "on" button and an "off" button.  There is no manual to read in order to learn how to operate your frame (though it does come with a one-page instruction sheet).  It's great for your office desk when all you need to do is reach over and turn it on or off.  If you want to display it in a difficult-to-reach location, or choreograph your pictures with music, then this is not the frame for you</review_text>
The frame is a good deal for a 10 inch LCD, at least when I bought it about a month ago.  Pictures look great, and a slide show that I converted to an mpeg played with no problems</review_text>
A great camera for everyday people for everyday purposes of memorable photos.  It takes good-quality photos and has multiple features that may trigger an interest in users.  MP3 and PMP player another plus, adding to the versatility to this great product.  This camera does all the things an electronics-savvy person would dream about.  Does its purpose as a camera and adds features like MP3 to increase the entertainment value.  A great buy for a great product</review_text>
This little camera is great at capturing the wonderful moments of my little boy growing up.  I love that I can carry it in my pocket or purse and will never miss anything.  The video quality is awesome too! I agree with the PP that the flash can mess up some pictures as the subjects move after the first flash, but it's a minor glitch.I'm so happy with this camera.  I've really enjoyed the Red-eye reduction mode on the camera.  Makes for editing a lot quicker</review_text>
Very good picture quality. Very small and easy to carry around. The mp3 quality is good and even the speakers do a decent job considering the size of the device. A few minor complaints. The flash in auto mode flashes twice so your unaware subject will move after the first one and ruin the photograph. There is no problem with the other modes. Beware if you have a mac. I haven't been able to figure out how to put video on the thing which is not what I really bought it for so who cares. The mp3 function works fine with a mac and uploading pictures is no problem through iPhoto. In conclusion: A great little camera that is perfect for going out and decent for mp3's (great value for the money by the way). Video format needs to be reworked for mac but should work well with Windows</review_text>
it is what it is... this camera does everything and takes amazing pictures, i have never regreted the purchase of this camera not once</review_text>
Well....this was my first camera ever and I do attest accurately that the advertisement holds VERY TRUE for most of the features. The picture quality is fantastic, the special editing the camera is capable of (built-in templates), and the different modes that the camera can be positioned to take photos.One weakness I do want to point out is that it could be hard to determine which mode to take the appropriate picture in (outdoors, bad lighting etc). Therefore, I STRONGLY urge you to read the instructions which state, "Please experiment with this camera before taking photos" (basically I paraphrased it).Other than that, this camera rocks!!!  Advantages outweigh the disadvantages by far</review_text>
This versatile camera offers so many features that you can't go wrong.  It's pictures are soo clear and vivid and it automatically enhances everything for you. You can put in frames and edit the picture right from your camera no need to go to your copmuter. Also someone wrote that its not compatible with macs which isn't true I have a ibook G4 and i was able to put my photos on, songs, videos and text files.  Very appealing design and small enoguh to take with you on the run</review_text>
I absolutely love this camera! Granted it's the first digital camera I myself have ever owned but I have plenty of friends with cameras. The NV3 is by far the best I've ever used. It has some extras like MP3 and MPEG4 playback that may seem unnecessary at first but you won't be able to let it go once you set everything up to your liking and drop in atleast a 2GB SD card for an insane amount of storage. Battery life great, flash great, picture quality is just below SLR quality! I love it, Samsung has outdone themselves with this one</review_text>
I agree with almost all positive reviews I read here. Only thing is after I use the camera for 10 min the front of the camera gets pretty warm (warm enough to be uncomfortable to hold). Anyone else experiencing this? Please leave a comment.PS: I am going to contact Customer service and ask.</review_text>
Ok if you know your way around a camera and are looking for nice slim shot camera just to have around. Then this is a great camera. I have a very nice digital SLR camera but i really wanted something that i could just take with me. I will admit that the auto setting are not the best you can get, but it will get the job done. However if you switch the camera over to Program mode you have a whole bunch of settings to choose from. I am very impressed with what this little camera can do. It has by far the most advanced setting of any slim shot camera i have used. As for the 7.2 MP, you never really need to push this camera to do that, your pictures will probably turn out alot better if you use 6 MP settings. Just because it might speed up the shutter time and processing time. I am really a fan of long-exposer pictures, but i find myself in situation where i want to take the picture but i didnt bring my huge camera bag. This little camera can take these sorts of pictures. Just put in the night shot setting and push the +/- button and the setting will come up and your good to go. Findiing your way around this camera was quite easy. There are not a lot of buttons so a few hours of experimenting and you will have it down. Dont bother reading the manual is doesnt really help. As for the PMP in the camera, it is a nice touch. Although if you have a Apple computer putting movies on the camera will take a little work, but it can be done. Putting text files on it couldnt be easier just save the file as a TXT and throw it on your camera and again you will be good to go. Since I have a Mac i definetly use itunes but most of my music is protected and in mp4 format. This camera will not play mp4's, just mp3. Again all it takes is a little work and you can get those song on to your camera. Just find a converter and convert the song you want and put them in a different file on you computer just to have. I would have gave this camera a 3 but the advanced feature and easy learning curve really jumped it up a point. I love this camera and it will serve well for anyone. Dont be worried that the PMP features have taken away from the quality of the camera. It feels as if this camera has been cut out of solid block of metal. One last note, just becareful of shooting, although it have a very nice lens, it is also sensitive at time to movements, but it is not bad compared to many other cameras. All of them have this problems so dont let this scare you off. Just have the right settings and this problem will be corrected. I love it. I love it. I love it. Samsung is headed in the right direction with the slim shot camera market. Also check out the NV7 and NV10 if you want that extra boost in lens quality and functionality.</review_text>
The only previous paper i have used was a kodak paper (some years ago), now no longer readily available. This paper does not seem to have the corner durability in handling that i used to recall in the other paper i used</review_text>
I'm very much pleased with the paperIt was cheaper than I thought it would be.I was very urgent and the paper came right on time.^</review_text>
The glossy paper when making prints creates great dark blacks & very white whites, and if you're taking a photography class and plan on using many sheets, I would highly recommend buying a larger package rather than a bunch of small ones. You'll save money that way too</review_text>
It's a nice product for the price. Very compact. Good quality video for my purposes.The battery life is a problem. I've been using it to tape portions of my son's baseball games, recording for about 10 seconds at a time and pausing (when he's batting or pitching) and it barely makes it through the game</review_text>
Only complaint I have is with the battery that does not last more than 60 mins. So have a replacement battery always</review_text>
This is a great camcorder.  It is very small, compact, easy to run, and even looks nice.  It actually fits in most average size digital camera cases.  I've not had it all that long, but so far I am pleased with it.  Let me just list the pros and cons; hopefully it is helpful.Pros:*30G Hard Disk Drive is massive.*Recharges in less than 2 hours.*Can be used while pluged in to the AC adapter/charger.*Relatively easy to use--self explanatory manual and on-screen display.*Digital pics are better than I expected.*Plugs right into TV/VCR/DVD for playback/burning/recording.*Indoor average light situation was acceptable for me; everything shows up fine (though in lower than average light, the video gets a bit grainy).*The remote is great--you can put the camera on a stand and use the remote to record and zoom (and use for playback/TV mode).Cons:*Battery is only good for about 60 minutes.*Software is not very good; it bogs down my computer and is not easy to use.*Light on camera is only good close up (though this was expected).*Record button is a split-second slow when shutting recording off.*The view screen cannot bend backwards more than 90 degrees; it only twists up and down.In summary, I am happy with the camera and think it was worth the money.  I may at some point have to purchase or find better software to edit these movies.  They do, by the way, play on the newest Windows Media player (version 11?).  I also plan on getting another battery for a back-up.</review_text>
This Camcorder works very well thus far.  Very easy to use without having to pour over the included manual.  I have not tried to use the included software yet to burn a DVD, so I can't comment on that.  They camcorder looks great, is the perfect size, has great features that others didn't (built in light) and seems to take great videos in all light conditions.  I would hightly recommend this camera.</review_text>
After reading all the "professional" reviews, i decided to try the MG57 anyway and i am completely pleased. It may not be a top of the line, pro video / coffee maker but it is a very competent video camera.The manual is actually useful although you dont need it. The menus are easy to use and on "auto" the camera takes very good video or stills.I chose this over the MG77 because it has a video light (vs. a flash) and I dont expect to take serious still pics with it (although the stills are quite good).The controls and menus are really well thought out (big change from most gadgets like my cell phone ;-)the size and weight are very good and the unit is always ready to use, just open the lcd and 3 seconds later you are recording!Mac SW is supplied for trimming the clips and combining them into one file for burning or opening in iMovie, this sw is simple but easy to use and does exactly what is needed.This is a very competent little camera and i expect to get a lot of enjoyment out of it.P.S. Most of my video's are taken indoors and for best results i do manually set the white balance (very easy). The low light video is quite acceptable to me (as good as my sony DC20 but without the tape bother)</review_text>
JVC's G-series camcorders are an excellent value.  The GZMG57 is no exception.  I bought this for my wife and she is thrilled.  She likes the point-and-click simplicity, the millions of features, the simple video browsing (playback) mode, and the quality of the video.Some professional reviewers rate the JVC lens technology lower than the Sony, because in theory the Sony's lens is superior.  In practice, there is no difference.  The Sony's touch-screen menus are a big hassle, too.To us, this model is the perfect mix of features and cost.  It takes wonderful INDOOR pictures (as well as outdoor) thanks to a f1.2 lens, has a built-in light (unlike the GZMG7x models), shoots wide-screen (16:9), stores 7 hours of highest quality video, has an SDRAM card (and easy controls to transfer to / from the hard drive), and a 15x zoom.It also works with our Mac and PC (on the Mac, I recommend that you just use the built-in iDVD software instead of the JVC software).The Sony SC100 has a much larger hard drive, but that's about it.  That's not enough to justify a $250 price differential, IMHO.</review_text>
I was very pleased the fast shipment.  I bought this as a Christmas gift for my husband, and he loves it.  Every day he finds a new feature.</review_text>
I purchased this camera about a year ago and I have had no problems with it yet.. It is also light weight and is compact.... Great product..</review_text>
I purchased this cancorder for one purpose: to playback old 8mm tapes for recording onto a DVD-R recorder.  For this purpose it is ideal:  low cost; colour view sceen with sound; plays 8mm and Hi8 tapes; rugged and high quality feel, so it may last a long time; apparently the only name-brand 8mm camera available at this time.If you are looking for a general purpsose camcorder do not buy this one for the following reasons1. 8mm and Hi8 is obsolete.  When your camcorder finally breaks (as all three of mine did after an average of 5 years use) you will have a hard time finding a device to playback your precious tapes on.2. This camcorder has no "steady shot" which in my experience is the most important feature for easy recording of good quality videos.3. This camcorder is rather big and heavy compared to many others available.Steven Woodward</review_text>
This camcorder can not be used to record direct to your computer or any of the new dvd recorders.  You have to record first to video tape then be able to connect your VCR to a dvd recording device.  Very disappointed.  How hard can it be for Sony to add the USB port?  Even my $100 digital camera has a USB port.Don't waste your money on a camera that is already outdated in technology</review_text>
Everything about this camera is amazing to me. I originally read that there is a problem with this model of camcorder with the screen blanking out after 1 or 2 years of use. I haven't seen any signs of that happening so far. I love this. Being a college kid it gets banged up on occasion, but my Sony seems to have held up to the challenge.BUY THIS CAMCORDER</review_text>
Very good and helpful device. Adds quite a bit of bulk and weight. I would recommend you use it when you can't get ahold of the smaller batteries, or you are going on a trip. Vertical shutter release comes in very handy. It comes down to this, if you want more battery life you have to accept more bulk in your camera. Even with the battery pack my rebel k2 still weighs less than most digitals I have tried out</review_text>
I love the adapter saving me from having to buy the mega expensive CR2 batteries my EOS T2 uses. However I thought I could use rechargeable batteries with this adapter. As most NiMH and NiCAD rechargeables are 1.2V (versus alkaline being 1.5v) I am guessing the 4 rechargeables was only giving 4.8v versus the 2 CR2's giving 6 volts ... not enough to power the camera.</review_text>
I will not consider using my camera without this battery pack;all cameras should carry one</review_text>
When you take a long exposure photo whith a motorized camera the batteries drain whith the first picture (four hours exposure aprox.), and you wasted 8$ or more, whith this baby you take four cheap AA batts and take the same photo for less $, the recargeable NiMh batteries are the best choice, i take a three hours and a half exposure whith this ones. For last, Adorama ship is fast and very good package!</review_text>
Battery grips have become a widely used accessory for those who use their SLR regularly.  They typically add a grip to make vertical shooting easier and a expanded battery department to allow for longer sessions without battery changes.  This grip in particular takes inexpensive and widely available AA batteries (4), which will save money quickly over the $12 or so a pair of the batteries that these cameras take on their own.  Rechargable batteries work fine in the grip.  Also included is an additional shutter release to go with the new vertical grip.  I'd love to have seen a tripod socket in line with the lens and perhaps a sensor for Canon's remote shutter release, which isn't built into many bodies (if it has a shutter release button, all that would be needed is a cheap IR sensor).  All in all, it's an inexpensive way to add value to your camera, save money on batteries, and simply look cooler</review_text>
At first I could not believe that the 3 hour time limit was true because the smaller batteries didn't even last 45 minutes using the eye viewer. To my surprise, this battery lasted over the 3 hour limit and I used the TV viewer to film. I do sports videography and I need something that  wouldn't have to run and charge every hour becaue in tournament action every game is back to back.This was beyond what I wanted and I ordered two when i really only needed one! I must say that this is a new battery and I am not sure how long it takes for the charge to start to degenerate, etc. this was a good buy at a good price</review_text>
This is a great battery if you are shooting for long periods of time and dont want to have to worry about filling your pockets with extra batteries</review_text>
Purchased from camera_world for $49.These were authentic Canon batteries in original packaging. They work great and I have put them through many cycles. They hold up terrificly</review_text>
This battery, if purchased from North East Power and Battery, is not the Canon BP-945, but an equivelent.  If you are looking for the actual one from Canon, I suggest buying it straight from Amazon, not from North East Power and Battery</review_text>
I purchased these because I don't like taking my $100 binoculars to football games and rock concerts. These are perfect. The optics are a little cheap, but at $20, I think it's a steal</review_text>
these glasses are small, protable and good for concerts and quick bird work. I keep a set in the car, but they do not replace my larger busnells for birding. please don't expect to do more than a little backyard birding with these, and i am now adjusted to my larger set, so i use those in the yard. You get what you pay for</review_text>
I actually purchased 2 of these for Christmas presents.  I gave one pair to my son at a "early christmas" gathering & my husband was so enthused by the quality, I ordered another pair for him....AND received them before Christmas!  Per my husband:  "Very good quality...and compact so that they take up very little room in the glove box of my car!</review_text>
The Bushnell Powerview 12x25 is a fine, small pocket-sized binocular.  Since my wife is an avid bird watcher, we already have several binoculars of various sizes and viewing power.  Our grandson accidentally broke her small 10x25 Bushnell that we used for trips, so I researched, then bought this one from Amazon for her birthday.  She loves it.  The viewing power is a bit greater than the other and is every bit as compact, which makes it easy to pack for vacations, yet provides for a good viewing experience when enjoying the various bird populations around the country.  We both highly recommend this, and other Bushnell products</review_text>
What's not to like? Light, compact and comes with the strap, case and wipe cloth.  They are perfect.  Keep in mind 12 power can be more challeging to hold still</review_text>
Used this on a trip to Hawaii - brought the lava much closer (looked great at night). It's not difficult to focus, and provides clear images. I was not disappointed in the least.Compact size makes it pocketable - perfect for any traveler/casual user.Recommende</review_text>
Small and compact.  Let me see everyting I wanted to</review_text>
These are great little binoculars that I use quite often.  They are so compact and lightweight that I grab them whenever I leave the house - whether it be for a boat ride around the lake or just a quick ride.  I don't see quite as well when I leave my eyeglasses on and it does take a little bit more adjusting to get the focus right with eyeglasses, but they are a great pair of binoculars for the price.  I am very impressed with the quality of them.</review_text>
Great product! Great image and zoom. Captures color very well. Sound is good. Very compact. Good battery life. Still picture quality is ok. Definately recommend this product.</review_text>
My son bought this camera on his own this past summer to take videos of his friends skateboarding, etc.  His desire was to get video editing software to add sound effects, music, titles, etc.  The camera works great and does what is advertised.  Always keep in perspective that a $300 something camera will not match up with the features and extras that a $1000 something camera offers.The real reason for my posting this message relates to how to connect this camera to your PC to download videos.  This is how it will work.1. Ignore the USB connection stuff in the manual.  Good for still picture transfer and webcam stuff only.  Look at page 43 in the manual:  "PC Connection With DV Interfac Cable".  You must use this method to transfer video.2. You need a "firewire" IEEE 1394 OHCI compliant card in your computer.  I purchased and added a PCI Trendnet TFU-H33PI to my 5 year old HP XL773 computer that I also recently loaded Windows XP.3. Here is the KEY.  I bought a cheap SanMAX 4pin to 6pin 1394 cable.  Could not get the camera to be recognized by the computer OS.  With XP it should recognize the camera as soon as you connect it and turn it on with the camera set to playback mode.  XP will treat it like new hardware the first time.  I tried everything to reload the card software and search online for drivers and through forums for answers.  Then I remembered that my neighbor does video editing.  I took my sons camera over to his house and his computer recognized the PV-GS19 Panasonic camera right away.  I then plugged my SanMAX cheap cable into his computer... NOTHING.  IT WAS THE CABLE.   I borrowed his Belkin shielded $25+ cable and plugged it into my computer and it WORKED.Moral of the story.  Don't skimp on the firewire cable.  They are not all created equal.</review_text>
I was taking good video 20 minutes after opening the box.The camera is easy to use and you can compensate for dark scenes quickly by changing a  video setting with the cameras joystick.I had no trouble copying video from the camera to my computer ( XP ) via the USB connection. The windows movie maker program worked fine.Be aware that Panasonic does not supply a USB cable with its camera</review_text>
If you are looking for a camera that has everything you need to transfer movies to your computer this is NOT it. It WILL work if you get the cable and you use a software suite such as Nero (that often comes w/ DVD burners)- but these things don't come with the camera. The size of the camera is great as well as the battery life. The biggest problem, and an important one at that, is that we found this camera to have a dark picture- picture was a bit grainy and pixely and especially poor performance in low lighting. Battery life & size were not good enough to sacrifice sharp picture quality and bright picture & colors.</review_text>
This is an excellent camcorder, it small, easy to carry around, and has good battery life.  It even fits into a inexpensive carying case we had our for digital camera.  It has a lot of great features and served us well on our vacation.  Its been said before, but the only real drawback to this is the instructions. To Claridy:  The camcorder can transfer still pics from its SD slot via a USB cable, you will need firewire to transfer it to the computer or use as a webcam - both which work very well.  It also has all the necessary cables you will need if you just want to hook it up to your VHS/Home DVD burner via A/V cables and record, or just watch the playback on a TV.  It could use an external audio mic output, but we found the internal microphone is quite sensitive and met our needs very well.  Overall: Definately recomende</review_text>
This is a great camcorder.  I've read that people have problems with uploading video to the computer, but I have not tried to do that yet.  We purchased the camera to film everyday things (holidays, the dog, etc.) and it works much better than I expected.  The zoom feature is great--I can't believe how crisp the film is for things that are so far away.  I've even used the camera in place of binoculars on our travels because you can see everything on the screen so clearly.  We also play back video in the car on our way home from travels and enjoy watching it on the mini screen and listening to the audio.  The most unexpected benefit of the camera is how easy it is to take pictures from film.  We watch what we filmed on TV and just hit the picture button to snap digital photos after the fact.  It is fantastic!  I really like having the digital camera and camcorder in one; it's one less thing to carry.  Again, I can't speak to the computer upload of film, but not everyone wants to do that either.  The only drawback to the camera is that it doesn't have a light or flash.  However, we haven't found that we really needed it yet, and we have filmed a lot inside and out.  I am so happy with the camcorder!</review_text>
This camera is great! Really user friendly and takes great quality videos. The lcd screen is a touch screen which makes it simple to play back videos and work the camera. Anyone looking for a small camera thats easy to work...this is the one!!</review_text>
Great picture quality and fast focusing when zooming. Instructions are confusing regarding how to edit and go back to re-record over something</review_text>
I received my CD in a timely fashion and spent three hours playing it as soon as possible!  Thanks for the prompt service</review_text>
We purchased this camera to video my newborn son, and we have been very pleased. With all of the features that it has, there is no way to go wrong.It is easily mastered and you do not need a college education in order to operate it</review_text>
This camera is perfect for people who record family events once or twice per year and need things to be foolproof.  This thing is wonderful for casual recording, though you'll definitely want a multi-pack of DVDs, since the limited time can make changing discs a constant event.  You can't really edit these easily, but you could probably stitch a bunch of clips together to make one long movie.The only downside, other than the basicness of the features, is that you will occasionally hear the DVD spinning.  It's kind of a wobbling sound, but it's common on a lot of DVD camcorders, I guess.So, if you're a casual video jockey, a teenage girl looking for a way to make naughty videos for her captain of the football team boyfriend, or a lonely fat guy wanting to make a special show for the lady across the street...this camera is for you.  If you want to be a super video professional Oliver Stone movie director extraordinaire?SPEND MORE MONEY, YOU CHEAP GOON</review_text>
I just bought this camcorder and find it so easy to use and the best feature for me is the fact that you can view your videos on your dvd player so easily!!  I am not interested in dowloading the videos on my computer or editing them as some other reviewers mentioned, so it's perfect for me.  I just want to capture my kids in motion and am not looking to create a "perfect" movie of my kids.  I strongly recommend this product to anyone looking for a great product which is very easy to use</review_text>
Remember the cell phones of the 80's?  That's what this reminds me of.  It doubles the weight of the camera.  However, the only other downside is that I now need to carry extra tapes because I can now film EVERYTHING I want and not worry about conserving battery time.  I burned through almost 2 tapes (on long play) during a day at Disneyland, used the LCD screen the entire time and even play-back while waiting in a line.In hindsight, I wonder if 2 4-hour batteries would be a smarter purchase, but that would be one more item to keep track of.  Cameras today are SO small and light, that large hands like mine benefit from the extra weight, but only to a point.Summary:  Extra weight, but allows you to completely forget about time, and concentrate on shooting anything and everything that you want to.Michae</review_text>
My wife and I bought this for our Optura 2000MC to go on our honeymoon and found this to be very useful for day long excursions. We hardly needed to look at the power bar the whole time. Also the size was helpful because it helped balance the camera for a steadier shot. Definitley worth getting</review_text>
I bought this camera for my honeymoon, as I expected to do a lot of snorkling and thought that the price compared favorably with purchasing several waterproof disposable cameras. The camera and case functioned properly and were easy to use. The pictures taken on land turned out swell. The undersea pictures were okay, but could have been better. The flash is automatic and, in my opinion, the camera would have taken much better photographs if it could have been activated manually. All in all, great for an inexpensive vacation camera, but don't expect to take pictures like Jacques Cousteau</review_text>
I used this camera in the pool to get ready for our family cruise.  It works great.  You do need to read the manuel prior to use and follow the directions.  Works great in water in the case and works great on land with very sharp pictures</review_text>
I bought this camera at Divers Outlet in Florida City, Florida. They had 2 of them on a clearance table for $39.99 each. I went off a dive boat in Key Largo and when I was in the dive shop at the John Pennicamp State Beach down the road I noticed they had the same camera for RENTAL at a price of $25.00 for the day. I haven't developed the film yet, but the flash was ready after a few seconds between shots and you can't beat that price with a stick. The case didn't leak at all, although I only dove that "Christ Statue" which is only like 25ft down. An excellent alternative to a digital camera if your'e poor white trash like me</review_text>
Okay, first and foremost, this seems to be the camera everyone forgot, including Panasonic. Go to their website and venture to the comparison page,  and it's like no one bothered to fill out the spec sheet.If you go online and search for reviews of this camera there is no shortage of criticism from the pro set, faulting it for not having this feature or that, but once you do the research the cameras that have those features cost about a grand to two grand more!Ironically, this undeserved disdain and neglect seems to have resulted in a real deal, both affordable and versatile. It has less features than some professional cameras and more than most consumer cameras. It works great with iMovie and has been a great way for me to familiarize myself with shooting in general.  It is not HD, but neither are 99.9% of the places it will be played.Maybe as I learn more I'll become more aware of its limitations and my opinion will change and, yes, the lens is smaller than I'd like, but the 3CCD makes a huge difference in the colors and contrast.One thing to bear in mind, this is a great piece of equipment for someone who works with professional directors and videographers, but in no way a replacement for such skilled and outstanding professionals.  Basically, if you're a director or videographer you'll want a far more serious piece of equipment, but if you're a writer or art director who just wants a firmer grasp of the shooting process this is the camera for you!All in all, it's a great to learn on and great for the price. Not a bad combination at all.</review_text>
Shipping was very very fast and the cost of the paper was low enough that they still beat out everyone else I could find on the net for total price, even with having to pay shipping</review_text>
This is why sony is hot! This sexy little (yes its really small the size of a pack of cards) it takes perfect clear and crisp pictures and the battery life is a long 320mins perfect for a vacation, make sure to get a memory stick with it though, because w/o it it only holds about 15 pics. This is my first digital camera and I would definitely buy sony again</review_text>
I love this camera.  The color is great, so fun and makes me feel unique.  The screen is a great size, and it takes great pictures.  Good with the red eye issue.  The menu is great too, when you scroll thru things, it tells you what it does so you don't have to memorize it all.  Takes fast pictures, but not one after another, like I was hoping.  But it does open fast.  Don't be fooled by the big memory, you will still need a larger card.  Depending on the size pic you want, you can take about 30 to 50 pics on the memory alone.  But all in all I love this camera and it was a great buy</review_text>
This is my first digital camera, i did a lot of search and finaly i decide for the DSC-W55 in black, and is what i was looking for, small enough to have it in my purse, have a lot of functions, and is very easy to import pictures to my computer, you only connect the camera with the USB cable and you don't need to install the software that came with the camera, I have windows vista and i didn't have any problems transfering the pictures, is the best camera and the price is great, and you can choose the super saver shipping and save more.you will love this camera too, is small, very pretty, have lots of options, and take great pictures.Some one wrote in a review that this camera feels like plastic, and that's not true, looks very durable to me and I think is a good product and worth every single dollar you spend.Is easy to shoot pictures in the Auto adjustment mode, to start taking pictures the sooner you charge the battery, because this camera have an internal memory you can buy a memory card later.Well hope you have lots of fun taking pictures, Good luck..!</review_text>
I am just an average guy when it comes to using a camera. Probably below average. I started trying to use 100% Sony electronic products because my computer was a Sony and Sony-Sony linkages make for easy use. Given that, here is what I think of the product:1. It is amazing how much camera you can get for the money. Compared to just 6 months ago, or a year ago, this is a lot of camera for the money. It is very small, fits easily in your pocket, but takes great pictures. Also, it is very easy to use and recharge.2. A visit to the Sony website, suggests that Sony has new cameras coming out constantly -- new cameras that are very similar.  This makes it hard to compare cameras, even within the Sony brand, and makes you feel as if your camera is obsolete the minute you buy it.3. A problem with this camera, given it is so small -- do not shake. Your pictures will be blurry. I am a typical guy, with very little fine motor control. My hands have trouble holding small objects. Holding this camera in one hand and taking a picture -- well the results are not pleasant.4. I tend to be disappointed by the telephoto capabilities of these small cameras. I guess if you really want to zoom in, then you have to go to a big camera. But it still seems like the small cameras could offer more.5. Having said all of that, in the end, this camera is small and easy to carry, light weight, durable, and it is also easy to use. When you look at it, it looks well made. I ended up giving the camera to my in-laws, because they lost theirs. My in-laws tend to be technologically challenged. I said to them, just leave the dial set to the little green camera, and snap away. I have to say - they love this camera.Overall. For the money, a great purchase, technology is amazing. Just grab it with two hands or develop a steadier aim than I have.</review_text>
I bought this as a present for my wife.  I was looking for something that she could carry in her purse.  the automatic functions are easy and functional.  It is not an enthusiasts camera:  too hard to get into the menus.  The screen is easy to turn off(this sucks battery power).  and it even has an optical viewfinder(a rare finding lately)  the optical viewfinder helps to get steady pictures for those of us with the shakes.  The pictures are clear and the colors are excellent.  The drawback is the that sony batteries cost an arm and a leg.  The wire for downloading pix is multifunctional and very proprietary(read that as expensive if you lose it</review_text>
The Sony W55 is the followup to the successful and popular W50. It's a very good compact camera, easy to carry and easy to use, and reasonably priced - so most people will be happy with it.Not much has changed from the W50, which in this case is a good thing!One change is that the W55 is a 7 MP camera, rather than the W50's 6MP. Honestly, that's not a big plus, as they haven't made the sensor that catches the light any larger.  Same (good) lenses, same size sensor = the same (good) pictures, but not better.  (Though it might help a little on features like Smart Zoom.)The obvious change is of course the colors.  Don't make too much fun of that!  There are 4 DSC-W series cameras in our family, colors would have kept my mother-in-law from taking my sister's camera home with her.  A little personalization is a good thing.The internal memory has been expanded (to 56MB), but I've never used the internal memory on the cameras that have had it, so I'm not sure that matters much.  It might be worth knowing how to use as a backup, for another dozen or two shots if your card is full, or you have some other problem.The controls, menus and interface on the W55 are reasonably easy to use.  For example, the W55 has easy access to the various scene modes (twilight, etc), with some explanation on the screen of what those mysterious little icons mean (so you might actually use them, since it tells you what they do!). If you're new to digital photography, there will be a learning curve.  But if you've used other cameras much, especially Sonys, you can pick this up and use many of the features right away.Read the short introductory guide that comes with the camera, though!The rechargeable battery should easily last you for a full day of shooting - hundreds of shots - with no problem. (Be a little wise about turning it off when you're not using it!) So you probably don't need a second battery, unless you're going into the woods for a while.  It's nice not to have to mess with bulky AA rechargeables. Also, lithium ion batteries don't have a memory effect, so don't worry about partial recharging. Just charge the battery each night. So - before getting a second battery, try it for a while and see if you need it.But get a case - something to protect the screen, at least.  A fully closed one might help resist rain and splashes a little, too.You'll also want to get a Memory Stick Pro Duo card - Pro cards are faster, and you need the smaller Duo size with this camera. Get a 1-2GB card so you don't have to think about running out of memory too much - if you shop carefully, you can find them for so little these days that it's well worth avoiding running out of memory.  You might want a spare card if you plan to travel for more than a week, or use the video mode often - which is surprisingly good (though a bit dark) if set to fine, but uses enormous amounts of storage at that setting.You can stretch your memory, and your hard drive space, by using one of the lower-resolution settings to take snapshots.  You don't really need 7MP for all your photos!The W55 will take better photos than those credit-card type cameras that have a tiny lens system - optics will always make a difference in a camera.  Any reasonable person will be very happy with the pictures from the W55, given the size of it.The camera will be a little slow and often take disappointing pictures in low light and dark situations.  Try the High ISO mode in low light no-flash situations - the picture quality suffers some, but most people will find it useful. Realistically, no ultra-compact camera will work really well in that situation - if you need that often, think about something with a bigger lens and bigger sensor. Good light always gives the best pictures with any camera. There are limits to what you can currently expect from any ultracompact camera.The W55 offers enough controls (through the scene modes and the Program mode) to allow a fair amount of control over the pictures, for an automatic camera.The charger is fairly compact and rated 100-240V, so while you'll need a plug adapter overseas you won't need a voltage converter. The battery charger is a little slow, though probably OK.Keep this camera charged and handy, and you'll find you take a lot of pictures because it's easy to carry and easy to use</review_text>
I really love my first digital camera! I searched and I searched and I finally found what I wanted.  The pictures are crystal clear, the movie playback is exceptional - you only hear what you're supposed to, no loud background noise or static, no muffled noise.  The pictures come out so clear that after you take the picture you can zoom in 5X and count the pores on your face! I love it! I don't think I could ask for a better camera.  I hope this camera will last me atleast 4 years or more or until I graduate from college.  If one is in the market and can afford it, get this camera! There are cheaper cameras but if you want to get a camera, get a good one, that doesn't mean it has to be expensive, but in my opinion you get what you pay for. Thanks for reading. Happy buying</review_text>
After using my friend Cannon 30D and its nicely sized viewfinder i cant understand why oly made this one so small.  This magnification only helps, it doesn't fix the problem</review_text>
I have a lot of olympus manual focus lenses from my old OM-4t. I like to use these, but the E-Volt 500 has a poor viewfinder for manual focusing.The AS-ME-1 is just enough to help. It's not perfect - constricts the field of view more than I would like - but it makes manual focusing doable and reasonable for me. This doesn't magnify the smallish viewfinder very much but it makes manual focus a reasonable option.Oh yeah, it's much more comfortable against my eye than the default eyecup.</review_text>
I own an E-300 and a bag full of manual focusing Olympus and Pentax lenses, which I use in addition to some auto-focus 4/3rds ones. As a glasses wearer I was constantly adjusting my diopter and straining to get things into focus when using the manuals, the result being perhaps 25% of my shots being unusable.This little magnifier makes a big difference. On several recent outings I had absolutely great results. Most shots sharp and clear. There is a bit of a downside in that I have to work a little harder to see the readout in viewfinder, but I really don't need that.Don't expect an eye-popping change, but a change you will notice.Good product</review_text>
A number of photography review sites recommend the Eyecup Magnifier for the Olympus EVolt E-500 and I purchased it with my E-500.  The complaint is the E-500 view finder is small compared to other DSLRs on the market.  The Eyecup Magnifier fixes this problem instantly!  I was/am glad I paid the extra for it!I think Olympus should include it as a standard piece to the E-500 package, obviously that isn't going to happen.If you purchase the EVolt E-500 and can only afford one accessory, buy the Eyecup Magnifier</review_text>
OK - having read ALL 7 reviews (thank you other 7 for opening my eyes) I decided to plunk down the dough and buy one.  I wasn't able to understand why people were so diametrically opposed to this simple accessory - it was always either God's gift to cameras or useless as the day is long.  It arrived today by UPS (thanks Amazon prime - next day service!)Here's what I can tell.  I've been an Olympus user since the 2500 days - after the 2500 I graduated to the E20n - similar viewfinder - nice big image, easy to use.  I avoided the E-1, content with my E20n and wondering what the 4/3 system would bring to revolutionize cameras or become another standard.  Now I've moved to the Evolt 300 - and from day one, my biggest complaint has been "The viewfinder is too small" - still having my E20n I compared them  - sure enough the 300 is smaller than the E20n.  What's going on here?I bought my AS-ME-1 and it clicked on easier than the rubber cup does.  BAM  suddenly my view was big again - like the E20n!  I can see again.  I can seeeee again!  (little miami vice music here) And if you tweek the focus, it's a big deal.My personal theory (and I am wrong as well as right) is that it depends if you use prescription glasses.  Or maybe other prescriptions.  The eye has an entrance pupil.   The AS-ME-1 guides the light from the focus grid THROUGH that pupil.  I personally like to shoot with my glasses on.  Camera up, halfway push, fully push if happy, camera down.  My friends remove their glasses, in their mouth they go, and up to the eye goes the rubber cup - and they shoot and shoot and shoot.  They don't seem to be bothered by the E300.IF you are nearsighted your glasses make things look smaller than they actually are (ask old ben franklin who invented eyeglasses) - the AS-ME-1 counters this effect of prescription lenses.  If you remove your glasses or have 20/20 vision, well, you may like a bigger image, but it's not likely to be as big of a deal as it was for me.I'm happy - 5 stars and all that - it's a winner.   I FULLY respect the people who have given it one star.  They made me search for a reason.  I think the eyeball & vision & glasses are the key to this product being a benefit or hindrance to the shooter.  Yes, its 20% larger (1/5) - for me that's a big deal.Given the price to potential performance ratio, it's a winner for a good chunk of the population who doesn't remove their eyeglasses to snap a picture  Those with 20/20 and shoot at nightime or a dimly lit studio will have a large entrance pupil and likely not benefit.Human sensory perception has a threshold of noticability of about 10% meaning if one cup of water is 10% hotter than another it will be felt as hotter, but less than 10% and it's likely to feel the same temperature, same goes for shades of grey, and almost any perception.  It's called the 10% rule.  At 20% increase in picture size, the AS-ME-1 is pretty much guaranteed to be noticed by the human physiology, and that was the final reason I bought it.  Lets hope your experiences are good ones - I didn't say you'd like it - just notice it!  (the optics however are top notch)</review_text>
I have purchased many simulated security cameras.  The Swann Simulated Security Camera is of excellent quality construction with a housing design that would fool even the most skeptical of viewers. Long term battery life (I have had the cameras blinking light last as long as 8 months without having to change the batteries!).  Highly recommend</review_text>
You get what you pay for, great for outdoors pictures using the UV filter great color effects, and also indoors using the FL filter. A bargain for the price</review_text>
This is a great digital camera. I have no problems with it. i got it for my 1st anniversary 2 yrs ago. Its great! You can take pictures, and put xmas, valentines or birthday borders around them b4 you take the picture. It does video too, you can play back the video, but there is no sound because there is no speaker on the camera, there is a mic thuigh. So when you download the video, it will play the sound too. The camera has survivied being dropped many times. I would like to take long videos, so I am going to purchase a 4gb sd card. I feel sorry for all the people i saw complaining about the camera because i have no problems for 2 years now. The only thing is that the  batteries die quickly ( using the flash really drains the battery), so I went and bought high quality rechargable batteries, or the disposable duracell meant for digital cameras. also to the people who complained about blurry pictures, it depends what setting you have the camera on. I do not like all those different setings, they just mess up the pic. And do not use the auto feature I always use the non auto, egulr pic, with flash. All those other settings are confusing . Oh yes and great self timer for when you have noone to hold the camera</review_text>
I have no complaints. I have had this camera for over a year and a half and it has been reliable, fast, and gives me crisp, quality photos! The only option I wish this camera had was a better stabilization mode to prevent blurred pictures, but the software edits the blur without reducing the quality. Blurry pictures are not a problem as long as you know how to aim and shoot. Everyone loves playing with my camera because it has many cool features to make your photos fun! I highly recommend this camera (especially to beginners or for those who just want a simple camera that can capture those precious moments, with high quality photos). Excellent camera overall! ;</review_text>
I was extremely impressed with this camera; I felt the only not exceptional feature was its nonwithstanding aptitude for steady shots. Other than that, I felt it was fantastic, and exceeded all expectations</review_text>
great size and shape for taking along places. feels good in your hand. boots up pretty quick. like the color. impressed with features. takes decent pictures. has internal memory, as well as taking a memory card. i suggest getting a set of good rechargable batteries.</review_text>
Extremely easy to use.  Price on Amazon was terrific vs. Circuit City Offering.  Like the way you can view immediately in the DVD player.  Picture quality in sunny conditions is not good and grainy digitial picture taking</review_text>
I'd like to share the reasons why I bought this camera and strongly recommend it:1. Innovative design and size. I absolutely love the design and compact size of this camera. As any other innovative products, the form factor of this camera received mixed reviews. I think it is perfect, I have no problem handling and holding the camera when filming. You have to give credit to Sony: there is no other DVD camcorder in the market this compact, even after a year in the market.2. Media support. This should be the number one criteria when buying a DVD camcorder. I have read several reviews from other DVD camcorders complaining about issues finalizing the discs or playing them on standard DVD players. I have had no issues whatsoever with discs burned with this camera, and finalizing the discs is a very smooth process: one click and a few minutes. This camera supports DVD-R, DVD-RW and DVD+RW. Most DVD players will play all of these formats. The DVD+RW format allows you to view the disc in most DVD players without finalizing the disc, while the DVD-RW format allows you to edit and delete scenes from the disc when used in VR format (though this format is typically supported by DVD recorders only); both rewritable formats can be formatted and reused as many times as you'd like. Note that the capacity of the discs is 30 minutes in SP mode (or 60 in LP mode); this is a limitation of the size of the discs, not the camera. You can buy double-sided discs which will allow you to record 60 minutes in SP mode, but you have to manually swap the disc, so it is equivalent to using 2 different discs.3. It's a Sony camcorder. I have to mention that I have not owned other brand of camcorders, just because I've been extremely satisfied with Sony camcorders. They not only have a cool design, but they are also the best in terms of ease of use and reliability. I cannot vouch for the quality of this camcorder yet, but I expect this to last, it seems well built. It also comes with a Carl-Zeiss lens, which are among the best in the market.4. Other nice features worth mentioning:* USB cable allows you to copy any or all of the recorded scenes to your computer, even if the disc hasn't been finalized.* Almost all the functionality is driven by the touch panel, and the main menu is programmable which allows you to add only the features you use the most.OK, so this camera is not perfect, it has some areas for improvement:1. If you are buying this camcorder to take still pictures as well as recording video, this is not your camera. The resolution of the stills is only 640x480 (less than 1MP), the quality is so poor that it is not even worth using it for stills.2. Poor low-light filming and no NightShot feature included.3. No upgradeability, because of its compact size there is not a lot of room for attaching typical add-ons: microphone, flash, or headphones (though you can use an adapter on the A/V cable). The battery provided lasts for about 90 minutes, however you can buy a larger battery, the NP-FA70 which will lasts up to 180 minutes.4. At the original MSRP of $699, this camera is expensive, if you pay less than $500 for this camcorder, you are getting a good deal. If you're willing to pay over $600 for this camcorder and you're not crazy about its design/size, you might be better off buying the DCR-DVD203, at least you'll get a 1MP digital camera</review_text>
I absolutely love this DVD Camcorder.  It's so super small and user friendly I can't explain.  It is very simple to use.My only complaint and frustration is that my Sony VGC-RA710G VAIO PC and the USB software for the Sony DCR-DVD7 don't get along.  I thought for sure a Sony would be compatible with a Sony, especially since both are less than one year old.Best I can tell Windows XP professional won't recognize the USB connection to the Camcorder because the software isn't digitally signed or something.  Plus everytime I try just about any installation variation my pc gets hung up...something that it NEVER EVER EVER does.  So until Sony can answer why a Sony won't talk to a Sony I can't give the product 5 stars.This camcorder does hook up easily to a tv, and once you finalize your recordings, they will play on anything.  I can't comment on the editing software because I have only been trying to hook up the camcorder to the pc via the USB cable.  My hopes and assumptions are that I can use the software from my finalized DVD's.P.S. If any other users are experiencing this same problem or can offer any advice, it would be greatly appreciated</review_text>
This camcorder is very easy to use, light, and takes good video as well as decent stills.  My only complaint would be the disk length - the DVD still only holds 30 minutes of video.  I have found some that hold 60, but only on the Web, not in stores</review_text>
I bought this last month when the price was $549....what a difference a month makes.This is a great small and compact camcorder.  Has great audio and video and the DVD is very convienent.  I'm extremely pleased with the recorder.  The included software works, but to really get into the video editing mode, you'll need some professional software.All in all, great product and I would buy again.  Good luck</review_text>
I've been using this for about 2 weeks now and I love it!  It is very user friendly with touch-screen controls. I only wish the DVDs could last longer than a half hour, but for the size of this model I can over look that</review_text>
Works very well with little instruction.  Camera is grainy in low light, crisp in daylight.  Video is crisp, audio good.  Easy touch screen application makes this camcorder a delight to use</review_text>
The video is great.  Even at the LP setting the quality is good.  Being able to put 5,100 stills on one DVD is great.  I always carry one DVD for video and another for stills.Small, compact and easy to use.  What more could you want</review_text>
We needed an easy to use, lightweight, quality video camcorder that anyone could use.  The Sony DCR-DVD7 is GREAT. Worked excellent on vacation, our beach video images are excellent - the "EASY BUTTON" makes the whole experience of shooting video a snap. When we reviewed the video the quality was surprising very good for the price of this camcorder.  We have a JVC camcorder that we paid double the price for which I find difficult/complicated and too heavy to use.NOTE: The DVD7 is so easy to use - for example; I was holding one dog (7 month old wiggly puppy)in one arm, and using our DVD7 with the other hand to capture our other dog playing tag with a sand crab, and the video images turned out steady, focused, and clear.As for digital still images - I did not purchase this device for still images. If all I wanted was still images, I would use a disposable camera for on the beach, and our Sony digial camera for other times.Now for the software: easy and fun to use.**Battery - really does last a full hour! And I was using it for video, and play-back of the video, not still pictures.Overall impression: I wanted a point & shoot camcorder with great video images. Here is all you do: insert the DVD, turn on the power, touch the "EASY Button", and shoot. If you want a lightweight, easy to use, excellent video images, and a battery that lasts a full hour, the DCR-DVD7 is exactly all these things.</review_text>
I purchased this together with a 4 section monopod.  This head is very solid, and works very smooth.I would definitely recommend this if you are planning to use it with an SLR.  I you have a smaller point and shoot, you might want to stay away.  Before my current Rebel XTi, I used this with a PowerShot S3 IS, and the quick release lever would stick into the palm of my hand.  Very uncomfortable and distracting when you're trying to compose</review_text>
This is really a special purpose head.  Its best used for a monopod and not a tripod since you can get enough tilt range by tilting the mononpod.  The only reasons you even use this on a monopod is for quick release or for vertical shots.  Its just not flexible enough for a tripod.  For a tripod use I'd suggest either the Bogen 486 or 488 ball heads, both of which offer good value and come with quick release.In any case, note that this uses the RC2 quick release.  If you use camera supports even 20% of the time, you can just keep the quick release attached to your SLR.  I've got two other heads and all use the RC2 system.  The adapter is always on my camera and I can easily attach it to any of my tripods/monopods.  Its really easy to use and encourages me to set up the tripod/monopod when I might otherwise get too lazy</review_text>
use this on my bogen monopod. sofar so good. with this i can take vertical shot and not limited to just horizontal. very light and easy to use</review_text>
I purchased this Bogen (Manfrotto) swivel/tilt head with a Bogen (Manfrotto) monopod.  I wanted something to stabilize my camera without having to carry a tripod.  This head is great!!!  It comes with a plate that attaches to the camera.  Then you simply place the camera on the device and it snaps shut.  It is easy to pull the lever and disconnect your camera.  To prevent you from doing this accidentally, it has a safety lock that you can deploy with a flick of your thumb.  I recommend this for other folks wishing to stabilize their camera and not having to lug a tripod around</review_text>
Very well made and looks like it will hold up for a very long time!  I'm not a professional photographer, far from it, but I don't think you can go wrong with this if you have a DSLR without a huge telephoto lens to support.  I have an Olympus E-500 system and it's great with this</review_text>
This quick release tilt head works wonderful on my monopod.  I leave the top part of the head connected to my camera (Nikon D70s) all the time and when I want to use my monopod it just clicks in place to my monopod  very securely and off I go taking more pictures</review_text>
I have a Canon S3 IS & got this to go with the Manfrotto 676B monopod.  Have used it numerous times & it works great</review_text>
I've used this with two different monopods, a light-weight Manfrotto monopod that I use when I'm travelling, and a heavy-duty pro-grade Manfrotto that I use at home. This head works wonderfully and is exactly what you'd expect from a company with the reputation of Bogen</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter's camera, and it is sleek, modern, stylish and durable.  Has a couple of small pouches inside for extra memory cards. It is by far the best case available for this camera, and I highly recommend it to others.</review_text>
It very nice case.Beautiful and small. I like it so much. It good for protect my camera. I drop my camera and case to the ground 2 times. It still work well. Very nice</review_text>
This came quickly and at a very competitive price.  It works well with my Fuji S5000 camera - a noticeably wider view at minimum zoom</review_text>
I purchased this lens for my Fuji S5100 in order to take wide angle pictures of the rooms in our house.This lens works well for areas with plenty of light but if you need to use the camera's flash then you may have issues with this unit. You may require an additional flash slave unit or 2 to properly light your subject which takes you to a whole new level of photography.It seems the built in flash flips up too low and is blocked by this lens.Other then this, this lens puts out quality pictures and attaches easily to the lens adaptor that came with the S5100</review_text>
It works really well, but it's not panoramic like I was hoping it would be.  If you're looking for an enhancement you should get this, but if you're expecting too much you may be better off buying a newer digital camera</review_text>
Gives the camera a whole new selection of images at all tele settings. Excellent macro addition as well. It looks cool too</review_text>
I found that this item is worth the money spent for it. The lens fits perfectly into the adapter and operates the way it is supposed to. i am very glad I bought this item</review_text>
Five stars, even though the image quality siffers a tiny bit. For $30, what does one expect? Easy installation and use (just screw it into the filter theads on the lens, then shoot). The built-in macro adapter further simplifies shooting. All in all, a good purchase decision</review_text>
This is perfect for my Fuji S5100.  It fits perfectly well to the adapter ring which comes with my S5100. The lens arrived ontime and in perfect condition.</review_text>
I am trying my hands on taking close-up pictures for the first time. I bought this lense without really knowing how it works because I thought it will take a better close-up pictures. Indeed, it is. Not only can I take nice clear picture but I can take a close up of 6" with clarity.I tell ya, if you wanna try wide angle and you new at this and want something cheap. Get this, it worth your while. oh!! one problem that I encounter with the seller: the deliversy service not as prompt as I expected from the customer reviews. Disappointed in that sense but truly happy with the product</review_text>
This is a very roomy bag.  It has places for you to safely store your memory cards or extra batteries. Overall it is a fairly functional camera bag</review_text>
I had some gift cards so I went to buy my first digital camera. I went to a local electronics store and I had a certain financial cap. I wasn't thrilled with my choices but this camera caught my eye and I just fell in love with it. I spend more than I had planned but it was 100% worth it. the camera is very easy to hold, its not too small, and its not too big. It fits easily into my purse. the pictures are beautiful, the battery life is great and I have yet to exceed the amount of pictures I can store. I have over 300 now on the extended battery. The only gripe I have is having to reset the time every time I put the battery back in. its a minor inconvenience. The screen on the back is larger than a lot of them out now. that was a major deciding factor.. that and a good zoom. It has a very nice silver color too.for my first digital camera, this was a perfect choice.</review_text>
I've owned this camera for over a year now, and I continually find myself reaching for this one whenever I need to know I will get the shot I want. I love the quality and color of Kodak prints, as well as the ease of use for those of us who are closer to the "point and shoot" type consumers. If I had to make numerous adjustments to a camera before shooting, I would never get the pictures I want...as I'm usually taking pictures of kids or animals, or scenery, or in concerts and I love being able to snap several photos and be done while others are still busy composing one shot. It is consistent and I can rely on the end product being very good, and it is overall better about redeye than my 4 MP Olympus.(yes I have a lot of cameras!) For many years I used 35 mm Canon AE1 for everything and still love the quality you get with those, but digital is addictive. Being able to delete and retake pictures is just invaluable. I have to disagree with the other reviewer about the video clips. I inadvertently shot some video in a concert (it was dark and I turned the wheel to the wrong setting) and it simply showed up as a photo on the software and downloaded as easily as the pictures. I click on it and it plays. I find the software simple and it could have more features, but it is adequate, especially considering the price of this camera, and I don't rely solely on the Kodak software for editing, etc. I find the battery life amazing....I buy the 1800 lithium batteries and always carry an extra, but rarely have to change one on a vacation. I just returned from Ireland, shooting about 350 pix and only changed it at the end of the trip....awesome.I think one of my favorite things about this camera is the shutter lag (or lack of shutter lag), this baby is ready to go for the next shot by the time I am...it's one of the reasons I can capture so many shots and be done quickly, then sit back and enjoy the scenery and not be waiting for the camera to be ready again. My Olympus is terrible is this regard.I have to say I can't recommend the Kodak Z7590 in the same way (I've owned it over a year also), but that is another review for another time. My first digital camera was a 2 mp Kodak DX3440 and still takes awesome pictures after being dropped several times.This little camera is portable and goes into a purse easily and is lightweight, perfect for vacations or going to concerts. I think it's a little gem. There are lots of more technically qualified reviewers here to give you the specifications and details, but from a person who just likes to grab a camera and use the Auto settings....and print up to about 8 x 10 on my Canon photo printer, it is perfect. Most of my pictures turn out great, photo lab quality. (I have a i860 Canon printer)I did have one incident with this camera in Ireland when it was misting rain and the shutter failed to open all the way...I got about 3 beautiful but strange pictures with the edges of the shutter framing a gorgeous green landscape, but it was only momentary and the camera soon returned to performing perfectly, I simply dried the shutter, and got out of the rain....:)  I hope this review helps someone. If you are a pro, or advanced photographer, you will already have something a lot more sophisticated, but for the average person who just likes to take good pictures, you can't beat this camera!  Good luck!</review_text>
This camera has great quality!  The photos have unbelievable color and detail.  It is a great camera for the price.  Software is fine, but not AMAZING, but great for enhansing, color effects, cropping, and fun effects</review_text>
I've done extensive studying to find a good camera within my price range, and this one is it. Months later, I have no regrets whatsoever.I have seen the slightly newer moder, the z760, and I honestly think this one is a better deal. The z760 has one more Megapixel, but that doesn't matter to me. I have to zoom in as far as photoshop will go to see a differance, and there really isn't much of one. This odel does have a superior zoom, which is why I picked it.This one also has an automatic lens-cover, whereas the z760 and many other high zoom cameras have lens covers that you have to put on yourself, which is also easier to get lost.This one doesn't have all of the mickey-mouse options like fancy frames, but it does have the alternations that fit my needs. It has B+W, Sepia Tone, as well as the options of Low, Natural, or High color, and other options like light balance.I found out that I don't like the presets, but that's just like me. I prefer to use the manual settings, which are much easier to access than most other cameras I've used.If I had to think of a couple bad sides, I'd say that it's the image size and the need to take the battery out to charge it. This camera can only do 8x10 shots, which isn't very useful if you intend to do more professional work. The battery has to be recharged by taking it out and putting on the charger, however this problem can be solved by simply getting a dock for it. Also, like most other cameras, this one isn't very smooth with my computer. The software is a little bit confusing, but this is no problem either as long as you have an SD card reader</review_text>
This cover goes good with the case kit made for the D40. I wish the case was a little larger. I also wish they made a more custom cover that you could leave on camera in use</review_text>
We purchased this photo album as a Christmas gift for our 25 year old son who has Down Syndrome.  This has been a good purchase as he loves watching the photos he has taken himself on his digital camera.  We simply showed him how to slip his SD card into the slot and told hiim to wait for it to load.  We have it set on slideshow and after the unit is turned on, it loads and shows all of the pics on the card and loops to repeat.  This unit operates very simply.We have NOT had to "format" pictures into the unit.  We have no idea what others are complaining about.  We did purchase the leather case and do not use the frame as the on/off button, the plug for the electric cord and all other switches and ports are accessible from the case.  The leather case can substitute for the frame as it will stand by itself when opened.  The frame is clumsy and has to be opened to get to the controls.  The frame could have been engineered more logically.We also purchased the rechargable battery and this has been a good choice as well.  It makes the unit totally portable and seems to have an adequate playing time.  It has never lost power while our son has been using it.  The "portability" of this unit is the big draw and if we could make only one suggestion it would be that the battery should be part of the package rather than having to purchase it from the company separately.We are glad we purchased this item for our son as it has brought him much joy!  Had we listened to the less complimentary comments others had submitted and NOT purchased the unit, our son would have missed out on one of his favorite "gadgets".  We are rating this with 4 stars only because we think the battery should be included in the original package and replacements should be available for purchase in stores.  We also think the frame itself should have access openings to all of the switches and ports.</review_text>
These batteries are great the batteries have the following characteristics:2 123-size lithium batteries For use with photographic devices,  also works with certain calculators, pagers, watches, and more.   These batteries storage life is up to ten years.  Reliable in high and low  temperature</review_text>
I was travelling from Europe via Japan, Singapore, Australia and New Zealand to the USA. Anyhow they were handling my luggage so badly that they broke on one of those flights my charger (possibly somewhere in security). I tried several shops in Houston to buy a replacement including the SonyStyle shop. No luck at all. Went back to the hotel, had a look at amazon.com, ordered it and had it two days later delivered to my room. That's perfect service.</review_text>
Small and compact-functions well.  Good not only on the road, but also when you want to recharge your spare battery without "tying up" your camera.</review_text>
We bought this charger long after we had our camcorder. It wasn't until we purchased an extra battery and a camera that works off the same battery that we realized that charging batteries off-camera is a better practise since the camera/camcorder does sometimes get unusually warm after charging. Besides having a battery charge at home/hotel while on the road with a stand-by is a secure feeling. The device itself is very compact and sturdy with color coded LEDs to let you know when charging has completed. It fits easily (including the little power supply box) into a camera/camcorder bag and is a guaranteed travel companion.</review_text>
The product is compact and portable, seems solid and well made. The zoom is good, and the functions are all fairly simple. Hooks up to a tv easily enough.The nigh vision feature, while providing better visibility, creates more of a strobing effect than I would have liked. Also, I have not yet figured out how to transfer video to a computer (I have the right cable), but I haven't tried too hard to figure it out</review_text>
This camcorder is the best deal if you are looking for something easy to use and don't need the newest bells and whistles. It's small and light, making it easy to hold and record. The options are there for zooming, light, snapshots, etc. So far the quality has been great. Even if it lasts just a few years, at this price it was still well worth it. Would definitely recommend it</review_text>
JVC is noted for its sound quality and reliability. I am not disappointed.</review_text>
Being a camcorder novice I liked this item.  Fit my needs for recording family memories.  Just recently got it for trip to WDW.   So nice and compact, a delight to carry around since it fit in one of my purse pockets.  At the end of a day @ Disney World you appreciate compact & lightweight.  Video looks great.  Oh and I got it cheaper here @ Amazon.com than @ local Wal-mart.</review_text>
Excellent so far; however, it did not include USB cable for computer. That is my only complaint so far........</review_text>
I like this camcorder because it is small, lightweight and travels easily.  Neat little feature- you can take snapshots while recording video.  I'm very happy with the optical zoom.  The only downfall- no separate charger for the battery so the camera has to be plugged in to charge it, which is very limiting. On the upside- it charges quickly.</review_text>
Wonderful camcorder.  Very easy to use and really small.  Enjoyed it at Christmas with my grandchildren</review_text>
So far so good. Used iit only a few times. Like the feature of the still shots.</review_text>
There isn't much more to say here. This is a superb little camera, definately worth a 10 on Cnet, not the 7.0 that their review gave it! They completely got it wrong with their rating because this camera definitely deserves at least an 8.0! On here, it also gets my 5 stars!As far as the Pros go on this camera (28mm Wide Angle, 10x Optical Zoom, 3'' LCD, IS, Built-in Lens Cover), it's exactly as good as it sounds! Real life needs for real life situations for real people that loves superb photos and having the right camera to capture those moments.On the Cons side (No manual controls, No zoom in Video Mode, Average Battery Life), those are practically the only things a more ADVANCED user would care about. Manual controls are mostly for expert photographers as white balance and exposure settings are already in this camera, so I don't know what else you need. Zooming in video mode isn't important to me since I don't particularly take much video footage. And I only say average battery life because I tend to look through the photos I already shot pretty often without using the power save on the LCD, therefore, that's particularly what drains the battery. However, you usually get @ 250-270 shots per charge, without frequent previewing.Panasonic has basically taken the original TZ1 and made it even better. There's not much missing from this camera. As I've said, 28mm Wide Angle LEICA Lens, 10X Optical Zoom, 3" High Resolution Screen, Excellent Image Stabilization, etc. All this in a fairly compact camera. Panasonic has also improved the "noise" on higher ISO's. Low light performance is much better than on previous Panasonic models. The most important this is, the camera takes fantastic pictures.Another thing I'm extremely impressed with  is the construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. I love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously can't believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen without even printing them with the high resolution output. Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness and want that "Canon-like look," you could always use the camera on "Vivid Mode."It's also not much bigger or heavier than your overpriced Sony's. Plus, on here, I found it for three hundred, with a high speed 1GB Panasonic card included. What's better than that?! The only accessory I have to buy now is just the DMW-CT3-K, the leather case specifically for this camera.You really can't find the perfect digital camera, but this comes as close as you can get. Overall, I am extremely pleased. If you are looking for a great zoom camera in a small  enough form factor, you should seriously consider the DMC-TZ3. This is the best compact camera I've ever owned</review_text>
I really like this camera. It has 10x optical, image stabilization, a 3.0inch lcd with 230,000 pixels, and more. The size is great for a 10x zoom camera. Image stabilization and is great for getting shots that would come out blurry with my Canon Powershot A620. My other favorite feature besides the zoom and image stabilization, is the wide angle. It is great to finally get cityscapes and have the whole skyline in one shot!! And with the camera set to 16X9, I can get a 24mm shot!What I don't like about this camera is it's short battery life. Even with the1300mAh battery I bought, I get less shots than with my Canon. And the colors of the photos from this camera are a lot less colorful than on the Canon. That is something I will have to get used to. I was very disappointed to find out that this camera has no zoom in movie mode, unlike its predecessor, the TZ1. Luckily, that did not stop me from buying this camera. Overall, this camera is a great buy, especially if you want i.s. wide angle, and long zoom</review_text>
Extremely impressed with the TZ3. This gem should get 5 stars on construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. Love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously cant believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen w/o even printing them with the High Res output. Navigation is so easy on this camera. Something not surprising though if your already coming from another panny (FZ7 here). Picture quality is great. I tested it out today on standard and I would say its just as good as my FZ7 in daylight and better in lowlight (indoors). Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness you could always use the camera on "Vivid mode" or add a little with some post processing. The pics in Standard and natural mode PP very well. The wide angle is something new to me. Took some neat shots that looked very nice with the extra viewing angle. Very distinctive and after having this i'm not sure if I could go back.If your looking for a do it all camera this may very well be your tool of choice. Combine it's extreme versatility coupled with excellent image quality, superb lens, build, and finish you have yourself a winner.</review_text>
Upgrading to the TZ3 from a 4yr old Canon 3.2 megapixel. Waited a few months to purchase when I heard the TZ1 was being updated. With the TZ3, Panasonic has fixed the main complaints about the TZ1 which were: No build in lens cover, noisy images at higher ISO speeds. IMO, the build in lens cover alone is wirth the price permium over the TZ1.As others have said, this camera has a great build quality, easy operation, and a high-quality look. I ordered the black model and was pleasantly surprised when I opened the box. It has the look of a retro 35mm cartridge camera, which is cool. The chrome (or polished stainless steel, cant tell), is first rate and looks great with the matte black case. The LCD is huge and bright. The camera's "Simple Mode" does a great job the the other modes are fully customizable. The zoom is fantastic, but you need a really steady hand at full zoom, even with Optical Stabilization turned on. I did take some surprisingly sharp shots zoomed way in from my car as I came across a herd of deer. Shot to shot speed is really great, unless you are using the flash. The red-eye reduction works better than any other digital camera I have used. Overall, I am extremely pleased. If you are looking for a great zoom camera in a small form factor, you should seriously consider the DMC-TZ3</review_text>
I came off a Canon PowerShot S40, a little 4-megapixel brick of a camera that gave me 4 years of excellent results. That was my first digital camera after a closet-full of film Nikons.Many buffs claim that 4 megapixels is all you need, and I made a number of nice looking A3 prints. Now that I have 7 megapixels to work with, I see that I was wrong: Four is not enough. Seven is wonderful.[...]points out strongly that above ISO 200 noise is a real problem--but you always wonder just how picky they are. Well not too picky in this case. Using a higher than 200 setting (i.e., most indoor flash shots) resulted in a lot of noise, making the camera almost unusable except for the simplest 4 X 6 snapshots.But I take almost entirely outdoor shots--scenics and candids. I set the ISO at 100 and get gorgeous results. It has taken some getting used to the different color rendition of the TZ3 from my Canon. The Canon seems more balanced while the TZ3 caused reddish orange to really pop out. There is something cool (color temperature-wise, not "fashionable") about the color that is not entirely fixed in PhotoShop. Sometimes the results are marvelous, especially shots of cloudy or rainy days. Other times they are not so great--to desaturated for my taste.  So I have been playing around with the various settings--"Natural" and "Vivid." "Vivid" is closer to what I want right out of the camera, but is less easy to spruce up. "Natural" is easier to modify, so that is the setting I am using now. I also set the exposure compensation to one stop under.I was pleasantly surprised at how small the TZ3 is: it slips easily into pants pocket (but not shirt pocket). The zoom lens starting at a decent wide-angle (28mm) is utterly fantastic and really makes the camera stand out head & shoulders from the pack.Thus, I am delighted with the choice. However, to answer my question "What more could I want?", here it is:1. The selection disk ALWAYS moves when I pocket the camera, so I ALWAYS have to check, when I pull it out, to reset it to the desired setting. Its detents need to be strengthened.2. The back-side controls are too easy to activate accidentally when shooting one-handed with the fleshy part of the thumb. A headache because you then need to press "select" to get back in operation.3. DPreview is right when they moan about the Venus III sensor. It's good but, for an otherwise sensational camera like this one, not good enough</review_text>
I just received the DMC-TZ3A.  I love this camera.  This is my first camera ever.  I love the features, build quality, and menu system.  I am still getting used to learning how to take quality pictures.  For example, I have trouble getting it to focus at times.  I am certain this is just the learning curve for me.  One feature I am disappointed that it lacks is - auto retraction of the lens when in playback mode.  Most other cameras automatically retract the lens to protect it when viewing pictures from the camera.  This one does not do this and you have to turn the camera off to get it to retract.  I really wish they would update the firmware to support this important safety feature.  All-in-all I definitely recommend this camera</review_text>
I owned the first generation DMC-TZ1. The DMC-TZ3 has some welcome improvements; wider angle, automatic lens cover, maybe 25% faster shot-to-shot. In particular, the wider angle is a really useful feature.The camera's strength is in its versatile, outdoor shooting. It does best with lots of light. Indoors, the flash coverage is just ok. Shot-to-shot flash recycle time is sometimes a pokey 4 seconds. Digital picture noise is noticeable with lesser light.Setup Tips:1. Use 3x2 ratio if you primarily print 6x4 photos.2. Use vivid mode as normal mode looks washed out.</review_text>
If you are looking for a nice sized digital picture frame, do not hesitate to get this one.  It is an incredible value.  It's very durable feeling and the picture is bright, crisp, and just superb.  I got this for my mom, but am going to buy one for myself now.It has two annoyances that I would change and a few new ideas that would make this a perfect product.Annoyances:- The power switch is on the back so it makes wall hanging a bit of a problem.  This is easily overcome by plugging it into a power strip or something else that has a switch.- No random option for the slideshow (that I could find)  This should be able to be addressed with a firmware upgrade.Ideas:- Have an option to run it off of batteries so you could pass it around the room like a stack of conventional pictures- A mouse wheel type control on the side for easy scrolling up/down between pictures.- A timer so you could tell it to turn itself off from 11pm to 7am or whatever.Oh, a make sure you get the latest firmware.  You just copy it to one of the cards that this frame supports, power cycle, say yes to the upgrade, and you're done.[...</review_text>
Matsunichi seems to get it right - the price,the size, the resolution.The main problem with *all* digital frames is resolution. While typical print gives you around 200-300 dots per inch, most digital frames offer mediocre values between 72 and 100.Matsunichi offers you quite respectful 125 dots per inch. This means that images look absolutely perfect from a distance of two-three feet - even if you have 20/20 vision.Other positive things that I want to mention:- it offers excellent view angle - I would estimate it at 170 degrees and screen is bright and crisp with great (for LCD screen) color reproduction- it has usable remote control- it understands all major memory cards- it plays mp4 movies with sound, though manual says they recommend to use Compact Flash card for that (I tried SD without any problem); movies and pictures may be mixed in slideshow- it can play unprotected mp3 music in the background- the frame internal software is upgradeableFrankly, the frame ability to play mp4 movies is not so easy to use - because most digital cameras produce video clips in a different format. And it does not play DRM protected mp4 movies and music from iPod either.The bottom line here - this is just a picture frame, not a TV or music player.Now is not so good news.This frame does not have internal memory - so you need a memory card, but do not rush to buy new 2Gb unit. It seems this frame can only display first 256 images from any memory card, so that old 16Mb memory card you have received with your camera two years ago suddenly may become useful.Slideshow parameters are broken - on power on frame always resets to 10 seconds interval between pictures. Another problem is that maximum selectable interval is 30 seconds - I would prefer it to be in 10 minutes range.Because software is upgradeable there is a chance Matsunichi fixes these bugs eventually.Frame tiny internal speakers produce sound that is just laughable - do not expect anything good in this area. From other hand there is audio/video  output cable (included), so you can attach external speakers and/or TV (in standard resolution) - but I do not see how it fits with product intended usage pattern.All thing considered - this is solid 4 stars. I could give it five if not for problems mentioned above.Matsunichi seems to go in the right direction offering affordable and useful product with great consumer value.</review_text>
I had bought my mother a 7" digital picture frame from pandigital for Christmas.  After using it for a couple days, my brother and I both agreed that it wasn't a good product for my mother.  The remote control didn't work that well and the interface to the USB port wasn't working.  So we returned the product to Linens and Things were it was orginally purchased.  A month went by and my mother missed the frame. She had like being able to easily pop out the memory chip from her digital camera and plug it into the digital picture frame.  So I went on line and found the Matsunichi photo frame.  I had never heard of this brand before and was somewhat concerned about the quality of it's products.  However the reviews by other people rated this pretty good for the price.  I also upsized to 8" due to all the reviews that I had read about it being a better aspect ratio for the digital pictures coming directly off the camera memory (i.e., without having to resize).  Ease of use and simple use was key for my mother who is not a technical wiz (and will not take the time to read the manual).  This frame was a very good value - price was reasonable, picture quality very good and easy to use.  Frame was of good construction and is not cheap looking.I had also read reviews for other frames, but found several of them very expensive ranging from $150 to some over $300.  I paid $139 for this frame. Don't understand why someone would pay $300 for this size frame.I would buy from this company again.  My mom is thrilled with her new frame</review_text>
This picture frame works goods and only has one flaw. It has a power switch on the back. You have to use the power switch to turn it on. It does not turn on with the remote. If you are planning on hanging this on the wall you will need to take it down every time you want to turn it on or off. Other than that it works nice.</review_text>
The image is real sharp and bright, however, the instructions could be clearer. The grandkids like seeing themselves pop up in brilliant color</review_text>
Pros:+ Cherry (or Mahogany) frame+ Fine resolution - great color+ Good sound considering the small speakers are back mounted+ several slideshow transition and timing options+ does photos, music and videos well+ Remote is very basic (simple)Cons:- User interface is tricky to use with on screen menus at first- remote could benefit from a pause buttonI got this unit for myself but with the idea that I'll get one for my parents if it works out.  My concerns were ease of use and image quality, large picture size and price.This unit is attractive, displays nicely and is easy to operate.All my parents need to do is plug in the memory cards I send them and  turn it on.All this for under 200 bucks.  They sure pack alot of features into a small package.</review_text>
The display on this digital frame is crisp and bright, and displays photos fairly well. I would consider 800x600 a minimum resolution for a screen this size. As I intend to use this for displaying pictures only, I didn't test the video or music functions.The initial settings are annoying; the thing automatically started a slide show with random cheesy screen-wipe effects, and file information permanently on-screen. I changed the settings to manual slideshow only, no info display, long delay, full-screen transition only.The location of the buttons on the frame mean you can't see the screen and the buttons at the same time... given the inclusion of a remote, this is a small issue. The buttons are oddly placed, though... left, right, Enter, up, down. This in a straight line from left to right... not exactly good interface design.Menu options were comprehensive and surprisingly feature-rich... no complaints there.The included colored frames are okay; in my opinion, the black looks rather flat and bland, while the cherry-wood colored frame gives the whole assembly more of an interesting look.The card support on this frame is excellent; support for all the standard card types, including xD, is definitely a bonus in my book.The included leaning stand is sub-par... it basically gives the frame a bent plastic peg to lean on, and the angle adjustments are limited. The option to hang it on a wall is welcome, but then you're stuck with the problem of what to do with the big wall wart on the end of the power cord.Hopefully this was specific to my particular order, but when I opened this up, the frame looked dusty and dirty, and there were clearly visible fingerprints on the plastic screen cover. The round plastic "seal" on the box was untouched as far as I could tell, but I suspect the occasional refurbished item may be slipping into the packaging line. The plastic cover is meant to be removed anyway, and everything seemed to be working fine, so I haven't bothered to seek an RMA</review_text>
I was satisfied by the quality of the pics and the sound. It is nice to be able to change the frame and it is of real wood. NO memory inside, though plug and play was simple even for mother in law who is not familiar with the computers. Overall a good present with a reasonable price compared to the equivalents in the market</review_text>
Solved all my rechargeable batteries problems with my Olympus SP-350 Camera... Best choice I've ever made regarding this issue</review_text>
I'm not sure that ANY of the other reviewers that gave this a BAD rating have a clue as to what they are doing.1. LI-ON does not have a memory, and discharging them fully is detrimental to the batteries life! You SHOULD place them into the charger BEFORE they discharge fully!2. LI-ON are light weight, NOT because the are CHEAP, but because they do not contain heavy metals in their construction. Hey, if you need weight to think it's a quality battery, buy a nice lead acid and lug that around!3. Professionals have been waiting on LI-ON to make the leap from camcorders to cameras  (But in a common form factor, like cr-v3). LI-ON is better than NI-MH, NI-MH are better than NI-CAD, and NI-CAD are better than Lead ACID...Battery evolution.4. I'm not giving them 5 stars because I feel that for the price they could have a better charge. 1200mAh vs. 1500 or better. But I'm still getting much better performance over my old NI-MH, that seemed to lose it's charge if left overnight in the camera. Real bummer when trying to complete a shot with limited light</review_text>
I have to say, some of the things other reviewers have written have some truth to them, but this battery is a much better alternative than using 2 AA batteries, regular or rechargeable.  It retains charge longer than the NiMH type if put to constant use.  It is a great value compared to just running through standard batteries.  The charger does seem lightweight, but I don't see how that matters when it charges the battery efficiently, which it does.In a nutshell, it's worth the money spent</review_text>
These batteries are great. They last very long. Great performance. Low charging time. The normal batteries that came with the camera were dead in an hour. But these batteries last about 3 times of filling the whole memory with photos in the camera. may be more.Definitely a must have for A Nikon 3200 Coolpix. i dont know about other Nikon cameras</review_text>
Have to disagree with previous poster - the Vialta Vistaframe is superb.  I haven't seen any pixelation on my pix.  I keep the frame on my desk at work and it is much admired.  I love it to pieces.  My only complaint is its price, when they eventually come down in price I'll get one for home use.  Also the power-saving shutoff only kicks in after 2 hours which I think is too long.The reasons I bought this one over others were:*  the card compatibility*  it's stand-alone, no need to upload/download pix via computer*  the size of its screen*  the classic metal frame itself - doesn't detract from the pix, indeed when it's on you don't see the frame.Agree that a randomizer on the screenshow would be good, also would be nice to be able to specify how long the pics are on screen for.The only thing stopping me buying another for myself or as gifts for family is the price.  Love it</review_text>
While I do like this lens, when zoomed all the way out I can see the edge of the lens through the camera in a big blacked out circle around the outside edge of the video.  I'm sure a larger lens would help with that, but I think it is a good compromise due to its weight which isn't as bad as some say, it balances the camera with a larger battery pack quite well</review_text>
I took this camera to India for two months and shot some amazing pictures.  I hope to share some online after a while so you can see what kind of pictures this machine gets.  I won't bore you with details, for you can read exhaustive specs on other websites.  Nonetheless, this is a superb camera that deserves to be bought, by you, that is</review_text>
After working with 35mm cameras such as most of the "F series" Nikons, and other formats, I was searching for a digital camera that would give me the same results and maybe surpass because of the digital capabilities.  Well, after spending quite a bit of money purchasing some of the digitals, I never felt that "wow effect" until I came across this beauty.  First, I did as most smart consumers do and researched as well as read the reviews.  The reviews and specs were good enough to purchase this model above all the others including other Panasonics.  This camera takes amazing shots, and still allows you to manually change the settings if you choose to do so. A plus to this is by inserting a high capacity memory card, you can shoot a video scene for the length of the mem card. Of course this does not take the place of a quality camcorder, nor can you adjust any of the settings once you are in video mode such as zoom, but the feature alone plus the quality is awesome. This past summer we took this camera on vacation with us and shot beautiful sunsets and great video of our son surfing.  I have dozens of cd's with incredible video footage even the birth of our first grandson.  I recommend this camera 100%, and it can still be had for less than $300. if you shop around. If you want a quality digital with a 35mm feel then go for it! One more very important thing, the accessories are very expensive if you buy them from Panasonic. This beauty has a hot shoe for an extra flash and now here's the kicker, I decided to see if my Vivitar 283 flash would work on the camera and YES it did. As a matter of fact all my flashes work,but of course they should be used for extreme cases because the built in flash is great. As a matter a fact, I've only had to use it once on a night shot and the results were awesome as is this camera.</review_text>
I got LUCKY with this camera!!  My hubby bought a new digital SLR Cannon rebel XT paying $899 last year then he had to buy the telephoto lens needless to say we have over 1200 dollars involved, and I wanted a Macro lens for my insect shots which we never got.  I found this camera at the local Goodwill store in the display case for $15.00 and took a chance it worked.  I LOVE THIS CAMERA!!  It does everything my hubby's does without having to change any lens's.  I learned to operate it in no time at all.  The ONLY drawback is the battery doesn't last long...I guess that's why there was 2 extra in the box.  I love it for the insect shots if nothing else!  I carry in my jeans pocket a Pentax 7meg. I just bought and it also is a great camera, but paid $200 for it on QVC</review_text>
This is an excellent camera except for the size. I had it for almost 8 months and very happy with it. Recommend it if you don't care about the bulkiness.</review_text>
I bought (and returned) 2 other cameras before this one. They were the Kodak Z612 and Canon powershot S2. This one is by far the best. The image stabilization is incredible, colors are natural. I am very pleased with it</review_text>
This camera is great! Not only does it take great digital photos and is extremely user friendly, but if you add a 1GB memory card to it (which slides right in and only costs about $40.00) you can take a LOT of great quality digital videos with sound that are very easy to upload to your computer and/or the internet and email to family etc. In fact, there is no need to buy a video camera when you have this and it fits right in your pocket. I can take up to 30 minute videos and lots of photos at one time. You can easily take a photo while you are making a video as well</review_text>
This has got to be the best camera for the money that you can buy right now!! I was looking for an affordable camera, small and thin, a well-known name brand, takes sharp digital photos, can shoot at low light, uses cheap SD cards, good-sized LCD display, and can take decent videos. Well, this Casio Exilim is everything and more, and at a great price. I have used it so much during my out-of-state travels without running out of power or memory (I bought a 2gb SD card for $20 at [...] and I can take more a 1000 hi-res photos or about an hour of video). I was absolutely surprised at how good the videos are that I can shoot on this small digital camera, that now I have decided not to buy a new video camcorder, as this Casio Exilim is all that I would need for any occasion. If you're in the market for a great camera, look no further than the Casio Exilim</review_text>
its sleek and easy to use. it takes great pictures and has alot of feature</review_text>
It is a great camera, very small and gives very good photos in most circumstances.  Grainy pic in dim light. Go to the casio website to download the new firmware for 4GB SD card compatibility.  You will get over 1500 high res photos with a 4 GB card, where outpost is selling for 5o dollars a car</review_text>
I own a Nikon Coolpix 3100 camera and have no complaints with it, except for the fact that its size (even though it's fairly small) is a pain to carry around when you want to take pictures. Looking for a much thinner camera, I came across this one and was quite pleasantly surprised at its size, and its ability to take really great shots! I'm merely a birthday - holiday type picture taker, but this camera will definitely enable me to take more pictures, because I'll be carrying it around in my pockety whennever I go somewhere that might provide a photo opportunity.</review_text>
This really is a great camera (for it's purpose!) This isn't a camera to get if you want super-fine shots or are some kind of amateur photographer.   If you want a camera to preserve memories, snap shots during travel, parties, etc, this is the one to get.Here are a few of my favorite things about the camera:Solid construction.  The thing just reeks of quality.Very fast startup time - not only is it easy to fit in a pocket so you can grab it while other idiots are unzipping their camera bags, but it starts up so fast that you're taking a picture before you know it.Portability - I've taken this everywhere.  I've gotten great pictures I'd have never gotten otherwise because this camera is small, unobtrusive, always available, etc.I'm very happy with this purchase & my next digital camera (sooner or later people will laugh at 5 megapixels) will definitely be a card/small sized Casio</review_text>
This product exceeded my expectations in performance, picture quality and ease of use its excellent.I have already recommended this product to 4 of my friends, its a must have gadget and with the 8 inch screen it just capitavates you every time you look at it.Well worth buying</review_text>
That's what I attempted to do. If you are planning on doing the same learn from my mistake and do not buy this product</review_text>
noticeable difference when used, and I live in smoggy VEGAS! so I can tell, can't beat the price, I give it two thumbs up</review_text>
This UV filter does it job to protect the lens well. The build is solid (metal construction). The glass is also descent quality.About the performance, it absorbs some UV light. The UV light absorbtion is hardly noticeable, probably the sky 1-A and the haze filter version will absorb more UV light than this lens which is fine for me.Now, about the one problem which is the internal reflection. I've heard many people say that it mostly happens during night or low light shooting. I found out that it is not caused directly by the low light/night situation. The internal reflection will appear when there is a strong/bright source of light in comparison to the overall exposure (the surrounding environment). To put it in example (which hopefully is easier to understand), when you take a picture of a lamp during nightime and the light is much brighter than the surrounding area then you will see the internal reflection. as you move the position of the light to be closer to the sides/corner of the picture (and not in the center of the picture), the internal reflection reduces and finally dissapear (if you move the light far enough from the center). And if the light isn't too bright/contrast compare to the surrounding environment then there will be no internal reflection. but of course most of the time, a lamp at nightime is often very bright. But the point that I'm trying to make is that the internal reflection doesn't happen all the time during low light or night time.Additionally, the internal reflection isn't only happening at night. it can also happen in the afternoon if you are taking a picture of a sun for example. basically same rule as above, on how bright is the light source compared to the surrounding area, and as you move the sun from the center of the photo and near the side the internal reflection will move to the side/dissapear (also depending the angle). But the best way is just to remove the filter during these situations.Hope this explanation helps you to reduce the occurence of internal reflection by identifying correctly when the internal reflection will occur and then remove the filter during those situation (which is not hard to do).I'm actually not a fan of lens filter (any filter) as I think it will only degrade picture quality as we added another layer between the sensor and object, but I decided to use them anyway for all my lens. And I would recommend everyone to get one of this filter if you don't have any filter for your lens yet.</review_text>
Great build quality and comes with a solid case.Does the job its supposed to do and has good optics</review_text>
I purchased the 55mm filter for my Konica Minalta 18-70mm lens.  The quality of the filter is excellent.  My photographs are exceptionally sharp and, of course, the filter protects the lens.When using the lens at 18mm, due to the thickness of the filter band, a small bit of vinetting is evident.  This is to be expected with a standard filter used at a strong wide angle focal length.  For those doing extensive wide angle photography, a special thin banded filter is a better choice.Overall, an excellent filter at a great price</review_text>
My wife purchased one these frames for her desk at work about a year ago.  She liked it so much we bought one for our daughter who just had a new baby.</review_text>
This item is the best resolution on the market today, and the wood grain frame looks great. The functionality is good and simple once you get used to it. Capabilities for USB and Memory Card are very versatile. Out of the box, i was up and running in under 15 minutes. My only complaint is that the frame doesn't autorotate, but it's great that it has it's own hard drive you can save photos too. If you can drop the $200, it is a great digital photo frame.</review_text>
This was one of the best presents that I ever gave my elderly mother. It has kept her in touch with the members of her family who are scattered across three continents and bring them to her home. She loves it - once you have programmed it, it requires no maintenance, not turning on and off, nothing. It switches itself on automatically every day and displays anything up to 300 photographs in sequence or randomly. A great present. Only one small complaint - the device downloads images from a card onto its own rather limited menory in a rather unpredictable and uncontrollable fashion. I believe more recent models have fixed this problem. But don't let this put you off. You can give someone great pleasure by offering it to them</review_text>
Did a lot of size and price comparison and this one was one of the best for the size picture that came along with it. Minor annoyances = (1) always have to keep the frame plugged into an outlet, (2) resizing your pictures realy takes away from the quality and size of the output on the frame so keeping your pictures bigger is better but you get fewer numbers of pictures to save, and (3) using the menu and menu buttons takes a little getting used to. Other than that, I have no complaints with the frame. I really wanted one that had music to go along with it, or an alarm clock that played a favorite song or something to that affect....but for the price and quality of the images this one is hard to beat.</review_text>
I bought this picture frame for my dad for Christmas.  I thought it would be a great gift because he is somewhat home bound and he has alot of pictures.  I used the SD Card slot to put pictures on and they display really great.  He had some black and white pictures and some pictues in color and they both look clear and sharp and bright.  He was pretty excited to see what the frame could do and wants even more of his pictures to be scanned in and put on display.  It is always gratifying to have your gift appreciated...and this one certainly was</review_text>
This is a surprisingly very good camera. Though it is a 4MP camera, the picture quality is so much better than other 5 or 6MP cameras. We had the chance to do the comparison when we (with a group of friends) took a lot of pictures in the park using different types of cameras. The pics from the DSC-S60 was so much brighter and clearer.I guess the only problem with the DSC-S60 is that it is quite bulky (compared to similar models). It could be quite a pain carrying this around for a whole day.</review_text>
I bought this camera back in September when it was new for $200... Now I see that the price is a mere $140. Wow! Point and shoot cameras go down in value quickly! I originally wanted to get a film SLR camera but I didn't know much about cameras and I needed something quick and easy to pick up and learn. And at that time the cheapest film SLR was also $200. I figured I'd probably be spending more on film and developing in the long run so I just got this camera instead. It came with 2 regular AA batteries, an AV/USB cable, a thin cotton sleeve, carrying strap, instructions, warranty info, and a cd rom.At first it was pretty easy to use. All I ended up photographing in the first few days were just simple little things around town or around the house or whatever using auto mode. The first picture I took was of my dog. A few days later I had to buy some rechargeable batteries because lets face it, regular alkalines will not last long for high-draining devices. I started taking more and more pictures in the following weeks experimenting with different scene settings and learning about adjusting to lighting and focusing and my camera did it's job without any problems. It was very easy to use and that's what I liked about it. And it's decent in size also. I could just put it in my bag and I'm off to wherever.Once I filled up the 32MBs of internal memory I went out and picked up the largest capacity memory stick Best Buy had which was a 512MB MS DUO for around $60 and it was well worth it. I wanted the DUO because I like to view my photos on my PSP! In the following months I also picked up the VAD-PEB lens adaptor, a wide angle and telephoto lens and also some filters and basically maxed out this camera to its full potential.Overall I'm pretty impressed with this camera. It's simple to use features make it easy for anyone to pick up and take great photos. Over the months that I have had it I've definetley seen improvements in my photography skills and I've basically learned all its' features and mastered this camera. Before I was just pointing and shooting here and there... I just got back from a trip down on the Oregon Coast and I've taken some breathtaking photos that even people with DSLRs are impressed. I've also used it to record me riding bmx too. Seeing that I've learned a thing or two about taking amazing pictures I am more than happy because I never knew anything about photography before I picked up this camera and now it's my second favorite hobby.To see that this camera has gone down in price-- well I can't recommend it enough for you beginners. But don't be fooled by the fact it's only a point and shoot. Give it some time and be creative because you will eventually learn how to take amazing pictures. If you want the best out of this camera though, be sure to pick up the VAD-PEB ring, a 512MB memory stick, and a bunch of lenses and filters and you will have one of the finest 4.1 MP cameras on the market for sure.Eventually I will end up picking up a Nikon DSLR camera because this little Sony camera is only the beginning of my passion for photography. But I will not be sad when I lay this camera down! It has taught me the basics with ease and for that I am thankful.And the reason I give it only 4 stars is for the following reasons below.1. If you get the VAD-PEB ring adaptor, your flash will be blocked.2. Zooming really far increases the chances of blurred pics. But it's nothing a little ISO 400 and tripod can't fix.3. Night pictures take awhile to process and will normally come out blurry if you can't hold your camera still. Otherwise, back to the tripod.4. Focusing only on certain subjects takes awhile to learn. But like I said, give it time</review_text>
I purchased the DSC-S90 4.1 camera for myself for christmas from Best Buy because I had $70 in certificates for them.  The Carl Zeis lens is great and it takes beautiful pictures up to 8x10 and 11x14 are good.  It has so many features and the battery life is great.  It came with a charger and two sony batteries, but I use regular Duracell Alkaline batteries and can fill up a memory stick (256K) without changing them.  A big improvement over the old one I had.  I used it in Hawaii and found the video to be good as well and it also records voice.   For the person who has a problem with the batteries and memory stick in the same compartment, just turn the camera upside down to remove the memory stick and your batteries won't fall out.  I would recommend the camera and plan to buy another for my son.  Buy your memory sticks on Amazon.com and the price is good.  I paid $30 + for my 256 memory pro and at the rate I take pictures that is the equivilent of four 4packs of 400asa film.  Not so bad when you think of it that way.</review_text>
Do not buy standard batteries for your digital camera's, you will be disappointed,  (15 to 30 min of battery life).Walmart sell four AA NiMH  Nickel-Metal Hydride bateries and a charger (brand Energizer) for about $15.00.You keep two batteries in your camera and two charged in your camera case, and battery life will never be a problem.Dont forget your charger on trips</review_text>
I liked it and it is working fine.Consno USB cable and night times is not the right time to shoot video or photo both.</review_text>
I purchased this camcorder with a lot of hesitancy because of the reviews it received here on Amazon, but for the price I got it for, it was hard to refuse.First, the camera is very lightweight and sturdy in construction. If handled delicately, I don't foresee any spontaneous operational issues appearing. If you drop it and kick it around, then sure, it's going to break and not function correctly.I am very pleased with the quality of film that it has produced. I am an amateur photographer and videographer, and I have no complaints personally about this particular model. It functions well in all light, and I was especially impressed with how it did in low-light. I found that reading the manual thoroughly and understanding the cameras functions helped me immensely to avoid problems.Overall, I am pleased with it and am glad that I chose it. I have full faith in this camera, and that is why it's going to be used on an Alaskan cruise, and to film my wedding this summer. It's a great camera for the price.Now, I do have a couple of rants about it.- When in a specialized mode while filming, the display is very slow. So I haven't been able to have "real time filming" and when I am shooting something, and I see it on-screen, it's already happened and something else is going on.- The camera does not come with any extras, which meant that we had to run to the store to get the Mini DV tapes required to start using it immediately.- The BIGGEST issue that actually caused me a lot of frustration and anger was that with this camera you CANNOT transfer your film to your computer through USB. With my other cameras, I have always been able to transfer all digital images (movies and stills) over USB. Not with this. You have to have a special cable (Firewire 4 pin to 4 pin) AND you have to have the port for it IN your computer. Most average computer users do not have this port (I have a new Dell Dimension) So, I have to go and buy the Firewire port ($14.99), open my computer case and physically install the hardware. The firewire cable itself is really inexpensive. For someone who doesn't know about computers and needs this port, it could honestly cost you quite a bit to have it installed for you. It turns into a lot of hassel, which isn't very appealing for todays technological consumer.Overall, I rate it a good camera for the money, but I do not like the issue with the firewire cable.</review_text>
I bought this camera 3 months ago and have used it a few times. Last week all of a sudden the pictures look out of focus and over-exposed. I haven't changed anything or done anything. I have no idea what's wrong with the camera, but given the price I'm pretty annoyed and Amazon.com will not refund my money because it has been over 30 days</review_text>
I just got this camera for Christmas.  I hate reading directions, so I popped the battery and memory card in and I was off!  Very user friendly, and has all the right options. Plus, its about the size of the average cell phone. The coolest thing about the powershot is that it knows which way you're holding the camera, so if you hold it vertical to get a tall shot, the viewer turns all by itself.   I also love that you can edit video on the camera and set up slide shows.  Its very easy to load pics onto my computer with the USB connection - or to set up a slide show for the TV.  It even holds voice memos and has cute sound effects when I take pictures.  This is really a great camera</review_text>
i bought this for my teen age daughter for xmas, and she loves it. it's easy to use and takes super great pictures. thanks for helping my make her happy</review_text>
I've had the camera for over a year, and taken several thousand pictures with it. It's pretty darn good overall. I've been pleased with the image quality, especially for scenery shots. It does fall somewhat short with portraits of people in many cases, though. Easy to use. Minor durability problems.</review_text>
Gave this to the in-laws for Cristmas and they were taking pictures the next time we went to visit. Definitely buy additional memory, the internal memory is really more of a back-up</review_text>
This camera works great.  And the batteries last quite awhile too.  Good quality pictures.  A good deal for the price</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife for Christmas and after I bought it she was talking and said she did not like HP products. Well she opened it on Christmas and said it looked nice. After she took about 40 pictures with it I could not pry it out of her hand with a crowbar.. It takes great pictures and is very easy to work. She even let me take a couple of pictures with it. So it shows you don't have to spend a lot of money to get a great camera. Keep up the great work HP..</review_text>
My husband got this for me as a present and I love it.  Easy to use.</review_text>
I bought this for my mother...she loves it! Its easy for her to use and the screen is large enough for her to view.  The print quality is excellent.  I got more (merchandise and quality) with this HP brand than I would had with any other brand.  The price was excellent too.  Good job Hewlett Packard for making me a "smart" person</review_text>
This camera is basically the norm in disposable cameras, and it isn't too hard to see why. If you just want a cheap camera that works well and very reliably, this is the one for you. If only this camera could have zoom, but that is asking far, far too much from a disposable. Also, try smacking the bottom of this camera to set off the flash without taking a picture; just a useless tip</review_text>
This is a simple flash that just fills a need for somebody who wants better results than the built-in flash of a Nikon dSLR camera without extra complexity. It does what it does, and quite well.The only controls on the unit itself is a on/off switch and a bounce angle. The camera's iTTL function does the work, and I have no complaints about the results. Just a perfect solution to get a softer, more diffused lighting for indoor photography by allowing you to bounce the light rather than direct illumination. The body is quite compact, and when mounted to my D80 body does not throw off the balance in my hands. It even is compact enough to fit inside of some camera cases while still attached to the body.It is also versatile in that you can improvise a bounce-diffuser for low-cost. Just cut a piece of 4x6 inkjet photo print paper to the same width of the flash, fold it in a "L" shape and mount it to the flash with a rubber band above and just behind the strobe. When the flash is pointed up to bounce, some of the light gets reflected forward by the paper behind the light and fills the subject a little better. Does the same as $40+ aftermarket reflector/diffusers.The SB-400 by no means will do the same job as a SB-800, because that flash is made to give more options for the professional in more demanding situations. But for somebody wanting a flash for simple indoor photography (perhaps not a large public hall) where there is a desire to bounce the flash for better photos, or shoot from a little bit longer range, this does the job for not a great deal of money.It would be better if the light could swivel as well as be angled upward for more bounce options. If that's important to you, then the SB-600 or SB-800 might be the right choice</review_text>
This is a very well thought out product - you get all of the pro features you need in a very small and affordable package.It's a full TTL flash for Nikon cameras - meaning that the camera will meter the scene and adjust the flash timing and power to match what you are shooting, all automatically. As such, it is very hard to take one of those terrible, washed out flash pictures.The flash unit itself is mounted so that it can easily be tilted for flash bouncing to give a warmer lighting effect off the ceiling - and the way it is put together means it is still very compact. Very clever. In fact, the unit is so small that it is easy to carry with you just in case you need it.Finally, you get Nikon quality - build is very good, and it is supplied with a nice padded case.All of this for little more than the price of a generic flash unit from a camera store!</review_text>
Great addition to gadget bags when the smaller version just won't do</review_text>
Although, my Nikon D50 has the built in flash but I got this any way.  This did help me taking indoor shots with low light environment.  If you can afford it, get it.  Feature that I most like about it is the flsh angle.Cons: Takes AA battery.  I would prefer chargeble option from camera</review_text>
Being fairly new to the DSLR world, I'm constantly learning how to get the best out of my D50. This flash has been the most important piece to the puzzle to get the results I want. I was very frustrated when I always got the washed out look when shooting indoor photos of my newborn son. Once I learned about flash bounce and purchased the SB-4oo, I really started to get the results I was looking for. The skin tones are much more natural and it really illuminates the background and provides great fill light. Excellent purchase, a must if shooting indoor shots</review_text>
Simple- this is the fastest way to make your flash photos look DRAMATICALLY better.  Off camera flash is the way to go- just try it and see.For photos of my child up close, I wouldn't do it any other way now.</review_text>
Highly recommend.  Huge difference in pictures.   I was quite amazed and cannot live without it anymore</review_text>
Its small and works well, slightly better than the built in. Nothing amazing but seems to integrate nicely with the exposure/flash functio</review_text>
If you need a small flash that is a lot more powerful than the on-camera flash on your compatible Nikon camera, this is a great flash. More than anything, it's a better than on-camera flash that also has bounce capability, which none of the on-camera flashes do. For me, it doesn't replace a full-featured flash like and SB-800 or SB-600, but is a lot smaller and lighter for many times when you don't need the big mama. It's not powerful enough for instance to bounce if the ceiling is higher than 10 or 11 feet with lower ISO settings, where the SB-800 can still reach. I have found I don't use it as often as I thought I would, but that's really because I've not gotten into the habit of using a fill-flash as much as I should. That's not the fault of the flash.It is fully automatic, which really means there's nothing to set or control on this unit. If your camera isn't compatible, basically this flash won't work for you. If it is compatible, it works great and seamlessly. I use it with a D200, D70 and CP8400, and it works great with all of them.One thing to keep in mind is if you were thinking of using it as a "better" main flash on for instance a D200 in wireless remote flash mode, think again. Only the actual in-camera flash can be used in the remote commander mode on a D200. And, this unit is NOT capable of being a remote flash in wireless flash, either. So basically, don't consider it as part of wireless remote flash operation. It's a better than in-camera flash, not a wireless flash.Also keep in mind as far as I know in the Coolpix line only the 8400 and 8800 are fully compatible with this. Most of the newer DSLRs are, though. If your camera isn't i-TTL, it's not the flash for you. Check the compatibility before you buy.If you want a small and fully integrated flash for your Nikon digital, it's a great unit.</review_text>
love love love this camera.Simple, easy to use, just point and shoot.  I handed this off to my husband with no instructions one day and said "take some pictures"!  He turned it on, saw the button for taking pictures, found the zoom button and was off!  He was so impressed, I kept telling him that Fujis are really intuitive and now he believes me!Takes wonderful pictures, nothing to complain about.  Does fine in low-light, outside, sunny days, cloudy days.  I haven't found a situation where it doesn't work well.  There are all sorts of manual settings you can use if you want to, having fun with the dual picture option (takes two pictures in a row, one with flash, one without flash), or just let the camera decide for you based upon the situation.Definitely recommended to my friends, and I just LOVE the orange color.  Sure makes it easier to find when you put it down on a covered end table! :</review_text>
good camera! back is all screen which is great. good settings, good zoom, good quality. definitely recommend!</review_text>
More than what i expected. A great digital camera with lots of great functions. Plus, very easy to operate. For those who are not interested in reading instructions, i think this is the one for you. Overall, i really like it. Everywhere i go, i always have my Fuji V10 with me. My husband thought it was a toy camera when he first saw it, but when he started to use it, he fell in love with it. i strongly recommend it.</review_text>
To be honest, I am more particular to Canon and Sony cameras, but my wife got this for herself so I got to play with it. It has a very nice LCD screen, decent battery life, and easy to navigate menus and controls. It's comfortable to hold. The pictures it produces don't seem any different then my Canon and Sony cameras for computer and web images, but I haven't tried any prints yet.I don't think it turns on quickly enough, not like my Canon and Sony point and shoots. My style is "shooting from the hip" so to speak, at random, sudden, and unpredictable moments. Also, the USB cable it uses to connect to the computer is not standard, and it does not work with the same cable my other cameras use(they all work with the same cable), but it comes with its own. Or just get a card reader. Have fun</review_text>
I also bought the 512mb memory card and it is taking me forever to use it up.  I love how easy this camera is to use.  My 4 year old neice has figured it out.  VERY USER FRIENDLY.  I would highly recommend this to anyone.  Great quality pictures and super long battery time</review_text>
I SHOPPED THIS CAMERA BEFORE CHRISTMAS AND WAS READY TO PURCHASE AT RITZ CAMERA FOR [...] PLUS THE LARGE MEMORY CARD AND SPARE BATTERY. WHILE SHOPPING ON THE INTERNET I REMEMBERED AMAZON.COM AND AFTER A THOROUGH SEARCH I PURCHASED THE WHOLE PACKAGE FOR LESS THAN [...]. THIS IS MY FOURTH DIGITAL CAMERA AND TODATE THIS IS THE VERY BEST UNIT . USER FRIENDLY, EXCELLENT MACRO FUNCTIONS,GREAT MINI-VIDEOS,ETC, I LIKE IT SO MUCH THAT I AM GOING TO PURCHASE A DUPLICATE FUJI V10 FOT MY WIFE.</review_text>
I bought this for my 9 year old daughter and she loves it.  She can use all the functions and make movies.  Very easy to use and takes great pictures.  Would be good for a begining photographer, great price too</review_text>
I have only used the camera once to date, but it is simple to use, the small size is great, the large screen is super, the features are great for a camera in its price range, and the pictures are as good or better than I expected</review_text>
I got the red one!  Waited a month or so for this camera to finally become available and I love it.  I also wanted a camera I could put in my pocket and go.....have a 35 mm digital camera....found it too big to lug around.  Am going on a cruise (17 days and counting!) and wanted a compact camera.  This camera is unbelievable....easy to use, great pictures and fun!  Members of my family have taken it out of my hand and  are able to immediately start using it.  Got some great pics of the 3 grandkids...blew one up to 8x10...beautiful picture.  I too now carry my camera with me all the time and have gotten a lot of impromptu pictures!  Battery life is great...also bought a back up so will not be without while on cruise.  Have 2 MG high speed pro duo card....have not come close to running out of room (I do download periodically!).If you are looking for a compact camera that is easy to use and takes geat pictues (and has a good battery - my first digital camera ate batteries...so this is important to me!)....I highly recommend the Sony T100 - and go for the red...it is cool!!  Oh...love the large screen too</review_text>
I received my DSC-T100 Sony Cybershot about 2 weeks ago. It's a wonderful camera. I'm not a professional photographer by any means. I found myself tired of lugging around a larger camera everytime we went on vacation (and found I didn't really use one much when we weren't on vacation). By not using my camera very often, of course, I forgot most of it's features. My pictures generally reflected that. I really wanted a camera I could have with me all the time and use more often.This Sony Cybershot fit the bill exactly!!! I ordered a small camera holder than I thread onto my belt. I carry my camera with me every day now. I've gotten so many pictures since I've been carrying it. It's so easy to just  open and start taking pics. It's ready instantly and takes TERRIFIC pictures. On top of that, I'm actually able to use features on the camera since I'm using it more often. I'm also taking video with it and finding it's very simple and takes great video.I suppose time will tell how well built it is by carrying it around with me every day. It feels very solid. Being a smaller camera, I'm having to learn where to place (or more appropriately NOT PLACE my hands) when taking pics. I've gotten my finger in the pic a time or two by not paying attention. But that's just a matter of getting used to it. I'm really looking forward while traveling not having to lug around a camera and all the necessary equipment with it. The battery has lasted wonderfully. It really does hold it's charge well (as advertised). I went ahead and bit the bullet and put a 4 gig stick in it to make sure and have plenty of room. It's amazing!!! I've taken many pics and lot's of video and still have a HUGE amount of space left on the stick. Wow!!! This is wonderful!!! I truly feel I made the right choice with this. I've taken pics in restaurants, rest stops on the interstate, the grave site of my dad, video at the beach, etc. This camera really does the trick. I can see that I will be using it all the time (again, assuming it lasts well...time will tell)</review_text>
The DSC-T100 is a very good camera and I would highly recommend it. I have had several generations of the Cybershot series (DSC-T1, DSC-T9 and now the DSC-T100) and they've all been great, high quality cameras.This camera takes beautiful pictures. The pictures are clear, little to no white bleeding, with superb colors and great contrast. The lens is bigger than previous models so it works better in low light conditions and apparently this camera uses the noise reduction technology used in the new high end Sony cameras so the pictures should be less noisy when it's dark too.The movie quality is 640x480 at 30 frames per second with audio. And unlike the previous models you can zoom while recording movies (BIG plus!), whereas in the previous models you were locked at whatever zoom level you set before you began recording. Also, the movies are saved into MPG and not Quicktime so you're not locked into a video format.The camera is bigger than the previous top-end models, but not by much. I imagine they made the change to fit in the 5x optical zoom (over the previous 3x). And while they had the extra depth they threw in a 3 inch LCD (instead of 2.5) and a larger battery (to drive the larger LCD no doubt). I personally preferred the feel of the DSC-T9, but I accept the trading of features for a bit more size.The downsides to the camera are few and minor, and if I could I would have given this product a 4.5/5, but they don't let you do that. But, here are the problems I have with this camera.1. Reduced Buttons: From the previous models they removed buttons and replaced them with software driven menus. While I do not mind software menus, I do mind not having a choice between using the software menus and using physical buttons. They really should have included a button for delete and I really want a switch to pick between movie mode and picture mode. It takes a few extra seconds to switch from the previous models and I don't like that. Companies seem to think that it makes something easier to use if they make it software driven, but really it makes it harder and slower to use.2. Options Not Very Accessible: The software menus impose too many limitations. I should be able to cycle through all flash options with the flash button in auto mode, but I have to go into program auto mode to do it, and I have to use the software menus to do it. This camera has the ability to set a brighter flash or a dimmer flash, but it takes so long to change that I won't ever be able to use it. The same type of problem applies to the red eye reduction (although, I don't think it's necessary because it doesn't seem to have red eye problems since the flash is further away from the lens).3. The camera is still missing options that the DSC-T1 had. When I bought my DSC-T9 I remembered being so angry that they changed and removed options, and still they're missing. For example, you can cycle through different display levels (normal, normal with histogram, bright, etc.). On the DSC-T1 there was an option to turn off the backlight, which increased the battery time dramatically. But, you can't do this on the newer DSC-T9 or even the newest DSC-T100 models.4. It's a Sony so you pay a lot more for it. The camera is a reasonable price, but to make it useful you need to buy a Memory Stick Pro Duo, which costs a considerable amount more than SD cards (even though they are the same technology). You also may want the docking station, which is far overpriced, and all of the various other peripherals are more expensive then this should be also.Don't let the negatives discourage you though. This is a good product a Sony deserves praise for making it. I just wish they'd consult with me before they marketed it. :</review_text>
This is the 4th Sony camera I've had and each time they keep getting better (which is why I've bought 4). This newest one, I got the red, is the best looking camera I've seen (and everyone agrees). However, I have a few qualms with it from my first uses. 1st they got rid of the review button on the left hand side of the t-pad and instead copied all the other camera makers and added a view button on top. While this works OK, I really miss being able to quickly go back to the last picture I took push the delete button and then take another, it's not a HUGE deal, but it just takes more time. 2nd is that the screen quality is not nearly as good as other Sony's I've had in the past. While it's GIANT which is nice, the pixels are fairly large and I feel that this lack of resolution makes the pictures look worse than they do when they get on the computer. The new face detection feature is pretty neat, though I haven't really been able to tell what difference it makes. Also I was a little upset by the high ISO setting, i tried using it at a club and not only was it so dark that the picture was useless, but it was also SOO grainy and blurry that nothing could be identified. I'll have to experiment with it more, but so far it was a bit of a let down. The steady shot works pretty well, I've only had a slight blur on one photo (which was expected as by hand got bumped) and all the others have been perfect which is quite welcome after my last camera without Steadyshot that blurred frequently. Another BIG DISAPPOINTMENT for me was that they got rid of the INFOLithium battery, I don't know if this is because of the issues they've been having, or just because this one lasted longer or what, but it's annoying to not have it say how many minutes I have left as I've gotten used to it for the past 3 cameras from them. Still it's not THAT big of a deal, just kind of annoying that they got rid of a feature. The 5x zoom is very good, and welcome over the measly 3x that the older versions had. The size and weight are really good (although it could be a bit slimmer as it's still almost an inch thick). Still it's smaller than my wallet and about as thick as my cell phone, so I can't really complain. All in all it's been a great purchase so far and I'm quite pleased, and will still be sticking with Sony in the future as this camera is so much better than my friends' Casios and Canons</review_text>
I heartily agree with the first reviewer's detailed and accurate review--but I'd like to add that I DID indeed buy the Red DSC-100, and it is a beautiful and colorful masterpiece!  Plus, it'll be easier to find, amongst all my black equipment!!  Thank you SONY!</review_text>
On paper, this was the camera I wanted.  Here were my criteria:  (1) Shirt-pocket size.  I was sick of subconsciously deciding NOT to take a camera along because I didn't want to lug about a bag of camera-plus-accessories-plus-adapter-plus-plus-plus.  I wanted something small and self-contained that I'd get used to carrying with me all the time.  The DSC-T100 is about the size of a deck of standard playing cards.  (2) More than 3x optical zoom.  I've had 3x cameras (too little zoom).  I have a 22x video cam (too much zoom, at least for my shaky limbs).  Something in between is the ticket.  This camera is 5x.  (3) High but not necessarily state-of-the-art number of pixels.  This camera is 8.1 megapixels.  (4) BIG LCD screen.  As big as possible.  This camera is 3" diagonally.  (5) Flexible but easy-to-use shooting features, so all of my family members would be tempted to learn how to operate it.Like other reviewers, I was reluctant to buy a Sony, but for one reason only:  the Memory Stick.  But I got over it and bought it, along with a 2GB Memory Stick PRO Duo.This brand-new-for-2007 camera is great!  It's light.  It's pretty.  It's got a Carl Zeiss lens that's, as far as I can tell, flawless in rendition and spherical aberration.  Tactile feedback is excellent.  It turns on in an instant and recycles in a flash.  You can bracket shots three different ways.  You can blast off 100 "motor drive" shots in a row.  It has two complementing image stabilization systems.  It's easy to use but yet has a host of use features that should satisfy all but the pickiest of photo enthusiasts.  In short, it's VERY thoughtfully designed and carefully produced.The LCD display is really beautiful.  I've tried it out in direct sunlight (the bane of previous experiences with LCD screens), and, although it's not as easy to see the screen image in bright dierect light as it is in, say, a darkened room, it's still possible to clearly make out the subject, differentiate it from the background, and get off the shots.  Five stars for the display.The zoom works great.  It's very responsive.  Its speed of motion is adaptive to the length of time you hold the button down.  It works nicely in playback as well as record mode.  Five stars for the zoom.The menu system works great.  Once you get the hang of the layout, it's a cinch to use on the fly.  The menu is adaptive in a sense, only presenting you with options that are pertinent to the shooting mode you've selected (e.g., they don't let you see the option for "face detection" when you've selected a shooting mode for landscapes or outdoors at night).  Five stars for the menu system.Even the little things are great.  It's got some nice heft even though it's compact, but not too hefty.  The fit and finish is excellent.  The buttoms feel right.  There are a HOST of neat use features like face detection (up to a whole Cub Scout pack!), multiple zone focus, lots of shooting modes and programs.  Hell, even the array of beeps is charming.  Five stars for the beep, including the fact that you can shut the beep off if you want.All in all, it's pretty much perfect for this amateur, and even a pro might find it a great little box to carry around in a pocket for grab shots.  Thanks to its size, that's what I'm doing.NIT-PIXThe power button and the record/playback toggle button are small-ish for my fat fingers.  Likewwise the battery eject button, set inside the battery/memory card door.  Because the lens is up in the northeast corner, you have to get used to gripping the camera in a way that gets your fingers out of the line of fire.  Battery life (included proprietary lithius ion unit), while substantial, is probably such that you'd need a backup for a long trip or an important shooting event.Check out Sony USA's website for all the specifications.  Hope you enjoy this camera as much as I do.  By the way, I almost got the red one</review_text>
The DSC-T100 is a great all round point and shoot with all the features expected of a camera in this class. The 5x optical zoom is nice given the non protruding lens, and allows for a very quick start up time in around a second.  Additionally the face detection is very good, once it locks on to subject/s it visually moves with them to keep the focus area of the frame always in the right place. It can be used with full auto settings or it gives access to manual controls, however I found auto to be very good in almost all situations. The pictures taken are very good quality although in low light the high iso does blur a little. The continuous shoot mode allows for almost 3 shots a second with out flash which is leaps ahead of the Casio I traded in for this.  The menu structure of the Sony is very intuitive and feels like a proper interface rather a bunch of options in a long list.All in all a very good, easy to use, high featured compact camera. I would recommend to anyone.</review_text>
I very carefully researched the vast world of digital cameras before actually commiting to purchasing one for my upcoming trip to Europe. By far, for the money and features, this camera IS AWESOME!! 8.2 MGP and the HUGE screen is absolutely amazing and it takes WONDERFUL pictures. The ONLY downfall is that it charges only on a DOCK, (not just a cord) but the dock is small and VERY light, so it travels easily. That's it- everything else about it very cool. Onscreen finishing, effects, tinting, etc. I didn't need any sorts of bells or whistles as i have little camera experience, and with this its just point and shoot- and the extras aren't daunting in difficulty.all in all, its a sweet camera at a sweet price</review_text>
This camera is pretty incredible.  You can do so much on the camera itself, before you even upload the pictures.  It is so advanced compared to my previous Fujifilm digital camera or any other camera I've seen for that matter.  The only thing that is a little bit of a bummer is that it can be a little slow at times due to the capacity of information it processes, but it is well worth the couple seconds extra wait time. I am extremely happy and satisfied with my purchase and am looking forward to seeing what HP comes up with next.</review_text>
As soon as you charge the battery for the first time, you can take a picture.  The quick start guide has all the information you need to perform all the common tasks with the camera.  You can use the camera as a simple point and shoot, or take advantage of all its features.  You can snap pictures less than 2 seconds apart.  Great clarity until you reduce the megapixels too much with the digital zoom, but the camera tells you what your current mp level is, so you can monitor the quality before you snap.  I recommend an extra battery and a card with plenty of extra memory so you can snap unlimited photos then pick and choose later.  Only drawback is that the latch for the battery/memory door requires some dexterity to open and close.  If you have clumsy fingers, you'll want to try to open the latch on a demo before you buy it.  Also read my comment on Scott Rose's review</review_text>
This camera is awesome! easy to use, easy to setup, and the program to manage your photo's is simple with a very intuitive interface. Thanks H</review_text>
I love this Camera!!! The Screen is Huge! The pictures come out great!! There is not much you can't do with this camera, great investment if you love taking all kind of pictures indoors, outdoors, light, or dark!! Great job HP!!!</review_text>
I purchased this camera for use in my real estate business, downloading pics is easy, especially for a novice like myself.  I've never been good at taking pictures and this camera makes me look like a pro.  The large screen is great for viewing and you really don't have to focus...the camera does all the work for you.  I'm still learning everything this camera can do.  I have to upload pics to many different sites and use them for ads, every pic comes out in High Resolution and I get compliments all the time about the quality of the photos.  I would definitely recommend this camera over and over again.[...</review_text>
This camera is good for any one that travels and wants to have good pixs of the family or places they visit. The viewing area is a good size for those with "over 50 eyes" and is easier to see when the sun is shinging than most. The LCD is blurry until pushing a button which is the only negative I can find. I have an expensive sony but this is less bulky and easier to take on the plane. Slips in my purse</review_text>
This camera is user friendly and has done everthing I have asked it to do . The pictures are clear and I am able to download them to my computer with ease</review_text>
This pocket sized stainless steel package delivers more than I expected. It has to be the easiest digital camera to use than any I've owned or used. I get more use from this camera simply because it is truly a pocket sized camera and I carry it with me most of the time. The huge 3" LCD display is one of the most outstanding features. Its battery is strong and has not let me down yet. The camera is much quicker to use than the low resolution camera built into my cel phone. The video and audio quality is very good. This feature packed camera is one of the best values out there</review_text>
I have owned this camera now for a month since buying it here on amazon.  It is a great camera and I am very happy with it.  The photos it takes are amazing.  The video is also very good.  It is also very easy to operate.  The only thing that is a downer is what others have wrote about the LCD in the daytime, it is hard to see when its sunny</review_text>
I purchased this camera to replace an olympus 400. All in all, it takes great pictures. The image stabilization works very well. I took some test shots at dawn from a freeway bridge (low light conditions & bouncing from traffic)and the camera performed excellently. The shots turned out great. Good color saturation, and fairly sharp image. It also is weather resistant as was the 400, which was one of the MAJOR reasons I picked Olympus. I have had a camera "fry" because of a little rain during a picture shoot.It does seem to go through battery power quicker than I would like, especially if it is being used outdoors in the cold. But I planned ahead for that by buying two extra batteries just for that issue. The lack of an optical viewfinder, screen is in use all of the time, I suspect is a major culprit. I usually turned off the screen on my older camera to conserve battery life.As with many postings for this and most newer point & shoot cameras, the lack of an optical viewer is a critical flaw if shooting in bright environments. Between the reflected glare, and dim screen images, you just can't see a thing while composing your shot. Just point, shoot, and hope!I was looking at Digital SLR's for a next camera when I bought this camera. I'm not sure I'm through looking</review_text>
Compact so it fits in you pocket, high tech enough to dance with it's bigger counterparts. This little camera does it all. I comparison shopped for several weeks comparing and contrasting multiple cameras from cannon, kodak, hp, sony, panasonic, and olympus, and none had features like this, a small size, and in this price range. The upgrades form the old 710 are a 5x optical zoom and 5.6 digital zoom (28x total) for up close, excellent photos, and the dual image stabilization.7.1megapixels, Dual image stabilization (both digital and optical stabilization for shake free pictures new for the 750 and 760 models), 2.5 inch lcd viewing screen, and a low price what you get. OH, DID I MENTION EXCELLENT PICTURES. I have played with this for several days now editing the photos, paling with the on-board and the computer imaging package, and I see nothing wrong with this camera for an everyday average user like me. And with it's weather resistence, nice for a clumsy average user like me. Also the battery life is very adequate, about 120 photos or more, with slide shows, editing ect... This is well worth the investment, saving your families memories in a fit and proper manner.The Olympus Master software for you computer is very easy to use, And with panoramic feature, 3d, and Extra ART Features unlocked by Olympus Brand-Olympus Stamped Type H HD, this camera becomes even more of a pleasure to own. you can edit photos on the computer, or right in the palm of your hand. Both ways, this camera will make you feel like a pro in no time.</review_text>
I've used my 750 for a month now and love it except for one thing. No viewfinder. Most ultra compacts don't have one but in bright sun it's tricky to see the display. I "reshopped" today and found a Canon Elph 800si but - it was only 3x optical zoom not 5x, it weighed more, cost $100 more, had fewer features and scenes (which I really use), wasn't weather resistant and was harder to "figure out". I decided to keep my 750 and just learn how to shield the display better. It takes great shots and the automatic scenes are easy to use and easy to switch among. Much easier than my old Olympus</review_text>
Very versatile to use because of its many features.  Easy to use in basic point and shoot mode.  Difficult to aim accurately outdoors in bright light because display is washed-out by background light</review_text>
I have not used the camera much, but like the other Stylus models that I own; it is quite functional.  I do miss having a viewfinder because bright light can make the digital display a little iffy.  The 5x optical zoom is very nice to have.  The pocket size of the camera makes it extremely worthwhile to me</review_text>
This camera is fairly easy to use and works well.  I wish it had a view finder.  I guess image stabilization works but am not really sure.  It is also moisture resistant but fortunately, I didn't have to test that on my holiday.Milli</review_text>
I decided to get one of the new Stylus cameras as my old camera was dying and the new ones are water resistant (supposedly waterproof to ten feet). I do a lot of canoeing and I believe that dampness hastened the demise of my previous camera.The camera takes excellent pictures and the 4 power optic zoom works quite well. I have used it for indoor and outdoor pictures. While it is not as versatile as the SLR types, it is good for quick pictures which is mostly what I take these days. It does have a fair amount of versatility, but it takes a bit of time to adjust.The only downside I have found on the camera is that it does not have a viewfinder, only the screen which tends to wash out in bright light. This has not posed a serious obstacle to any pictures I have taken to date, but it does restrict the ability to finely compose a picture. If this issue could be resolved, I would have absolutely nothing but good things to say about this unit</review_text>
Small, good picture quality, rugged...I've taken this camera camping, canoing, hiking, biking, etc.  It's covered with scratches, it's been in the rain, and yet it still takes great pictures.  It fits in a pocket or backpack without any problem.  I'd highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I got this camera to replace an Olympus C4000 that was too slow focusing and bulky for my needs (shooting my toddler). I have had it for about 9 months now and still think its great. One reason I bought it was the price (under $200) and the reviews I saw on the web (like dpreview.com). It is small enough to go in your pocket. It can be used in the rain without fear of damage. The fireworks shots I took , a couple can be seen in the user images for this camera, where unexpectedly good and done HANDHELD without a tripod using the fireworks program! There are a couple of cons, but minor and are to be expected for a camera of this type, ie. weak indoor flash (fix with software), sometimes takes long in low light to focus, no lens protection. But in all, would buy and recommend again. Make sure you invest in NiMH batteries and a charger and you will be all set! Happy shooting</review_text>
This camera really fits a niche if you like to hike, bike, canoe, raft, kayak, etc.  From the rubberized corners to the sealed design, it's made for adventure. I've dropped mine, been rained on, and splashed big time- without problems.Also, it has most features all other camera's have. Easy to use, rugged, good pics- I highly recommend it.I use it often for my blog: www.riverrant.blogspot.com.  Many photos from this camera are posted.</review_text>
After I lost my previous digital camera to a 3 foot fall, I was looking for a digital camera that could survive being thrown around a bit, and also something I could take kayaking. The Optio 33WR seemed tailor-made for my needs.  The first weekend I had it I went hiking on one of the dustier trails in Northern California, I came back with some great shots of banana slugs, redwoods and hilly panoramas.  The camera didn't handle the bright sunlight as well as I hoped (some of my panarama pictures were a bit washed out).  However, you can knock exposure down in half steps manually (which I came to use frequently later).The next day I tentatively dipped it under the running sink, dried it off, and waited for it to explode.  Happily it behaved as though nothing had happened.  Eventually, I took it kayaking, all day, in salt water.  It handled splash, salt, and sun like a champ.  As an added bonus, the batteries (not the default ones, but some fairly standard rechargeables I'd purchased seperately) managed to last the whole trip (about 120 shots and 4 hours on the water).  I also got to use the phrase: "hang on a minute, I have to rinse off my camera" - and there's something cool about saying that.Most recently the camera has survived 4 weeks of backpacking, much of which was spent on the plains of Kenya.  Obviously, there's not enough zoom to make this the "safari" camera, but it was great for capturing some spontaneous moments, some landscape shots and the braver wildlife.  I found it hard to get a good picture in lower light situations (dusk or dawn).  But anytime there was some cloud cover during the day the pictures were deep and rich.The quality of the photos are quite what I'd expect from a 3MP camera.  The manual focus is a nice bonus, but the autofocus is responsive enough.  The zoom is less then I would like, but is still acceptable.  For digital camera features alone, I'd say this camera is an easy 3.5 or maybe 4 stars.  Having the freedom to take it out on the water, get dirty and generally abuse it push it up to a shining 5 stars</review_text>
I am new to Digital cameras, but have been shooting film in a variety of formats and systems for over 30 years.  After much research and agonizing compromises, I waited and purchased this Pentax Optio 33WR.  It is small, but fits my small hands well. All the controls are nicely defined and laid out. I began using the camera prior to consulting the manual because the camera is logically engineered. The manual is well done and thorough, and Pentax also spells out the accompanying ACDSEE software - not needed if you own a Mac. You can also download the manual and specs for this and many Pentax cameras directly from Pentax's doc site - free, prior to purchase if you want to study this.  The specs available are quite accurate.  Output is great! Sharp lens, fast focus, accurate exposure, and it fits in my pants pocket.  It has a lot of flexibility for a P&S and a fair number of manual features if you need them.  Nicely sealed, all weather unit. solid feel! Lots of positives! Negatives are: Came with 2 inexpensive alkaline batteries instead of lithium versions -  I replaced them, but one can find power for this camera anywhere.  The camera comes with an 16MB SD memory card which is good for about 8-10 hi-res pix, so I replaced it with a 64MB version ($34).  All-in-all, 4 stars may be conservative because I like it and it is nearly all I need and want</review_text>
I just used this camera for a dive in Mexico (my second dive, first attempt at underwater photo).Although the camera has no flash, it worked perfectly fine at depths up to 12 meters. I guess the lack of flash can be a problem for some other locations or if outside is not a sunny day, but at least for Cancun this camera did the job perfectly.The wheel that turns the film does a specific noise when the film is correctly positioned and ready for a new shot; this noise is different from when there are no more positions on camera, and the wheel turns continuously - so if you pay attention you'll know when the film is over, even if the position indicator may still show 1 or 2.Yes, the pictures are grainy (I think it uses ISO800 film so this is expected), but they look "clean" when scaled down on computer at 800x600, and I think the prints will look acceptable, too.The pictures will also show vignetting, but this is nothing unexpected for such fixed focus disposable camera lens.Out of 27 positions, I got 20 pictures I consider good enough and "keepers". The picture turned out crisp - only 2 of them are motion blured. Try to stay still when taking pictures and you'll be fine. For best colors, take pictures of close divers/fishes (less than 1-2 meters away)...We also used a non-disposable 35mm plastic camera with case and underwater casing, but the Kodak yielded better quality pictures.As for the viewfinder, it is a bit harder to look through it with the googles on, but I got better framed pictures than with the non-disposable camera that had a "target" sistem.If you want to spend only 10-20$ and don't plan investing more on underwater casing for digital cameras, this camera is a good choice.I don't regret buying it.</review_text>
I work at a professional photofinishing lab, and I can attest to the quality of the film inside this camera.  The Kodak Water & Sport camera provides excellent results both in and out of the water.  It performs comparably to the Kodak HQ Max Versatility camera; it produces a high-quality image in most situations.There is no flash on the camera (though using a flash underwater can produce unpredictable and sometimes undesirable effects), so do not plan on using it in low-light situations.Film does not like to get wet, and accidentally dropping your camera in water could mean that all the pictures you just took are lost forever.  So even if you don't plan on taking your camera physically underwater on your family boating expedition, you might still want to consider purchasing a Water & Sport camera as insurance against "splash damage".If you need a flash, or if you plan to take pictures at depths greater than 50 feet, you'll need to consider a professional underwater camera or camera housing</review_text>
I love this camera!! We went to Raging Waters and I picked up a 2-pack from Sams Club for about $18.00. The pictures were gorgeous! The colors brilliant and images crisp and clear. I could not believe it :) I would not have taken my regular camera to the water park and I was able to get wonderful shots of the family without the stress of "taking care of the camera". I am very pleased and impressed. I took an underwater shot that was a bit blue-ish because of the cloudy water and lack of flash BUT still very cool shot.</review_text>
Delivery of camera was very prompt. Camera was what I expected, I am very pleased with it's portability, and usefulness. Sanyo support of the VPC-C6 camera is great with Sanyo Firmware Update Downloads. Thanks</review_text>
this summer i was to travel to Palestine and attend a wedding . the last thing i wanted was to hall around an ostentatious camera that would break my back as well as be a problem at check points and border crossings.i picked the Sanyo Xacti C6. it was great. the size is amazing, its as big as my cell phone, and i laughed at first becasue i didn't find it when i opend the  box.the video quality is great, **FOR IT'S SIZE** i was expecting the picture to be realy blurry and pixulated but it wasn't that bad, and more suprizing is the indoor videos at night. However, the still picture capabilities is inferior to the movie capabilities. and don't even think of taking a picture at night.On my trip the camera fulfilled its duties with flying colors. But then my family used it to film a highschool graduation...boy was that a disaster. movies of the wedding weren't very celebrated, but the behind the scenes were great. again don't use it for family moments!now you might say why should i buy a flawed camera for that price, its because you will use it maybe 1000x more often than a regular bulky video camera. many a times did i capture great vacation moments with this camera in situations where a bulky camera wouldn't have been carried, just because this one can be placed in the pocket of your pants</review_text>
Taking phote is good outdoor, but poor indoor. Somewhat worse than average 5MB compact camera.Video is ok both outdoor and indoor. Clearly worse than average Mini DV camcorder</review_text>
I just purchased a C6 and took it to Disneyland to video the kids.  Bottom line is that I love this cam.  Here are my thoughts after using it for one week:Without a doubt, the size makes this camera so much more usable than larger models for "on the go" shooting.  I have a mini DVD cam that fits in your palm, but you can't put it in your pocket.  For me, its a pain to have to get it in and out of a fanny pack or whatever and I miss shots.  For a trip like Disneyland, it was so nice to be able to have this thing in my pocket and be able to take it out fast and discretely shoot all kinds of great shots on rides, etc.  After a few hours, I could literally take it out of my pocket, flip the screen up with my thumb and be shooting in about 3 seconds!  And being able to go back and forth between pictures and video gave me way more shots that I wouldn't get by having to dig out the camera.  I just hate having to carry around all the gear.As far as quality, the photos turned out pretty good.  I expected less based on the other reviews.  I have not enlarged anything yet.  My only complaint would be a bit overly saturated colors.  I may be able to fix that setting in the camera. The best shots were bright sunlight at the pool.Video quality is decent, better than I expected at low light. It focused pretty well at low light.  I got some good results on indoor rides.  My favorite thing to do is hold the camera out and shoot myself and my son on a ride.  The size makes this easy to do and of course you can turn the screen around so you can see yourself.  I can do it with my DVD cam, but it gets heavy and is bulky.The anti-shake is not that great.  You really have to watch how much you move it around.  It works, it just could be better.  I didn't have a problem with stills even when zooming.Like others, I found that you get lots of camera noise when taking a picture during a video.  The wind reduction works much better than my other cam (a Panasonic DVD model).  The sound is decent overall.The flash is very weak.  About 6' max I would guess.  Weaker than my Pentax Optio digital camera.  I did not take a lot of indoor/night shots though.I really like how fast it warms up.  When you turn it on or flip up the screen, it is ready to go in just a few seconds.  This is why I don't like the DVD cams, the warm up is really slow...Like 30 seconds on my Panasonic VDR.  I lose lots of shots becuause of this.I like that the buttons are all on the front and can be accessed with the thumb.  It took a bit to get used to its small size.  There is a slide type switch to go back and forth between viewing and recording so you can do it fast without the menu.I forgot to buy an extra battery which was a mistake.  I don't know how much life I got, but I started out each day at 8:30 am and by noon it was dead.  But I took lots of video and flash pictures.I really like the docking station becuase you don't have to take the battery out to charge it and you can plug into a TV and watch the videos.  Another cool use of the docking station is that it doubles as a table-top tripod.  I used it to video the fireworks show with pretty good results.  The remote worked OK, but one bad feature is that if you are paging through a bunch of clips on TV and you stop for about 10 seconds, it goes back to a different screen and you have to page all the way back through the clips to get to where you were.  Maybe this can be changed in the setup, but I don't know.  Also, there is now battery level indicator on the screen.  The battery just died.  I think you can check it from the menu, but that is a pain.I got two, 2 gig SD cards.  The SanDisk Extremes (or Ultras I think).  It writs to them super fast.  No issues so far.  Each card gave me about 80 or 90 minutes at the hights quality.  I didn't fill them all up in 5 days at Disneyland.The lens cap is cheap plastic and kind of hard to get on and off but I got used to it.  It is working OK, but I bet it will crack before long.  They should figure out how to integrate one that slides on and off.Bottom line:  If you are like me and don't like tons of gear hanging around your neck or in a fanny pack or whatever, this camcorder is for you.  I was able to get more cool shots becuase of its speed and size than using my DVD model.  I don't put so much weight on quality, becuase for family vacations its way more important to get that once in a lifetime shot of my kids doing something cute than having the image quality perfect.  Now I just need to learn how to use iMovie to put all these clips together</review_text>
Like many people, I debated and debated, read countless reviews, and watched prices for weeks... for me, it pretty much came down between the E500 and the 8MP Rebel. (The 6MP Pentax D100 was in the running, too.) Finally, I pretty much decided that based on the reviews for the E500, it seemed like people who know their way around SLR cameras enjoyed it, whereas the complaints mostly seemed to be lack of ease by those coming from the P&S camp. That being said, Olympus does make fine cameras. So does Canon. So does Nikon. As I saw it, it's pretty much like the old Ford verus Chevy debate: just as many people can tell you why one is superior to the other. When it comes down to it, all cameras (like all cars) have their stong points and their weak points. And depending on what you're using a camera for, different aspects will weigh more heavily than others.For instance, for me, price was a big concern. This is, hands down, the best deal. I picked up a factory demo refurbished 2-lens kit. I don't think I can list the price in the review, but it was the cheapest among the 8MP cameras. And the two lenses are both made-for-digital. Somewhat limited by Olympus' 4/3 platform, but any camera you buy if you want good glass in front of it, you'll be spending as much as the body. Or more. Top of the line lenses are not cheap... anywhere, from any maker. These Zuiko lenses seem solid though, and I can't complain about them. I do wish there were more AF options versus what basically amounts to a center-focus option only. There are 3, but they're very close to the center. Minor irritation, though; just focus on your subject, hold the shutter down halfway, and then frame your shot. Really no different than lining up those two circles on older 35mm lenses.I like the overall ergonomics of the camera. It's just big enough that it has some heft, but not too heavy to weigh you down. (Granted, I'm a 6'1" guy with average-sized hands.) However, it does feel a little plasticy, but coming from a Pentax K-1000, I think anything will. And having worked at a photography-based company in the recent past, I got a little spoiled on the Nikon D1 series; however, the D50 (and to a lesser extent the D70) felt more like a toy. But the E500 fits in my hands nicely. I actually really like the way the lens sits almost all the way over to one side, with an ample grip on the opposite. Makes for strong handling on vertical shots, even one-handed.Photos are great. Very sharp, very crisp. Colors have a nice vibrancy. Tones are balanced. I've seen a few complaints about noise in higher ISOs, but I didn't see anything too out of line. Plus, there's noise reduction, which takes it down to pretty much nil. Anything that's left, nothing a basic photo-editing program can't take care of in a second. I think the "blur" complaints are from people used to P&S photography. I've shot down to 1/15 or so with no more blur than expected. It's just a matter of knowing how to hold a camera and maintain a firm stance. As someone who loves black-and-white shooting, the color filters for the momochrome mode are a nice touch. They can really make the images pop. I've been happy with the all the settings; it has lots of scene modes, lots of little ways to tweak the images as you shoot, too (high key/low key, vivid, muted, etc). The flash sits up a little higher than other cameras, too, so there's less of a chance of catching shadow on closer shots. The flash can be a little bright and slightly distracting when in auto-focus focus-finding (pre-flash). Again, though, not a huge deal.Now the menu IS a little convoluted. It could be more user-friendly and intuitive. But it's nothing that a reasonably adept photographer can't figure out after reading the manual and playing around a little bit. A second command wheel would be nice, but hey, you're here for an economical camera, and you're going to have to cut a few corners, I guess. All the commands of a second wheel are there, just back in the menu. Some way to set "hot buttons" or something could compensate some, too, but again... think value.My only other "complaint," which is more of just a minor annoyance than anything, is the location of the power swith and the rear dial for adjusting aperture and/or shutter speed. Sometimes when changing settings, I'll trip the power and turn it off. Startup is quick, though, so it's not a biggie. And sometime when repositioning myself and moving the camera around, I'll inadvertently change the aperture or shutter (depending on which mode I'm shooting in). Either moving it more to the top, making it harder to turn, or making some sort of setting "lock" would help.Anyway, bottom line: if you're a 35mm SLR user wanting to make the switch to digital, and price is a deciding factor, just go ahead and get this camera. It's a solid camera that takes great pictures, and is likely just as good as any of the other--more expensive--options. If you're impatient and just want a better point-and-shoot, get another point and shoot. And if you're a fancy-schmancy professional, why are you looking at this budget camera? ;</review_text>
My first digital SLR camera. After using a few Olympus cameras, I decided to get another one, and this time a digital SLR. I don't really know how to use an SLR cameras. So far I have used only the auto mode and some scenes. It is so easy to use! And the pictures came out so perfect</review_text>
This camera is great value, I bought it with the two lens package. The normal lens is good and the zoom lens is huge. I bought a 133X speed 4GB flash card for the pictures and I've taken some amazing shots. The sports mode is great for skiing and captures very fast movement. The focusing is a little more elaborate and so takes a bit of getting used to if you're coming from a compact digital camera. Highly recommende</review_text>
The product is satisfactory - you would not expect any less from Olympus. The shipping and the associated wait? That is another story! I chose free shipping (kick, kick!) and thought the the product would reach me in 5 to 9 days. No - it would "SHIP" in 5 to 9 days from wherever it is. So, for the next 9 BUSINESS DAYS, I watched my order - the product sat in a warehouse. I was tempted to cancel and get it via overnight shipping a couple times - or try the Prime Shipping as a one-off thing - but that would not be fair, right? Painstakingly, the product moved and came tantalizingly close - about 15 miles from where I live - and sat in a UPS warehouse for 2 more days. The last time UPS was supposed to deliver, it had just noted "Premises closed" - when I was at home waiting for the package all through the 8 hour window - and at around 2 PM the day of the delivery, I started getting the feeling that UPS would find a lock dangling at my place. Ultimately, it did not turn out to be the case. Overall, it took more than 12 days to travel 100 miles or so.To rub it in, the battery took HOURS and HOURS to charge - it takes from 8 to 10 hours to charge fully. So, if you are in a hurry, do not order free shipping and add 10 hours to the UPS window to estimate the time you would first use the camera.Results of the camera - excellent. I prefer to use the xD card in order to avoid the bulk and number of pins (that can go out of alignment - see another post in this trail) of a CF card. The xD card, in my experience, has been extremely stable and have used one for 3+ years. Also, if you have RM-1 from an older Oly, you can use that remote here as well!The reason I deducted 1 star .. my patience ran thin with the S&H process</review_text>
For anyone wanting to explore the field of photography, this is the camera! I have past experience with Olympus equipment, but this is the first on the digital side. I am impressed! Money was not an issue, but I still purchased a factory refurbished camera. Word on the street says that refurbed products are given a 500% Q.C., therefore a more reliable item. Of course, the factory warranty is only 90 days instead of the usual 1 year, but most reputable dealers will give their sale an additional year (ask!). On that, purchase an extended warranty; you never know. I have 500+ shots so far, and all I can say is WOW! Olympus stood up tall and proud on this camera, and you will too if this is the camera you choose!! And on any accessories you decide on, make them Olympus as well</review_text>
I use to have a Minolta 35mm in the past, but this camera and the lenses that come with the camera is by far the best!!  The pictures are clear and very colorful.  I like to take photos of old churches and old towns or buildings and I use the Sepia setting, it makes the photos look old and antique.  The black and white photo setting takes excellent photos as well.  The viewing screen is larger than other cameras, and clear.  I am not an expert photographer its just a hobby.  This camera is great for beginners and up.  It is so easy to set up and start taking pictures. I recommend that you get the 2GB compactflash card</review_text>
I have had this camera for 4 months now and its an outstanding pro-sumer grade digital SLR.  The Amazon price for this camera body and two lens kit is simply the best price to be found anywhere, and is less than most vendors charge for this camera with a single lens.  No longer do I mourn the loss of my Nikon 8008s 35mm Film Camera.Both lenes have outstanding optics and the metering system is superb.  The included lens hoods are very helpful, but make sure you take them off for flash photography.  The lenses operate quietly and quickly.  They have nice grip.The built-in pop up flash is adequate for close-up snap shots, but you'll want one of the two available dedicated flash units the FL-36 or FL-50.  Don't waste your time or money with the FL-20.  I bought the FL-36, which is a full featured dedicated flash with significant manual overrides just as with the camera to meet your creative needs.  I'm likely to further upgrade to the FL-50 which is a more powerful full professional grade flash.For serious photographers, this camera gives you total manual control that provides overrides for every possible setting to ensure you realize your full creative needs (just as with any professional 35mm or digital SLR).The automatic settings for focus and exposure are outstanding as well.  There are several program modes for various types of shooting and a user program mode where you can essentially make your specific manual settings an automatic set-up.The controls are well placed, except for the the one-touch White Balance and the Auto-Focus frame buttons are right where you may normally want to place your right thumb while holding the camera, especially if you're taking vertical shots.  The large LCD display is excellent and easy to read even in bright light, but be advised that its not for composing and lining up your pictures.  The display is for making your camera settings and viewing the pictures you've taken.  You must compose your shots through the viewfinder only.  The viewfinder gives you gives you plenty of camera setting information along with immediate exposure and composition feedback so you can make adjustments without removing your eye from the viewfinder.The camera shoots in every file format that complete amatuers want and serious professional photographers need ranging from various degrees of quality for jpeg all the way up to TIFF and several RAW settings.  The has shutter speeds that go from manual settings up to 1/4000th and an ISO range up to 1600.The camera is built solid, is very well balanced and lightweight.  It looks great and feels great with a nice grip.  The included Olympus LBH-1 battery has extraordinary life.  I had in the camera for the first 3 months without a change or charge.  In that time I took over 600 pictures, and often found that I had left the camera on when I went to pull it out of my bag for the next shoot.  In fact, during my trip to Ireland during this mentioned timeframe. I basically left the camera on night and day for an entire week and had juice to spare when I got home.  Phenominal!As mentioned the included lenses with this kit (wide angel to normal & normal to long telephoto) are very, very good.  I'm so pleased with the overall performance and capabilities of the camera itself, that I'm definitely going to invest heavily in the professional level lens upgrades.  With the exception of the Macro and extreme wide angle, those lenses are essentially the same focal lengths as included with this camera kit.  However the upgrades are "faster" lenses allowing for more very low light levels and a greater ability to capture sports activity.Bottomline, this camera is fantastic and has everything that far more expensive professional cameras have.  Olympus has a full range of accessories for serious and professional photographers that amatuers can work their way up to.  This camera has it all at price that no one seems able to beat</review_text>
I have been an amateur photographer for 20+ years. In that time I have been a semi-loyal Olympus fan. (I admit I cheated with Canon on a couple of point & shoots).This is a great DSLR for someone looking to carry their photography hobby to the digital world or someone looking to start a new hobby.It is not the easiest camera to use. Meaning you need to read the manual to learn the icons.The picture quality is amazing.The ability to manipulate the picture without entering a full manual mode is also very impressive.The size is perfect. The Cannon DSLR is a little to compact for my hand to provide a stable platform when shooting. The Olympus fits just right. (my hands are not huge.)DOWNSIDE:The accessories are very expensive and limited. The kit included is excellent and will satiate the appetite of most amateur photogs, especially when purchased with the optional starter kit for the camera (extra battery, bag, remote, etc.)But, before you buy this camera, imagine yourself wanting a wide angle lens, or a more powerful telephoto. Now take a look online... not too impressive?This is the area that the Cannon DSLR excels</review_text>
Dear Mr. of AmazonYou estan offering the following one I articulate: Olympus Evolt Digital E500 8MP SLR with 14-45mm & 40-150mm + 2GB Accessory Kit now I buy to You the 27/02/2007 to them, camara Olympus Evolt Digital E500 8MP SLR with 14-45mm & 40-150mm, You then did not offer that Kit to me. Now I am seeing that they estan offering that Kit but with camara, Mr. I I have camara You, me you can sell the single Kit, PLEASEJOSE LUIS</review_text>
This camera case is stylish, compact and fun! Be aware that there is not much extra space inside to store camera cards, and definetely not room for extra batteries. There are plenty of larger camera cases for that purpose; this camera case is for stepping out in style</review_text>
I love the size and style of this little camera bag. It's only a single compartment and the shoulder strap is nice and long. Long enough to use around the waist as a fanny pack.  The bag itself isn't padded inside and it's rather stiff. A tight fit for my camera, but good protection I think. I just wanted to keep my camera from getting scratched up and this does the trick nicely</review_text>
pretty and comfortable. could be more practical with a couple of inner pockets</review_text>
Bought this to go with the pink camera I bought for my 12 yr old daughter for Xmas. Nicely made, protects the camera and it looks cute!</review_text>
I bought the pink case for my mom, as I bought her a new HP digital camera for Christmas. It's so cute, and the camera fits in it perfectly</review_text>
I was actively looking for a new digital camera since the middle of december 2006. I am a real nut when it comes to gadgets, and domonths worht of research, comparing different products, before I buy anything. I simply want the best, and if it involves spending $40-50 then be it.After months of researching, reading every single review there is, looking at pbase, e.t.c. I had two finalists:SD900 and F31FDCriteria were:1. Camera has to be small...to fit into jeans or shorts pocket2. Camera has to be pretty fast3. Camera has to have great battery life4. Most importantly, image quality has to be superb compared to other cameras in its class.SD800 looks great on paper, 7.1, 3.8 wide, IS, FD, nice LCD, small...it also felt pretty good when I played with it in the store...extremely fast. However, when I went to pbase and looked at images people posted (A LOT!!!) I couldn;t find one single shot that I liked. Everything was blurry and unsharp, so even, that I started getting a headache looking at the screen. I was truly dissapointed, especialy since rave online reviews...but I understood the reviews are RELATIVE...to perhaps (Casio cameras :o)I looked at all other cameras (ALL of them). Panasonic was nice...but it was too bulky, and very plain.SD 900 felt great, super fast, awesome lcd, great looking camera, FD, 10 megapixels, and fairly good photos, with nice colors.However I spent exactly the whole week comparing SD900 to F31FD...and F31FD just beat it completely in terms of picture quality.If you go to pbase and look for yourself, Fuji is ALWAYS better. Much sharper, high ISO's kill SD900, and tomy eye, the colors are more natural.Battery life is more than twice better on Fuji, and it is slightly shorter (slightly). Also, it cost less than Canon. Finally, I mde my move, and bought F31Fd.I received my camera today, and I must say it is a super product.PROS:1. Exhudes quality when you hold it in your hands, very non-flashy and quality looking camera2. Pretty fast in all functions. Very responsive zoom, almost instantaneous, better than SD900.3. I thought that the menu is pretty well put together.4. I took almost 100 photos, and the quality is unbeliavable, all pictures are very sharp with accurate colors, white balance works awesome.5. FD works perfectly well, just as expected.CONS1. There is a small plastic door that covers output and input conncetions. It is made out of this plastic rubbery material, and you sort of have to stratch it out of the way to plug in the USB cord. I definatley feel that a person who designed this door was drunk when he did, because on the camera tht great, Fuji should have either left the ports open, or design somethig much better. I really feel that this plastic door might break.I will try to update this review as I go along. But I must say that all the time I spent doing research paid off very well. I do not regret buying this camera, this is the best camera you can but in its size-class.</review_text>
You know that feeling...the one you get after taking a bunch of indoor shots that you think turned out great, but look really crappy on your computer and then you waste tons of time trying to photshop the pics, well that's the feeling I have had with every compact digital camera I've owned. This is especially disappointing when you have important events like birthdays, weddings, etc. and the indoor pics turn out bad. Trust me and check out this camera. You will be shocked at how noise free indoor pics are (even iso 800 w/o flash). I don't know of another non-SLR camera that takes indoor pics this well. The build quality is superb (all metal construction). The only things I don't like: No separate battery charger included (you must charge in camera), no viewfinder, and XD card format. Those are minor quibbles and I would trade them any day for the fantastic indoor pics.I am a photography enthusiast and Canon fan (over $3k in bodies and lenses) and my main camera is an Rebel XTi. However, I've got to give Fuji a lot of credit for focusing on pic quality rather than getting into a megapixel war. Don't be fooled by the megapixel myths. This camera may have lower mp's but it has a very large CCD sensor for a compact camera. And for gods sake don't buy a camera based on looks !!! Do you really care what the camera looks like or do you care about the pictures ??? Also, optical image stabilization (OIS) seems to be the latest rage. Who cares if a camera has OIS, but takes crappy indoor pics? This is the reason I passed on the Canon SD800 IS.</review_text>
Pros: Good for those who want an automatic camera and those who want to adjustable settings.Cons: Software is awkward. It can't be used as a webcam.The Bottom Line: A great camera with lot of features that can be used by beginners and enthusiasts.Why did you buy this product?My husband and I got the Fuji Finepix F31FD Digital Camera as our Christmas gift in December 2006. We wanted something to replace our current digital camera which was quickly becoming more and more irritating because it does not take good pictures in low light and it does not have a zoom feature.Describe your experience using this product.The Fuji Finepix F31FD Digital Camera arrived when my husband was at work and I was at home on vacation. I was so excited and immediately started playing with it.One of the first tests I did with Fuji Finepix F31FD Digital Camera was to check how well it worked in low light. I closed all the blinds, turned off all the lights, and took a picture of items approximately 18 feet away. I took this picture at night and the room was pitch black. I was amazed. The picture came out clear and it looked as if it was taken in the afternoon. You could not tell from looking at the picture that it was taking in a completely dark room.The second feature I wanted to test was the face detection feature. So I took pictures of me with this feature turned off and another with it turned on. I was pleasantly surprised at the results. While the pictures were not hugely different, it was clear that the feature worked and that I was more of the focus in the picture that was taken with the feature on. This feature even worked when I took pictures of dolls and when I took a picture of a picture with several faces in it.One feature that I didn't think would be all that useful was the video capture feature. I love taking pictures but have never been into recording video. However since this feature is included I find myself using it more and more. It is quick and easy to switch over to the video capture component and record those precious moment. It is limited to approximately 15 minutes of video which isn't a great deal of time. There is supposed to be a new memory card coming out soon that will allow users to record longer periods of video (approximately 30 minutes). My husband keeps looking for the new memory card to be released but I'm fine with the approximately 15 minutes of video and approximately 350 pictures.What do you love about this product?It's compact and easy to handle. It has a lot of great features including taking pictures in the dark, face recognition, video capture, the ability to let the camera automate the setting or let the user manually adjust them, a 2 sec and a 10 second timer, and an excellent zoom feature.I also like that it warns you when you need to make adjustments to get the best picture. For example if I am zoomed in to closely for the auto focus to work, it warm me.What do you hate?I do not like the software that comes with the camera because 1) I think the way it labels items is awkward, 2)it seems to be all or nothing i.e. save all pictures or erase all pictures 3) it doesn't let you view before saving items, and 4) it's kind of slow. Maybe I just haven't learned to use it correctly but doesn't work well for me.I also do not like that I can not use this as a webcam. I can connect it to my TV tuner and view what is happening in my room but Yahoo Messenger does not recognize it as a webcam.Recommended:Yes</review_text>
I can't say whether this camera is better or worst than the f30, but I can say that the camera is excellent. I've been using a Casio EX-Z750 for the last 18 months, and it is a tremendous outdoor performer. It is also more compact, has a viewfinder and manual mode.  That's where the advantages end. Indoor shots always required flash, and the flash invariable gave skin a strongly unnatural pallor.By contrast, f31fd indoor shots with and without the flash are superb . I recently took over 200 shots at a seminar where I could not use a flash. Skin tones was very natural/accurate and noise at ISO 400 or less was virtually non-existent. At ISO800, noise was noticeable, but the shots were usable.  Shots at ISO 1600 were also usable, but substantial detail was lost. The FD worked, but the subject had to be looking in your direction.  Also, at the longest zoom, the camera would default to ISO 1600 in auto mode.  I found that if I zoomed halfway, I could keep the ISO down to 400 (preferred) or lower.Images are a little soft, which is okay, but might be a problem if you don't want to use Photoshop or similar.  I haven't taken many outdoor shots.  That's not why I purchased the camera.  However, I suspect it will do fine.  Most cameras do.Some dislikes: I wish it had a viewfinder, I wish it was smaller, and I wish that I could use FD in a non-automatic mode (or at least prevent ISO from creeping over 400!).  These are not major dislikes. I'm more than happy to trade off these minor niggles for the great performance</review_text>
Excellent camera full of features that will make it a very versatile camera for me in the future.Great flexibility in camera settings for all kinds of shots.Battery life is excellent, excellent, excellent.Great value</review_text>
Tis is the best Digital camera I have owned or used. The picture quality is outstanding and the speed is super fast. It has so many options and capabilities that make it such a great camera. The face detection is a little slow and I'm not sure if it makes that much of a difference but I have no complaints at all. The camera is a little pricey but I'm sure it will give me years of trouble free use. I also got a 1GB Type "H" (High Speed) card to go with it and this combo is fantastic</review_text>
The adapter worked just fine, but one small fault is that it blocks the flash.  It was just something I failed to take into account</review_text>
I'm kind of a gadget nut I guess, so I have all the stuff to go along with my Canon A95 camera, including the 0.7x and 1.75x conversion lenses by Canon, and the .45x and 3.2x conversion lenses from Opteka.With the 2 Opteka lenses (bought together) I got only one bundled aluminum adaptor by yet another company (and not the one shown on Opteka's page). Although I like aluminum because it matches the camera, it does not mate to the camera very well, and has some rotational slop and general wobbliness.The Canon adaptor is made from that hard type of plastic commonly found on 35mm SLR lenses, so it is pretty sturdy. Further, when it clicks in place on the camera, there is no movement at all - very secure.So...plastic that works, or nice aluminum which is questionable?Well, I'm going to use the aluminum one strictly to hold filters, and I bought 2 more Canon ones (that makes 3) for the lenses. I plan to leave them attached to 2 lenses because I hate screwing the lens on and off.</review_text>
The adapter works easily, snapping on and off in seconds.  It's large but very lightweight.  My complaint is this is simply a piece of plastic which could not cost Canon more than 10 cents.  Shame on Canon for charging close to $20 rather than including it with the camera for free</review_text>
The title of this listing says its for the A80 and the G6, but its only for the A80. The G6 uses the LADC58D adapter</review_text>
My order was received within a few days -- and the price was ok</review_text>
I received this battery along with the camera and thought that the silly little thing would not last any longer that AA's, but I was suprized.  I took about 200 pictures with it before it finally died and about half of those were with a flash.  That was after it sat on my desk for almost a year.  Had to resort to AA's last night and went through 6 AA batteries for about 40 pictures.  So I am going to get more becuase it works out to be cheaper and it is less of a hassle.</review_text>
Even though I have not used this item yet, knowing kodak and their standards I know that it will be great and of the finest quality.</review_text>
Our Kodak camera takes AA (disposable) batteries - and this battery is the best so far that we've used.  Highly recommended and affordable</review_text>
There are numerous complaints about the supplemental image for this product on the Amazon website. However, vendors (such as Adorama) will send the correct item. Lastly, this battery far outperforms regular AA batteries, especially if you are flash-happy</review_text>
I find this product to be amazing.  I have never been able to successfully use binoculars because my hands are too unsteady.   With the press of a button,, all of the shaking stops and I can enjoy as though looking through a window.  I find the binoculars reasonably light and feel natural and sit comfortably in my grip.  Lots of good technology at a reasonable price.    My only criticism is the neck strap.  It appears to be impossible to attach to the binoculars.  It finally took my wife and I three safety pins and two pairs of pliers and four hands to accomplish the task of simply attaching a strap.   It amazed us how thoughtless they were in this part of the design when they were performing the miracle of stopping my hands from causing the image to shake.  Now that it is attached and I can safely use the binoculars without fear of dropping them, it love the product.</review_text>
The Image Stabilizer Technology (IS) really works. IS has been around for a long time on video camera's but you could never see it work in real time. You either had to turn it on or off.  With these Bino's you just push the button on top, and all the shake stops.  This is not a gimmick or sales hipe. I would not have believed it unless I saw it myself. I have used Steiner 7X50s in the military and other high quality optics, and these little 10x30s beat all the others for my home use.Pro's: (IS) really works. Affordable. Light weight. Enclosed soft case is fine. Great value for the money. Current Rebate from Canon.Con's: Not Water-proof. I would not want to backpack with these.Overall: MUST BUY!! For fair weather sports, racing, birding, and general home use. Read the reviews.</review_text>
An excellent set of binoculars -- exquisitely stable details, easy to use. My wife has never liked to use binoculars, but she thinks these are great.</review_text>
Performance of the viewing and stabilization is very good.This is the 3rd pair of these binoculars that I have used and the stabilizing mechanisim is what stops working.I use these as an employee of ABC sports for college football so they do get quite a bit of use - but it is also a MAJOR problem when the mechanism stops working DURING a broadcast</review_text>
Try this, you won't regret it! Size would be the only con ... but then it's far better than regular binoculars</review_text>
These binoculars are not a gadget but a real advance.  I am an engineer and was at first skeptical that the internal control system of the binoculars could really deliver an enhancement in seeing.  However, I was amazed by their resolution from the first try.  I view astronomical objects as well as animals.  My first trial was reading a number tag on a high voltage line 500 yds away.  Unstabilized I could see the yellow sign containing the number but could not resolve it with my eye; as soon as I pressed the stabilizer button the sign was easily readable!  As a second example, I noticed a buck deer dozing along a fence 300 yds away but the motion of the binoculars unstabilized did not allow me to count his points.  Press the button, seven on one side 6 on the other!  So even though the resolution of the binoculars does not change theoretically, the IS mechanism, increases your hand held seeing resolution by what I would say would be a factor 5.  This is in addition to the fact that the image does not jiggle but remains locked in view.  Works correspondingly well for viewing star clusters, nebulae and the moon.  No motion of the stars hand held</review_text>
Great product for the price.It's tough to hold a 10X binocular steady, but when you hold down the stabilize button it locks on.  You can also pan while locked down to track something moving such as wild game or airplanes, etc.Low light viewing is not so good, but I'm not willing to pay the premium to get that, nor carry the extra weight that would go with larger lenses.</review_text>
I purchased this item mainly for bird watching.  I own two Canon lenses with IS technology and I really appreciate the value that IS brings in.  I have tried other binoculars in the same range and found that Canon 10x30 IS outperforms all of them.  The image clarity is excellent.  IS works great and reduces eye strain to a great extend.  The compact design and the light weight help you to carry the binocular along with your other photography gears and field guides.   Only drawback I could find is not having a lens cover for the object lens.  Be aware that, this binocular is water resistant, not water proof. Overall a great investment. I would recommend this to anyone looking for a good binocular for bird watching and sports.</review_text>
We live at the edge of a bay and do a fair amount of bird and boat watching.  We've been using the binoculars for five months now and find them GREAT for that purpose.  We use them constantly and the IS feature takes the annoying flutter away.  We would like to get another pair for the car.  Can't recommend them highly enough</review_text>
There's not much to tell.  It's a simple part and does what it is designed to do</review_text>
There isn't too much you can say about this product because its just an adapter. I ordered it for my A520 and it fits just fine and I have no problem attaching filters to it.</review_text>
I've have had this device since about 5/2006 and have been relatively pleased with the results.  Video in low light conditions is not great, but outdoors video and indoor/outdoor photos are fine.  Though I do have a HD television, I tend not to view my videos on it.  I transfer the video files to my MacBook Pro and view them with QuickTime Player.  I think the video quality is great and just the fact I have instant access to the videos is a huge plus!  The small size is also great...I just came back from a ski trip and was actually skiing and filming at the same time!  You wouldn't do that with that big Sony HD camera!  Sanyo has also told me the SDHC (high capacity) cards will also work in this camera, so I intend to buy a 4G card very soon.  Amazon also sells some lens attachments that Sanyo has come out with that I may look in to</review_text>
have had this cam since last April 2006   I did put some microphone foam over the microphones which eliminated any wind noise and didnt change the exsiiting quailty stereo recording.  Wind Noise filter wasnt enough to cut out all wind noise.   Camera is amazing considering its size  best part is that it can be slipped in my front pants pocket and goes unnoticed and is there when you need it!Low light video recording is grainy when yuo set asa to 400  but so was 35mm SLRs when using 400 speed film a few years back  get same feeling with this cam.  Low light auto focusing  is touch and go just have to give cam time to focus  or manully set the focus.   Awesome closeup pics in both still and video mode   can get down to 1/2" away from subject   so close  lens can produce a shadow in the image.  I always shoot in 5meg size and can get 700 some pics with a 2GB card and I have 4 of those for weekend events.for this price and small size I am 100% sold on this cam  but I use to shoot 35mm slr with 2-3 lens etc and camera bag over the shoulder  Now just this tiny cam in my pocket I get both still and HD Video  really amazing.You can get better HD and still pics but not in anything that fits  in a front pants pocket!</review_text>
I really like this camera, being a first time camcorder buyer it works great! I do have issues with the low light capabilites and also the HD quality, but other than that if you can pick one up used or for $450 it is well worth it. It is a fun camera to cary in your pocket and point and shoot small clips. Love that you plug it in via usb and drag of the .mov files</review_text>
I read lots of reviews for this camera before I bought one, and now that I have one I'm thrilled.  It's true that the low light issues are there, but I find that I don't use a camera if it's a pain to carry around.  This little thing fits in my pocket, takes great stills and above average video.  I've filmed the kids more in the last two weeks than I have in a couple of years. Don't listen to the videophiles who pan the image quality.  If you want a true pocket-sized video camera, this is the one</review_text>
After reading alot of the reviews on here and other places, everyone gave it a ho-hum rating.  I disagree, as with other things you have to take these with a grain of salt.I just purchased mine about 3 weeks ago and I've already taken it to two nascar races and more importantly, Las Vegas for a weekend.  It really proved itself in Vegas.  I walked up and down the strip multiple times (and made a few stops along the way) and had this camera in my pocket the whole time.  It never felt heavy or uncomfortable walking, standing or sitting.  Plus I could just take it out and within a few seconds take a picture or a movie of the many sights there.Unless you're some sort of videophile, this camera is great. Once you make a few important settings, its rock solid.  Remember, its an HD video and 5MP camera...and it looks it.  My requirements were to have a good video camera and good still camera all in one because I don't want to carry 2 cameras and I wanted something small and sleek to fit in my pocket as I don't want to walk for miles up and down the Strip with a camera bag.  This was PERFECT!The price was a bit steep for comparable sized units (also from sanyo), but I don't plan on buying another for a while and thought the HD would be worth it.  I opted for the 2GB card off the bat as it was pretty inexpensive and would hold plenty of video...and it did. I've found that rarely does anyone shoot anything for an hour straight; it's usually 1 min here, 4 min there, etc.  The only thing it doesn't have is night shooting, but ya can't have everyhthing and it takes fine pictures with even a little light.Anyway, great camera</review_text>
Just got the camera and from what I've seen so far it is a wonderful piece of equipment.  My only complaint is that Amazon misrepresented the battery type saying it is, "powered by EN-EL3a or EN-EL3" which is not true and disappointing to anyone who is upgrading from a camera that does use those batteries (ie D70)  The D200 uses the EN-EL3e which doesn't have the same fit as the EN-EL3a or EN-EL3.Be aware of this if you are upgrading</review_text>
This is my 2nd Digtial SLR.  In the film days, I was using Nikon products.  In my initial foray into digital photography, I switched to Canon (10D) just to see what's on the other side of the fence.  After about three years, I switched back to Nikon because the Nikon products suits me better.No, this is not a "Canon sucks, Nikon rules" review.  One thing I learned about digital photography is that you should really decide not on the camera body itself, but on the whole lineup...including the lenses and accessories.  For me, the Nikon lens line-up works for me better, not because Canon has worse line-up...I'm sure a lot of photographers find the Canon line-up much more sensible.Now, on to the camera itself: I've own this camera for over a year and has sold a number of stock images using this camera.  Suffice to say, I'm very satisfied with its performance; I'm not going to re-iterate the praises that's been said in the previous reviews.What I am compelled to say are the not-so-great characteristics of this camera: in ISO400 and above, it is not very forgiving to underexposure.  if you did not nail the exposure, even in RAW you will see noise in the shadow area when you try to correct the exposure in the RAW software converter.  This is why you hear a lot of whining from D200 owners regarding "noise."  Most of them don't nail exposure the first time and try to adjust in RAW converter...and then BAM! noise in the shadows.Auto White balance becomes iffy as well in underexposure; everything becomes biased to magenta in underexposure; and this is very hard to correct even in post-processing.The Nikon Creative Lighting System is I believe the feature that makes Nikon a little better than Canon in artificial lighting exposure.  Basically, Nikon has designed their flash system with multiple flashes in mind.The Nikon auto-focus engine is better than most Canon folks tend to evangelize.  With AFS lenses I'm positive it's as fast as any Canons.  If there's one thing I would like to change in future iterations of this product: I NEED MORE THAN ONE CROSS-TYPE AF POINTS!  The newer Pentax DSLR has NINE out of its 11 AF points!  This is beneficial to a more accurate focus.So my recommendation...if you already have Nikon lenses, and thinking if it's worth the price difference to jump from a D40/D50/D70.  It's unequivocably a "YES."  If you're just starting with a DSLR system, I say look closely on what Nikon/Canon/Pentax/Olympus/Leica/Sigma has to offer as a whole system then decide.  IF you decide on Nikon, you won't be yearning to own a higher D2-series model with this camera; it's almost the same feature set at a lower price</review_text>
A great choice for first time buyers. This camera is easy to learn and it has advanced features that you can learn as you go... and when you master these you will realize that you are shooting like a pro.The vast array of nikon lenses and accessories were a big selling point for me as was the ability to control Nikon speedlights remotely via the camera for some really great shooting setups.The D200 is my dream come true. It provides all the professional features that an amateur would want at a price that is affordable.The D200 incorporates most of the latest enhancements available in digital imaging including a 10 megapixel censor, MATRIX II metering, detailed battery indicator, large buffer for continuous shoots and much much more.Buy this Nikon</review_text>
The Nikon D200 is an amazing camera. This review is about Amazon packing procedures.This review is to alert prospective buyers that Amazon does not pack these cameras well. I just purchased one and it came packed like a book, with very little padding. I called Nikon and their recommendation was to return the item pronto. I have returned the camera (with much trepidation)and will purchase from another trusted source. Just wanted to give you all a heads up</review_text>
I have been waiting for an affordable Nikon digital SLR on which I could use my older Nikon lenses (AI, Series E, etc.).  I know, I could have spent thousands on a D2, but that would have been overkill for me.  Suffice to say, the D200 is a joy to use.  It is fast, solid, and intuitive.  For those owners of Nikon film SLRs who are considering a D200, to me it "feels" just like a Nikon film SLR.  I have previously owned several high-end digital point and shoot cameras, and the D200 blows them away in terms of its capabilities, the degree of control it offers, and the resulting quality of the pictures you can take with it.  It has all the features an advanced amateur photographer could possibly want.  I'll probably never even scratch the surface of all of its features, but its nice to know they're there if I want or need them.  I highly recommend the D200 to anyone who, like me, has been waiting for the right digital SLR to come along</review_text>
Nikon has always been the leader in photography/ camera/ lenses.  Others have nobly tried but a Nikon remains the high bar that others only hope to reach.When the shift from film to digital began, there was some speculation if Nikon could keep up with the competition.  Well, rest assure that not only have they kept up, they continue to lead the way.  The latest example of this is the D200.Like the D70/ D80 - this is a solid piece of equipment.  Just the feel of it tells you that you are holding an excellent piece of technology.  But the proof will always be in the end results and again, the combination of the Nikon know-how and Nikon lenses lead even a beginner to come up with excellent pictures.Gone is the "lag between shots".  You can fire up and shoot multiple pictures in seconds so action shots are all yours.  Without even "tweaking" a picture with a computer program, you can print top of the line photos at home.People have cited the cons:  Expensive.  Yes.  The camera does come with a hefty price tag but it should be kept in mind that this is a piece of machinery intended for serious photographers.  If you are a "vacation and holiday" picture taker, then you should elect to buy a cheaper camera.  The same is true with the difficulty of the multitude of small buttons, dials and switches.  There are too many and they can be overwhelming but only to someone who is in the "point and shoot" school of picture taking.  Anyone else will relish the options that Nikon has provided us with on the D200.Room for improvement?  Well, the battery life is nowhere near as good as the D70 which I upgraded from but that is a weak complaint as you can still get hundreds of shots on one charge.  Also, it would be a boon if the flash would automatically pop up when needed like in former models.So if you are serious about photography and always have one at the ready, this is the one for you</review_text>
My first professional digital SLR was the Nikon D1X.  I got great pictures with it but it was too large and heavy to lug around for extended periods.  I also had some issues with its operation.  But now, Nikon seems to have solved my issues with the D200.  I purchased the dedicated SB-800 flash and 18-200 lens recommended in the D200's manual.  The whole system is much improved over my other digital SLR.  Both focus and metering seem to work more reliably.  It works better in available light.  The optical anti-vibration aids in overall picture sharpness (plus for those of us who are not rock-steady).  I am getting use to the button sequence required to enlarge the picture preview and really like the amount of magnification possible.  The menuing system seems quite extensive and well-organized.  I would like more latitude in the picture quality settings (e.g. contract, saturation, and sharpness).  The help screens really tell me something when I'm confused.  I appreciate the "modeling" feature.  It is useful when attempting to compose in a dark situation.  It also lets me see reflections BEFORE they are committed to the picture.  Unfortunately this feature does not work using the built-in flash.  I wish Nikon could add some type of lock on the continuous-single-manual focus selector on the front of the camera.  My finger seems to move that switch unknowingly.  I would appreciate a battery charger with a built in plug rather than the detachable cord.  As a person who still wears thick glasses, I wish Nikon could make the viewfinder more like the one on their old N8008.  Or maybe it's time to do away with pentaprisoms and mechanical mirrors  and give us a truly pro camera that mimics the high-end pro-sumer models with electronic viewfinders and adjustable view screens</review_text>
I think the point a lot of people are not mentioning about the d200 is quite obvious.  Let me be the first to say that the main reason I bought the d200 over the d80 was to increase my credibility and prestige as an amateur photographer, make other photographers jealous of my kit, and to brag about the obscene amount of money I spend on camera equipment while my co-workers can't even pay their rent.  I bought the grip because I thought it looked really cool, and it increased the size and visibility of my camera to other people.  The question that really sold me on the d200 was: will strangers that I might want to photograph be more likely to say yes standing on the other side of a d80 or a d200?  Will people have less doubts about me holding this thing opposed to a smaller model?  Which one looks cooler?If I was completely loaded would I buy the D2Xs? Without a second thought.Of course I talked to a lot of camera people making minimum wage hoping that they would have some technical insight about purchasing a Nikon or other camera.  Of course they let me down and said a lot of bogus things to me most saying something like: "the d200 is way to much camera for me."  None of them knew how to change the exposure settings, they were contented with the wheel and "child mode," on top of the d80 and recited this to me several times as if I looked like a soccer mom.  As usual I was offended by the human experience of buying in the real world, especially the atrocious mark up of several hundred dollars, I refused to help pay those employees wages.  The breaking point I think was the time an associate instructed me to buy one camera over the other because, "when she dropped this camera it broke and the other one didn't."  So I turned to the internet where I only have to say hi to the UPS man as he leaves.I studied and studied all things technical, sometimes just staring at pictures of cameras for long periods of time without blinking.  I poured over thousands of photographs taken by all kinds of cameras and amassed a photographic library while I decided.  Basically I went way overboard and let the decision of buying a camera engulf my life until I was dreaming about it.So one night I just bought the d200 after being on the fence over the d80 or the d200.  And after two days it arrived and I was impressed with it.  The thing is literally a cold hard photographic machine.After being broken in on the d50 I was firstly impressed with the size, and then secondly all of the dials and switches to change things that I used to have to dig through the menu to get to.  Thirdly I liked the blazing fast 2 frame rate.When I go out at night I snap the 50mm f/1.8 onto it and crank the iso up.  A lot of people in the forms were complaining about the noise in the high iso of the d200 but I thought it was fine.  I feel most people from that camp want perfect clarity all the way up into the highest isos but I think that is artistically limiting.  I read one scathing review written by a veteran film user saying that basically high iso in digital has a lot less graininess than film basically saying that the d200 is a step up but some people still want to complain.  As far as the d200 goes versus the d50 at iso 1600 it is leaps and bounds better in my opinion.  The noise is way reduced without NR and there isn't that pixel chunkiness I found in the d50 at high isos.Another thing that stands out on the d200 is the enhanced colors.  In reality the ultra vivid setting on the d200 makes a lot of things look sort of fake, but it does make people who don't have a sun tan look like they have one which is a plus in my opinion.  It can make your dull green lawn look like a lush paradise, skies are ultra blue, and reds are spectacular.  I remember when I used the d50 I would steer away from photographing violets and red roses because it would blow them out, not so with the d200.  For some reason coming from point and shoot it always used to annoy my that the d50 didn't have b&w or sepia.  The d200 has b&w but no sepia.  The nerds in the forums would just say, "use cs2, or a photo editor," but I say no because I should be able to do everything in camera.The viewfinder is so awesome.  I literally hated electronic viewfinders and the d50's viewfinder was so small that it hindered my framing at times.  The d200 has a big bright viewfinder and a huge lcd that sucks down batteries like nothing.  As far as my evolution goes in photography sometimes I feel like I can literally climb into the viewfinder because its so big compared to what I was used to.Like I said the grip is awesome and I really like it.  I kind of like having as many accessories as possible and that kind of steered me away from the D2Xs into the d200.  Watching the percentage marks count down as the batteries drain is always fun.  The best thing about the d200 is little things like that because they make me feel like I have greater control over my pictures because I know exactly how many I can take.In conclusion buy the d200 over the d80 I am really happy with it and I am not happy with anything.  If you're having trouble considering what you want photographically try and pull yourself away from forums and outside sources and really consider what got you into photography in the first place and where you intend to go with it, I think that is the important part.  Advertising and gear collecting never made anyone a better artist</review_text>
I bought this camera as a back-up to my D2X and so I wouldn't have to change lenses as much on a trip I'm taking to Alaska this summer. Well let me tell you, the D200 with the 18-200mm VR lens is incredible. It is fast, quiet and a pleasure to use. I've read in forums that the 18-200 is a little soft. So far I totally disagree, the pictures I've taken have been very sharp. I wish this would have been available when I bought my D2X. If it had, I would own two D200's instead of one of each. Highly recommended !!</review_text>
Okay, let's get a few things out of the way:1. This case has no belt loop. None. Zip. Nada. So it's good for protecting your camera while being carried around in a pocket or a purse, but you won't be hanging this thing off of your belt like Batman.2. The picture doesn't show it, but there's a hole on the top center of the "lid" of the case to let the wrist strap pass through.3. The case has white stitching. Very classy, IMHO.4. The round "bump" on the flap that secures the top lid of the case is not a snap closure, it's a magnet. The intention here is good in that it makes the lid easy to open without having to tug excessively on the case, but it's a double-edged sword because the case can also be opened if it's carried in a purse or bag with any other object that can rub up against the front of the case and push the magnetic flap up. So make sure this case sits solo, I guess.5. Although the case is made of genuine leather, it sure doesn't smell like it; it smells like it was buried in ground black pepper for about a month. Pretty disappointing.All in all, the Fujifilm SC-FXZ1B Leather Camera Case is an elegant well-crafted item that ties in with the Z1's target user: The fashion-minded occasional snapshooter that carries a ultra-compact camera more for a statement than as a necessity</review_text>
I have always been an SLR photographer and have held off on purchasing a digital camera up until now because I have not been convinced of the resolution capabilities of digital.  I travel alot and sometimes due to space and sometimes due to the desire to be inconspicuous I have needed something smaller than my full size SLRs.  After a lot of research, looking at every model I could find, I settled on this Panasonic Lumix LX2 because I don't have to give up the control over every aspect of the photo. This camera lets you be a control freak, or you can leave it in one of several automatic modes.  It can store pictures in RAW mode, which is important to me (the Canon G7 lost out because it didnt have this) but the JPEG mode is great.  I have blown up some prints from this camera and I am completely satisfied with the quality, and I was skeptical before, expecting to be underwhelmed.I originally bought this as a backup to my SLRs but I already see this will be my primary camera unless I am a situation that calls for  a special lens, flash power, or super high resolution (like 25 or 60 ASA)My only suggestion to Panasonic would be to allow you to charge the battery while in the camera, like with a car charger, and make some sort of accomodation for external flash.  The flash on this camera is the weak spot - it's really not that bad for the size but if it could sync with an external flash that would be good</review_text>
I bought this camera after DPreview told me that it (well, actually, its Leica sibling) fits all of my needs, namely: compact, RAW, and aperture priority, plus optical stabilization.What I like: large screen, RAW, fairly decent flashWhat I dislike: it actually takes RAW + JPEG which wastes space on my card. However, it gives me an interesting comparison. 90% of the time, I prefer the RAW version, albeit tweaked. The JPEG colors just don't look right to me. I'm also unimpressed with the image stabilization, and the warranty is just terrible. 90 days??? What's with that? Also, the manual focus without a viewfinder takes getting used to.I won't argue that there's noise at higher ISOs, but it's not nearly as bad as I expected from other reviews. I haven't decided yet whether I'm keeping the camera; if you're not in a hurry, hold off and see if they release a new version in the summer. Of course, with their track record, they won't fix any of the problems, just squeeze a few more MP out of the chip</review_text>
While I am nowhere close to being a pro, I am not a stranger to photography or to digitals.  Recently I wanted something better than what I had for an upcoming trip to Italy and I bought the Lumix DMC-LX2 on Amazon after reading reviews, etc.It is no SLR, but it is far more than a "back-up" camera.  It is small enough to be handy without being a burden.  (A friend we were travelling with had a digital SLR with a 135mm zoom.  She had it in her bag most of the time because it was so big and heavy.)The lens quality is very good.  The absence of a traditional view finder is very nice.  The TV screen on the back works in all lighting conditions (its adjustable).  You can have as little or a lot of the technical data on the screen as you want.  It even has a couple of nice composition templates that I found useful at times.I bought one of the after market batteries and couple of 2 gig cards and I had far more capacity than I needed for a 2 week trip, but the second card is necessary if you shoot at max pixels as I did the whole time.  At max jpg a 2 gig card holds about 350 shots.  One battery was all I needed so long as I watched the charger carefully at night.  Sometimes the current converter one has to use in Italy would shut down mid-charge.  So my advice is to have a second battery and switch them out.This camera is very versatile.  It will do a lot if one takes the time to study the manual.  (The manual is not the best, however)  The SLR's do beat out its zoom, but that is not much of a problem for casual shooting because one can crop the tar out of the 10.1mg shots and still have a great photo.The flash works fine.  And one can fill flash with it.  I bought a small slave unit that works great but I never needed it.I found a handy, cheap, case at REI.  They have a padded cell phone case that hooks up to a belt or a back pack.  This camera fits the REI case perfectly.  It even has side mesh pockets for batteries and chips.  I forget the price but I think it was less than 20 bucks.</review_text>
This camera does what it says it does: it takes 16:9 pictures and video at 10.2MP for pictures and OK resolutions for video. It takes decent video, if you put it on a tripod. The built-in stabilization is worthless in video mode and you'll get a palsy type shaking no matter what you do. In other words, this will not replace your camcorder. In picture mode, it does a good job with most outdoors/indoors settings if you're not too picky about the lens distortions around the corners at the highest resolution. This is especially obvious if you take pictures where vertical objects appear near the left or right edges of the frame (like stop signs, light posts, building edge lines etc.)All in all, a decent buy for home use. Not something to look into if you'll be frequently printing your pictures for posterity or for use in professional publications</review_text>
This is a very flexible and capable camera. If you are looking for more than a point & shoot will offer, there are very few that would compare. For me the deciding factor was the high quality lieca lens with wide angle, if you havent compared this directly with a conventianal lens you will be amazed at what youve been missing. the 16:9 is an ok feature if you plan on HDTV veiwing but the screen size is compromised when you switch to 4:3. i would prefer a larger screen and lose the 16:9 feature. the lens cap is a little annoying as well but those issues aside, i am very satisfied</review_text>
I've had this camera for about a month.  I currently own a Nikon D50 and an 2 year old Canon Powershot.  I needed something small and handy to use as a walk around camera.  I've been reading reviews for months on various digital cameras, poured through thousands of images posted on flickr, and I decided on this camera.  I loved the look, the size, the price, and the leica lens.The images are sharper and the colors are more vibrant than my Nikon D50 and my Canon Powershot.  I love the manual settings available on this camera.  I mostly use the P setting.  Although adjusting shutter speed and aperture can be awkward using the joystick, the menu is very simple and offers a lot of control.I also like the fact that people stop me on the street whenever I use my camera</review_text>
At least for now it is :-) .  During the course of the past 10-12 months I have owned 7, that's SEVEN, digital cameras: Canon S230; Kodak V530; 5 different models of Casio's: Z60, Z600, Z850, P700; and most recently presented my wife with a red S770 for Valentine's Day.  I also had a pretty good chance to evaluate Canon SD450 (my brother-in-law owns one - it was actually a gift from my wife and I to him for his 21st birthday), Casio EX-S600 (a good friend of mine owns one), and Panasonic DMC-TZ1 (once again, a gift from my wife and I to my father-in-law for his last birthday).  If you read any of my digital camera reviews (and I've written a few by now), then you know that I'm not particularly fond of Canon's lately - I think they are overrated and overpriced for what they have to offer.  As I also mentioned before, I've tried several different Kodak models (and I used to work for the company too!), but all of them turned out to be a waste of my time, to say the least.  I became a big fan of Casio's, although not all of my experiences with them were great.  But being a huge gadget "freak" that I am, and constantly wanting new "toys", I have always craved for more.  Over time, my tastes in digital cameras have changed from having a simple point and shoot type of camera to wishing for more power and manual control.  So one by one, I returned/sold all of my cameras, and after extensive (and I really do mean extensive) research, I got myself an LX2.  I must say though that I probably wouldn't have without getting to know my father-in-law's TZ1 first.  I was actually quite impressed with it.  Powerful zoom, sharp lens, decent picture quality.  I also played with some other Panasonic models in various stores just to get a better feel for them, as well as spent a few hours on the phone, and exchanged numerous e-mails with a friend of mine who owns an FZ30, and who swears by it.  Unfortunately, LX2 was not available anywhere locally, but I felt that I got a pretty good understanding of what Panasonic's cameras are all about, and after some more thought and consideration, I went ahead and bought it from Amazon (nice thing about buying from Amazon is that you can always return whatever it is you bought, including digital cameras, within 30 days for a full refund, no questions asked).  I did know about the "Noise" issue at high ISO's, but it wasn't a decisive factor for me, and I'm glad I didn't pay much attention to it and got the camera anyway.  It turned out to be one of the best purchases I've made in a long while.  Here is why:PROS:- Superb design.  This camera is wonderfully crafted.  And I absolutely love Black!  It gives the camera a nice, clean, professional look.  I don't think I'll be buying another silver camera soon after having this one;- Intuitive controls, and menus.  I charged the battery, put it into the camera, and started using it and taking pictures right away, without even going through the manual once;- A load of features, including a large, bright, widescreen LCD; wide angle, super sharp Leica lens with a 4x zoom; Mega OIS - optical image stabilization control (optical means it's done mechanically, which is a TRUE way of doing stabilizing, comparing to other cameras where it's done by "tricking" the camera into using higher ISO's); and many more.  In addition, it has a joystick for an easy access to different menus, has a number of manual controls, as well as provides ability to shoot in RAW format (more on that later);- It comes with SilkyPix Developer Studio software for working with camera RAW files.  For someone who is not familiar with RAW - it's a "pure", camera specific picture format.  It varies upon a manufacturer, meaning that Canon RAW is different from Nikon or Panasonic RAW, for example.  And it's "pure" in a sense that it's of a much better quality than a standard JPEG (JPG), and doesn't suffer from loss of information, such as white balance, or brightness.  There is a lot more to RAW than that, and I'm not going to go into details right now.  What I want to say, however, is that having previously owned a camera which supported RAW format (Casio EX-P700), I must have tried about a dozen of different RAW editing software packages, including products from Adobe, Ulead, ArcSoft, PhotoFiltre, Picture Window Pro, ACDSee, LightZone, Image Broadway, and more. SilkyPix delivered by far the best results of all.  The only one that I would probably put next to it is Bibble;- Noise - What Noise?!  I really hate it when I hear people complaining about noise in this camera (after having it tried myself), or any other compact digital camera for that matter.  Are you really that nave that you think that you will get absolutely no noise in your images using a compact digital camera?  Think again.  You might have noticed that I've used the word "Compact" several times here.  I've done it on purpose - it is inevitable for a compact digital camera to produce some noise.  Some cameras are better than others, but no matter how hard you try, you will see some.  This camera is no better or worse than any other one that I've had/tried.  At higher ISO's (above 400), it's slightly more visible, but who in the right state of mind is using anything over ISO 200 on a compact digital camera, such as this one, anyway?  I always have mine set to a 100.  If I feel that it doesn't get the job done, I shoot in RAW;- Picture Quality is Very Good.  Yes, it does take some time getting used to, but once you familiarize yourself with everything this camera is capable of, you can achieve spectacular results, especially if you don't mind doing some post processing.As much as I like everything this camera has to offer, there are, however, some things that kind of irritate me.  Here is a short list of bad things about this camera, otherwise known asCONS:- First of all, this camera has actually been somewhat misrepresented.  It's been advertised as a 10.2 megapixel camera, which is not entirely true.  10.2 MP resolution is available ONLY in 16:9 (wide) aspect ratio.  Two more ratios are available - 3:2, and a more conventional 4:3, but those offer 8.5, and 7.5 MP resolutions respectively.  So if you compare this camera to others that don't have a widescreen format, or if you prefer to shoot only in a regular 4:3 mode, then this camera should only be referred to as a 7 MP digital camera (because not all the pixels are actually effective).  Obviously, Panasonic is aware of it, and marketed it having higher pixel count on purpose, to boost consumer's interest;- I expected to see a compact digital camera.  What I got instead was actually a smaller compact camera than I expected.  I was really surprised to see how small, yet convenient to hold and operate, the camera body was.  What I didn't like, however, was the lens.  Not the lens itself, it's actually quite superb, but the fact that it sticks out.  I like cameras with lenses that retract all the way back to the camera body.  I realize that it would probably loose some features, like the wide angle, and perhaps zoom, but I still wish it did that.  It would be so much more... umm... compact?!  The way it actually is makes it quite difficult to find the right case for it.  Almost impossible, I should say.  I've tried a few, but they are either too small or too big.  I just can't find one that would fit right.  I put an order for an SLX1B case for it, which is specifically designed to fit LX1, and LX2 models, but I hear they are not that good.  We shall see;- I'm not a big fan of a pop-up Flash.  I always keep forgetting to open it when I need to use it.  And it also seems a bit flimsy.  I'm treating it as carefully as I can, but I just can't stop thinking that it might break soon;- I hate the Lens Cap!!!  There, I said it.  It's probably just one of those small annoyances that keep frustrating you until you get used to it, but for now I'm not really happy with it.SUMMARY:Despite very few minor negatives, I think LX2 is probably one of the best, most innovative cameras on the market today, and I sure am glad to have one.  It offers more than any other camera in the same price range, and can even compete with some DSLR's when it comes to picture quality.  If you are someone like me, who wants to have more control and/or learn more about digital photography, or a DSLR user who just needs a solid backup to carry everywhere, then this camera is not be overlooked!  Highly recommended</review_text>
Meets all expectations.  Questions of noise are greatly overblown.  Image stabilation reduces impact of noise in low light.  Do people really expect to get a great image at very low light condition?  Regardless of noise contrast will be too low to get a quality image except in very special circumstances.  Up until last few years ISO 400 film had similar problems and ISO 800 was virtually useless except to get a image.  When I got this camera I took numerous pictures at night inside and got very good quality pictures without flash.  Far better than my old ditigal and better than my film camera.  LCD size and image quality is really impressive.  The best I have seen</review_text>
Fantastic camera! The Nikon legend lives on! Great bright screen, great pictures, video, and so much more. Amazon had the cheapest price anywhere</review_text>
I chose this camera specifically because of the advertised in-camera red-eye reduction fix. I have a new baby and like any proud parent, take loads of photos of him. It is a pain to have to fix the red-eye manually in Photoshop, but at the same time I don't want to lug around (or learn how to use) an SLR type camera. I thought the Coolpix S9 would be the solution to my problems. While the photos are very crisp and clear, the red-eye is worse than in my old Casio digital camera and the flash really washes out indoor photos taken at night. In fact the flash is so bright it makes my son turn away from the camera, so the pictures that didn't have red-eye were all of the back of his head! I returned this camera and am renewing my search for something that will meet my needs</review_text>
Great pictures, fast response time. good resolution for a little ultra compact.  Why pay for the sony T10, when this is so much less, and takes standard SD memory like my old camera. The memory stick change is the major reason why I wont change over to sony. nikon shines with this one</review_text>
the quality of nikon is still no. 1.  night shots with flash are ok.  I like the non-protruding camera lens technology and just fits me.  Good buy for me</review_text>
You can do better for the money. The image quality is below average and low light is really bad, even for a novice camcorder. I'm glad to see the price has come down. The camcorder did not come with the software needed to capture video or even play the dvd on my computer(it really should have). I would do more research and choose a camera that is right for you. I found many online camcorder review sites very helpful. I returned it and bought another panasonic with 3ccd technology. It has much better picture quality. If you want really good night vision go with sony. I would not recomend this camcorder to anyone</review_text>
This camcorder is awesome!! Easy to use and the instruction manual breaks things down for you Barney Style:)The battery only lets you record continuously for about 2 and a half hours (more than I need) so you may want to have a standby battery waiting if it's nessasary</review_text>
I like my new panasonic recorder (you might consider the next model up before you buy). What I would really like to review is the performance of Amazon. The first unit I bought performed marginally, so the first chance I got I exchanged it with Amazon. They took care of the problem, by replacing it with a new camera. They moved on the problem so fast that my jaw dropped. I could not believe how quickly and professionally Amazon took care of the situation! I am old enough to be a little reluctant to use the internet, but Amazon gives me the confidence to know if its not right, it will be, quickly!   Thanks Amazon</review_text>
We purchased the Panasonic VDR-D100 as our first video camera after the birth of our daughter. We wanted the ability to record directly to DVD, playback on our DVD player and be able to edit on our computer. Just as the last reviewer stated; getting the DVD-RW discs to recognize on our computer was the main problem. We wanted to be able to do this so we could do the simple editing functions like dividing and combining on the camera, but then embellish a little with transition shots and cleaning up the video on our computer. We also wanted to upload the video through YouTube online to our blog.After a little research and working with the CSRs at Panasonic, we were able to figure out we needed 1) a Driver 2) authoring software and 3) software to recognize and play the DVD-RW on our computer. For less than $20 (including shipping) Panasonic sent us DVD-Movie Album SE 4.2, which included the driver (reads the DVD-RW, but no editing is allowed) and DVDFunStudio 2.4 (authoring software, which allows editing).After tinkering with it for about an hour I realized the manuals (in PDF on the program) are not very easy to understand for a novice like myself, so I opted to forego the authoring software for Microsoft MovieMaker. I needed the DVD-Movie Album SE 4.2 though regardless to be able to recognize the DVD on my computer. For less than $20--that wasn't bad at all.My review was editing focused because that is the major downfall of the camera. I wanted to share how we got around that downfall and how pleased we are with the result. I created my first edited video of our daughter and was able to save it to my computer, upload it through YouTube to our blog, then save it to a regular DVD (to get it off our computer) and re-use the DVD-RW disc to save us a little cash.I don't know enough about video cameras to tell anyone if it is good or not, really. It was inexpensive and it does well with my shaky abilities, so we are very pleased. It has a decent mic and is fair in low lighting situations.</review_text>
If you want a lens that stays on 24/7 while you chase your kids around (and carry their stuff altogether) and try to take decent pictures, well this is it. Good for every occasion, from wedding to landscape.Every once in a while I look up at new lenses wondering if it is time to get a new one, but having the 18-200mm, another one does not make sense unless you have the TIME to change lenses and the will to carry them. I am not a pro, and with this lens and my D70s I am way too happy. Sometimes when I am out shooting pictures I hardly have the time to change the camera settings, I cannot imagine changing the lens too. My other lenses are in the cabinet.If you are a professional you may get 4 lenses that have better performances, I am sure. But I have read reviews from pros that do like this pricey toy too.</review_text>
When you die and go to heaven, if you where a kind hearted photographer with a great eye, St Peter gives you a Nikon D200 with this 18-200mm VR zoom. To get the most out of this lens the user needs to carefully learn its digital features as a part of the Nikon D200 system.  This lens is much more that a zoom composition aid.  It's worth attending a car, boat or horse race just to play with the image stabilization (VR) capabilities.If you were born rich or have worked way too hard in your life just buy one!!</review_text>
I would not necessarily agree with a previous reviewer's assessment that it is lightweight.  I guess it's relative, but of the three lenses I own for my D80 it is the heaviest; although not so much that it's a hassle to carry.  I have found this lens to be great for a lot of different situations from landscapes to portraits.  One thing though, do heed the manual's, and Scott Kelby's book's, advice to turn the VR off when shooting with this lens on a tripod.  One thing to note, this lens is hard to come by and the vendors who do have some in stock are charging a premium over MSRP.  You have to decide if the premium is worth it (I decided it was) or if you want to get it up to $200 cheaper by waiting several weeks to months.  Eventually Nikon will get enough into the marketplace, but they aren't there yet</review_text>
No the lens doesn't do everything.  But after about six months on my camera its been the go to lens for 90% of my shots.  Lowlight, macro and extensive tele work need something more, but for everything else you can just keep it on.  The real benefit of this lens is that its sharp and contrasty from 18mm up through about 170mm.  Its main problems are vignetting at wide apertures and distortion.  On most photos its not noticeable, but when it is a problem Photoshop with PTlens or DxO can get you results that look like a pro lens because you've got the inherent sharpness and contrast to work with.  For its great flexibility, convenience, and dust protection (from not having to change lenses all the time) its worth its price</review_text>
Undoubtedly a great achievement by Nikon to offer this 18/200 range, very convenient to carry. A lower F/stop alternative would have made this lens even more successful.</review_text>
there are 1000+ reviews about this lens. i am going to put my openions only:First, Pros:1. versatile.2. effective VR.3. 11x Zoom4. sharp images.5. quick and quit focus.Cons:1. expensive.2. a bit heavy.3. suffer some distortion.4. f/3.5, i wish it was 2.8.overall, i am very happy with with this lens, if you are like me, who carry only one lens for everything, you can not go wrong with this lens</review_text>
I've had this lens for a month now and what a wonder it is. I've been in and out of photography for 30 years but am still a beginner. I read a lot about this purchase on the internet and it was overwhelmingly positive. It pays to research. I am selling my nikon 55-200mm but keeping my kit 18-55mm as backup. I also love my D40. Will probably pick up a 50mm 1.8 for indoor. Highly rated also.</review_text>
Thia is the 4th Comcorder I have. The picture is really clear even in the room at night with regular light. It's better than I thought. very easy to use and watch and download to computer. Picture quality is good even I watch it on 37" TV. I like it, especially for this price.  Highly recommanded.</review_text>
half the price i could find at the local store. with two quick release units. seems to be a great product</review_text>
This works fine for me - is easy to use and light to carry. If you are filming MMA or Muay Thai in a half cage, extend the legs straight down, spike-style, otherwise some heavyweights will clinch up and topple onto your new tripod before you can move and bust one of the struts.</review_text>
Overall, very nice product for the price.  I would have liked the lights to be a bit more powerful</review_text>
We just got these for a trip to Alaska. I LOVE them! They are so easy to share. The sharpness of the image is AMAZING! My Dad wears glasses and I don't. No problem. We can both see CLEARLY! The amazing part is he doesn't need to have his glasses on! My husbands eyesight is completely different than mine, same story.Very cool item! Very well constructed. Highly recommended</review_text>
These binocs are very similar to the ones they replaced that cost 5x as much.  The old ones got tossed because they were showing a double image after living in my backpack for 2 years or so.  The Bushnells may or may not have the quality of optics that the more expensive units did but the "Permafocus" or infinite depth focus makes it so you just pick them up and look.  If what you are looking at is further than about 75' away it will be clear.  This is really great when multiple users are using them as you don't have to reconfigure them for each persons eyes.  It is also good for scanning a wide area as you don't have to adjust focus for close or far.  This also makes them great for watching sports where things move fast.I decided to try these because we have some older 10x50 units that use the same "Permafocus" design under a different brand that got bought by Bushnell and they have been working great for over 10 years.  I hope I will be able to say the same about these.</review_text>
If you want to catch something in the binoculars quickly without fooling around trying to focus... this is it.  We live on a lake and we always have something in the wild to catch our eye.  This has been very beneficial to have the focus there at all times.  They are a bit bulky and somewhat heavy but an excellent pair of binoculars.  The "shake" with the power is not bad like we thought it would be.  I can not say enough about Bushnell as a company.  They support and back their products like I have never seen in ANY other company.  I will ALWAYS buy this brand from now on because of this.</review_text>
I actually have a less powerful binocular than this one, but it is the Bushnell Permafocus technology.  I can't even begin to describe how amazing it is to never have to focus your binoculars.  You just look through, and whatever you're looking at, regardless of distance (except very close-up), is in focus!  It's like a camera auto-zoom.  My husband wears glasses with a rather strong prescription, and he can see perfectly clearly through these binoculars without his glasses.  He just takes them off, and it's as if he never wears them</review_text>
I really like the perma-focus attribute of this product.  We use it for nature watching while hiking and vacationing.  It's good to be able to pass the binoculars back and forth to others without losing the subject while adjusting the focus each time.  Only drawback is the difficulty in holding binoculars steady when viewing due to magnification.  Best binoculars we've had</review_text>
I purchased these because I don't like taking my $100 binoculars to football games and rock concerts. These are perfect. The optics are a little cheap, but at $20, I think it's a steal</review_text>
these glasses are small, protable and good for concerts and quick bird work. I keep a set in the car, but they do not replace my larger busnells for birding. please don't expect to do more than a little backyard birding with these, and i am now adjusted to my larger set, so i use those in the yard. You get what you pay for</review_text>
I actually purchased 2 of these for Christmas presents.  I gave one pair to my son at a "early christmas" gathering & my husband was so enthused by the quality, I ordered another pair for him....AND received them before Christmas!  Per my husband:  "Very good quality...and compact so that they take up very little room in the glove box of my car!</review_text>
The Bushnell Powerview 12x25 is a fine, small pocket-sized binocular.  Since my wife is an avid bird watcher, we already have several binoculars of various sizes and viewing power.  Our grandson accidentally broke her small 10x25 Bushnell that we used for trips, so I researched, then bought this one from Amazon for her birthday.  She loves it.  The viewing power is a bit greater than the other and is every bit as compact, which makes it easy to pack for vacations, yet provides for a good viewing experience when enjoying the various bird populations around the country.  We both highly recommend this, and other Bushnell products</review_text>
What's not to like? Light, compact and comes with the strap, case and wipe cloth.  They are perfect.  Keep in mind 12 power can be more challeging to hold still</review_text>
Used this on a trip to Hawaii - brought the lava much closer (looked great at night). It's not difficult to focus, and provides clear images. I was not disappointed in the least.Compact size makes it pocketable - perfect for any traveler/casual user.Recommende</review_text>
Small and compact.  Let me see everyting I wanted to</review_text>
These are great little binoculars that I use quite often.  They are so compact and lightweight that I grab them whenever I leave the house - whether it be for a boat ride around the lake or just a quick ride.  I don't see quite as well when I leave my eyeglasses on and it does take a little bit more adjusting to get the focus right with eyeglasses, but they are a great pair of binoculars for the price.  I am very impressed with the quality of them.</review_text>
This is my first telescope. I was looking for an inexpensive one, but I didn't want a cheap toy. I researched every telescope I could find in the under $250 category and bought this one based on the reviews on Amazon, which appear to have given this telescope the highest rating in its price range. I'm very satisfied with it. No complaints.The telescope appears to be well built and has impressive features for the price, most notably the parabolic mirror. It's small enough to be easily portable and is easily set up on a table or milk crate. All you have to do is attach the finder scope and it is ready to use right out of the box. Mine needed no adjustments. The red dot finder scope makes aiming the telescope simple.One of the more difficult aspects of shopping for a telescope was trying to determine just what an image would look like in actual use. Having never used one before, specifications and comparisons were of little use to me, so I'll try to describe what you can expect to see with the StarBlast: The smaller magnification eyepiece shows the moon in sharp detail, and you can clearly see craters and surface features. When you look at the moon with a telescope, its features seem three-dimensional compared to any photographs you may be familiar with. With the larger magnification eyepiece, the moon's image more than fills the field of view, and you can see individual surface details. However, this larger magnification is more suitable for viewing more distant objects. For example, while looking at Orion, I clearly saw what appeared to be a cloud surrounding one of the stars. With a little research I determined I found the Great Orion Nebula. Cool! This is why I bought a telescope - to see things I would never have known about looking around with a pair of binoculars</review_text>
My sister was considering a telescope but was unsure whether she should put out a large amount of money for something she might not often use. I suggested the Orion StarBlast Astro Telescope as a way to test the waters first. The telescope is very inexpensive, yet reviews of the scope are good. What I didn't expect was how good this little telescope can be. Saturn's rings are clear, with a hint of Cassini on still nights. Jupiter's two primary bands are clear as well, and globular clusters are much brighter and more resolved than you would believe possible for a scope of this price (don't expect glittering jewelry boxes though.)The scope is well built, solid, yet lightweight. Its incredibly easy to use, and the view in the primary's sweet spot is bright and clear. Outside the sweet spot the images get distorted quickly, but for this price that is a small consideration.Like the rest of the scope, the red dot finder is easy to use. My sister's scope did not have the jerkyness other reviewers have reported, but I can't say whether we were lucky or they weren't.I have an informal test of whether a first telescope is any good: did the new owners put it in closet after a few frustrating attempts, or have they developed a growing fondness for and knowledge of astronomy? In our case the little StarBlast excelled at this test.One prior reviewer asked why, with a telescope this good at this price, everyone didn't have a telescope? Good question -- for a first scope, its well worth the price. If you are planning to buy or give a first scope, I wouldn't look any further. You will still be happily using this scope long after you move up to larger, more powerful telescopes</review_text>
As usual from Orion nice optics for the price. Would work much better on XT4.5" mount& base. I've experimented with this scope taking mirror cell out & installing altitude bearings from a xt4.5. Then installing on XT4.5 base & mount. Balance is not an issue on such a short focal length. High power views are now  easy to track plus height is a liile better. If you love your starblast order an XT4.5" mount & base from Orion. Probably under 100 bucks. My XT8 base was 110 shipped. Only thing is you'll have to dig up used altitude bearings from somebody. Well worth the work. I do not suggest attempting this unless your absolutely sure what you have to do to make it work, drilling of holes for bearings, alighning bearings evenly side to side, etc. But the results are grea</review_text>
This is my first telescope and I am very satisfied with my purchase. Portability and ease of use are high points - you can set it on top of car trunk and start using it in seconds. Gives clear and bright views of deep sky objects such as nebulas and clusters.It's not the best option however for watching planets as its short focal lenght requires high power eyepieces for high magnification and you pay for this in field of view and eyepiece relief - in other words if you want to see planets up close, your field of view will be narrow and you will have to keep your eye real close to the eyepiece (plus you will need to buy additional eyepieces).In sum, an excellent option for amateur use. If this is your first time as well, get a good guidebook ("Nightwatch" by Dickinson is a very good pick) and also a pair of binoculars to help you find your way around the sky - this is a piece of advice that first timers tend not to heed and then realize how hard it is to find objects with the relatively narrow field of view their telescope offer</review_text>
I agree with all the previous reviews. I've owned a number of telescopes. In all honesty, I never planned on getting this scope, but I changed my mind the first time I looked through one at star party. As some of the reviews have mentioned this little guy isn't really designed for high power views. However it does a decent enough job with it's 6mm eyepiece (75x) which lets you see Saturn's rings. Where this scope shines is wide field objects like the Pleiades, which are too big to be seen in a normal telescope. I believe a previous reviewer mentioned a jerky motion when turning the telescope. I was able to minimize this by taking the lazy susan type base apart and spraying Pledge furniture polish on the laminate surface to lessen friction.The biggest "con" this scope has is that it needs to be set on top of a table in order to get the eyepiece up to a comfortable height. However this telescope still blows away anything I've seen in Costco, Wallmart, etc.One thing you should be aware of is you really have to go somewhere pretty dark away from all lighting for this and any other telescope to achieve it's best views. Ideally somewhere out in the country as far away as possible from street lighting will let you enjoy much better views</review_text>
I've had an Orion StarBlast for over a year now, and even though I have larger, more sophisticated telescopes, it is the one I use most. The setup is instantaneous though, like other reflectors, it takes some time to cool down on cold nights. It's easily portable, and works well as a grab `n go. The short focal length makes it excellent for low power, wide field views of deep sky objects and the moon. Through the StarBlast, I have observed (to name a few) the Ring Nebula, the Andromeda Galaxy (along with its two neighboring galaxies), Galaxies M81 and M82, countless open clusters, the Lagoon and Trifid nebulas, The Eagle Nebula, the nebula in Orion, comets NEAT and LINEAR. Jupiter's belts and moons are apparent at higher power, as are Staurn's rings and the phases of Venus and Mercury. During the last opposition, I could see Martian polar ice caps. During the last lunar eclipse, I had no trouble taking digital photographs through this instrument.This is the same fast optics formula as the Edmund AstroScan and Bushnell Voyager bowling ball. The StarBlast is far and away the best of the three, but as with the others, the high power views are soft. That feature is not a problem for those of us primarily interested in deep sky. Planetary views could be more detailed, and my own StarBlast won't split the double double in suburban skies. (Orion's somewhat longer 4.5" f 8 dobsonian is more suited to these subjects.) In addition, most globular clusters present as unresolved fuzzy balls, as they will in any instrument of this aperture.For the price, though, you can't really beat the StarBlast. It works well as a family telescope, or as a casual scope for someone interested but not obsessed by astronomy. It is small, inexpensive, and intuitive enough to be handled by children. It also works nicely for crusty old guys like me who have bigger hardware, but just don't feel like moving it every night.</review_text>
Just got the camera and from what I've seen so far it is a wonderful piece of equipment.  My only complaint is that Amazon misrepresented the battery type saying it is, "powered by EN-EL3a or EN-EL3" which is not true and disappointing to anyone who is upgrading from a camera that does use those batteries (ie D70)  The D200 uses the EN-EL3e which doesn't have the same fit as the EN-EL3a or EN-EL3.Be aware of this if you are upgrading</review_text>
This is my 2nd Digtial SLR.  In the film days, I was using Nikon products.  In my initial foray into digital photography, I switched to Canon (10D) just to see what's on the other side of the fence.  After about three years, I switched back to Nikon because the Nikon products suits me better.No, this is not a "Canon sucks, Nikon rules" review.  One thing I learned about digital photography is that you should really decide not on the camera body itself, but on the whole lineup...including the lenses and accessories.  For me, the Nikon lens line-up works for me better, not because Canon has worse line-up...I'm sure a lot of photographers find the Canon line-up much more sensible.Now, on to the camera itself: I've own this camera for over a year and has sold a number of stock images using this camera.  Suffice to say, I'm very satisfied with its performance; I'm not going to re-iterate the praises that's been said in the previous reviews.What I am compelled to say are the not-so-great characteristics of this camera: in ISO400 and above, it is not very forgiving to underexposure.  if you did not nail the exposure, even in RAW you will see noise in the shadow area when you try to correct the exposure in the RAW software converter.  This is why you hear a lot of whining from D200 owners regarding "noise."  Most of them don't nail exposure the first time and try to adjust in RAW converter...and then BAM! noise in the shadows.Auto White balance becomes iffy as well in underexposure; everything becomes biased to magenta in underexposure; and this is very hard to correct even in post-processing.The Nikon Creative Lighting System is I believe the feature that makes Nikon a little better than Canon in artificial lighting exposure.  Basically, Nikon has designed their flash system with multiple flashes in mind.The Nikon auto-focus engine is better than most Canon folks tend to evangelize.  With AFS lenses I'm positive it's as fast as any Canons.  If there's one thing I would like to change in future iterations of this product: I NEED MORE THAN ONE CROSS-TYPE AF POINTS!  The newer Pentax DSLR has NINE out of its 11 AF points!  This is beneficial to a more accurate focus.So my recommendation...if you already have Nikon lenses, and thinking if it's worth the price difference to jump from a D40/D50/D70.  It's unequivocably a "YES."  If you're just starting with a DSLR system, I say look closely on what Nikon/Canon/Pentax/Olympus/Leica/Sigma has to offer as a whole system then decide.  IF you decide on Nikon, you won't be yearning to own a higher D2-series model with this camera; it's almost the same feature set at a lower price</review_text>
A great choice for first time buyers. This camera is easy to learn and it has advanced features that you can learn as you go... and when you master these you will realize that you are shooting like a pro.The vast array of nikon lenses and accessories were a big selling point for me as was the ability to control Nikon speedlights remotely via the camera for some really great shooting setups.The D200 is my dream come true. It provides all the professional features that an amateur would want at a price that is affordable.The D200 incorporates most of the latest enhancements available in digital imaging including a 10 megapixel censor, MATRIX II metering, detailed battery indicator, large buffer for continuous shoots and much much more.Buy this Nikon</review_text>
The Nikon D200 is an amazing camera. This review is about Amazon packing procedures.This review is to alert prospective buyers that Amazon does not pack these cameras well. I just purchased one and it came packed like a book, with very little padding. I called Nikon and their recommendation was to return the item pronto. I have returned the camera (with much trepidation)and will purchase from another trusted source. Just wanted to give you all a heads up</review_text>
The ergonomics: Perfect. The D200 is not completely rubber-encased. There's rubber where your hands need to hold it, and plastic where your hands rarely touch it. The hand grip is comfortable and nicely concave where the tips of your fingers can dig in.The battery door and the memory card door are made of plastic, and hinge-pinned. A simple slide latch opens the battery door....and some have warned the latch could be easily (accidentally) tripped. The memory card door latch, however, uses a more secure 45 degree pivoting latch.USB 2 and Video Out/DC-in doors are made of flexible rubber, and these doors extend into the body of the camera as the hinges themselves.The English language operating manual is a work of art. Each operating concept is alpha' & numerically numbered at the pictoral diagram, and to the page where the function is explained in perfect English. The reader will quickly catch on to how this well thought out manual is organized.I like the depth of field preview, the mirror lock-up, and the multiple-exposure capability.The continuous servo autofocus does a better job than any human at following and focusing on any moving object.If you have the old manual-focus, film-based Nikon SLR lenses from the '70's and '80's, except for a few rare exceptions, will fit on the D200.All these positive attributes remind me of the best, most highly-evolved film camera SLR's. No wonder so many photographers have been won over to digital media.</review_text>
I have been waiting for an affordable Nikon digital SLR on which I could use my older Nikon lenses (AI, Series E, etc.).  I know, I could have spent thousands on a D2, but that would have been overkill for me.  Suffice to say, the D200 is a joy to use.  It is fast, solid, and intuitive.  For those owners of Nikon film SLRs who are considering a D200, to me it "feels" just like a Nikon film SLR.  I have previously owned several high-end digital point and shoot cameras, and the D200 blows them away in terms of its capabilities, the degree of control it offers, and the resulting quality of the pictures you can take with it.  It has all the features an advanced amateur photographer could possibly want.  I'll probably never even scratch the surface of all of its features, but its nice to know they're there if I want or need them.  I highly recommend the D200 to anyone who, like me, has been waiting for the right digital SLR to come along</review_text>
My first professional digital SLR was the Nikon D1X.  I got great pictures with it but it was too large and heavy to lug around for extended periods.  I also had some issues with its operation.  But now, Nikon seems to have solved my issues with the D200.  I purchased the dedicated SB-800 flash and 18-200 lens recommended in the D200's manual.  The whole system is much improved over my other digital SLR.  Both focus and metering seem to work more reliably.  It works better in available light.  The optical anti-vibration aids in overall picture sharpness (plus for those of us who are not rock-steady).  I am getting use to the button sequence required to enlarge the picture preview and really like the amount of magnification possible.  The menuing system seems quite extensive and well-organized.  I would like more latitude in the picture quality settings (e.g. contract, saturation, and sharpness).  The help screens really tell me something when I'm confused.  I appreciate the "modeling" feature.  It is useful when attempting to compose in a dark situation.  It also lets me see reflections BEFORE they are committed to the picture.  Unfortunately this feature does not work using the built-in flash.  I wish Nikon could add some type of lock on the continuous-single-manual focus selector on the front of the camera.  My finger seems to move that switch unknowingly.  I would appreciate a battery charger with a built in plug rather than the detachable cord.  As a person who still wears thick glasses, I wish Nikon could make the viewfinder more like the one on their old N8008.  Or maybe it's time to do away with pentaprisoms and mechanical mirrors  and give us a truly pro camera that mimics the high-end pro-sumer models with electronic viewfinders and adjustable view screens</review_text>
I think the point a lot of people are not mentioning about the d200 is quite obvious.  Let me be the first to say that the main reason I bought the d200 over the d80 was to increase my credibility and prestige as an amateur photographer, make other photographers jealous of my kit, and to brag about the obscene amount of money I spend on camera equipment while my co-workers can't even pay their rent.  I bought the grip because I thought it looked really cool, and it increased the size and visibility of my camera to other people.  The question that really sold me on the d200 was: will strangers that I might want to photograph be more likely to say yes standing on the other side of a d80 or a d200?  Will people have less doubts about me holding this thing opposed to a smaller model?  Which one looks cooler?If I was completely loaded would I buy the D2Xs? Without a second thought.Of course I talked to a lot of camera people making minimum wage hoping that they would have some technical insight about purchasing a Nikon or other camera.  Of course they let me down and said a lot of bogus things to me most saying something like: "the d200 is way to much camera for me."  None of them knew how to change the exposure settings, they were contented with the wheel and "child mode," on top of the d80 and recited this to me several times as if I looked like a soccer mom.  As usual I was offended by the human experience of buying in the real world, especially the atrocious mark up of several hundred dollars, I refused to help pay those employees wages.  The breaking point I think was the time an associate instructed me to buy one camera over the other because, "when she dropped this camera it broke and the other one didn't."  So I turned to the internet where I only have to say hi to the UPS man as he leaves.I studied and studied all things technical, sometimes just staring at pictures of cameras for long periods of time without blinking.  I poured over thousands of photographs taken by all kinds of cameras and amassed a photographic library while I decided.  Basically I went way overboard and let the decision of buying a camera engulf my life until I was dreaming about it.So one night I just bought the d200 after being on the fence over the d80 or the d200.  And after two days it arrived and I was impressed with it.  The thing is literally a cold hard photographic machine.After being broken in on the d50 I was firstly impressed with the size, and then secondly all of the dials and switches to change things that I used to have to dig through the menu to get to.  Thirdly I liked the blazing fast 2 frame rate.When I go out at night I snap the 50mm f/1.8 onto it and crank the iso up.  A lot of people in the forms were complaining about the noise in the high iso of the d200 but I thought it was fine.  I feel most people from that camp want perfect clarity all the way up into the highest isos but I think that is artistically limiting.  I read one scathing review written by a veteran film user saying that basically high iso in digital has a lot less graininess than film basically saying that the d200 is a step up but some people still want to complain.  As far as the d200 goes versus the d50 at iso 1600 it is leaps and bounds better in my opinion.  The noise is way reduced without NR and there isn't that pixel chunkiness I found in the d50 at high isos.Another thing that stands out on the d200 is the enhanced colors.  In reality the ultra vivid setting on the d200 makes a lot of things look sort of fake, but it does make people who don't have a sun tan look like they have one which is a plus in my opinion.  It can make your dull green lawn look like a lush paradise, skies are ultra blue, and reds are spectacular.  I remember when I used the d50 I would steer away from photographing violets and red roses because it would blow them out, not so with the d200.  For some reason coming from point and shoot it always used to annoy my that the d50 didn't have b&w or sepia.  The d200 has b&w but no sepia.  The nerds in the forums would just say, "use cs2, or a photo editor," but I say no because I should be able to do everything in camera.The viewfinder is so awesome.  I literally hated electronic viewfinders and the d50's viewfinder was so small that it hindered my framing at times.  The d200 has a big bright viewfinder and a huge lcd that sucks down batteries like nothing.  As far as my evolution goes in photography sometimes I feel like I can literally climb into the viewfinder because its so big compared to what I was used to.Like I said the grip is awesome and I really like it.  I kind of like having as many accessories as possible and that kind of steered me away from the D2Xs into the d200.  Watching the percentage marks count down as the batteries drain is always fun.  The best thing about the d200 is little things like that because they make me feel like I have greater control over my pictures because I know exactly how many I can take.In conclusion buy the d200 over the d80 I am really happy with it and I am not happy with anything.  If you're having trouble considering what you want photographically try and pull yourself away from forums and outside sources and really consider what got you into photography in the first place and where you intend to go with it, I think that is the important part.  Advertising and gear collecting never made anyone a better artist</review_text>
I bought this camera as a back-up to my D2X and so I wouldn't have to change lenses as much on a trip I'm taking to Alaska this summer. Well let me tell you, the D200 with the 18-200mm VR lens is incredible. It is fast, quiet and a pleasure to use. I've read in forums that the 18-200 is a little soft. So far I totally disagree, the pictures I've taken have been very sharp. I wish this would have been available when I bought my D2X. If it had, I would own two D200's instead of one of each. Highly recommended !!</review_text>
Good quality paper at good price.  Shipping costs a little bit, but hard to beat the price even with shipping.  Paper fits on 1.5" pvc used with my home built frame.  It does what I need it to</review_text>
This camera deserves 5 stars if you need a camera that easily fits in your pocket or purse and is ready to use whenever that picture or movie moment arrives, even under water. Considering the varied picture taking situations, action, and lighting conditions, the performance was beyond my expectations. The only significant limitation is seeing the display in bright sunlight or under water, even when the screen is set at its brightest. However, aiming was intuitive enough that I never missed a shot and I was able to change modes even under water (but I did practice switching between underwater wide 2 and movie ahead of time). One feature that would be an improvement would be the ability to zoom while taking a movie.I received this camera just a couple days before leaving on a cruise so I didn't have any time to practice with it. Be careful not to have your finger in front of the lens, especially under water where you may not be watching the screen. Also be aware that when you zoom in for movies that the image movement is also magnified. The wide angle underwater movies are much better than at full optical zoom (digital zoom is off). After a couple days the controls were easy to use to change modes and review pictures and movies.I used 1 gig cards and the highest resolution which provided about 240 pictures or about 40 minutes of movies. Switching back and forth was easy. Movie recording will continue until the card is full or the battery runs out, not just short clips. My clips were too short until I was comfortable that I would not quickly fill up the memory card or run out of battery. Under water pictures were superb with a natural shift in color toward green. I recharged the battery every other night. The battery was able to take about 100 pictures and 15 minutes of movie between recharges. I recommend a spare battery as it did indicate it was getting low a couple times and ran out once.The camera was also used in daylight, inside, with and without flash, even night shots (the auto setting was better than Night Scene for harbor lights at night. The camera was steadied on the railing).I purchased a lanyard with metal clasp at Sports Authority for a dollar which provides a very secure leash. With the lanyard around my neck I could tuck the camera in my shirt pocket. I was always ready for the next picture opportunity without worrying about dropping it.I'm very pleased with the picture quality although it may not match a camera with a much larger lens system, but it was great to be able to take pictures and movies when I would not have had my larger camera available. The 15 fps movies do not match a 3CCD digital video camera, but they are acceptable. I even recorded short clips during live theater performances (with the screen brightness set at its minimum) and I was pleased with the quality from this tiny camera.</review_text>
I RECENTLY RECIEVED MY NEW CAMERA, AND I AM THRILLED.  I HAVE BEEN RESEARCHING WHICH CAMERA TO BUY SINCE DECEMBER (WHEN OUR LAST CAMERA WENT CAPOOT).  THERE HAVE BEEN MIXED REVIEWS FOR THE OLYMPUS SW SERIES, BUT COULD NOT RESIST THE APPEAL OF THIS CAMERA'S UNIQUE FEATURES.  I CANNOT WAIT TO TAKE IT INTO THE POOL THIS SUMMER WITH THE KIDS.  SO FAR, THE POINT AND SHOOT OPTIONS AND PICTURES HAVE BEEN LOVELY.  ANY PERSON CAN SCREW UP PICTURES WITH ANY CAMERA, BUT THIS CAMERA HAS SO MANY FEATURES TO AVOID THAT.  MY HUSBAND AND I HAD A WONDERFUL TIME TAKING EXTREME CLOSE UP SHOTS OF OUR GARDEN.  I HAVE NOT SEEN THAT QUALITY, AND HAD THAT MUCH SATISFACTION FROM A CAMERA SINCE WE FIRST SWITCHED OVER TO DIGITAL.  I AM VERY PLEASED, TO SAY THE LEAST, WITH THIS PURCHASE.</review_text>
The new Olympus Stylus 770SW is the nicest camera to date I've purchased.  It takes great pictures and is extremely durable.  The picture quality is awesome in all types of weather conditions and lighting.  I stronly suggest to purchase this if the price is right</review_text>
I have an Olympus 770 SW (NOT the 720 SW), for sure...and I like it. I have had five digital cameras before, and this one is terrific. Considering that it's a sub-compact pocket camera, image quality is fine (not equal to that of a digital SLR, but I don't want to carry around a big box like a DSLR). Shadow detail is especially impressive. Operation is smooth and intuitive. The screen is fine, even outdoors. Shutter lag, a big concern of mine as I like to photograph my kids at sports, is minimal and can be zero if you prefocus. The number of custom scene settings is impressive. I bought it because of the waterproofing and shockproofing, and because of prior good experience with Olympus over the years, but I'm just as happy with the pictures it takes under normal circumstances too.A few gripes that stop me from giving the camera 5 stars:1. The battery cannot be recharged when it's in the camera. For a total of $80 or so, you can get an external power source and a cable, and together they let the camera run a long time without draining the battery, but they don't charge the battery. Battery life is fine for a day of normal shooting, but if you use the camera actively, every single night you pretty much have to unlock the case, take out the battery and charge it, then remember to put the battery back in the next day. Each charge takes 5 hours. I'm going to take the same $80 and instead buy two extra batteries to be comfortable--One in the camera, one reserve along with me, and another charging at home. Even so, it will take some planning and thinking to keep batteries ready all the time on a vacation. It would have been much nicer to have a holster or a charging socket on the case.2. The case is actually smaller than it needs to be. It could be significantly bigger and still fit in my shirt pocket, which is my standard size requirement. As it is, the advanced engineering is impressive to pack all the features in a tiny box, but the camera is more expensive than need be, the lens is smaller than it should be (depending on zoom position, the lens is between f/3.5 to f/5.0, which is pretty weak), it's harder to hold the camera than need be, and if the case were bigger, there would be room for a nice little charging socket too.3. There is indeed a background, almost mechanical noise introduced when filming videos. It probably can be filtered out, as it's very constant and very low pitched, but it's mildly annoying.4. Time between shots is too long--it takes several seconds to save each shot at full resolution.5. You can use the internal memory only if there's no memory card in the slot. Given the slow transfer speed to the card, it sure would be nice to be able to save a dozen or so shots very quickly to the internal memory and then transfer them to the memory when you have time.For all that, though, I'm really looking forward to using this camera on a forthcoming sea kayaking and snorkeling trip this summer. With one camera, I'll be able to take snapshots above and below water, also modest videos underwater (there's a special scene selection to do just that)</review_text>
We bought one of these items to see how well it would work with pictures of the kids for grandma and grandpa.  It was easy to use, holds a lot of pics, nice picture quality, and convenient in size.  We liked it so much we bought 2 more - 1 for an uncle living in another state and 1 for my wife to keep in her purse.  Well worth the money for not having traditional pictures getting ruined in your wallet</review_text>
This is a great little unit, if you can get it for under $50. More than that and it's limitations will drive you nuts.Battery life: great.Transfering photos: drag and drop with a card reader to an SD card...great. I have not tried using the Easy-share software to transfer.Viewing: great, but....as a previous reviewer said, you can't organize the photos into folders. To see a photo, you need to scroll through the entire card. This really makes it useful only for a few photos.I love it for being able to carry a few photos around to show to friends, but remember, that's a FEW due to the navigation limitations. Kodak, please release a firmware fix to address this, and this thing goes to 5 stars plus!!</review_text>
I already own this product and this purchase was for a Christmas gift. I had been searching and was not able to find it until I checked with Amazon.com. Once I placed my order, it arrived in perfect condition and I was so happy to have found it. Thank you for your prompt service.Sincerely,R Flour</review_text>
I purchased this for my kids grandma who doesn't have or want a digital camera but loves to show off pictures.  I currently use the Kodak software so I had no trouble loading pics onto the internal memory.  The trick is to tag your pics as favorites and then you will need to sync and transfer them to the picture viewer.  The software recognized the viewer right away.  I had it all loaded in less than an hour which included picking out the pictures to put on it.As usual with Kodak, the screen is crisp and clear and unlike other viewers, is a little larger than say the magpix which I also considered.  The only draw back is that it cannot be hooked to a tv and does not take regular batteries.Overall, I was very pleased and most everyone who I have showed it to said - I want one.  It's perfect for Grandma to throw in her purse and even comes with a leather case</review_text>
I read all the reviews and considered other possibilities, but this was by far the least expensive and has the most needed features for it's intended use.The viewer works as others have mentioned and taking the limitations (no indexing) into account is still a very worthwhile tool.From what I could fiond out the imnag es are ordered by the software according to the date the picture was taken. I haven't delved into the manner in which one could change the dates to enable arranging images in group by subject matter, or what ever groupings one would want.My use was to take images on a trip to visit relatives and show them others back here at home. It works very well for this prupose.Compare prices with, say, an iPod or such.</review_text>
My dad can't get the hang of transfering photos but my husband loves his.  It did replace my old Kodak software with the newere version that came with it. I prefere the older version. IT is much easier to install the software on a computer without existing Kodak software. Yes, you must mark the photos as favorites to transfer but it is really simple from there.  The photos are crisp and clear so far as we only have about 20 trasnferrred.  HIghly recommended toreplace the old brag book and bent envelope</review_text>
While I agree that the tutorial could have been better, and that the instructions could have been easier, this is still an excellent product.As far as needing to make pictures "Favorites" before they will transfer, the manual is *very* clear on that.Anyway....if you do encounter problems loading pictures, all you have to do is Copy & Paste them from one of your Kodak Albums into your Viewer Album.  Yes, moving pics 1 at a time can be a pain, but it's only a worst-case scenario and it works just fine.Regarding the viewer itself, I can't say enough nice things about it:  it's small, but with a nicely-sized screen (easily big enough to view pictures on), it has a zoom feature, a nice carrying case so nothing gets scratched, and it still easily fits into a pocket (and certainly a pocketbook).Don't get me wrong.....you shouldn't expect the same kind of quality that you'd get by looking at a standard 4x6 print photograph.  But then, I would sincerely hope that you didn't expect to on a 2.5 inch screen.I bought one for my father and loaded it with pictures before giving it to him.  I liked it so much, that I then bought another one for my wife for Mother's Day!.One caveat (and for me it's a small one), they advertise that it will hold 150 pictures.  I wouldn't expect more than 100.  I found that when I reduced the resolution sufficiently for 150 pics to fit, that the photos looked pretty poor.  But getting 100 on is no problem.  I'm also willing to admit that this may simply be my lack of digital-photo expertise and that someone else *could* get more photos on it.  Regardless, I still think it's an excellent value</review_text>
Versatile tripod for the low price, light weight, sleek design, compact in retracted mode, allows for great stills in almost any position</review_text>
I am very happy with this product.  For an inexpensive tripod, it is steady and flexible.  I have traveled with it as well as used it at "photo opportunity" events such as a wedding.  I definitely think it is a good value for the cost.</review_text>
Yeah, the knobs may be plastic, and it may be lightweight, but it works perfectly. It does work well for time lapse as long as you use a shutter delay or a remote(which you should do anyway). It folds up to a very compact size that you would be more willing to bring it with you.I have lost my shoe as well, cant find a replacement, so Im buying a new tripod. I paid a good 40-50$ for it 2 years ago at a local retailer, so 13$ is what I was hoping to pay for a quick release shoe</review_text>
After purchasing based on the previous reviews, I was a bit underwhelmed after recieving this tripod, but what else can you get for $13.If you plan on using this for video or time-lapse work, I would recommend finding a thicker, sturdier model.  I have a very small DV camcorder (Canon Elura 100) and am unable to pan or tilt without jerking the picture.  Also, if you raise the telescopic part more than a few inches, it becomes very shaky.All of the knobs and locking parts are totally plastic, so it wouldn't be good for use in the cold or for rough use</review_text>
This is a very nice tripod for $15 plus shipping and handling.I was very pleasantly surprised.Screwed into both my digital camera and my camcorder.It folds up to a nice size and is very lightweight, but sturdy even when fully extended</review_text>
I love my tripod. It is sturdy and easy to use. My only problem is I have lost one of my quick release shoes. I'm looking for more. I'm not sure they sell them seperately. That would be a shame. However, the tripod itself is great.Enjoy.</review_text>
perfect for a family, a mother, a child, for EVERYBODY! i've had it for 4 moths and its perfect. I can take all the pictures i want, etc etc. Everybody loves the color! Loved it!Buy it!</review_text>
I have sticked with Sony since I got my first digital camera 4 years ago and Sony camera has been the moneys worth! This one DSC-T10 is the one for the parent who is carrying to much already and needs to pack down for a change. It fits in my purse and still have space for more, the only thing to remember to buy a slim fitting case for the camera and an extra battery(for those kind of battery are not sold everywhere) you need that one when you don't thing you need an extra battery, you always run out at the wrong time.I recommend this one</review_text>
I bought this camera for a trip down under a couple of month ago and I have been really impressed with the image quality. It takes great low light pictures and the steady shot technology works really well for longer shutter times. The camera is very small but feels solid in the hand due to excellent construction unlike some of the Casio ultra-compacts. Well worth the extra cost</review_text>
I wanted a good quality consumer grade digital camera to take on short trips, so I  purchased this one. I think the quality of the picures is very good and it has most of the features I wanted. It was a few dollars more than I really wanted to spend, but all in all I am pleased. My main complaint is the battery life is a little on the short side, and it takes a while to see the photo you just took on the lcd screen. I really want something to hold me for about two years, by then these things will be twice as good for a fraction of the cost. For now it does what I need it to do pretty well</review_text>
First of all, this camera has every feature any beginner - intermediate - professional photographer could ask for.  The macro / zoom capabilities are outstanding, with a little practice and use of tripod or a patient steady hand.  The use of the top lcd (waist level) is the best way to shoot low level shots, otherwise the rear lcd is fine for everything else.  Too many features to list, (read the manual for all the features) but the main one is the shots this camera produces are excellent.  I do suggest using photoshop for editing, as any good photographer will attest to.  Want to see many more photos taken with this camera?  see: [NekoPhoto . com] Big Bang for the Buck is what this camera is all about</review_text>
Haven't had the chance to use it alot since purchasing it.  Still learning the MANY features the camera offers.  Although, bulkier than most smaller digital cameras, it is easy to handle but the quality of the pictures and the capabilities of the camera more than make up for the size/weight.  Love it.  Can do most anything with it.</review_text>
I had used Nikkon D70 before I bought this one. The advantage of this camera is I dont have to change the lens again and again.It includes both wide angle and telephoto lens.In addition to the still image, this camera also has video feature.So I can capture the video too.I bought this camera before my niagara vacation.So, I took lots of wonderful picture in niagara and I also did video.So, this works for me much better</review_text>
I've read over all the reviews and I don't agree with them. For starters, I don't think that this camera is that difficult to use. This is my first digital camera ever, and I'm not having problems using it. The pictures are crisp and clear; I'm very impressed with the quality of the pictures and the camera. If I had one complaint it would be that the straps on the handle keep coming undone and I really feel that the quality on that could be better; I've had 2 instances in which my new camera almost crashed to the ground so my advice is not to carry the thing around by the handle</review_text>
I, like most people was drawn to this camera for its incredible 28-420mm lens and its 3.5 inch lcd screen. However i didnt like the max aperture of 8. But i gave it a chance anyways. First day i took it outside and took a few snapshots with ISO50, which comes in handy. ISO50-400 was fine for me.Basically this is a great camera but here are some things people can forget or ignore till its too late.-Aperture max is 8. Might be too small for more professional users.-Write time for RAW is 15 seconds and for TIFF 25. (supported by http://dpreview.com/reviews/samsungpro815/page4.asp )-TIFF function is not much better than jpeg and it takes 25 seconds to write.-Works worse than most cameras in dimly lighted areas(shutter speeds sink down to 2.0" and 1/3 etc.). But you can easily avoid this with opening the flash.Overall this camera is wonderful. It has some problems but i find the good outweighs the bad by a landslide. Just remember its a 28-420mm zoom. Think of all the possibilities. O yea and it has a 3cm macro that actually works well.Props to Samsung on a camera well done</review_text>
I just bought this camera, and I think it is really great. The LCDs and lens are what sold me, and they're everything I hoped for. Very high quality camera. Feels solid, all the components are well made. Pictures are amazing (see my posted pics). I don't think you need to be a pro to use this camera, but the features are all there for those wanting manual control</review_text>
Traveled abroad with this.Multi-voltage, no cords (though it can obscure a 2nd socket if it has to go in the top one for any reason).Charges 2 at once, which is really convenient, but note that it takes almost 2x as long as doing one</review_text>
If you are like many videographers, you have more than one battery. It's easy to start charging one, and forget to do the other.  This baby will charge TWO batteries at a time. Or one if you like.I charged an FP-960 clone and FP-970 at the same time. Sony says it is ok though the web info doesn't say it is supported. Infolithium batteries practically tell the charger it is done, so it is safe.Naturally, charging two at once takes twice as long. If one battery finishes first, it trickle charges and the light goes out. Thus allowing faster charging on the other battery. Full charging is done about an hour after the light goes out.As I recall it is a max 1000ma so, there is less chance of over heating the batteries during charging, thus minimizing damage. Aside from the slower dual charge, there is nothing bad I can say about it.  Folding plug prongs makes it very easy to pack.It lacks a car adaptor, but that doesn't seem needed when you have two fully charged batteries. No serious user of Info-lithium batteries should be without it</review_text>
Initial impressions of the new super-zoom Olympus camera are excellent.  Thought I'd like having a view finder, as opposed to just a screen on the back of the camera, but the digital image in the view finder isn't as crisp as I'd like.  A relatively small fault.  Still learning to use all the features</review_text>
takes excellent photos.  love the zoom.  feels good in your hands.</review_text>
Would give a 3.75 or 75% rating to this new camera from Olympus.  Full review can be found at [...]Overall the camera feels good to hold and does not seem at all fragile. However, the SP-550 is too large for purse or pocket use and is lacking in the features and image quality that would make it the ideal dedicated camera for intermediate and advanced users. So the target market will be hobbyists who are avoiding the advanced prosumer and DSLR models, yet wanting more features and zoom than the current crop of shirt pocket cameras offer.Photos did not give the sense of crisp sharpness I was hoping for. Noise issues, many of which can be dealt with in post-processing, were still abundant, and may be the main contributer to the soft feel of the SP-550's images. In all, I think the image quality is going to be the SP-550's main downfall among serious photographers.On the contrary, the strongest appeal will be to casual photographers who simply take vacation and family snapshots and occasionally need a longer zoom or a wider lens. Photographers who do embrace the SP-550 and eventually want the ability to explore more advanced photography techniques will find the camera to be a good stepping stone</review_text>
I got the camera about  a week ago and highly recommend it. If you buy this camera, I recommend getting an H type card which is much faster than the M type for taking pictures. Some movie functions do not work to full capability with the M type but do with the faster H type. I also recommend getting NIMH 2700 mah batteries and charger. Their higher capacity is worth the money  and will save over the long run.As far as the camera goes, I wish the camera was higher than 7.1 mp, but compared to my old 3.3 mp camera, the pictures are so much clearer and finer. The camera has many functions build in, and you will need to read the manual to get full use of the camera. Out of the box AUTO mode works well, but after reading the manual, I think most higher end users will want to set their own modes.Some nice included functions are the manual ability, the ability to choose among 15 different shooting types (such as through a window), and the ability to store raw images among others. Storing raw images is slow due to the large file size and can take several seconds on an M type card.Movie mode is able to take 30 fps at 640X480, but 15 fps is still good  quality. With the M type card you can only take 15 seconds of movies at full mode, but H type you can fill your memory card. The default setting for movies is without sound so you will need to turn this on. However, with sound turned on, I was not able to zoom, even with the H card.Image Stablization was nicely setup and can be set with just the push of a button rather than going through the Menu. Also, the eyepiece viewfinder is setup so that if the display on the back is on, the viewfinder is off and vice-versa. In fact when you use the eyepiece viewfinder, the picture that is normally displayed on the back is now in the eyepiece. I suppose this is good for taking pictures when it is too bright to see the back screen.Finally, I like to take weather  shots and this camera includes a time lapse mode, which I can put together with my old software (not Olympus) into a movie.[...]</review_text>
As soon as I got the camera I could tell it was a good one by the instruction manual. I'm still reading and learning how to us it. My husband and I enjoy trying out the different features and we'er pleased with the pictures we've taken. We highly recommend this camera to both a novis and the more experience photographer.</review_text>
the camers works well. takes great pics and is easy to use and has a lot of extra features. great for the price. very pleased</review_text>
I have had the camera for about 5 months now. I have had a great time learning to use it. Easy to use and takes good pictures. The only negative is that the nighttime and fireworks setting is not the greatest, but is still pretty deciet</review_text>
The Camera is really very compacy and nice. It easily fits into  your pocket. Very useful if you want to take a quick picture. The only concern i have is you cannot change the DPI (dots per inch) of the camera. You can take 5Mp resolution pictures but if the dpi is small it doesnt really help when you zoom in. The dpi is limited to 72. As such it is of not great concern unless you want to zoom in pictures take</review_text>
This is my second digital camera.  I owned a pentax optio, which was very small, so I was hesitant to purchase this camera due to its somewhat larger size.  However, as the poster before me mentioned, this camera is not only small (not tiny though) and light weight, but it also takes really incredible pictures.  For under $150 this camera offers alot more than other cameras in the same price range and better quality pics.  One thing I would like to mention, aside from taking great standard night and day pics, is the ability to adjust the picture ratio.  On the second night out using this camera, I was able to fit all 6 of my friends in one shot, sitting comfortably on a sofa at a club (at the 16:9 ratio setting).  That really blew me away.  After careful research and consideration, I am very pleased with my purchase</review_text>
I did a lot of research before buying my first digital camera.  I wanted a quality camera, and I went back and forth between the $300+ and the under $150 camera's.  I chose this one because I figured at $140, 5MP, and 3x optical zoom, I would use it for a year and then get a new one and not feel gipped.  Well, the camera is so great!  I knew nothing about digital camera's, the instructions use language that I'm not familiar with, but the camera is very user friendly.  It takes some tinkering with, but it's easy to figure everything out.  Pictures come out crystal clear.  The different picture scene modes make for some creative pictures.  I travel a lot, I love to go out to the clubs and bars, party in the moonlight and dance till the sun rises, I love to do outdoor and indoor sports... this camera is light, small, I can keep it in my pocket, and it takes great pictures.  I have a mac computer, so the cd didn't load.. but all you have to do is connect the camera and the computer and an icon pops up.  Do a little copy and paste, easy.  The battery life is good.  I like the fact that it used AA batteries, because when travelling overseas, it's easy to buy batteries, and more difficult to make sure you find an outlet to charge your camera.  After about 4 days of using it continuously, the battery still was a little over 1/2 full.  I was a little concerned about the optical zoom, thought maybe I should invest in a camera that had more... well, after taking a picture of a house, I was able to zoom in and read the words on a post-it note on the front door- 3x is plenty!  I Highly recommend this camera</review_text>
This is supposedly an entry level digital camera, but I have already found more cool bells and whistles than I will ever use. Since most of my photography is of performance horses, I was very interested in how the camera would handle the in motion pictures. The "sports" mode stops them in their tracks with totally terrific resolution. It is very easy to operate with on screen menus that really are effortless to use.The only thing I am diappointed in is the strap for carrying. It is so flimsy as to be useless.</review_text>
I make movies from this camcorder in good result, but feel snapes with noice. I think it's not too much resulation. If you can spend more mony then you buy high resulation Panasonic or Sony camcorder else it's enough choice in your budge.</review_text>
i like this camcorder because of 2 options that no other camcorder has.1. can take pictures2 has that light in the front that let you shoot in the night.I will highly recommended buying this camera</review_text>
The HP camera is very easy to use and takes great pictures, its small enough to carry comfortable but does not feel fragil</review_text>
I've had digital cameras before, but this one is has it all. If you want to take really good pictures of your life then buy this camera. The HP Photosmart M527 6MP Digital Camera with 3x Optical Zoom has more features than I'll commonly use , but I think all of them will come in handy in specific settings. Easy to use and great photo quality</review_text>
The HP Photosmart M527 is an all around well built camera, espicially considering the price it can be purchased at.The body is all metal and it's honestly built like a small tank. It feels good and strong in your hands. The weight of the camera is also very evenly balanced, so you can hold it in one hand and get clear shots in almost any situation. The ergonomics and overall design also help with this. Every button on the camera can be accessed with just your one hand.The screen is very nice, bright, and colorful, even on the lowest brightness setting. I really don't have a problem with it being "only" 2". I can't imagine a situation where the "small" screen would negatively impact the ability to accurately frame a shot.The image quality, for the price, is also fantastic. The shots can be a little noisey. But honestly, how many cameras in this price range will not produce noisey pictures? Considering the price, the image quality is great. Sure, it doesn't look as good as a Canon that costs an extra hundred dollars. But that doesn't mean the image quality is bad. The noise disappears completely when you shrink the picture down to fit in an email. Afterall, you're not emailing friends pictures that are 3.3MB in size each, are you? ;) When printed out, using a photo printer or getting them done professionally, the prints are very colorful with good detail, definition, and color saturation. They will definitely be able to sit next to all of your other framed prints, or go in a photo album, and only you will ever know that it is a digital print because nobody else will be able to see the difference in quality.The camera also offers multiple shooting modes that can help improve the image quality in certain situations. For example, it has a "Portrait" mode which can help the look of closeups dramatically. It also has the obvious "Night" mode which will take care of any dark or murky pictures in low light. There is a "Beach and Snow" mode which will help you with those high contrast shots in bright lighting. It has a Macro mode which has obvious uses. You can also manually adjust certain other parameters, such as ISO speed. However, you cannot adjust shutter speed or more advanced settings like that. But if you find your pictures aren't exactly what you want them to be, there are definitely modes that can help you get the quality you desire.The camera also has a decent movie mode. It can record roughly 30 minutes of slightly better than VHS quality video, with sound, on a 512MB memory card. It's not very good in low light, but it can be good for those quick moments when you are out and wish you had a video camera. However, you cannot zoom in or out while recording. You can adjust the zoom before and after recording. But not during.The camera also has very extensive photo editing features built-in, like the famous "slimming" effect, and you can do other things like add borders. It also has a very thorough Help system.There are only a couple of minor gripes I have about this camera. The first is battery life. Real world battery life is about 100 shots on two alkaline batteries. So get some rechargables or lithium batteries. The second gripe is that the memory card slot is right in there with the batteries. So that can be a little bit of a pain if you use a memory card reader instead of hooking the camera up to your computer to transfer pictures.Overall its a great camera for the price, as long as you keep you are realistic with what to expect. You're getting a complete package for not very much money. Not many other cameras under the $200 price range offer such a complete package. If you're looking for a great camera on the cheap that is built well and has a ton of features, this is definitely one to look at. However, if you want absolutely pristine image quality, you're better off looking at the $250+ Canon PowerShot A6x0 series. For me, this camera is the one that is built like a tank and will get taken with me everywhere I go. But I will keep a higher quality Canon around for those times when image quality is more important than the quick, yet good, shot</review_text>
If you are looking for a cheap camera with a higher res. then here it is. Like I said, you get what you pay for</review_text>
Great picture quality and very easy to use. The auto picture one of the best I have seen. The only con is the display is not bright enough to see under sunlight</review_text>
Was really suprised at how easy the this camera was to use and at the great photo quality.  Zoom is great!  Don't really care for the easyshare software.</review_text>
I bought this camera last december in Houston. Didn't have enough time to test it while there, but recently went on a trip to an island near the coast of Salvador (I'm from Brazil!).I never saw such crisp, live, powerful pics before! Decided to test its features and found myself stunned by the quality and power of this little camera. I'm not a professional photographer but my pics turned out to be best-sellers among my friends. I took 500 pics in three days and not even one came out in bad shape.Great cost-effective deal:Not too expensive.Amazing picture quality (10x optical zoom and 7.1 megapixels).Works with a wide range of batteries (AA, lithium dual pack, rechargeable)</review_text>
Great camera for the beginner or advanced photographer. The SCN settings let the beginner take great pictures indoors and outdoors, close up and landscape, snow and beach as well as manners or museums and kids parties.  The sport setting lets you capture moving stills. The Video feature not  only records sound but when you play it back on the camera it lets you hear it all also. For the advanced photographer it will let you set your own settings and it is threaded so that you can add lenses if you like.  The 10x optical lets you get close without being blurred and there is a digital enhancement. The 7.1 megapixels lets  you blow up one small section into a nice size picture.  It is a great camera especially for the price. For the price other companies do not offer any where near all the extras this camera offers that I have been able to find</review_text>
I am impressed by how easy this camera is to use. The picture quality is good & the NiC Battary that came w/ it keeps a charge for 2 weeks w/ steady use. The only problem is the lens cap won't stay o</review_text>
This is my first digital camera after using an SLR (film) camera for the last 15 years.I'm very happy with the Z710, with the quality of the photos, ease of use and the selection of features. The other reviewers have said it as well as I could. I tried a few test photos, zooms, sports, etc. The photos came out clear and distinct, even under conditions of swift movement.Another important point for me was the ability to use rechargeable batteries, which the Z710 does. So there is no dependency on expensive throwaway batteries.I would have prefered to have a digital SLR camera, but think I will be satisified with the Z710 until that day finally comes. The one thing I miss is the ability to experiment with different filters. And that's the worst thing I can say about the camera.But a few things I didn't like which had nothing to do with the photo quality: 1) The accompanying software (once installed) is started each time the system boots. I would prefer to start it myself when I need it, but this option doesn't seem to be available. 2) The video sequences are filmed in quicktime (.mov) format. I would have preferred a more accessible format (avi) which I could burn directly onto video cds. I still have to test more, but the video sequences seemed not as smooth as they might have been, especially after converting them to avis. I realized this might be a general artifact of videos produced via digital cameras.In general, it's a great value for the money, and I would recommend it to anyone in the market for a digital camera</review_text>
I upgraded from an old 2 megapixel Easyshare, and boy am I glad I did. It is very eay to use, and pictures come out great.I do find that the display looks a little grainy, but the pictures never come out that way. The lens cover comes off very easily, and I am not fond of the kodak software</review_text>
The SR300 is a fantastic camcorder for the price and the still shots are amazing. Definitely worth the buy. I am no professional. All I was looking was for a convenient camcorder that is easy to use. I researched for days and was torn between CCD and CMOS, Brands and all other technical details and features that I probably will never use.Finally the convenience of not having to use tapes or DVD's and Some of the technical specs lead me to the SR 300. I love the touchscreen operations. The ease to copy files over to storage disks quickly is conevnient (Offcourse, I wish I did not have to use the shoe for that). The video quality was great both indoors and outdoors. However in complete darkness, The camera struggled to focus ...... my eyes did too.</review_text>
I've been using it for a couple of days, and I love it.   The harddisk is a gift, once you get used to it, you'll never believe that you've been using tape before.   The USB 2.0 transfer to your computer works like a charm and it's pretty quick even for very large files, also because the video file types are mpeg, dvd authoring software doesn't take forever to compile a dvd, it's very quickly.  There are a couple of simple, yet powerful editing using the camcorder itself.   The interface is pretty intuitive, and the touch screen is very usable even for my thick thumbs.   The video picture quality is excellent in medium light, and ok in low light 'far better than my previous Canon ZR70 though'.   The stand still camera is simply top notch, compared to my current Sony P8.I love the slow motion feature, unfortunately it can only capture a couple of seconds, also taking photos while you're video taping is great, but you can only take a couple of photos during shooting videos.  All in all, I'm very happy with all it's features, also the surround sound works pretty well.I didn't give it 5 stars because the camera doesn't come with a USB port, or video output options on the camera itself, I have to dock it in the docking station and then connect it to my PC, which leaves me with a choice to either put the docking station beside my PC to move the files, or beside my HD TV to watch the movies on the Camera, not sure why Sony at least didn't put a USB port on the camera directly, pretty annoying!   Also, there is no way to capture video using this camera, although that was kind of a standard feature in any cheap mini DV cameras, now I have to think of getting a video capture card for my computer if I need to copy any of my recorder programs from my DVRs or previous tapes to DVD!</review_text>
SIGMA doesn't seem to be a third-party lens company any longer. I do like this super-wide angle lens. Considering its price, the sharpness as well as color are awesome. Also, it is very quiet by hypersonic motor. In comparison of TOKINA 12-24, it has 2mm more but 2mm is quite big in the crop body (Nikon x1.5). If I have to mention its drawbacks, I would say that this lens is applied only to the digital SLR camera and its aperture is f/4-5.6.</review_text>
10mm for the Sigma versus 12mm for the Nikon, and it costs around half as much. Done deal.HSM is great for focusing, and works on my D40 which only supports AF-S type lenses. 5.6 on the narrow end is unfortunate, but you don't buy this lens to shoot at 20mm. You can handhold wide-angles at slower shutter speeds anyways. The lens cap is once again Sigma end-pinch, which I quickly replaced with a Nikon center-pinch, a practice I've begun with all my Sigmas. Be aware that there are optical distortions in most wide-angle lenses, but most of the time they aren't much of an issue. When they are, an application like PTLens does a great job of fixing it up.I've really become a fan of Sigma lenses, they seem to offer such a great value. I'm sure the Nikon is probably slightly sharper, but I don't see a noticeable difference. I can see the difference between 10mm and 12mm, though, along with the over $400 difference</review_text>
This lens is great - very sharp and WELL worth the money.  Especially since the Nikon version is TWICE as much - and this lens is WIDER (10mm vs. Nikon's 12mm)... Some have complained of "distortion" at 10mm, true, there is some, but that's what I LIKE about it.  What fun is WIDE ANGLE if no one can TELL it's wide angle? If you are on the fence, BUY IT.  You won't regret it</review_text>
I was looking for a prime wide angle for my Nikon D-50 and settled on the Sigma 10-20mm instead.  Used it on a trip to Spain shooting close in interiors and architectural shots as well as  landscapes.  Worked well with the  Nikon D-50 . Photos sharp - good image quality  Expected distortion at 10mm and some vignetting when used  with lens hood. Best quality  between 14 and 20mm.This lens is a great addition.  I used it together with a  "normal" 18-70 and a 70-300 (Tamaron) . These three lenses are all you need when on the road.One major annoyance is the cheapo lens cover that kept on falling off. Useless.all in all a good choice to get a decent wide angle in digital</review_text>
I went into a local camera store to look at the Nikon 12-24mm wide angle zoom to eventually augment the Nikon 50mm 1.8 and 18-200mm VR I currently use on my D200.  After seeing the Sigma 10-20mm, taking test shots with it and the Nikon, and then printing the shots in the store, I walked out with the Sigma lens.I had planned to buy the 12-24mm Nikon next Spring when my budget would allow the expenditure.  I have had success with Nikon optics in the past - starting with my first Nikon FM back in the seventies.  The Sigma's good construction, nice finish, smooth+fast+quiet focusing and 10mm focal length convinced me to try my first non-Nikon lens in 30 years. A big factor: The Sigma lens is less than half the price of the Nikon lens here is Canada.  It fit my budget, so I took the plunge.The Sigma fits into my "sharp enough"  category.  In real world shooting, its sharpness is on par with my 18-200mm Nikon. Both lens are less sharp than my $100 50mm 1.8 when "test" images are blown up to 16"x20" size. I never notice any lack of sharpness in  "real" pictures.  I care more about color saturation, contrast and color balance anyway.  In this area, the Sigma does well.  Saturation and contrast are equal to both my other Nikon lens - particularly at f8 and smaller aperatures.  Wide open, I find some weakening in contrast.  The Sigma has a warmer color termperature than my other lens.  One click toward blue in Photoshop would fix this minor variance in color.  But I use my 10-20mm almost exclusively for landscapes.  The warmer color is generally a good thing.I have noticed some vignetting @ 10mm f4.  Zooming to 12mm or stopping down to f5.6 elminates any artifacts in pictures I have taken thus far.  I have found it's more important to avoid "thick framed" filters - and stacking filters is a no no with this lens.  They cause more darkening than a wide open f-stop.  BTW: I added a 72 to 77mm step-up ring to my 18-200m VR Nikon to allow me to share filters between my zoom lens.I do miss having a manual/autofocus switch on the Sigma lens.  I have accidently nudged the manual focus ring a couple of times.  With that said, the incredible depth of field of this lens (or any lens at this focal length) means small focusing errors can be tolerated :)I recommend this lens - even to people like me, who never had a non-nikon lens before.</review_text>
You don't want to use up all your battery power transferring images to your PC, so this accessory is fantastic. It works for five different Nikon cameras and will save you a fortune in batteries and a lot of time waiting for batteries to recharge.  For the price, it's a bargain</review_text>
This case was just as it looks, but it would have been helpful to have a strap that you can put on your shoulder or a handle or something. If you don't care about straps, then I would recommend this case for you</review_text>
The set is wonderful, but the case is so big and it is not confortable to be carried</review_text>
I got my MB-D200 last fall and after more than 6 months of using it I should say that Nikon has created a winner yet again!!!THE GOOD:1. The ability to have 2 fully charged batteries while going out to the field gives you that extra peace of mind.2. In addition Nikon has added a menu that will give the shooter a very good indication of the battery power remaining. I have been able to get more than 200 shots in a day starting out with 2 fully charged batteries in the MB-D200.3. The weight increase is very minimal and in fact the meager increase in weight enables the shooter to balance the camera better.4. It was very thoughtful of Nikon to add the shutter release buttons for taking portrait shots and the main and sub command dials, to the MB-D200. I find myself using these controls quite frequently. If the user had to revert to the controls on the camera it would have been quite frustrating IMHO.5. If you are a nature/landscape/wildlife photographer, you can carry additional AA batteries with you in the field and rest assured that you won't miss out on the "Kodak moment" due to a drained battery.Some suggestions for improvement:1. The first thing I noticed was the latch on the battery compartment. It feels quite flimsy and I wish Nikon had done a better job on this. A latch along the lines of the one found on the camera to release the door for the compact flash card would have been solid IMHO.2. Though I mentioned that you can use AA batteries (you will need 6 of them), they can drain out amazingly fast, depending on the type of lens (with or without VR), depending on whether you are using the in-built or external flash and other variables. So you will need quite a few AA batteries if you ever have to rely on them in the field. To overcome this problem I am thinking about purchasing 2 more EN-EL3e batteries as I have found that they have impressive battery life once fully charged.Hope that this review was useful to you! Thanks for reading</review_text>
The pack holds two EN_EL3 batteries and makes holding the camera even easier. By checking the battery power you can determine exactly what percentage of power is left in each battery. It' heavy, but I like that in a camera</review_text>
The handling for portrait shots (vertical format) is improved. This is because the battery grip has its own shutter button and mode dials. With the battery grip on the D200, the camera's size closely approximates that of the Nikon D2X. The weight also understandably increases, but I think it helps to keep the camera steadier; especially with shaky hands and when the wind is blowing hard. This battery grip is ideal for travel, because if you run out both batteries, you can load up six AA batteries into the grip and keep making photographs. It's a well-made, sturdy accessory that I can highly recommend</review_text>
Ever since my first purchase of my MB-D100 Battery Pack (for my Nikon D100 DSLR) I have made it a point to get one for every new DSLR that I purchased. I believe I even got one for my Nikon N65 film SLR way back when. I currently have a D100, D80 and a D200 and they are all equipped with the corresponding battery pack.Let's face it, the D200 IS a battery hog! Maybe 650-700 shots per battery and less if you have auto preview on or preview each shot. With that in mind, the dual battery compartment makes this battery hog shoot forever! When I shoot weddings, I work all day and take nothing short of 10gb of photos and there is still juice in it when we leave... Impressive. I DO change my batteries half way through the day out of "principality" andfor more reliability but if you are in a pinch, you can just throw 6 AA batteries in the backup holster and slide that into the compartment. We all know AAs can be bought almost everywhere so you can ALWAYS shoot!The most crucial part of this battery pack is the side shutter release button. No longer will you have to uncomfortably twist and turn your right hand to strenuous angles if you want to compose a vertical shot. When you turn your camera sideways, the extra shutter release button is right there where you are used to. When paired with the shutter and aperture command dials you are ready to go quickly and efficiently. Comfort factor is huge with this grip. The grip fits into your hand like a glove and is very sturdy and stable when mounted to the camera itself. I swear I could hold my camera with one well placed finger on that battery grip!I did notice that my wife and co-photographer had a bit of trouble couping with the sheer weight of this camera + battery pack but after dealing with it and shooting, she quickly adjusted and now fell in love with the packs as well.The other features on the grip are nice to have but not essential such as the AF lock and such... Well done Nikon</review_text>
I've always hated how cumbersome it is to shoot verticals with 35mm and digital: having to contort one's arm over the head, twist the wrist, etc.  This pretty much solves that problem.  Granted, it is difficult to reach the thumb pad on the camera, but at least you can use the AF-On button and the front wheel to change focus areas.  Build quality? I figure Nikon went with plastic to minimize weight and cost.  I wish the latch on the battery door were a bit more robust, however.It changes the balance of the camera, making it feel much more 'centered', especially with my goto lens, the 18-200mm VR.  It also is much better balanced with my SB-600 flash attached.Overall, I'd say this is a 'must have', probably the second accessory you should get after a flash unit.  Oh yes, it also tends to command R-E-S-P-E-C-T from people, be that good or bad..</review_text>
A very nice accessory for the D200.  Doesn't add a whole lot of weight but it does officially make the D200 plus battery pack...slightly taller than the D2x, just slightly.  This has the main and sub control dials plus a multi function button.  A must have for sports shooters and people with larger hands who want more space for their pinky</review_text>
The D-200 is a great camera but unlike the D-100 the single battery used in the camera doesn't last very long between charges.  The Multi-Power battery pack correct the problem-two batteries instead of one and it also give the camera a better feel when handling.  I love it.</review_text>
Amazing, this essential accessory has proven to be more than invaluable.  With the MB-D200 attached to your Nikon D-200 you not only have extra power in a small package and an additional grip with controls to take vertical shots, BUT, you also can maximize the battery use and take full advantage of the Nikon built-in battery monitor.  This feature not only tells you the percentage of battery life left, it also tells you the number of photos taken with the specific battery. Furthermore, the camera is so smart, that it first uses one battery then the other.  Thus making it a no-brainer as to which battery needs to be recharged.  In seconds, the battery menu tells you each battery status in one glance.  The only regret is the removal of the voice recorder that was included in the MB-D100 battery pack that is for the Nikon D-100.  Perhaps Nikon will bring this feature back- it was very helpful when trying to quickly identify photos for assignments</review_text>
I ordered this product through Amazon and recevied it promptly.  The product itself is robust and works very well.  It is however, very difficult to get a good focus.  I usually get good service/product when ordereing from Amazon but this time I was a bit dissapointed.  I ordered a "new" unit and not a used one.  The product came in an opened box with origianl product packaging missing.  Obviously a used returned item.  You would expect more when paying $276.00 for an item.  I would have returned it but It seemed to work fine.  I am happy with the product but unhappy with Amazon for sending me used goods and saying it was new</review_text>
This product does what it says. I use the camera adapter to attach to my Canon EOS-30D</review_text>
nice scope, feels hefty and appears to be well made. glass optics good light gathering abilities.large objective lense with nice metal screw on lense protector. Only drawback I found was the battery compartment was tiny and kind of hard to screw the battery cap on</review_text>
I bought this camorder around 3 months ago and so far I am very happy with it. First off let me say that I am a complete amateur when it comes to camcorders. I did a lot of research online though before buying this particular camcorder and saw nothing but positive reviews and for a 3 CCD camcorder I only paid $400 for it, which is the same as a good 1 CCD camcorder. I have a 20 month old baby and I use it primarily for home video footage. I was able to take it out of the box and use it very quickly. I keep the setting on 'auto' most of the time and that works just fine for me. The picture quality is excellent, the colors and vibrant and the camcorder is easy to use. I read a lot about camcorders not performing well in 'low light situations' and this camera does pretty well, even though I do notice that when I shoot video in my basement (which is not very bright) the picture is slightly grainy. However when the room is bright or when I am outside the picture is incredible. The zoom is not great but I am not shooting more than 10 feet away anyway, so that doesnt bother me. I am going to buy a video light and see how that improves my indoor video. Overall, I am extremely happy with this camcorder and highly recommend it</review_text>
this product is a best buy.it is easy to carry and produces a clear product</review_text>
I liked the camera a lot, but it has a few irritating details as compared to GS150. If I knew these before purchase, I probably would have purchase GS150 itself.The camera itself is fine, but the description doesn't indicate that you cannot transfer the video over the USB cable. You have to separately purchase the Firewire cable for that. GS150 allows you to transfer video over USB. GS150 comes with software for video editing, and it has a built-in lens cap.</review_text>
Great product from Panasonic.  This is my first digital camcorder and I am very pleased with the quality.  Used it to do research on fiddler crabs, and needed zoom and picture quality and it was excellent.  The picture was crystal clear as I took shots from 7-8 feet away and zoomed in to max.  It also picks up sound even from a whisper and that was a great feature needed.  Easy to use and easy to transfer video to TV viewing</review_text>
VERY sensitive to cold weather. Pouts and does not put its lens out if left in the JEEP overnight in Montana even if it's spring and there's only a light flurry that evening.   I was just getting everything set perfectly (yes, it's taken me 4 years) when the lens quit extending.  It is now a paperweight or doorknob art.  It does still read cards...a plus, for door knob art, I think.  I saw one person whose camera didn't work for them in the winter very well at all, mine worked fine while dog sledding and other great times in Montana and this camera moved from Florida all at once.Shooting it fully automatic as you would with a cheap compact, you miss out on many of the features, not to mention: many good photos from dawn through a dimly lit club in the wee hours~~all without flash.  If you can read the manual, you can work this camera, which has ways to personalize settings without worries as you can always "return to default" without concern.Mine enjoyed over exposing when running free on fully automatic in full on daylight.  I wish it would had been better at identifying moving targets and selecting shorter exposures, even in rapid mode.These problems aside, the camera itself is capable of very good photos. Be advised,  this could be a point and shoot, but to get the photos that you really want, decisions must be made!  I don't believe this is for the casual photographer that is only interested in point-and-shoot.  A feel for the basic photography concepts: using aperture or timing priority or fully manual; knowing what effects ISO and exposure compensation, etc.  These will all be explained enough in the manual for you to operate the camera enough to enjoy it, I think. If you know how to use Picasa, the simplest way to add UV filter, I think, you don't even need to buy the proprietary click in version to actually place on the camera to make your photos look more appealing and professional.  Go to go to Irish Gypsy's my space page to see photos ALL taken with this camera.I strongly recommend spending a few hours with the advanced manual and the camera and learning properly how the exposure, white balance and focus controls work. It will really pay off!  What you see on the approximately 1 knuckle length wide by about 1.5 knuckle long display screen will be what you get.  Though it is difficult to see the itsy bitsy screen in bright daylight, this camera really shines in dim light  with help from things like white balance to make sure you don't get the false sepia tone that makes things look so awful in dim light photos and Image Stabilizer mode, which I used even on the tripod, in case I forgot to turn it back on.    Either way, this camera ate batteries like a bear on huckleberries.  My battery recharger is worn out!!  I'll be replacing the camera and the recharge.All in all, worth the cost of purchasing the camera as a first digital camera.  It is bulky, and I did miss out on some great shots because I didn't feel like hauling the camera with me on some particular excursion.  I hope my replacement will take shots as nicely.~~~~~~May I say that I purchased this through here and Amazon does a DARN fine job!!</review_text>
That's all you need in a simple camera.Compact Flash (the cheapest), NiMH AA batteries (idem), 10x optical zoom.Just missing a macro but, ..</review_text>
Well, I did it. I finally bought a digital camera. Don't tell anyone, but I didn't buy it here.The Canon S1IS has gone a lot of places with me, and has always done exactly what I want it to, flawlessly. It has gone to the ocean, the  bowling alley, on numerous hikes, to Burning Man, to the mountains, to work..and has performed like a pro.To me, the controls are laid out very logically, and it is easy for me to turn off the flash when I want to take a night shot.After a few days with the manual, and using the camera regularly, the menu options became familiar.For those of us who like self portraiture, the LCD screen that swivels and turns around all the way is perfect, as you can set up your self portrait easily.I love the black and white and sepia modes too.Taking video with this Canon, even at night, is easy. The only hitch I have seen is that you cannot zoom in very close, otherwise the camera cannot possibly keep up with keeping the video in focus...this is easily solved with my tripod.To sum up: I am SO glad I bought this camera as my first digital. It is perfect for me, and we are very happy together. Now I am eyeing a smaller Canon that I can slip in my pocket. But sssshhhhh, don't tell my S1IS</review_text>
This camera has a good response time, nice picture quality (as you would expect from a canon), excellent battery life (i use 2500 mAH rechargeable batteries). Low light performance is very good too</review_text>
I love this camera it has enough features to keep you amazed even after 2 years of use like me.I just found out that i can use the software to control the camera ...WOWAlso don't let the 3.2 MP fool you the image quality is great.The zoom is also awsome.I just had mine repaird as it had a optics problem i sent it into canon for repair and after a $100 repair bill :( i got it back good as new ... My next camera will definatly be a canon</review_text>
I bought this camera last year I'm very satisfied whit it, it's incredible the resolution and good color, saturation and quality of pictures, you must be atention with low light condition but the rest its a great camera very sofisticated and when I have more money I will buy the S2</review_text>
I have had this camera for about 2 years now. Before I bought this camera I had a smaller camera with a 3x zoom. I didn't really miss the zoom option on my previous camera but now that I have the 10x zoom on the PowerShot S1 I'm not sure how I could live without it in the past. The camera takes good pictures and it is easy to operate. You can use the predefined modes if you want to..or you can adjust a lot of stuff manually if you are into that :-) The only problems with this camera is size and the lens cap. It is "big" and bulky...no, it is not as big as a SLR camera but it is still a bit to bit to stick in your pocket when you are going out on a Friday night. The camera lens keeps falling of all the time and it is not a big problem but from time to time the lens gets dirty due to this problem. I have posted lots of pictures taken with this camera on my homepage (check the profile). All the pictures from the NYC trip and until today is taken with the camera.Conclusion: I would not hesitate to recommend the PowerShot S1 (or the new S2) to people I know :-</review_text>
I really hedged between a sky caddie and a rangefinder.  I've used both now and the convenience of a sky caddie is hard to beat with a constant readout of yardage.  However, given the fact that I often find myself in "unique" locations on any given course, there is much to be said for being able to shoot a specific target to get a distance, which the sky caddie doesn't allow you to do.  Sometimes you need odd distances for lay ups, getting the ball back in play, etc.  In short, I would recommend this product.  It's easy to use, and appears to be very accurate.  A definite time saver on the course</review_text>
I bought this rangefinder for golf, but thought it might also work for hunting. It is small enough that I can keep it in my pocket and pull it out when needed.I have tried it in heavy brush, but find mixed results at close range.  You can get good results on objects beyond 50 yards by utilizing the "Ignore close objects" function.I pulled it out at the rifle range today during a snow shower and was pleasantly surprised to get a reading of 101 yards to my target from the bench about 1 yard back of the firing line.  The snow did not affect the results of the rangefinder at all...probably had more effect on the bullet path</review_text>
I love this rangefinder- much better than the type that shoots the prism on the flag sticks.You can use this one to find yardage to bunkers, creeks, etc. Very accurate and very useful. Well worth the money</review_text>
I use this for golf yardage when I'm in a location where the yardage is hard to determine. Very accurate. Does require a steady hand. Would not recommend more magnification than this one has as it would be very difficult to hold steady enough for a target as small as a flag</review_text>
It is light; has 6X magnification; and easy to use.  This little tool is great for any golfer.  You must know the yardage before you can select the correct club.  How far is it to either the top of that bunker next to the green or the flagstick?  Next,you just then need to pull the club that will get you there.  Fits on your belt through a loop in the safe carrying case or use the supplied clip to attached the case to your golf bag.  These NEW laser rangefinders are better than ever and at a lower price than previous models. LOVE IT</review_text>
I got a Nikon laser rangefinder for Chrisymas and it had an 8x magnification. I found this to be to powerful for golf.I could not hold it steady on the flag.The 6x magnification on the Bushnell Yardage Pro Scout was much better. Also it is very compact and stores easily in my golf cart. The price from Amazon was well below I could find anywhere else.</review_text>
My husband and I bought this case for a cruise we took over the holidays. We absolutely are SO GLAD we did! Yes, the waterseal ring was a little wierd to figure out at first, but really, once you get that down, this case is a cinch! I absolutely love being able to take video underwater as well as the photos. Here we are, swimming with Sting Rays and I can capture every moment of it! I can't reccomend this case more. Just follow the instructions and beware what they say about using the flash without the diffuser--- it's true, the image gets all funky if you use the flash without it, so don't. Otherwise, very simple and user friendly.</review_text>
while the manual is a little vague about how to remove the "o" ring that is used to seal the camera housing, I figured it out. Not really that hard. I applied the gel. And took it to 45-50 feet 3-4 times and it worked wonderfully perfectly. No leaks, no condensation, a no brainer actually. And it took great pictures. I would add that messing with a digital camera when you're diving makes buoyancy especially interesting when trying to do close ups of an octopus tucked away in a reef. And how to set up the Canon for nice underwater shoots is definitely something that will take some time. But by all means buy this. I have been diving for 10 years and this works great. Recommended highly</review_text>
I used this snorkeling in Grand Cayman and it was fantastic!Easy to use, make sure you read instructions and seal the gasket properly. Don't be afraid to handle it, just put a little sealant between your forefinger and thumb and coat it well. Getting the gasket in is easy, taking it out...well...to be honest, is not. Look for the little area to stick something in-between the plastic housing and the ring to pop it out (it's not easy, maybe a plastic tooth pick?). Do not use anything that will damage the ring or the housing!, if you do, be very careful. Don't forget the diffuser! It works great with the flash. Also, keep the diffuser and hold it with your hand if you must but use it to take better portraits, the flash is simply to much and this will make your portraits much better (look at the skin tones after using it) I wish this camera had a way to clip this diffuser to it without the case. I didn't buy the weights but wish I did. The camera floats easily, I would get it for next time. Also, learn the buttons well before you go, really get them in your memory, its not easy to remember them when you're underwater and moving around.</review_text>
I read the reviews and I was a little nervous about putting my camera in a case that some people claimed leaked.  I took my camera to Jamaica loaded it into the case (carefully reading and following instructions) and it work out great.  The pics turned out awesome, the camera was safe from water.  I recommend this to anyone who has an interest in taking their camera in or near the water.If you want your underwater pictures to come out well, you definitely need to put the camera on the underwater setting.  Because of the neutralization of the blue hues you cannot take pictures of things that are more than 20 feet away without there being blurred or hard to see items.  If you switch the camera setting the pictures come out overly blue or blurred.Another thing, it is easy to switch in between camera modes.  Just be aware of what mode you're in.Another thing to watch out for is if you are using the camera around water, but not necessarily in water, sometimes water spots get on the lens and leave a good picture with some blurry marks.  It's easily taken care of by dipping the camera in the water and letting the water naturally run off or by using a clean cloth to wipe away water.Avoid touching the inside of the case, finger prints are very annoying to try and look through while underwater or with some type of sun glaze</review_text>
I took this to Guam and the pictures and videos came out awesome.</review_text>
Took mine on a trip to the Caicos island where it was promptly dropped, mauled and possibly even slightly neglected (I never soaked it after bringing it out of the saltwater).  Worked without flaw.  Just as easy to use as without the case.  If you've got kids, for Pete's sake buy one of these.  While making it not only virtually trash proof, it enables you to take it places you would probably never take your digital camera otherwise... to the beach, to the pool.  Forget about it!  Got mine at scuba.com for $150</review_text>
I loved this - it was perfect for me.  I'm not a diver, so I don't know how it would hold up at greater depth, but I took it snorkeling (that looks spelled wrong, but I'm not sure, but oh well) and got incredible pictures and videos.  It also allowed me to take it kayaking without being paranoid, so it was great for me.</review_text>
This is not a case with frills.  The camera fits snugly inside but there's no room for anything else such as the battery charger or even the case for the memory card.  It feels flimsier than I expected but so far I have had no problems with workmanship, so that attribute may just be my interpretation.</review_text>
Panasonic seems to have altered the design somewhat.  The case I got looked a little different from the image on this page.  The badge says "Panasonic", not "Lumix." Not a big deal.  If you want to attach this case to your belt or to your backpack, though, you're going to have to find or buy a mini-carabiner, because contrary to what some product photos suggest, this case does not come with one.  See "customer images" for what my case looks like</review_text>
This case works well for the camera, but the elastic straps releasing the flash is a significant design error. Placing the camera in with lens facing the back of the case works much better. The belt loop only measures 1.25 inches effectively, so it will not work with all belts. All in all, the case will protect the camera, which is why I bought it</review_text>
This case is nice, but I think the expanding sides are unnecessary. The camera will easily slide in and out with out unzipping the sides, except that the elastic strap will usually pop up the flash when you put the camera in, and then the same strap won't let go of the flash when you pull it out...unless you unzip all the zippers and pull it apart. This is still the best case for this camera though, as long as you don't want to carry extra batteries, sd cards, etc.</review_text>
Fits fine, but its a little hard to get it fast, it goes well with the design.</review_text>
It was a chore to find a case that fit the LX2 as there is a protruding lens and the fit was either too tight or totally unusable. This case is perfect as it appears to be made just for the LX1 or LX2</review_text>
Ideal case for the Panasonic PS-SLX2. Easy to open / close, sturdy and nice design. Highly recommended</review_text>
Product arrived well packed and in great working order.  We had paid extra to have overnight delivery so I would have it before leaving town.  It arrived a day late and I had to buy another one.  On my return I advised Amazon about the problem and was promptly refunded the extra overnight charge.  Thanks!  That's why I use Amazon.</review_text>
Excellent quality/price/speed of delivery... works better/faster then one that came with camera... Would definately buy again, from this vendor, if the need ever arose. (I don't expect that it ever will.</review_text>
This product is fine - wish it had a smaller cord, but it does detach from the charger to make for easier storage</review_text>
The money I spent on this charger was money well spent, I had to replace my original after my dog decided that she needed a new chew toy.</review_text>
Not bad, on the whole, for watching wildlife in the dark.  Good illumination and nice balance between magnification, field of view, and use w/o a tripod.  Sharpness falls off at the edges of the viewing area.  I could recommend this to wildlife watchers who might be considering their first night-vision device.  Since this was my first, I have no comparative information on whether there might be better ones out there</review_text>
Hello, I'm glad with this product, I haven't try it yet outside my house but in a really dark condition it works pretty well, I need to turn on the IR button and clearly I can read even a sign on a bottle in total darkness. this thing really work</review_text>
I bought this from Amazon and am thoroughly impressed.  The field of view is fine, and you can see a ton of detail within a reasonable range.  I turned out the lights in my room, looked out the window with it at my pool (20 feet away) and saw ripples in the water.  I aimed it up at the sky, and saw a line of incoming airline traffic that I couldn't see otherwise.  I took it down to the basement -- pitch black -- used the infrared illuminator and could read the text off boxes.  Taking it outside, I could see clearly the houses across the street, cars, dogs outside -- just a ton of stuff.  Remove the gear from my eye and I can see little to nothing.  The thing's a beaut.My only concerns are about how long it will last and hold up.  Light damages this type of technology if handled improperly, and I'm hoping that generally careful use and no abuse will keep this thing purring for a long time.  The power source is convenient too --- two double AA's are all you need</review_text>
well this item is amazing...in m y opinion every body should buy one of them if you are looking for night vision monocular</review_text>
This is another good scope by a well known brand - Night owl, and should work well for most. I prefer it to the Cyclops as well - it has a much nicer shape</review_text>
This camera is great! Not only does it take great digital photos and is extremely user friendly, but if you add a 1GB memory card to it (which slides right in and only costs about $40.00) you can take a LOT of great quality digital videos with sound that are very easy to upload to your computer and/or the internet and email to family etc. In fact, there is no need to buy a video camera when you have this and it fits right in your pocket. I can take up to 30 minute videos and lots of photos at one time. You can easily take a photo while you are making a video as well</review_text>
This has got to be the best camera for the money that you can buy right now!! I was looking for an affordable camera, small and thin, a well-known name brand, takes sharp digital photos, can shoot at low light, uses cheap SD cards, good-sized LCD display, and can take decent videos. Well, this Casio Exilim is everything and more, and at a great price. I have used it so much during my out-of-state travels without running out of power or memory (I bought a 2gb SD card for $20 at [...] and I can take more a 1000 hi-res photos or about an hour of video). I was absolutely surprised at how good the videos are that I can shoot on this small digital camera, that now I have decided not to buy a new video camcorder, as this Casio Exilim is all that I would need for any occasion. If you're in the market for a great camera, look no further than the Casio Exilim</review_text>
its sleek and easy to use. it takes great pictures and has alot of feature</review_text>
I have used the camera for three months, and absolutely love it! The pictures are crisp (even very close-ups), and the video feature is right up there. Sound pick-up is excellent. I have created two DVD's combining videos and still pictures. Folks have thought the quality was very good.The battery life was rated very good, and I have found this to be true. I carry the camera with me nearly everywhere I go. People are impressed with the size.Drawbacks? Because of its size, there are no connections from the camera to a computer, TV or battery charger. The docking station is small and lightweight. Because of the battery life, I have never been away from home long enough to need recharging.I recommend the camera without reservations, and will look first to Casio in the future</review_text>
In my experience, this camera takes great pictures, but the zoom lens is so delicate that it breaks easily.  It stops extending and just makes a clicking noise.  This happened to me when the camera accidentally turned on while in my pants pocket rendering the camera unusable.  My brother and two of my friends experienced a similar problem with their EX-S500 after they accidentally dropped the camera while the lens was extended.  I would recommend looking into another camera that is not so delicate</review_text>
It is a great camera, very small and gives very good photos in most circumstances.  Grainy pic in dim light. Go to the casio website to download the new firmware for 4GB SD card compatibility.  You will get over 1500 high res photos with a 4 GB card, where outpost is selling for 5o dollars a car</review_text>
I own a Nikon Coolpix 3100 camera and have no complaints with it, except for the fact that its size (even though it's fairly small) is a pain to carry around when you want to take pictures. Looking for a much thinner camera, I came across this one and was quite pleasantly surprised at its size, and its ability to take really great shots! I'm merely a birthday - holiday type picture taker, but this camera will definitely enable me to take more pictures, because I'll be carrying it around in my pockety whennever I go somewhere that might provide a photo opportunity.</review_text>
I have many traditional film SLRs including the original Pentax K1000 (fully manual), Canon Rebel XOS and a Canon Elph. When considering digital SLR cameras the Canon Digital Rebel and  the point-and-shoot Canon Digital Elph were at the top of my list. But at $150 less than the Canon Digital Elph, the Casio Exilim  EX-S series is a better buy with the the same features (and in some cases a better execution of the same features). If you're looking for a fun point-and-click camera that will record audio, AVI movie files and digital pictures this is it. It takes about 15 miuntes to read the manual and you're off taking pictures. Pay attention when reading the manual and everything else will seem very intuitive.Of all the cameras I have I use this one most often.Other users have complained about the proprietary lithium ion battery but 3rd party equivalents are available right here on the amazon site, you just have to look. My back-up battery was only [...] bucks. San Disk 1GB memory cards are cheap too, [...] online, [...] retail. Last, I agree with many users that a lock switch needs to be developed so that you can keep the camera from accidentally turning on when it's in your pocket -- but remember many cameras have this problem/lack/this feature. I solved my own issues by buying a [...] case with a belt loop</review_text>
This really is a great camera (for it's purpose!) This isn't a camera to get if you want super-fine shots or are some kind of amateur photographer.   If you want a camera to preserve memories, snap shots during travel, parties, etc, this is the one to get.Here are a few of my favorite things about the camera:Solid construction.  The thing just reeks of quality.Very fast startup time - not only is it easy to fit in a pocket so you can grab it while other idiots are unzipping their camera bags, but it starts up so fast that you're taking a picture before you know it.Portability - I've taken this everywhere.  I've gotten great pictures I'd have never gotten otherwise because this camera is small, unobtrusive, always available, etc.I'm very happy with this purchase & my next digital camera (sooner or later people will laugh at 5 megapixels) will definitely be a card/small sized Casio</review_text>
It's a must have addition to the A530 camera, especially when learning to use the camera, and running slide shows on tv. Saves big time on batteries!!! The only reason I rated it less than 5 stars is that it's a little large</review_text>
Works great, easy to use and store.  It is just what I need</review_text>
Useful for home and you can save bateries, I use whenever I connect my camera to the PC</review_text>
This AC Adapter sure saves on batteries. Although it is not a device to use in the wilds it is sure handy to use at your home photography work shop. It could be setup in a permanent location that is handy for you where it could be stored(wound and hung)on a wall hook, easily accessible whenever the need arises. I use mine fairly frequently</review_text>
The case works for what I need it for just to carry around my digital camera.</review_text>
I love my camera and after a year of it in my purse it gotten some pretty good scratches on it.  The case is small enough to not take up too much space in my purse, but its still not small enough to fit snugly around my camera.  It will be perfect for long trips where I would need an extra battery and memory card in the case with the camera.  Still a great buy and the smallest case I have found for this sized camera.</review_text>
The camera fits perfectly with space in the front pouch for an extra battery and memory card</review_text>
I wanted something that could take some wear & tear and easy to carry so after a lot of consideration I chose this case. Excellent choice, it"s cushioned, has a long strap, very lightweight. Not pretty...but functional</review_text>
Just a few notes from using this camera after having owned an HP, Olympus, and Sony digital camera.1. The Nikon has no manual focus mode but the autofocus is not bad. If you do a lot of low light work, a camera with an infrared focus beam like the Sony is better. With the the infrared beam, the camera can focus in total darkness.2. The manual only mentions SD memory cards to 1 GB but a store let me try a 2 GB, X60 card and it worked almost doubling the number of photos and increasing the movie record time to about 30 minutes in the highest quality, 640x480 resolution, 30 frames/sec mode. My camera has firmware version 1.0 so it is likely all L6's can use a larger memory. One person has reported it will take a 4 GB memory ( not the SDHC type but plain SD ).  I cannot verify that however.3. Some reviewers here have noted slow writing times to memory but remember that speed depends not only on the camera but the speed of the memory. Most SD cards with no speed indicator write at about 1.5 MB/sec. The high speed cards mentioned in the manual are X66 ( means 66 times 150KB/sec ) which achieve write speeds of 10 MB/sec.4. The L6 can zoom during movie mode but the zoom is digital not optical. Also, you can hear the focusing mechanism noise on the soundtrack in movie mode.5. Having had batteries go dead at the most inopportune times, a camera that uses common AA's is a plus.6. The L6 only has one metering mode unlike some cameras that can switch between spot and center weighted average. The many scene modes make up for this but one caveat. The blur warning available in non-scene mode does not work in scene mode.7. Macro Mode was a pleasant surprise. Both my Sony and the Nikon focus to about the same distance in macro mode but there is a big difference in the results. The Sony achieves the close distance in wide angle mode. At maximum zoom, the Sony requires moving the camera back from the object. The Nikon is the opposite. It requires moving back ( not as much as the Sony ) at wide angle and it meets its close focusing distance specification at maximum optical zoom.8. The battery compartment. The L6 has a locking latch on the battery compartment door and the door opens by being pulled out towards the front of the camera. It may not seem like much unless you have owned an Olympus which had a battery compartment door on the bottom with no latch and that opened by sliding along the long dimension of the camera. Many times I would reach in my pocket to find the door open and the batteries having fallen out of the camera.</review_text>
1. Easily accessible menus to change camera settings. Less used settings are deeper in the menus. One touch flash control is nice.2. LCD is a good size for framing shots and reviewing.3. Accessing and downloading images does not require the use of the included CD software. Just plug into USB slot [either Win2K or XP] and the PC enumerates the camera as a drive. This is good for those of us who have other imaging and editing software and don't want to install the basic Nikon package.4. Must have taken over a hundred shots on a charged pair of NiMH batteries.5. Image pixel resolution is programmable. 3Mp is very clear for viewing and printing.6. Works fine with 1GB SD card; max spec'ed in user guide.7. As others have mentioned, the fact that the lens extends anytime the camera is turned on is a problem. I originally bought a soft case for it and found the lens extended one time when I went to take it out. An error message was on the screen. Power button must have gotten pressed. Got a hard case after that.Over all a good size, feature set, and battery life.</review_text>
My wife got me this camera for christmas and the greatest feature it has is that I did not have to charge the batteries once since I got it (4 months now). During that time I took approximately 600 pictures and made about 20 videos. It is perfect for the non-professional photographer. Makes it easy to choose the setting for various occassions (party, indoor, night, panorama, etc.) and it takes great overal pictures. I think this camera is great for people who like to take occassional pictures of friends, at partys or on vacation. Good buy for the price. I would definately recommend it.P.S. Get at least a 512 MB memory card</review_text>
This is my second digital camera; I've been using most recently a Nikon 35mm and though it probably isn't fair to make comparisons, I do find this little digital to be every bit as responsive and easy to use as the 35mm. I haven't noticed any lack of speed in shooting, etc. Maybe that's because this camera is used mostly for pleasure rather than business, so I can take a more relaxed attitude. I think for the price and all the options it does offer, the L6 is a fine choice and I would not hesitate to recommend it. I'm merely a hobbyist when it comes to photography, and again, maybe that's why my attitude is more relaxed. I don't demand anything much other than a good final product, and my new L6 delivers that</review_text>
I really don't have too much to add to the other reviewers, except that I really have fun using this camera.  I've had various digital cameras for years ( mostly Canon A series ) but none have come even close to the 3" screen.  You can really see your composition.  Plus the camera is small and fast... so I keep it in my shirt pocket and pull it out to get a shot off quickly.  I do find the screen gets smudged easily, but I just clean it more often... I don't really mind the extra work cleaning, I imagine it would like like washing your Ferrari every Sunday.</review_text>
I just received the SD750 for my birthday (thanks Mom & Dad!).  I've had it for several days and have taken over 3 hundred pictures and tons of video.  It now replaces my old Canon S400, which was a replacement for my antique Canon S110.  I've remained true to Canon because I can see the amount of work they have put into making each new generation of cameras "that much better."  First, the colors are so much crisper on the SD750 than in prior models, although some tweeking may be needed, you can always find a setting to capture the color you are after.  Second, the video quality is outstanding (at the highest setting, that is), and Canon finally took off the 3 minute cap to video recording to allow for longer videos.  Also, at the highest setting only, you can zoom in and out while recording video.  I love the 3 inch display that incorporates a shifting orientation so the picture is always upright.  I do wish that the camera came with a more powerful optical zoom... but I imagine I'll get that with the next generation.  And in the end, I have to emphasize, that this camera takes OUSTANDING pictures.  That's what a camera should do, after all.  Now for a quick rundown of improvements from previous models (for you Canon loyalists):- Much improved color- Faster picture taking and faster everything- Extended video capacity (to however much memory ya got)- Large LCD to appease the instant gratification generation- Overall improved picture quality (clarity, color saturation)A few small camera quirks outside of picture quality... the jog dial in back (trying to emulate iPod) is not the smartest addition and the "play" button is a little hard to hit at times.  Overall, I definitely without hesitation recommend this camera</review_text>
I previously owned a SD500, and have been looking for better features such as larger screen, wider zoon, higer ISO speed, etc.  And found SD750, I own it now.  Wow, it is very nice design of the body, slimmer than SD500.  Huge 3" LCD screen, color display on screen is near original(Not just my feel, also few other friends said so).  Use the dial technology similiar to the iPod's dial to switch the shoot modes, but you may take some time to get used to it. 3x optical 35-105mm zoom is better than SD500, but I wish it can go wider to 28mm like SD800 IS. SD750 has DIGIC III processor.  Can use SDHC card but I hear it may cause bottleneck, so I continue using the 2GB highspeed to hold over 600 pics in highest setting.  Movie shooting is great even inside the restaurant at night time.  It can also record your voice to each picture.  Battary life is not as good as SD500. But it still takes about 150 pictures in a full charge. Recommend to have a backup when you go traveling.  No complaint for the 3" LCD.  Oh, one good feature in this camera is it has an easy button to review the pictures, press the shutter to return to shooting mode.  This is way better than SD500.  It's one of the best so far. Highly recommend if you are looking for a compact, easy-use camera that take quality pictures.  Good luck.Added: This is just on my own preference, I have the silver version.  I like this version better than the black version, unless Canon makes the whole camera body black.  Another feature I use on this camera is: I can set the folder to be created on daily base, instead of seeing the picture's property for the picture day, it groups all pictures took at the same day to one folder</review_text>
I just got this camera last week from my parents as an early graduation gift (i'm fourteen) and I cannot put it down. I used to have a Nikon and this camera kills it. There are so many options on this camera and I love the color accent and color swap. I took a picture of my dog then turned her blue. The pictures all come out really clear and the time between shots are quick, there's a setting to change the time between shots on the camera! But my favorite part, by far, is the 3" LCD. It makes all the pictures sharper and clear.I was looking at the Canon SD630 but I know somebody who has it and i personally think this one is better due to the fact that this one is a new model and it's less bulky.I'm very happy with my camera and I hope this helps you when looking for a camera</review_text>
I have just purchased this camera for easier travel use.  My main camera is a Nikon D70s but it is too big to travel easily.  The Canon SD750 is a very compact camera.  The camera does not come with a carrying case so I purchased the leather case which I think is a necessary addition.  Video is somewhat grainy full screen except in the 640 mode (30 fps) which seems to be quite good and very watchable on a 20 inch computer monitor full screen.  Still picture quality is excellent.  Side by side pictures with my Nikon show comperable quality which is quite amazing for such a small package.  The camera is easy to use.  I purchased the 2 Gb Extreme card which I think is perfect for my use, especially with video.  The 2 Gb card appears to give me about 15 minutes of video at the 640 resolution.  All in all the camera has exceeded my expectations</review_text>
I have had a much larger camera for years but was introduced to the Canon SD630 by a friend. I fell in love with it instantly and began looking for one. During my search, I discovered that the SD750 was about to be released. So I waited. I just got it less than 24 hours ago and I am not disappointed! The 3 inch LCD is GREAT! It works well even on a sunny day. I have to admit that getting my fingerprints all over it regularly is driving me crazy but it cleans up easily with a lense cleaning cloth. The camera takes dynamite pictures and I love the macro mode. The camera is fast too, much faster than my old four year old model. It starts up fast, shoots fast, and stores fast. I shot some pictures at dusk last night and found that the camera does well in low light as well.One thing that worries me is the little flap that covers the USB connector. Maybe it's just me, but I feel like I am going to break it. Instead of using the USB cable, I will go buy a memory card reader to download the pictures.Other than that little detail, I love the camera so far. I found the menus to be reasonably intuitive, which I like. I don't care for reading the manual (who does?) and most functions will be easy to remember even if I only use them once in a while.This is going to be a great little camera for me</review_text>
I purchased this product after doing quite a bit of research.  I am a big fan of Canon cameras but recently there have been some other really good competitors.  I bought this one to take with me everywhere.  It is almost perfect.  The size is just right. It fits nicely into my pocket or easily into my wife's purse.  The Face Recognition is a great feature and seems to work very well.  The start-up time and time to take a picture is extremely fast and accurate.  It would be nice to have a more powerful optical zoom, and a little lip on one side to make holding while taking a picture easier.  This is a well built and high quality camera that I would purchase again in a second</review_text>
Canon resumes its position at the top of all camera manufacturers. Their design, performance, and quality is hard to match. Now onto the camera:I have shot around 4-5 Gigs worth of photos in various settings, so I have a good idea of what this camera has to offer. The features itself within the camera are excellent. Aside from increased megapixels, it's not much different than the SD700 except for some odd reason, Canon decided to opt out of the IS (Image Stabilization) feature. I almost gave it 4 stars based solely on that aspect. But other than that, the camera is brilliant.For portraits and close-ups, the Face Detection feature is phenomenal which is a reflection of the new DIGIC III technology. The camera will lock in on the human face or multiple faces (I've locked in up to 8) and keep it in focus no matter where you move or pan the camera. And if you're shooting indoors or in low-light, the ISO can be set as high as 1600 so you have a lot of Flash Exposure control if you don't like that spotlight look when using the flash. There is also an Auto ISO setting which gives the user a lot of range to shoot. It will determine proper ISO setting and shutter speed and also will predict camera shake resulting in less blurry pictures. I guess this makes up for not having IS. :)If you are a novice photographer and don't like to mess with ISO, aperture settings, and shutter speed variations this camera will fit your needs just fine. It has 17 shooting modes including "scene" modes for the different settings you may be shooting in such as the beach, fireworks, snow, portraits, night, etc. Fully automatic so any beginner can pick up this camera and shoot like a pro.The most popular feature has to be the 3" LCD screen. It's ginormous. But in order to get that big of a screen on such a compact camera, Canon forgoes the optical viewfinder. So if you're a viewfinder shooter, then you may not like the fact you are limited to just the LCD screen for image framing.One shortcoming of the camera is that it still has a weak zoom. 3X optical is nothing and so the zoom feature is pretty much non-existent.The movie features on the camera are awesome. i like the Time Lapse movies where you can record time lapse of up to 2 hours and condense it into a 4 or 8 minute movie. So if you want to make that cool "cloud moving" effect or the "budding flower" you can accomplish that with this camera. The video resolution is excellent and has a VGA frame rate of 30fps.Overall, the camera satisfies all users with being simple enough to use for beginners and also boasting features a professional can appreciate. It also looks bitchin and has a two tone effect that people admire. The corners are intelligently rounded so it slips easily in and out of any pocket you may want to put it in.</review_text>
This charger is pretty amazing! It's the smallest most compact one on the market, plus it comes with the car charger.  Charges in about 90 minutes or so.  If you are looking for compact, this is it, and it has good looks too!!</review_text>
I've had a C6 Celestron for some time. I wanted something easier to move and set up. This Firstscope works great for the kids. Easy to set up and and has very clear optics. For the price, you can't go wrong!The Moon, Venus and Saturn have the kids wanting to see more!</review_text>
Good telescope.  I would suggest buying the extra lenses (only two others available for this model).  Very light and easy to travel with</review_text>
Incredible for the price and size.  Very clear and secure.Good deal</review_text>
The only trouble with this product is that it is very hard to pick up the flag from any distance.  You generally have to use a trap (or a person on the green) to get distance to the flag.  Otherwise, we've found this a very useful and easy to use tool</review_text>
Excellent.  Upgraded from Yardage Pro 400.  This one is so small.  Much more convenient than the 400.  This one just clips on your bag.  Works better as well.  Even picks up those flags that are just hanging there on a overcast, windless day.  The scan feature is nice to verify that you are zoning in on the proper target</review_text>
I've used this since 2001 and extensively in 2006 now that it's USGA legal.  Not sure why others have having trouble holding this steady.  Anything &lt;200 yards I have no problem hitting the flag (you don't aim at the stick, you aim at the flag).    Excellent for getting distances to bunkers, trees, and other hazards.200 and over it is difficult for me to hit the flag, but all you have to do is wait for someone to pull or reinsert the pin, and you beam it off the player.Inside 150 I've never had a problem getting the distance.   I have learned to first laser an object behind the pin (such as a tree), then move up to the pin so I know for sure that I'm getting the flagstick and not the tree in the background.My dad has the "Pinseeker" model and it IS quicker and easier to beam off a small object, but it's also a lot more expensive... and it's larger.</review_text>
I don't know how I played golf before I bought this.  What was I thinking???  No more adding or subtracting or just plain guessing.  By the time the group in front has walked off the green, I have the exact yardage to pin, have the right iron in my hand and ready to fire.  Unfortunately, the laser range finder doesn't help you hit greens any better, but I am pin high every time!  It is so much fun</review_text>
I just purchased this unit and found it to be extremely useful on the course.  I have "shaky" hands and from a distance it's difficult to view the flag distance but I've found that if I use the scan mode and just scan the area of the flag and I view the flag for a second it does give the distance which is all I need.  For other items like bunkers, trees and edges of water, it's a breeze.  It's light and easy to use.</review_text>
Firstly, I love its black all-metal body. I also love its ergonomics and size. I've own other digital P/S and SLRs. They are all good cameras, but big in size. I tend to bring the L60 with me everywhere I go (e.g. biking, hiking, etc.) for convenience.On the inside, it was also beautiful. I've ordered prints upto 11x14 and they turned out beautiful. Using a 2GB SD card, it also allowed me to record more than 1.5 hours of 640x480 video in MPEG4 at 30 FPS. If you need a small, robust camera that you can take everywhere you go and still takes beautiful pictures, this is it</review_text>
so far i've had this camera for about a week and im am pleased with everything. its actually my 10th digital camera and i think i've finally found one that i like. it takes beautiful pictures, film good movies and it also has great sound. Its also smaller than any other camera i've bought and better looking. i think it takes pictures better at night though and sometimes that a good thing. buy it cause its very nice!!</review_text>
This is the 3rd digital camera I use, and it really is impressive.Here are the highlights:-First off I LOVED the Video Feature, you get a decent 640X480 with SOUND, and since the camera is so small , you'll always be able to capture those special moments, it also comes with a USB cable to connect to the PC and a cable to connect the camera to a T.V (has video and audio out)-The rechargable LiOn Battery that also comes with a charger is a very nice feature, digital cameras are notrious battery drainers, I had a separate budget for Batteries (AA) for my former camera, and those aint cheap!- so you wont worry about this with this one.-it also has a voice recorder so you can record notes when you are taking still photos.on the negative sides:- you need to buy a separate SD memory because the high resolution stills and the videos take a lot of memory, you'll need AT LEAST 512MB, better yet go for the 1GB.-The special effects button on the back of the camera is kinda useless, It can turn the pictures into monochrome, B/W. sepia etc. or negative,_ the biggest negative thing I found is it takes way too long to actually capture the picture even on the low res. the flash goes on twice for red eye reduction( very impressive results) but the whole process is slooow, so you end up not taking the shot you intended , I am still trying to figure out how to disable this feature so it takes photos faster.this may be the only real negative feature of this camera.</review_text>
I gave this as an Xmas gift to my 14-yr-old daughter and she loves it. Super easy to use. Good idea to get a backup battery if you're like her and forget to charge it sometimes. Big selling bonus was that it was thin enough to fit into her pocket</review_text>
Bought this camera for my teenage daughter who wanted something sleek.  The camera is all that and powerful too.  Photo quality is excellent and the camera is easy to operate.  The video feature works very well, also.  My daughter found the controls intuitive enough that she hardly had to look at the user manual.  Battery life is good although you can't charge it without removing the battery.  Extracting and inserting the battery is pretty straightforward and is not as inconveinient as you might think.  This is an easy pick for a solid, versatile camera</review_text>
for the price and the size i am very pleased with the digimax l6</review_text>
When I purchased this tripod, my husband thought it was just another tripod.  After he used it the first time, he guards this tripod with his life.  He LOVE this tripod!  The tripod is like a magnet because it always brings questions and people to the tripod.  We have the Sony DCR-DVD505 and the remote on the handle of the tripod works GREAT with our camera. The height adjustment and everything was made perfect! We are not disappointed</review_text>
I have purchased a second Sony VCT870RM Tripod to use with separate video cameras because of the ease of setup and stability of operation. The quality of the construction supports a lot of good use.Eldon Wolf - Albany, C</review_text>
i recently ordered the sony vct870rm tripod w/ remote for my sony camcorder. it arrived in a few days and i was very pleased with the product. i'm glad i spent the extra money on the variable zoom for this model tripod plus it seems to be made a little better then the next lower model.i was please with the purchase all around. nice job with no complaints</review_text>
I was a bit tenative about writing this revierw lest the world know our secret - and then they'd all have one too. We were looking for something to put under our PD170 and stubled upon this beauty.The construction quality is solid and as a unit the tripod is stable. The fluid head panning is just about as good I could expect. Smooth and steady.  The tripod shoe is nice and has a cork pad to protect the bottom of your camera.The tripod would be a good buy for just its basic features, but what sets it apart is the LANC remote control built into the handle. Its great. LANC (or Control-L) compatable cameras are made by Sony (this is a Sony product) and Cannon and some others.On the handle you have a On/Standy switch, a Record button, a Photo button, and a Zoom rocker.  For the stuff we've done so far its supeer. I can keep my hands on the handle get the shots I want.The remote control makes the makes using the camcorder on the tripod a slick experience.The only thing that would make this a better deal is if they added a Focus Control to the remote. As far as usage - the only other issue is it took a while to get a feel for how much to tighten the tilt knob to lock it down -  i didn't want to over-torque it and break something and didn't want the camera slowly moving either - but once you get the feel its fine.This tripod is a good buy. But don't feel like you have to run out and get one. We like being the only cool and geeky ones</review_text>
Easily the best tripod I've ever owned, including some considerably more expensive ones.  The only problem was with the remote.  You must turn on the video camera before connecting.  When the camera turns off automatically, disconnect the wire, turn on the camera, plug the remote back in.  What a pain</review_text>
This tripod is stable, fairly light and has remote controls on the handle that perfectly interact with my Sony HDR-FX1 HDV camera.  Using the LANC connection I can zoom in and out at a variable speed / start and stop the camera without actually touching the camera.  Well worth the money!</review_text>
pirate scope works as advertised. the "leather" is fake or of low quality and the stitching is not that great. optics are good, extras are weak. shipping good too. seller delivered as advertise</review_text>
I got this frame as a gift for my parents after returning a different one.  The quality is good and it is easy to use.  The only thing I would improve is that there is no USB input so you need a card reader.  Overall I would recommend it to friends</review_text>
I absolutely love this frame!! I bought their smaller frame months ago, and it was great! I get so many compliments on it, and I'm so happy to see this larger one at this amazingly low price! Wow..I'm buying it for Mother's Day, and one for my husbands office! By the way, I've had great customer service with these folks! LOVE IT!</review_text>
My brother bought this frame for his wife about 2 months ago.  He liked it so much he suggested we get one for our parents anniversary. So he had it shipped to my home because I'm the family historian and have most of the pictures my folks would want.  I selected 2900+ pictures and converted them to 640x480.  All 2900+ pics plus 15 Glenn Miller songs fit on a 512MB SD card with about 50MB still vacant.   I liked the frame so much I just bought one for my wifes birthday.  Really good looking; both the actual frame and the images. I'm a fairly serious digital photgrapher and I didn't think 640x480 resolution could look this good.  Looks much better than I expected. Sounds just OK, but about what you'd expect with the size speakers that can fit in something this size</review_text>
It is a great product, very easy to operate, great size, accepts all my flash card formats. But the resolution could be better and the plastic in the back (ok, no one will look at the back of a picture frame) looks cheap.Compared with other products I know, I still think it's a great one</review_text>
This digital picture frame was a great value. The frame itself has a quality look to it and the operation aspect of it is easy to use. Picture quality is good as well. The only reason I give it 4 stars is the speaker quality...not great but adequate, which is not really an issue for me since I wanted the frame primarily for displaying pictures at a wedding. Overall, a great value for a quality product</review_text>
I gave my Mom this frame as a gift for her birthday.  I just put 300 or so pictures on an old memory card I had by uploading them through my camera's USB connection, then removed the card from my camera and plugged it into the frame and that was it.  She loves it and everyone at the birthday dinner was really Wowed when I lifted the cloth I had covering it and it was moving through the photos I choose.  Also, I like the frame construction because it seems better made than others I have seen.  True that there is not much in the way of instructions and it works best if you have an extra memory card you are not using that you can just keep in the frame at all times.  Memory cards are so cheep now I upgraded mine to a 2 gig and gave her my smaller one</review_text>
Easy to set up, looks nice and much brighter than the 8" Kodak frame from Target</review_text>
If nothing else you get a neutral for protection and you get a polarized that may or may not work well, but is only $17.  I thought it was worth it</review_text>
The case cost $5, the shipping $15.  This case was suggested for my newly purchsed Kodak V705 purchase.  Guess what--doesn't fit!!  Is it worth returning--NO.  So I've got a great case that's too small.  Should have never been suggested for this product</review_text>
It fits the camera perfectly.It's really cute and not bulky.It's not just the ordinary camera case that everyone else has.It's classy.</review_text>
It holds my camera nicely so the LCD does not get scratched in my pocket. The camera is easy to access and stays tightly clipped to your belt even when hiking.My wife thinks I'm a dork wearing a camera but we have a lot of great photos as the camera is always with me.</review_text>
If you have a Kodak V550 or a V530 model, you should buy this case, it's beatiful and has a perfect fit for those cameras.  It's a must buy item.  Much more important then a spare battery (I bought one and never use...</review_text>
This case has saved my a** and my camera! I did drop my new camera but thankfully it was in the case--and you could the cushion when it hit the floor--THANKFULLY!! I clip the camera to my belt and away we go. Its awesome--so is the V550 camera!</review_text>
This may not be the most expensive filter but it works great on my digital camera. It is well worth the money and the low cost will encourage you to replace it when it does eventually get scratched</review_text>
This is not only the ideal scope for beginners but enough of an instrument to show you new things in the sky for years to come. It is sturdy and simple to operate. It has enough light-gathering power (more important than magnification) to reveal dim star clusters, nebulae, and galaxies and good enough optics to show you the surface of planets like Jupiter, Saturn, and Mars. Affordable as this scope is, there is no reason to give so much as a glance at the numerous trashy 60mm refractors with exaggerated magnification claims that litter the market.Some advice on selection. Dobsonians like this one come in a range of sizes. A 114mm (4 ") is a bit on the small side but still a fine instrument, especially if your ability to carry large objects is limited. A 150-200mm (6-8") scope like this one is in the middle of the recommended range. A 250mm (10") is on the big side, and you should buy one only if you are able-bodied.Some advice on use. Viewing through a telescope is less like playing a CD and more like playing a guitar. Finding objects takes a little bit of practice. To simplify finding, I would suggest replacing the supplied finder with Orion's superior 8x40 model and also supplementing it with a "red dot" finder; both are available on Amazon. You will also need to buy an atlas (Sky & Telescope's Pocket sky Atlas is the best available), a red flashlight to view the charts without blowing out your badly-needed night vision, and a guidebook to lead you to interesting objects. These investments will greatly add to your enjoyment.What more can I say? This is the kind of scope that experienced observers have been trying to steer novices towards for decades. Although, I recommend that you do your homework before buying any scope--learn the sky and get to know experienced stargazers who can advise you--when it comes time to purchase, you could hardly do better than this scope.For more advice, see my encyclopedic guide here on Amazon, "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
It fits my SD550 wonderfully and could throw in extra memory card/battery in the case as well. I love the material and yes you really can fit the case in your pocket</review_text>
I have seen other lenses that sold for quite a bit less, but decided against attaching a cheapo lens to a camera that I spent a lot of money on - for me anyway, since I'm a beginner. The Kodak was well worth the investment, and the pictures look fabulous. It's not a massive amount of magnification, but my understanding is that anything more than the 1.5 is pretty much useless due to the picture distortion. I'm attaching a pair of pictures. Both are with the lens on, but I included the first to give an idea of the distance I was shooting at. I used a monopod for both.Like D Uren noted in a previous review, this is quite a large piece of gear when attached to the Kodak adaptor. Plan on picking up a larger case for the camera, adaptor, & lens. A tripod or monopod is also recomended, as any shakiness in your hand will also be magnified at higher zoom</review_text>
Found the lens to be very useful, can actually find only minor faults, which are not even worth mentioning. Considering purchasing the wide angle lens to supplement my picture taking.  Would recommend purchasing both</review_text>
After reading the Product Details section in Amazon on the Kodak Schneider-Kreuznach Xenar 1.4x 55mm Telephoto Lens (combined the paucity of available information elsewhere), I was expecting to receive a lens measuring 2 x 1 x 1  inches...... as advertised!  Go take a look.  Are those the figures you read too?What a surprise then to open the package and discover this hugely massive lens unit.Yup, first thing I did was check to see if what I received was what I ordered... an 8756488...... it was.In actuality, the lens measures more than two inches in diameter at the base where it connects to the lens adapter, is THREE inches in length and exceeds THREE inches diameter at the objective face.  Hold your thumb and forefinger about three inches apart and take a look.  THAT is a LOT of glass!The adapter coupled with the 1.4x lens adds a full FIVE inches to the length of the camera, and COMES CLOSE (just by hefting in each hand) to doubling the weight of my P880 camera.As of this date, no other reviews mention this discrepancy, which is why I am bringing the issue up.  I am rather thrilled that I have this massive and impressive looking piece of photographic equipment... but it sure is not a camera I can stick in my pocket, and if it comes down to a camera hanging from my shoulder for an all day hike, I'm going to be giving serious thought to doing it with a second MUCH smaller camera.I will update this review when I have more experience using the lens.   For now, giving it a 4 star so as not to skew the current ratings.AWESOME looking piece of serious equipment!!  I have added a picture of it shown on my Kodak P880 so you can see for yourself just how much lens this is.</review_text>
My brother was delighted with his lens and you got it here before Christmas which made me very happy</review_text>
I received the lens in a timely manner and am very pleased with it.  Thanks for the provider</review_text>
The purchase of my Telephoto Lens is a really great investment. I love the way it brings in objects closer to view in my photo taking</review_text>
The lens worked wonderfully on my Kodak Z740 camera and did not have a problem. I wanted a light camera with better pixel to shoot small music festival events, however obtaining lenses had become a problem. I found this lense and it worked beautifully with no problem whatsoever. It's a little weighty lense and you definitely need supplemental flash especially for night shoots, but during the day, the close-ups are brilliant</review_text>
Our camcoder was not holding a charge.  Did online search and found what we needed on Amazon.  Placed the order and received quickly.  Exact fit for our camcorder.  Camcorder working fine now.  Thanks</review_text>
Nice camcorder. Easy to use. Can see tapes right away unlike digital camcorders. this was a gift for my 14 year old grandaughter and she loves it</review_text>
The camcorder was very good quailty, but I did find it some place cheaper with a bag,and many other asserires. The return was very easy and smooth, I thank you Amazon.com for maken' that happen! I would order from you again. A.M.H</review_text>
The JVC GR-SXM38US Super VHS Camcorder is a great little camcorder . . . it is easy to use and takes great video, even under very low light conditions. I am extremely pleased with this camcorder. I wish, however, the proper cables to hook up to a television were included with the camcorder. It took a couple of trips to Fry's to finally get the right cables to use with my television and watch my videos. As far as the camcorder goes - I highly recommend it for anyone purchasing their first camcorder, and the price was very reasonable, as well</review_text>
I bought this camera after owning an Olympus digital camera for years. I was extremely happy with my Olympus, but wanted something smaller that would fit in my purse or diaper bag since I'm expecting. This camera was SUCH A DISAPPOINTMENT. Just about every single picture I took had huge white blobs all over it. (This only happened when using the flash. I must admit the camera takes great pictures in broad daylight without the flash.) Plus, if you used the zoom at all, the pictures came out fuzzy. The first digital camera I ever owned (7 years ago) took better pictures! The store I bought the camera from wouldn't take it back because I waited two days past the 14-day return policy. So, I sold the camera and took a $100 loss. I'd much rather lose $[...] than keep this camera</review_text>
perfect for a family, a mother, a child, for EVERYBODY! i've had it for 4 moths and its perfect. I can take all the pictures i want, etc etc. Everybody loves the color! Loved it!Buy it!</review_text>
I have sticked with Sony since I got my first digital camera 4 years ago and Sony camera has been the moneys worth! This one DSC-T10 is the one for the parent who is carrying to much already and needs to pack down for a change. It fits in my purse and still have space for more, the only thing to remember to buy a slim fitting case for the camera and an extra battery(for those kind of battery are not sold everywhere) you need that one when you don't thing you need an extra battery, you always run out at the wrong time.I recommend this one</review_text>
I bought this camera for a trip down under a couple of month ago and I have been really impressed with the image quality. It takes great low light pictures and the steady shot technology works really well for longer shutter times. The camera is very small but feels solid in the hand due to excellent construction unlike some of the Casio ultra-compacts. Well worth the extra cost</review_text>
This is an awesome little camera.  Except that you can't use it at night!  There are horrible white spots in nighttime photos when the flash is used.  Apparently these appear because the flash is SO close to the lens in this camera, and so dust reflects badly.  It's a known problem [...]Also, it's totally annoying that Sony uses all their proprietary technology.  As a result, the cable for connecting this camera to the computer is unwieldly (uhh, have you heard of USB??!!), and you have to buy a sony Memory Stick, which probably won't work with anything else you have.  On the flipside, you can take movies that aren't limited to 30 seconds with this guy - i think that might be a result of the memory stick technology.But other than that, the design and operation of this little guy seems pretty slick.  The lens is not one of those that pops out, so not sure if that affects image quality at all, but as far as I could tell, quality was good.In the end, what good is a camera that can't take usable pictures with its flash??</review_text>
I wanted a good quality consumer grade digital camera to take on short trips, so I  purchased this one. I think the quality of the picures is very good and it has most of the features I wanted. It was a few dollars more than I really wanted to spend, but all in all I am pleased. My main complaint is the battery life is a little on the short side, and it takes a while to see the photo you just took on the lcd screen. I really want something to hold me for about two years, by then these things will be twice as good for a fraction of the cost. For now it does what I need it to do pretty well</review_text>
This is why sony is hot! This sexy little (yes its really small the size of a pack of cards) it takes perfect clear and crisp pictures and the battery life is a long 320mins perfect for a vacation, make sure to get a memory stick with it though, because w/o it it only holds about 15 pics. This is my first digital camera and I would definitely buy sony again</review_text>
I love this camera.  The color is great, so fun and makes me feel unique.  The screen is a great size, and it takes great pictures.  Good with the red eye issue.  The menu is great too, when you scroll thru things, it tells you what it does so you don't have to memorize it all.  Takes fast pictures, but not one after another, like I was hoping.  But it does open fast.  Don't be fooled by the big memory, you will still need a larger card.  Depending on the size pic you want, you can take about 30 to 50 pics on the memory alone.  But all in all I love this camera and it was a great buy</review_text>
This is my first digital camera, i did a lot of search and finaly i decide for the DSC-W55 in black, and is what i was looking for, small enough to have it in my purse, have a lot of functions, and is very easy to import pictures to my computer, you only connect the camera with the USB cable and you don't need to install the software that came with the camera, I have windows vista and i didn't have any problems transfering the pictures, is the best camera and the price is great, and you can choose the super saver shipping and save more.you will love this camera too, is small, very pretty, have lots of options, and take great pictures.Some one wrote in a review that this camera feels like plastic, and that's not true, looks very durable to me and I think is a good product and worth every single dollar you spend.Is easy to shoot pictures in the Auto adjustment mode, to start taking pictures the sooner you charge the battery, because this camera have an internal memory you can buy a memory card later.Well hope you have lots of fun taking pictures, Good luck..!</review_text>
I am just an average guy when it comes to using a camera. Probably below average. I started trying to use 100% Sony electronic products because my computer was a Sony and Sony-Sony linkages make for easy use. Given that, here is what I think of the product:1. It is amazing how much camera you can get for the money. Compared to just 6 months ago, or a year ago, this is a lot of camera for the money. It is very small, fits easily in your pocket, but takes great pictures. Also, it is very easy to use and recharge.2. A visit to the Sony website, suggests that Sony has new cameras coming out constantly -- new cameras that are very similar.  This makes it hard to compare cameras, even within the Sony brand, and makes you feel as if your camera is obsolete the minute you buy it.3. A problem with this camera, given it is so small -- do not shake. Your pictures will be blurry. I am a typical guy, with very little fine motor control. My hands have trouble holding small objects. Holding this camera in one hand and taking a picture -- well the results are not pleasant.4. I tend to be disappointed by the telephoto capabilities of these small cameras. I guess if you really want to zoom in, then you have to go to a big camera. But it still seems like the small cameras could offer more.5. Having said all of that, in the end, this camera is small and easy to carry, light weight, durable, and it is also easy to use. When you look at it, it looks well made. I ended up giving the camera to my in-laws, because they lost theirs. My in-laws tend to be technologically challenged. I said to them, just leave the dial set to the little green camera, and snap away. I have to say - they love this camera.Overall. For the money, a great purchase, technology is amazing. Just grab it with two hands or develop a steadier aim than I have.</review_text>
The Sony W55 is the followup to the successful and popular W50. It's a very good compact camera, easy to carry and easy to use, and reasonably priced - so most people will be happy with it.Not much has changed from the W50, which in this case is a good thing!One change is that the W55 is a 7 MP camera, rather than the W50's 6MP. Honestly, that's not a big plus, as they haven't made the sensor that catches the light any larger.  Same (good) lenses, same size sensor = the same (good) pictures, but not better.  (Though it might help a little on features like Smart Zoom.)The obvious change is of course the colors.  Don't make too much fun of that!  There are 4 DSC-W series cameras in our family, colors would have kept my mother-in-law from taking my sister's camera home with her.  A little personalization is a good thing.The internal memory has been expanded (to 56MB), but I've never used the internal memory on the cameras that have had it, so I'm not sure that matters much.  It might be worth knowing how to use as a backup, for another dozen or two shots if your card is full, or you have some other problem.The controls, menus and interface on the W55 are reasonably easy to use.  For example, the W55 has easy access to the various scene modes (twilight, etc), with some explanation on the screen of what those mysterious little icons mean (so you might actually use them, since it tells you what they do!). If you're new to digital photography, there will be a learning curve.  But if you've used other cameras much, especially Sonys, you can pick this up and use many of the features right away.Read the short introductory guide that comes with the camera, though!The rechargeable battery should easily last you for a full day of shooting - hundreds of shots - with no problem. (Be a little wise about turning it off when you're not using it!) So you probably don't need a second battery, unless you're going into the woods for a while.  It's nice not to have to mess with bulky AA rechargeables. Also, lithium ion batteries don't have a memory effect, so don't worry about partial recharging. Just charge the battery each night. So - before getting a second battery, try it for a while and see if you need it.But get a case - something to protect the screen, at least.  A fully closed one might help resist rain and splashes a little, too.You'll also want to get a Memory Stick Pro Duo card - Pro cards are faster, and you need the smaller Duo size with this camera. Get a 1-2GB card so you don't have to think about running out of memory too much - if you shop carefully, you can find them for so little these days that it's well worth avoiding running out of memory.  You might want a spare card if you plan to travel for more than a week, or use the video mode often - which is surprisingly good (though a bit dark) if set to fine, but uses enormous amounts of storage at that setting.You can stretch your memory, and your hard drive space, by using one of the lower-resolution settings to take snapshots.  You don't really need 7MP for all your photos!The W55 will take better photos than those credit-card type cameras that have a tiny lens system - optics will always make a difference in a camera.  Any reasonable person will be very happy with the pictures from the W55, given the size of it.The camera will be a little slow and often take disappointing pictures in low light and dark situations.  Try the High ISO mode in low light no-flash situations - the picture quality suffers some, but most people will find it useful. Realistically, no ultra-compact camera will work really well in that situation - if you need that often, think about something with a bigger lens and bigger sensor. Good light always gives the best pictures with any camera. There are limits to what you can currently expect from any ultracompact camera.The W55 offers enough controls (through the scene modes and the Program mode) to allow a fair amount of control over the pictures, for an automatic camera.The charger is fairly compact and rated 100-240V, so while you'll need a plug adapter overseas you won't need a voltage converter. The battery charger is a little slow, though probably OK.Keep this camera charged and handy, and you'll find you take a lot of pictures because it's easy to carry and easy to use</review_text>
I really love my first digital camera! I searched and I searched and I finally found what I wanted.  The pictures are crystal clear, the movie playback is exceptional - you only hear what you're supposed to, no loud background noise or static, no muffled noise.  The pictures come out so clear that after you take the picture you can zoom in 5X and count the pores on your face! I love it! I don't think I could ask for a better camera.  I hope this camera will last me atleast 4 years or more or until I graduate from college.  If one is in the market and can afford it, get this camera! There are cheaper cameras but if you want to get a camera, get a good one, that doesn't mean it has to be expensive, but in my opinion you get what you pay for. Thanks for reading. Happy buying</review_text>
First of all, I was just looking for a decent camera for ~$200 that took good clean pictures and had a 6x zoom. I narrowed it down to a Canon A710 and this. Since I didn't need the few extra features the Canon had, I went with the cheaper LZ7 and although I had some reservations, I'm very happy with my decision. I primarily use the camera for taking pictures of my pets, family get togethers and wildlife/nature pictures while hiking...I've had the camera for about two months.Pros: Simple to use, image stabilization works great, takes AA's so you'll never run out of batery power, there are several different image size settings that change to accomadate the use of the extended zoom (up to 9x v. regular 6x), manual exposure controls, nice bright screen, battery life is excellent using NiMH batteries, price for everything that comes with it.Cons: There is a lag when the flash is used, but I think this is common for all cameras that don't use a lithium battery; there is no view finder although I haven't encountered a situation where I've wanted one; the size is a little large for a "pocket camera" but any camera with a 6X optical zoom will be, and it's really not bad.I haven't really used the camera for night-time party type shots, which I'm guessing would not be a problem. I have also not used the video capabilities, which based on the claims should be excellent.Overall, for $200, you'd be hard pressed to find a 7 megapixel, 6x optical zoom camera with excellent image stablization, and excellent picture taking capabilities.  Seven years ago, I paid $180 for a 1.8 megapixel Fugi with no zoom...this camera is an awesome deal!</review_text>
I've only had the camera for a few days, so I hope to write a more encompassing review later.But I'm writing now to clarify that the movie function on the DMC-LZ7 DOES record sound...I had read (maybe in the product specs) that there was no sound, so I was quite happy to discover otherwise!  I had purchased the camera for its low-light abilities and thought I had to give up the sound to get it -- so glad that I was wrong.NOTE:  The nearly-identical DMC-LZ6 does NOT record sound. The lack of sound-recording and the size of the LCD monitor (the LZ7 has 2.5 inch screen, LZ6 has 2-inch screen) seem to be the only differences between the models.  Certainly worth the extra $30 or so to get the DMC-LZ7 with the sound.The DMC-LZ7K movie quality is good for a digicam.  My only comparison is my 4-5 year old Canon Elph -- and it's much better than that.  The old Elph only records approx 15 second clips, and the Lumix will keep going until you fill up your card.As one might expect, there is noticable chromatic noise using ISO settings above 800 -- but even the manual says that setting is basically only suitable for 4x6 prints.  But at least you will get the picture in extreme conditions, even if the quality is less than optimal.Again, comparing to my old camera - the 1200 ISO on the Lumix looks like the 400 ISO did in my old Elph.  The Lumix 400 ISO looks great, at least on the monitor.  I haven't printed anything yet.Shutter response time is good and I have no major complaints, at least not so far.I'm using rechargable AA batteries and a SanDisk Extreme III 1GB card. Both are working well with this camera.</review_text>
PROS: Fantastic "straight outta the box" image quality. There is almost little or no shutter lag the second your press the shutter button. Auto focus is fast too. It wasn't so much that this was a standard point-and-shoot when I was looking for an ultra-slim camera - but most of the ultra-slim cameras I've tried sacrifice image quality to cram as much technology in such a little body - while boosting the price up. The LZ7 is a fantastic performer. The 6x optical zoom with OPTICAL image stabilization (not digital, I'm not a fan of "digital" image stabilization) is a plus. It's actually BETTER than the IS on the Canon SD700IS and SD800IS that I previously tested out (I returned both of them because paying DSLR body prices for a point-and-shoot camera is outrageous). The major plus of this camera is the image quality. Fantastic, sharp and decently saturated. It's one of the few cameras where I feel comfortable printing photos straight outta the camera. I even impressed a few colleagues of showing some 8x10s that I printed straight out of my silver LZ7 and they were shocked that I didn't take the shot with a DSLR. That's what I call great image quality!CONS: This is quite a beefy camera. In the age of ultra-slim point-and-shoot cameras that boasts the same features as the LZ7, for the price I paid for it, it's totally worth it. The use of AA batteries might be convenient to some, but it sure contributes to the weight and size of this camera. I'm still pleased regardless. The image quality and pros outweigh the cons of this camera</review_text>
This camera shoots gorgeous pics and movies.  I picked it after some pretty intensive research.  I wanted a camera that would capture ALL pics even in low light with a stabilizer that would give me steady pics even if the person holding it had shaky hands.  I also wanted it so simple that it had icons that was obvious.  (In other words, a camera for the "point & shoot" challenged.)  I wanted it to have easy to get and cheap batteries (Double A)and memory card (my 2 gig SDM cost $29) I also wanted it to download right to my pictbridge printer in the event I didn't want to power up my pc. And just to make it REALLY fun, I wanted all this for less than $250.Does it deliver?Oh yeah</review_text>
Very nice product. Completely protects the camera without hindering any operation. There is a simple velcro flap to pull down to take pictures - that's it. Very good for inclement weather picture taking and regular use as well. You do not have to remove the camera from the case even to replace digital cards or battery - just unzip bottom. This case is a little pricy, but perfect for the HP R series camera</review_text>
Lithium-ion batteries last longer than AA batteries, but you will still need this accessory for recharging.  I'd suggest buying at least one other battery to alternate.  It will take 1.5-2 hours to recharge one battery fully.  You can also buy an adapter for travel overseas.  You don't want to be stuck in paradise without enough batteries and Lithium-ion batteries are not readily available everywhere.  This recharger is less expensive than most</review_text>
Hey, whats to really say, but that it does it's job. I dig the ilink because I can hook it up to my TV and watch my Minidv tapes from my camcorder with just  this one cable! Also I can use it with my Sony DVD recorder to make dvd's from my camcorder. Just one cable...KOOL</review_text>
Bought it to connect my new Sony HD3 HDV Camcorder to my Sony KDF60XBR950.Works perfect</review_text>
I found SONY i-link most suitable for SONY HDV camcorder. I use FX1 with 1080i recorded signals, others could not match with SONY high data transfer rate</review_text>
can't go wrong with Sony. Great speed and visual. Don't think twice about buying it</review_text>
I highly recommend this item for Sony HandyCams. I used a Belkin for a while, but this tops it over and over. I can't tell you why but my video upload from my HandyCam to my computer are lightning fast now and I love it. Thanks Sony</review_text>
The product was exactly what we expected, and arrived VERY quickly.  We appreciate this seller</review_text>
Cable is working  perfectly.  What a joy to be able to transfer video to my computer.  I bought tis cable used, but it showes no sign of wear at all.  I did however expect it to be a JVC brand with a core filter.  Maybe thats what all the braided sheilding is for.  Regardless, I havn't gotten any interfearence so I'm happy</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife for Christmas 06.  She had a small Canon point and shoot that has been great.  She wanted something that had more zoom and other features so she could take her photography to another level.This is a great camera!  The controls are well placed and easy to use.  It has tons of pre-sets for various settings etc.  The pictures are very sharp.The only thing that my wife was not sure about at first is the cameras size.  She so loved the way the camera works and  the pictures it produces that she is willing to live with it's size.I think this camera is going to be a classic - gives SLRs a run for the money.</review_text>
I only problem with a lens filter is that the lens cap does not stay on as securely.  The lens cap does fit over the filter, but it doesnt stay put.</review_text>
Pros: made of metal and screws easily into the camera housing protecting the lense assembly as it powers up and while in use. Has inside threads along the outer rim to accomodate filters to totally protect the lense from damage and allow you to obtained filtered photos.Cons: the flared end of the cover partially occludes the camera's flash pattern creating small areas of shadows. Using an external flash in the camera shoe solves that issue. They could make the flared end a bit smaller to correct this problem.</review_text>
I am very impressed with this flash and the excellent way the camera controls it.  Inside it zooms to match the lens-view, which is a very impressive feature.  The exposure together with the flash is dead-on with my P880 which also lets me use the built-in flash for a little extra fill !  The recycle time is also great for a flash that only uses 2 batteries.I believe it is based on the Sunpak PZ-40X series flash that is made for non-Kodak cameras.  Compared to that and other manufactures flash pricing, the full mrsp is pretty decent and the current pricing is a great deal!While this is not marketed as a professional equipment, it will enable you to create top-notch indoor flash photos.  You may consider getting a Sto-fen Omnibounce for it that will enable you to diffuse the light a little bit for bounce situations.</review_text>
This ia a great flash and a "must have" if you're an owner of the P712-880 line of semi-pro kodak cameras. Effortless to use with a lot of illumination power, this unit will bring your flash photography to the next level</review_text>
Guide number is correct, but... It's so small ;-</review_text>
I have really enjoyed this product. It has enhanced my picture taking to the next level. I highly recommended adding this product to your camera bag. You won't regret it</review_text>
I'm using this flash with a Sto-Fen Omni-Bounce diffuser on it and it takes flawless photos. Wish it had just a bit more power, but still works well out to 20 feet or so even with the diffuser and while bouncing off the cieling, so I can't complain</review_text>
I love my Kodak Easyshare P850 camera...the only problem was that night shots or indoor pictures with low lighting were coming out with shadow or too dark.  This flash makes all my night shot photos have a prodessional quality...no more shadows, underexposure OR overexposure</review_text>
I purchased the Kodak P20 Zoom Flash to use with my Kodak P850 Camera. The money spent was worth it as I have had great results using this flash attachment; and, it is easy to use whether in the atuomatic or manual mode.</review_text>
This lens is a great value.feels well constructed, opitical quality is good(could be better but not for the price range).It's great for beginers or amatuers.Used the lens for about 1 year and had no problems with it.great range, 28mm is very wide on 35mm format cameras.great walk around lens.canon also has amazing online customer support</review_text>
As good as it claims to be. Great for golf & hunting. Easy to use and good eye relief adjustment with or without glasses.</review_text>
I think this optical instrument should be mandatory on all golf courses.  Just as iPods have obviated CDs, this device will completely obviate the need for yardages on sprinkler heads and the like.  Here's my normal round without the Bushnell Pinseeker:  I drive out in the fairway -- hopefully -- and then have to find a sprinkler head.  From there I have to pace it off to my ball.  I get a yardage, but that's to the center of the green.  At my home course I go to a pin sheet which has a crude outline of the green with four numbers on the green -- back left, back right, front left, front center.  Now, assuming we're playing the back left number, I have to do some speculative math to determine how far back left the pin is, add that to the yardage ... you get the picture.  WHAT A WASTE OF TIME!!  The Bushnell zeroes in on the flag and gives me an exact-to-the-pin yardage every time.  DO NOT get the cheaper versions as the optics are not good and it's almost impossible to lock in on the flag -- you will be terribly disappointed if you get the under $200 one.  And the one that factors in slope is not USGA legal.  I just finished a round at famous Riviera C.C.  I had a caddy.  He was calculating yardages for both me and my partner and he was amazingly accurate, but the time he wasted pacing off yardages from sprinkler heads ... and whenever someone hit it right or left in the Eucalyptuses he relied heavily on my Bushnell for the yardages.  And he was not spot-on with his distances.  This has been by far the best new thing I have put in my bag.  It's a little pricey but then no one thinks about spending $400 for that new driver that does nothing to improve their swing.  One thing the Bushnell has done is to really refine my iron distances.  I'm a single digit handicap and this beautiful little instrument has just been a fantastic addition.  I don't work for the company and I think their cheaper products are garbage.  But this little guy is a beaut</review_text>
One of the best investments that I have made.  Well worth the cost.  Adds to the enjoyment of the game.  Would reccomend to all - easy to use!  Very accurate</review_text>
This is my second rangefinder by Bushnell.  The first one was the Scout, which was an excellent product but could not get the pin beyond 200 yards.  This version gets the pin out to 400 or so, depending on conditions.  It is a little bulkier than the Scout, but you get 7x magnification and much better optics for looking at the green.  You can range any object on the course, like the lip of a bunker, the far side of a pond, a tree, etc. to know exactly how far you need to carry the ball. This flexibility makes a laser much better than any GPS, and you don't pay a subscription or have to have a participating course to use the laser, it works anywhere.A laser rangefinder will improve your game by first allowing you to learn what distance you hit every club in the bag, there is no guessing, you get instant feedback.  Second if you play strange courses often it allows you to see the hole and plan a strategy from the tee.  It is also amazing how many courses have yardage markers that are incorrect.</review_text>
I had previously bought a cheaper nikon range finder. I ended up taking it back and getting the pinseeker 1500 (non slope). It picks up the pin(doesn't need the flag) perfectly.. When rangefinders pick up the pin and some background clutter they always show you the farthest distance. this is because they are optimized for hunting (picking up a deer through the brush). the pinseeker always shows the closer object (optimized for golf). It's the best range finder I have used and all who see it agree. buy it.</review_text>
The Bushnell Pinseeker 1500 Rangefinder (non-slope model) is easy to use and constructed for the elements.  After using the Pinseeker for a few rounds I quickly learned how to focus and acquire the desired target in a matter of seconds.  As I walk up to my ball I pull out the rangefinder, acquire the target, put it back in the case and hit the shot without adding more then 10 seconds to my preshot routine.  This rangefinder is most definately a game improvement device and has helped me to select the right club, and in many cases made me aware that I needed to change clubs.In my opinion it is better then the GPS devices whereas you must have a course loaded or manually enter the course info beforehand.  If you ride in a golf car with GPS and are subject to cart path only, then the point where your ball lies will only be an estimate of the actual yardage.  The Pinseeker can go to any course in the world and be used immediately on any part of the course.If you are looking for a device that will help with club selection and game imporvement, then I would highly recommend the Pinseeker 1500.</review_text>
This thing works exactly as advertised.  I use it for golf, and it does a very good job of separating the flag from other background objects, even when wind or my over-caffeinated hands make it hard to get the target centered on the flag.  Even works when there is no wind and the flag is hanging straight down.  This is well worth the cost adder over cheaper ones that don't work nearly as well</review_text>
Yes, it is a great buy, only depending who you are.This camera is perfect for someone who doesn't want to do anything, just take the picture. It has many settings for many different situations: from indoor parties to hikes with cluody skies.The only bad thing I found is the weight. It's very compact, but you feel you have it in your pocket (the leica lenses inside are quite heavy). That happens because you have an amazing 10X zoom.Picture quality is beautiful. Colors in pictures are almost better than real (kinda scary...). Very fast processor, good battery life. Screen is very big.Great buy</review_text>
There isn't much more to say here. This is a superb little camera, definately worth a 10 on Cnet, not the 7.0 that their review gave it! They completely got it wrong with their rating because this camera definitely deserves at least an 8.0! On here, it also gets my 5 stars!As far as the Pros go on this camera (28mm Wide Angle, 10x Optical Zoom, 3'' LCD, IS, Built-in Lens Cover), it's exactly as good as it sounds! Real life needs for real life situations for real people that loves superb photos and having the right camera to capture those moments.On the Cons side (No manual controls, No zoom in Video Mode, Average Battery Life), those are practically the only things a more ADVANCED user would care about. Manual controls are mostly for expert photographers as white balance and exposure settings are already in this camera, so I don't know what else you need. Zooming in video mode isn't important to me since I don't particularly take much video footage. And I only say average battery life because I tend to look through the photos I already shot pretty often without using the power save on the LCD, therefore, that's particularly what drains the battery. However, you usually get @ 250-270 shots per charge, without frequent previewing.Panasonic has basically taken the original TZ1 and made it even better. There's not much missing from this camera. As I've said, 28mm Wide Angle LEICA Lens, 10X Optical Zoom, 3" High Resolution Screen, Excellent Image Stabilization, etc. All this in a fairly compact camera. Panasonic has also improved the "noise" on higher ISO's. Low light performance is much better than on previous Panasonic models. The most important this is, the camera takes fantastic pictures.Another thing I'm extremely impressed with  is the construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. I love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously can't believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen without even printing them with the high resolution output. Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness and want that "Canon-like look," you could always use the camera on "Vivid Mode."It's also not much bigger or heavier than your overpriced Sony's. Plus, on here, I found it for three hundred, with a high speed 1GB Panasonic card included. What's better than that?! The only accessory I have to buy now is just the DMW-CT3-K, the leather case specifically for this camera.You really can't find the perfect digital camera, but this comes as close as you can get. Overall, I am extremely pleased. If you are looking for a great zoom camera in a small  enough form factor, you should seriously consider the DMC-TZ3. This is the best compact camera I've ever owned</review_text>
I really like this camera. It has 10x optical, image stabilization, a 3.0inch lcd with 230,000 pixels, and more. The size is great for a 10x zoom camera. Image stabilization and is great for getting shots that would come out blurry with my Canon Powershot A620. My other favorite feature besides the zoom and image stabilization, is the wide angle. It is great to finally get cityscapes and have the whole skyline in one shot!! And with the camera set to 16X9, I can get a 24mm shot!What I don't like about this camera is it's short battery life. Even with the1300mAh battery I bought, I get less shots than with my Canon. And the colors of the photos from this camera are a lot less colorful than on the Canon. That is something I will have to get used to. I was very disappointed to find out that this camera has no zoom in movie mode, unlike its predecessor, the TZ1. Luckily, that did not stop me from buying this camera. Overall, this camera is a great buy, especially if you want i.s. wide angle, and long zoom</review_text>
I have to get on the bandwagon here.  This is a superb little camera, definately five stars!  I also have the TZ1, which showed promise, but has  limitations. In my review of the TZ1, I noted it had lots of "noise" and pictures shouldn't be printed much beyond 4x6 inches if they were to be sharp.  I also wanted more manual controls.The TZ3 fixes and improves almost everything about the TZ1 and adds some new, very useful features.  The noise has been drastically reduced, the lens is better, the sensor is bigger, and the processor is not only faster, but produces better pictures.  The TZ3 adds a very handy "function" button - or I should say function capability - the number of buttons is the same - which gives immediate access to five or so "most used" settings without having to go into the menues - of which there are several.The TZ3 keeps the Mega Optical Image Stabilization and adds Intelligent ISO, increases the sensitivity without adding noise,(I have not tried the 3200 setting yet.), increases the size of the viewing screen, etc., etc.The TZ3 is a "well-rounded," and very capable camera.  There is simply no comparison between the TZ1 and the TZ3 as far as the quality of the pictures.  The TZ3 wins hands down.  In my opinion it also beats some big name, higher priced digicams - a couple of which I own - rather handily.Of course, the big selling point for the TZ3 is still the 10X lens - now with wide angle capability - on a pocket-sized point and shoot camera.  This lens is SHARP, and combined with larger sensor and the new processor yields some excellent results.While there are no manual controls, per se, the camera seems to do very well without them.  Pictures are sharp, exposures seem nicely done (haven't tried it at night yet, but low light forrest shots were excellent), colors were accurate, appropriately saturated, and vivid (OK.  I like the vivid setting.), good contrast, etc.  There are a variety of AF settings, settable focal points, and focus modes.  There is also exposure compensation, and exposure bracketing available - and they work well!  The live histogram is a welcome bonus.  The TZ3 focuses down to about 2 inches in macro mode - again with excellent, sharp results.  The TZ3 is very well speced out.One nice thing that is gone is the lens cap on the TZ1.  It was  really not to inconvenient, but seemed always to be swinging in the wind to add yet another source of camera shake.  The TZ3 lens includes an built in lens cover.  Very welcome.I currently own five top flight digicams (including this one), and have owned about that many others, I am most impressed with this one - for combined convenience and results.  It is a quantum step forward.I also have a couple of quite nice, and fairly complete DSLR kits.  They are wonderful, and in a class by themselves, but when I want very nice pictures and the convenience of a pocketable point and shoot with a 10X, wide angle lens, or a back up for the DSLRs, the TZ3 is now my camera of choice.</review_text>
Extremely impressed with the TZ3. This gem should get 5 stars on construction and finish alone. Just holding it in your hands it screams quality and feels like a tank. Love it. It seriously feels like a $700 camera. No exaggeration. I was a little worried about it not being able to fit in my jean pockets before buying it. Women may have issues with really tight jeans but for us guys no problem. It fits fine. I seriously cant believe I can carry around a camera with a 10x zoom inside my jean pockets. Truly remarkable. The 3" screen is amazing. You can practically enjoy your pics right on screen w/o even printing them with the High Res output. Navigation is so easy on this camera. Something not surprising though if your already coming from another panny (FZ7 here). Picture quality is great. I tested it out today on standard and I would say its just as good as my FZ7 in daylight and better in lowlight (indoors). Image quality is great, and if you need extra sharpness you could always use the camera on "Vivid mode" or add a little with some post processing. The pics in Standard and natural mode PP very well. The wide angle is something new to me. Took some neat shots that looked very nice with the extra viewing angle. Very distinctive and after having this i'm not sure if I could go back.If your looking for a do it all camera this may very well be your tool of choice. Combine it's extreme versatility coupled with excellent image quality, superb lens, build, and finish you have yourself a winner.</review_text>
I went to Ritz Camera today and took a good look at the TZ3. I'll tell you, its pretty nice. The build quality is really  good, as a previous person mentioned. The body is metal. The dials and buttons click with precision, and have a nice resistance. It has a nice weight to it.I took some nice shots in the store. I must have clicked off 100 pics. I'm impressed with it. If you want something relatively small, powerful and tough, this camera is for you. The 10x zoom is great, but on such  a small camera it is difficult to hold it steady enough(at least for me) to use the zoom too much.I love the build quality and style, so I may be biased. It's a nice piece of equipment. I cannot speak to the photo quality only having seen pics on the camera's LCD</review_text>
I came off a Canon PowerShot S40, a little 4-megapixel brick of a camera that gave me 4 years of excellent results. That was my first digital camera after a closet-full of film Nikons.Many buffs claim that 4 megapixels is all you need, and I made a number of nice looking A3 prints. Now that I have 7 megapixels to work with, I see that I was wrong: Four is not enough. Seven is wonderful.[...]points out strongly that above ISO 200 noise is a real problem--but you always wonder just how picky they are. Well not too picky in this case. Using a higher than 200 setting (i.e., most indoor flash shots) resulted in a lot of noise, making the camera almost unusable except for the simplest 4 X 6 snapshots.But I take almost entirely outdoor shots--scenics and candids. I set the ISO at 100 and get gorgeous results. It has taken some getting used to the different color rendition of the TZ3 from my Canon. The Canon seems more balanced while the TZ3 caused reddish orange to really pop out. There is something cool (color temperature-wise, not "fashionable") about the color that is not entirely fixed in PhotoShop. Sometimes the results are marvelous, especially shots of cloudy or rainy days. Other times they are not so great--to desaturated for my taste.  So I have been playing around with the various settings--"Natural" and "Vivid." "Vivid" is closer to what I want right out of the camera, but is less easy to spruce up. "Natural" is easier to modify, so that is the setting I am using now. I also set the exposure compensation to one stop under.I was pleasantly surprised at how small the TZ3 is: it slips easily into pants pocket (but not shirt pocket). The zoom lens starting at a decent wide-angle (28mm) is utterly fantastic and really makes the camera stand out head & shoulders from the pack.Thus, I am delighted with the choice. However, to answer my question "What more could I want?", here it is:1. The selection disk ALWAYS moves when I pocket the camera, so I ALWAYS have to check, when I pull it out, to reset it to the desired setting. Its detents need to be strengthened.2. The back-side controls are too easy to activate accidentally when shooting one-handed with the fleshy part of the thumb. A headache because you then need to press "select" to get back in operation.3. DPreview is right when they moan about the Venus III sensor. It's good but, for an otherwise sensational camera like this one, not good enough</review_text>
I just received the DMC-TZ3A.  I love this camera.  This is my first camera ever.  I love the features, build quality, and menu system.  I am still getting used to learning how to take quality pictures.  For example, I have trouble getting it to focus at times.  I am certain this is just the learning curve for me.  One feature I am disappointed that it lacks is - auto retraction of the lens when in playback mode.  Most other cameras automatically retract the lens to protect it when viewing pictures from the camera.  This one does not do this and you have to turn the camera off to get it to retract.  I really wish they would update the firmware to support this important safety feature.  All-in-all I definitely recommend this camera</review_text>
I was torn between Sony and Panasonic (the Canons seemed to have many recurring complaints especially with the decks), and after reading several reviews became gradually partial to the Panasonic, before ever having used one, based on customer loyalty and consistently glowing testimonials.Well I've never used the comparable Sony's, JVC's, or the Canon XL2 (some limited experience with the GL2), but as best I can tell without personal comparison this camera does in fact deserve all the great reviews.The image quality is excellent and in many cases looks about as good as broadcast TV video (nonHD), and the camera allows a tremendous amount of image control--manual focus ring, aperture (iris), gain adjustment, shutter speed, zebra control for overexposure, white AND black balance adjusting, daylight filters, etc.  The electronic viewfinder can even be focused via simple diopter. There are six preprogrammed, but customizable, settings for image control so the user can simply dial in whatever setting they need based on the shooting/lighting conditions. So, for example, you shoot occasionally under weak flourescents lights--you adjust the white balance and the gain and the detail level accordingly, save it as a particular "scene file"; whenever you return to that same location or a similar shooting environment, you can click over to the saved settings in an instant and start recording. The first four are factory set for video 60 frames;  the last two are 24 fps for a more film-like quality, which this camera handles beautifully.What actually sold me on the camera, in terms of hardware, were the two XLR jacks--comparably priced models didn't seem to offer this.  The XLR jacks allow the user to attach professional shotgun mics and bypass the mediocre factory one, taking fuller advantage of 16bit 48khz stereo recording.  I use a fairly inexpensive AZDEN mic and the improvement in sound quality is tremendous. If you were willing to invest in finer mics the audio quality would  be better still. Having two XLR inputs means that in addition to recording live audio (like a mic) you can also mix in input from another pre-recorded source--all in the camera!The lens by Leica is also impressive--it is a bit wide and is not interchangeable (although I believe there is an adaptive telephoto for $$$).  I prefer shooting wide but if you have need a wide selection of lenses or don't enjoy the look of wide angle look to Canon.The drawbacks are minor--the camera is rather cumbersome--and would certainly be tiresome for handheld use as it isn't designed for shoulder-mounted use.  I shoot almost exclusively indoors with a tripod and so neither of these issues are relevant for me.  Also irrelevant for me are reviews I've read which have indicated lackluster battery performance--again shooting indoors I always have it plugged in and thus haven't noticed any battery problems.  The little menu joystick control button used to toggle the menu screens, as well as the VCR playback options, can be frustrating when you're tired, but that is an extremely trivial concern really.This camera is expensive, even in the $1500+ prosumer class it tends more to professional range, but I feel it is a great value considering what a fine piece of equipment it is and the wealth of features it offers.  It is much much more than enough camera for the consumer and probably a little more than I need actually--I've used mine for a few months and I'm still learning how to wring better and better shooting from it.  Once you've used it for a while it becomes clear why this particular model maintains a devoted following.  If I have to replace this camera--provided I can afford to--the next camera would definitely be a Panasonic and probably be its big HD brother the HVX</review_text>
The DVX 100b is cheaper than the XL2 but you get more features. Aside from the compact and built in XLR ports,  you get an optional flip out view finder which the XL2 doesn't offer. If you are looking for a non HD camera i would suggest going with a camera that has an optional 24p because you'll be getting your money's worth and it is a awesome feature to have..</review_text>
Lit and shot properly, the footage from this camera in 24P mode can come very close to 16mm film. This is a fantastic camera for the price, and this new B model has worked out a lot of the kinks from the earlier models. For those of you looking at the XL2, it's true this camera does not have an interchangeable lens (although wide-angle and telephoto adapters are available) but the camera feels more compact and robust, with more features (like XLR) built right into the camera body vs. external attachments.</review_text>
The Canon XL2 has been showing up in alot of complaining reviews, complaints realted to it's less than perfect imagery. From what Ive seen, the fact that the DVX100B is hard as heck to find says alot about which one is better. I find it very odd that a great number of these cameras are being sold by numerous retailers in Brooklyn who go by names like express, photosweep, Camera City....seems like one dealer is using  multiple names and varied prices. If you need a DVX100B, its best to buy from an established dealer. BUT no one can beat the 24p quality of this camerta. Better deal than the new HD cameras which don't even have the 24p adjustment</review_text>
From the description, it is "Well balanced and highly portable: 4.4 pounds in full operating condition", not 10 pounds, which is the *shipping* weight.Just wanted to say that. It's lighter than the XL</review_text>
I bought this for my mom and grandma and it's really simple if you're using a secure digital card!  Just plug in and turn on and it plays.  Everyone complains about the display, but it's like any other LCD display: it's not perfect but it's not less than I expected.  It's easy (once my grandma found the on/off switch) and a nice piece to have around at family gatherings...THE ONLY ISSUE: A LACK OF INSTRUCTIONS INCLUDED.  They were very vague and makes you not even want to explore other things it may have on it</review_text>
We bought this as a Christmas gift for my grandmother who lives in a nursing home.  She loves it!  With space so limited, the ability to hold an endless slideshow of pictures in a small space is a huge bonus.  It was easy to load even for my techically challenged mother, and now they are downloading pictures from extended family from Atlanta to Tampa to Texas.  My Grandmother can see the screen clearly and hold it in her lap, and the ability to view a slideshow without turning the pages of an album is a plus for her limited mobility.  This gift worked exactly as described, expected, with no difficulties, and filled a need like nothing else.  I can think of a hundred people I would give this to when the price comes down, including myself</review_text>
Bought two; both worked perfectly out of the box, no problems.  Easy to load pictures, not very technical.  Was exactly what we wanted for family members.  Ideal for relatives, baby pictures, etc.  Only problem is pictures do not necessarily show full screen, depending on your original jpeg.  Would buy a few more any day</review_text>
This camera is very small, sleek and light. It takes great pictures with a lot of features. Only has 3x zoom but can zoom much farther once picture has been taken. I have used Olympus in the past and have never had a problem with their products. :</review_text>
Very speedy delivery. A gift for my daughter. She loves it. I thought we were to receive a free photo card but did not. Not really necessary. Did not know that. Still playing with it and having a blast. I do like that it is weather resistant</review_text>
The camera works great, especially with the under water case for it.  I love the item, and it fits very nicely in a pocket for going out and having a camera to get pictures with too</review_text>
This little beauty really does do everything that it claims. There are so many shooting formats that you are spoilt for choice. The only problem i have is that there are so many formats that it will take me a lot of practice to be able to pull a fast point & shoot in anything other than normal light. I tend to do better with less choices but many people will undoubtedly love it. However, the internal guide is very helpful -- it will choose the format you need if you have a few moments to consult it.Its size is perfect and the body feels good in your hand. Huge viewscreen for the size.With a 1 gig card and extra battery, i'm set for travel</review_text>
This camera is very nice. I actually bought it for my g/f and she loves it. When it first arrrived I got to mess w/ it a bit before giving it up to her. I really enjoyed the different settings to take the picutres. Its great cause usually you get those shots that are way too bright because of the flash or too dark because of no flash. This camera takes care of both problems  easy. I even enjoyed the software it came w/. The only problem I had was when you upload the pictures to the computer be sure you push the "safely remove hardware" button or you will end up getting the camera to say there is more pictures  on the camera than there are. This was easy to solve though. Theres a way you can clear the camera memory but Im not sure I remember how. So that problem was more user error than product problems. Great camera and a great price. It might not be the same prices since I got it from the electronics expo so it was knocked down in price but it has to be worth the original price.So theres my review. Not in depth but to the point. Good enough</review_text>
I had an Olympus Stylus 4MP and loved it but wanted a newer model.  I purchased this 710 and love it.  Olympus makes it so easy to take pictures with pre-set options and image stabilization.  I love the smaller size of this camera and it was easy to use.  There is no way to give it 4 1/2 stars so I gave it 5 but there is one thing I don't like about the area for the USB plug in. You have to pop off this cap (it hangs off the camera) and maneuver the small end of the cable in the camera (tight fit with the cap hanging there) then pop the cap back on..it just seems flimsy and I wonder if that cap will eventually break off.  In the 410 it was much easier to access this as it was near the memory card.  That is the only design feature I don't care for on the 710.  It is a great camera and I am very happy with the purchase.</review_text>
I've bought this camera about a year ago and I am very happy with it. The batery charges fast and lasts long, the movies are good in quality (clear, not blured, the colors come out exactly the same) and the camera is light enough. The only problem I've had so far is that you cannot record in the dark - the movie comes out darker than it seemed and you can hardly see anything. Otherwise I am more than happy with the camera</review_text>
It does not have any USB connectivity. There is no way to hook this up to your computer except through the TV type of hookups. Other than that it works great.You need a software to convert the DVD to something els to be able to edit it on your computer though (to edit movie and make copies)I like that it write direct to DVD so if you don't want to edit it, there is no need to bother with the computer.Be aware it only works with certain types of DVD's. Won't work with DVD-RW. Has to be DVD-r and only a certain typre of RAM disk</review_text>
Purchased this Tuesday from another store since I needed it before it could be delivered.  I completely agree with the previous reviewer on the ease of use of this camcorder.  The battery charged in less than an hour and I was ready to go, except I failed to notice they did not include a DVD-R disc. :(  So, I had to wait but was not disappointed.  I was able to format the disc while using the battery, not the A/C adapter like the previous user, and it took all of 5 seconds.  I can't wait to use the camcorder for my daughter's soccer tournament starting Saturday. Go Mustang Fury 96!!</review_text>
I just bought this camcorder and am not a good reader of manuals.  I had it recording in a matter of minutes.  You do have to format the mini dvds, but that is easy to find in the manual.  The quality of the recording looked great on my computer screen.  I bought office depot mini dvds and they worked fine, for the great price.  This Panasonic is great and recording straight to mini dvds is a wonderful idea.  I would have given it a 5 star rating, but the finalizing of the mini dvd took a while and you have to plug it in, you can't do this using the battery.  Also I was warned, that if you use the dvd-ram instead of the dvd-r, they will not work on all players and they prefer to work on Panasonic equipment.  This is why I opted for the non re-writable mini dvd-r from office depot.  I also bought the PNY SD card from them and the card reader, all very affordable and easy to use</review_text>
Long story short, I have 12 years of experence in the personal security training and consulting business. I install two or three of these units outside every one of my urban customers homes. Commonly my customers have problems in their neihborhoods with home break-ins, agressive vagrants, threats to their dogs or Restraining Orders. I watch the deterent effect these fake cameras have on these types of people via REAL video capture cameras nearby all the time. They often cross the street or sheild there face as they pass by the fake cameras. My customers advise me on a regular basis that they see the deterent effect all the time. Just spoke to a single female customer tonight who advises that her agressive vagrant problem she had been having on her back street for two years has been solved with my install of one of these on her back garage. She has me installing two more of these and an SVAT ISC200 next week. You decrease the chance of your home being invaded SIGNIFICANTLY by installing these. Best security deterent item you could add to your home for the price, period! You can increase the effectiveness by printing out a small little sign in red and black ink and placing it under the camera, warning that they are being recorded. I usely use "Smile! You are being monitored and recorded from a remote location!". If you plan on placing a real camera somewhere that has public access, put one of these up first for 30 days to insure it will not be damaged. Also use these as "damage bait cameras" near real ones to reduce the chance of getting the real one damaged. Check you fake cameras once a week to insure no one has damaged it. You should also add a few "Beware of Dog" & "No Solicitors" signs from HomeDept/Lowes on your gates and near your front door (regardless if you have a dog or not.). might not be pretty, but combined with the fake cameras, creates a significant deterance factor against all bad people. Plan to change the batteries every 2-3 months. Difficult to get the thing to screw back on once mounted, difficult to get the innner "camera" to re-align when it pops out, I've recieved a few that were DOA (thus, 4 out of 5 star rating). Hope this helps! (sorry about the spelling errors!</review_text>
I use this set with my Celestron 4SE and a Meade ETX-90 with no problems.  The optics seem to be of pretty good quality and the EP construction is good. Just having the kit gave me an instant increase in versatility.  It provides a beginner to intermediate astronomer a number of combinations of eyepieces and filters to experiment with.  That and some good publications go a long way toward learning the sky.  The case is compact and very handy. It also has room for a few extra items.  Well worth what I paid for it and then some</review_text>
As luck would have it I have only got to use the set once. But wow great eye peices. If you're just getting in to star gazing great way to star</review_text>
I'm not going to imply that these are the best eyepieces available but they are good eyepieces and they are incredibly affordable. They are essentially Celestron's "Omni" series Plossl eyepieces, which are their least expensive series and retail for $30 - $40 each. Just the eyepieces alone are worth the $100. The barlow lens is a quality piece but is fairly redundant with these eyepieces unless you have a very short focal ratio telescope. The color filters are a good all around set but they would only be useful for 8" and larger telescopes and then only for planetary viewing. I don't care for the moon filter. It is better than nothing, but I prefer using polarizing filter for the moon.So buy it for the case and the eyepieces and if you get any use out of the rest that is just frosting on the cake</review_text>
After reading every review I could lay by hands on, I finally took the plunged and ordered this from  Amazon.  All I can say is, the reviews are not kidding, an amazing deal.  The quality of the eyepieces surprised me at this price, I especially like the 32mm eyepiece, great field of view!.  The case is solid, and with extra room for more bits as I get them.  I haven't tried the filters yet, but even if they do half what they promise, with everything else in the box I am very happy</review_text>
We've used Lenmar rechargeables in other digicams with great results, so it was a no-brainer to pick up this CRV3 compatible battery for a new Olympus camera. The 1350 mAh battery comes with the charging base and two electric adapters (wall outlet and car's cigarette lighter which is not shown in the picture).A nice plus by choosing this lithium battery is that is weighs less than a pair of NiMh AA batteries yet it runs cooler so the camera doesn't get too warm. The battery charges in a few hours and lasts quite a while between charges. We were able to shoot several hundred shots over multiple sessions without fully draining the battery.The only quibble we have with this charger is related to directions found in the one page instruction sheet:"Once the battery is fully charged, promptly remove the battery from the charger. Note: Do not leave the battery in the charger for prolonged periods after the battery is fully recharged."This battery can't be left charging overnight; it must be monitored and manually removed when the cycle is complete. Why couldn't Lenmar put auto-shutoff circuitry in the charger when the light turns green just like in their other chargers</review_text>
I ordered the Battery and Charger on Friday night and had it by Monday or Tuesday. Charged in little time. Have recorded video several times along with several pic's. Still haven't had to recharge yet</review_text>
I was very disappointed when the AA batteries my digital camera came with died within a couple days.  I've been using this for a year and a half now, and since I switched, I've never gotten so much as a low battery warning, even when I've taken a couple hundred pics between charges</review_text>
This worked as advertised and the initial charge did not take more than a couple of hours. I have not used the car adapter yet</review_text>
I am forever leaving my camera on after I download my pictures.  The $20 in batteries was kiling me!  This charger and the rechargable batteries have already more than paid for themselves</review_text>
The Olympus 740 is a GREAT camera.  It is easy to use in the auto mode and also gives the opportunity to set the camera for specific shots if one chooses. The only drawback is it is very difficult to see the screen in bright sunlight.  I am enjoying the 740 and have had wonderful results</review_text>
it a nice camera and easy to carry it will fit in your pocket i am satisfie</review_text>
This camera is easy to use and has a great zoom. Cheap considering all the functions it has.A great product</review_text>
This small camera is BIG in features.  WIth 7 megapix the detail of the photos are awesome and very clear.  The zoom feature is great but the best features are the compact size (can fit in a shirt pocket) and the ease of the control buttons. After dealing with lots of other digital cameras that had difficult to use control features such as deleting a photo or organizing your photos, this camera has proven to be the EASIEST camera I have ever had to operate.  Even a child can figure this one out.  I LOVE IT</review_text>
I have had several pocket digital cameras but this is excellent. Easy to use and I wanted a longer zoom, and this has a true 5x optical zoom. The pictures came out very good and the battery life is very good. My only complaint is that the screen is very hard to see in bright sunlight, but I think all cameras in this range without a viewfinder have the same problem.Also, the price was great.I would recommend this camera and I like the blue color- it is different from the rest</review_text>
I bought this for my Daughter, who is 22.  She LOVES all the great features and clear pictures which it produces.  She specifically enjoys the range of editing capabilities built into the camera</review_text>
We took the case to the Barrier Reef for 6 snorkeling trips.  The camera worked wonderfully.  There was no leakage, fog during all 6 uses.  The only thing is that since it was bright outside, there was a lot of glare and made it hard to see the LCD screen, but that is more of a camera issue than the case.I would recommend this product over any disposable underwater camera.  Worth every penny</review_text>
This case worked very well, without adding a lot of weight or bulk to the camera. I took it snorkeling (watertight to 12 feet), white water rafting and snow skiing, and it has worked well. All controls are accessible, it doesn't fog up if you follow acclimatization tips and it keeps a valuable camera dry. The only thing to watch is that you keep the wrist strap out of the way when putting the camera into the case, so that you don't crimp the seals</review_text>
We bought this for a "swimming with the dolphins" excursion on our honeymoon cruise and it worked perfectly! It was easy to set up, easy to use, and easy to clean. I only wish we had more opportunity use it, but the pictures we did get were great</review_text>
Works great , no fogging up , I put the camara in the fridge before I use it, or if you come from an airconditioned environement no problems. If you get grease on the lens wash it with liquid soap , else you will have water drops that dont rinse and they will blur the photo.My kids took hundereds of fotos of fishes .. never had one before. Now that you can film as well I needed to upgrade to 1GB chip from my 512MB . Can do all the programing functions without openening the case.</review_text>
I recently bought this case for my Canon SD-300. I was a little nervous when i saw that the max depth was 10ft but it's the only case for this camera so I thought I would give it a shot. I took it on a Caribbean cruise with me and let me just say WOW. Within 5 minutes I had applied a thin layer of grease to the waterproof ring, slipped in the camera, closed it up and jumped in the water. The underwater pictures came out amazing. I even went scuba diving down to 65ft with no problem, besides being a little nervous. The underwater movies also came out amazing. Sometimes so clear it's hard to tell I was in the water. The day we hiked up to the waterfall, everyone was jealous to see me taking pictures under the mist. I have around 100 incredible pictures from this trip that I never could have gotten without this case</review_text>
i've had this product for about a month and have used it to go kayaking, whitewater rafting, and snorkling. It keeps water out of the camera chamber nicely, but after rafting, i noticed a small amount of water had entered the top part where the buttons are. It didn't affect the operation of the camera, and no water or condensation was found in the main chamber. I left it open for a few days and it dried out. I did not have this problem while snorkling, which suggests that it may have been due to the pressure of having the camera wedged between the lifejacket and my chest...probably not a good idea for the camera, but i didn't want to lose it!Other items of note -- the neck strap that it comes with is good and adjustable- it's quite small, but roomy enough inside for a small anti-moisture packet- Operating it is just as easy as without the case, with the exception of the optical viewfinder, which cannot be used- case comes with a clip-on diffuser for the flash, which works nicely as the plastic case distorts the light without it- the steel pin that forms the hinge of the case is already rusted...could be due to the salt water, though i was careful to rinse it in freshwater after each use; again though, won't affect the operation of the camera, nor the integrity of the waterproof sealA possible improvement for Canon to consider would be the option of adding a clip-on lens cap to protect the surface from scratche</review_text>
This case does everything it is advertized to do.  I know ya can't scuba with it, but I'm not a diver so it doesn't bother me. I live in Hawaii, home to the wettest place on Earth, and I use this thing almost daily.  It is very nice to not have to worry about your camera.  It effectively keeps out the rain, the ocean, the sand (that's a really important one) and everything else.  Its fun to watch all the stupid tourists trying to run down the beach, snap their pics, and then run away before they get wet, or wading into a waterfall knee deep to snap some pics.  With this case, you can just jump right in and not worry.  Trust me, taking pics of those funny tourists from the water is a fun hobby of mine.UPDATE -- 5/31/06My O-ring has been a bit "loose" for some time.  I can still get it to close watertight as long as I pay a lot of attention when I am shutting the case to make sure the seal doesn't get pinched.  Canon does offer a replacement through Canon Parts, but it's 16 bucks with $7 for shipping.  I bought one with the intent of examining it and figuring out how to make a bunch of new ones for much cheaper.  After all, it's just a piece of rubber -- can't be that hard.  I will repost with information if I am successful</review_text>
I got one of these for my StarBlast 4.5EQ and I was amazed--the Cassini division and cloud bands on Saturn were opened to my view.    Highly recommended for getting that last bit of "oomph" from a small telescope</review_text>
This is not a case with frills.  The camera fits snugly inside but there's no room for anything else such as the battery charger or even the case for the memory card.  It feels flimsier than I expected but so far I have had no problems with workmanship, so that attribute may just be my interpretation.</review_text>
Panasonic seems to have altered the design somewhat.  The case I got looked a little different from the image on this page.  The badge says "Panasonic", not "Lumix." Not a big deal.  If you want to attach this case to your belt or to your backpack, though, you're going to have to find or buy a mini-carabiner, because contrary to what some product photos suggest, this case does not come with one.  See "customer images" for what my case looks like</review_text>
This case works well for the camera, but the elastic straps releasing the flash is a significant design error. Placing the camera in with lens facing the back of the case works much better. The belt loop only measures 1.25 inches effectively, so it will not work with all belts. All in all, the case will protect the camera, which is why I bought it</review_text>
This case is nice, but I think the expanding sides are unnecessary. The camera will easily slide in and out with out unzipping the sides, except that the elastic strap will usually pop up the flash when you put the camera in, and then the same strap won't let go of the flash when you pull it out...unless you unzip all the zippers and pull it apart. This is still the best case for this camera though, as long as you don't want to carry extra batteries, sd cards, etc.</review_text>
Fits fine, but its a little hard to get it fast, it goes well with the design.</review_text>
It was a chore to find a case that fit the LX2 as there is a protruding lens and the fit was either too tight or totally unusable. This case is perfect as it appears to be made just for the LX1 or LX2</review_text>
Ideal case for the Panasonic PS-SLX2. Easy to open / close, sturdy and nice design. Highly recommended</review_text>
I had to replace the lost one and this canon battery charger is perfect one for my camera power shot pro 1. Good product, high price</review_text>
My product arrived on the time I expected and the product was untouched.I would recommend this service</review_text>
Excellent charger, no problems ever, and has 4 different lightings to let me know how far charged it is. Fast charging, and the prongs fold up for easy transporting. Also very light and compact</review_text>
This foldout-prong charger came with my Canon camera and functions perfectly. However, for travel I prefer the Canon CB-5L which is the same except for a long cord rather than the prongs. Why? Because the plugged-in CG-580 is too easy to forget when you check out of a hotel room. (I forgot a similar item once.) Yes, the CB-5L cord is bulkier, but I never carry a battery charger in my camera bag anyway. And having a cord means I have to perform gymnastics only once during a stay in inexpensive European hotels where the electrical outlets can be oddly placed.  Also, foreign outlets are sometimes deeply recessed, and even with a plug adapter, appliances that plug in flush to the wall may not connect all the way unless you stack adapters. Both units are dual voltage, so that's not a problem. Listen to the voice of experience. .</review_text>
This charger is great, and well worth the extra 20 or 30 bucks it costs over a knockoff.1.  it is small, it plugs right into the wall, and the plug prongs fold in.2.  there is no brick on the end of a cord to truck all over.  no cord at all actually.3.  you know it is quality, and wont damage the expensive batteries.you spend 40 or 50 bucks on a battery, then go to ebay to find the cheapest POS charger you can find.  they dont charge as well, as quickly, and with some batteries, they just dont charge at all.  This charger charges all batteries I have to a much better charge, and is 1/4 the size.  This one is small enough to go right into my camera bag.  love it</review_text>
This charger is great.  No cord to trip over or store.  Batterys charge quickly and charger fits in your pocket or camera case pocket with no cord to become tangled with other accessories.  Great, great product</review_text>
I was looking forward to using this highly rated camera for taking video of our new son. Unfortunately, the camera tape mechanism went out after the first 4 months and I had to send the camera to Illinois to be repaired, and also to get the tape out of the camera. The camera was out for 6 weeks. The refurbished camera lasted approx. 6 more months, sent it back again and this time it cost me $168 to have it refurbished. Now after a couple of months the camera is showing a white LCD screen and will not function at all.Time to give up on Panasonic. Their customer service is non-existant and getting the camera repaired again seems like a waste of time</review_text>
I love my new camera!!!  This is my first video camera and there is definitely no buyers remorse here.  It is soooo user friendly!I researched many cameras and found this one to be most suitable for my needs.  My company was subcontracted to work with another production company and my camera (PV-GS250) was used as a secondary camera for b-roll and it was fabulous.  The footage was almost seamless between the two cameras when it was being edited.  I'm very happy with my purchase and look forward to using it more and more</review_text>
This is a great camcorder. The picture is excellent. It has well thought out features. I like the fact that you can also take high resolution still pictures. It is very small and compact. The only thing that could be better is the flash for the still pictures. I often get the glare from the flash in the picture</review_text>
Great product.  Easy to use.  Downloads a breeze with my iMac G5.  Low light conditions need a supplementary light source.  Great family unit</review_text>
This is a gem of a camera. The low light isn't as bad as many say or there must be other cameras out there that do a super job of low light recording. I've recorded a few videos at dusk and overcast days at F11 or above and I did not have any problems. The only problem that I've had is with the zoom (if you call it a problem), it's hard to record and slowly zoom in/out. The zoom usually takes off on you.Get one while you can- they are dissapearing fast. The new non HD cameras will have less features than this one to lower the MSRP because the HD cameras will list for $1000.Jef</review_text>
Bought this camcorder(my 1st) after reading most of the reviews on the net.  Quality is great with video other than at low light rating but most of the the consumer camcorder had the same problem anyway), didn't expect to take still with camcorder so didn't care about the 3.1mp.  Very easy to use and feels good in my hand.  I gave a 4 because I know soon there will be better camcorder in the market at this price range</review_text>
Make sure you use the sun filter when shooting outside.  I killed my wonderful camera one sunny day when I forgot the sun filter and accidently took a picture of the sky.  Now my awesome wonderful camera is dead.  And we are so sad.</review_text>
Easy to get up and running, the unit goes into slideshow mode after power on automatically.  Picture quality was excellent. Easy to put pictures on a memory card and have them show up.  Recommend re-cropping your pictures to 16x9 aspect ratio so you get a full picture.  Unit can accomodate std. 4x6 format as well, but will not fill the screen.  Small Quirks are:- When in slideshow mode, you can't hit the pause button to ZOOM in.- Very poorly designed stand that WILL collapse after a couple of weeks.- Documentation is lacking (typical COBY style)- No support for QuickTime video popular in some digital cameras- Unit has a faint lingering glow on screen after power down which doesn't go away unless you unplug the unit</review_text>
I bought this frame to display pictures of my newborn daughter on my desk at work.  I didn't really have high expectations for it, because it was so inexpensive.  As soon as it was turned on I had the following problems:1) Five seconds after I turn it on, it always says "USB Connected!"-- and I don't have a USB cable inserted into it!  This also freezes the device.  I found a way around this by selecting the memory card to read from within this initial 5 seconds or turning the frame on without any memory cards inserted.2) I cannot copy files over to it as described in pages 33-35 of the manual.  My computer does recognize the USB device, but when I try to copy files over to the frame, I get a "path is not found" error.3) I thought I could live with the above 2 problems if it could JUST SHOW MY PICTURES.  So I used a card reader to load .JPG files onto a CF card at 400x300 resolution. When, I plugged the card into the frame, these files show up as "Invalid" when I try to view them.Emailed Coby with the 3 bullet points above, got a response 30 hours later saying:"Coby Tech Support to me5:25 am (3 hours ago)Hello,We have received your inquiry. It appears that your unit is defective. Return the unit to the retailer for an exchange."What an inconvenience and disappointment.  I will be buying a different product</review_text>
This digital picture frame has a very good LCD display. As long as you resize your digital photos to match the resolution of 860X480, the pics. will fill-up the frame. One drawback is your original pics. will be cropped. My 1 Gb CF card can display over a thousand pics. Color and brigthness are still good even if you view it 6 to 8 feet. If you want you can change the frame to  wood if you are handy. Overall I'm happy with this Coby DP102.</review_text>
My friends have similar products that they paid up to 3x more.  Quality is very good...easy to use...such a great gift for almost any occasion</review_text>
I just received my COBY dig. frame. Put about 25 pics on a memory chip and stuck into the device.Pressed slide show and it started working. Minimum frame time is 5 seconds and I wish it were faster for my needs (window display in gallery), and the color is not perfect, but it was only about $107. so I'll live with it</review_text>
I've had this camera for a couple of weeks now, it's my 4th digital camera.  I am very happy with the photos I'm able to take, they are truly outstanding.  I'm still learning all of the settings but I'm finding everything to be user-friendly.  I like the way it feels in my hand and I'm pleased with the battery life.  I purchased a 2GB card to replace the one that came with the camera and it's been the perfect size for me.  The video is amazing, I was standing in the upstairs bathroom of our 2 story house and  saw our little one jumping on the trampoline at the far end of our backyard, so I decided to tape it.  Not only was the quality good, the camera picked up the audio, which I never expected!  And I like that you can zoom in or out while you're taping, I wasn't able to do that with my last camera.I've had no problems downloading the pics or videos to my computer and the prints I've gotten have been great as well</review_text>
As soon as the battery is charged, we were ready to go. In auto mode, it was as easy as turn on, point (focus), and shoot. Especially love the (1) speed at which it turns on and is ready to go and (2) the large, clear display screen. Additional modes are available, but I have only begun to explore. On the downside, this model is larger than the other Elph models and barely fits into the Canon camera bag</review_text>
We had a Canon Powershot S50 3 years ago, loved it. So this time when my husband wanted to buy another digital compact camera, we specifically looked for Canons.We originally were thinking of getting the SD700,800 or something like that. But after we compared these cameras together in a store near us. We found out SD900 has the finest LCD display, more opitions in control panel... So we came back and bought it from Amazon (our favorite online store).We used it in our last trip to Grand Cayon, LV, SF etc. This SD900 takes very good pictures, especially in good lighting conditions. Colors are also smooth and rich.The downside, as you may already read from others' reviews, no battery indication, no raw(it's ok, my husband doesn't do much editiing anyway, it will be too much to ask for a campact camera to offer), control panel is sensitive... don't get frustrated if you happened to pressed the wrong button and couldn't figure the way out during the time of shooting. Stich is a great function which comes with, but when in a very bright area, you can not see the stich alignment very well on the LCD screen (I guess it's a common trouble to all digital compact cameras which are relay on LCD dispay).Overall, it's a wonderful camera, we love it. It's my husband's camera, I uses Canon 350D, but I borrow it from my husband sometimes because it's tiny compares to my 10 lbs "moose" and it takes very good pictures.</review_text>
I just got back from my first trip using this camera, and it performed excellently.Two things I found very good:Night shots at high ISO and no flash were outstanding.  I took a lot of pics of the Hong Kong skyline, and they were just stunning.  No blurry image and crisp colors and lines.  There is no need for "no shake", given these pics are possible at this high ISO with no tripod.Battery endurance was unbelievably long.  I was taking pics constantly all over Hong Kong for two straight days, including a lot of night shots.  The battery lasted the entire time.  I bought a second battery as a backup, but I rather doubt I am every going to need it, with this kind of endurance.This is the best compact camera I have ever owned</review_text>
At 10mp, this camera takes some of the clearest and visually stunning pictures I have ever taken with a digital camera.  The clarity and detail alone are reason to get this camera. The display, although pooh-poohed by others as too small, is quite large to me.The cameras small, lithe design is another selling point.  Nothing bulky about this camera. You can put it in your front pants-pocket if you needed to.Do yourself a favor and get this camera.  You won't regret it.</review_text>
This camera takes great pictures all the time.  I haven't had one picture that has turned out bad.  It is also very easy to use and there are lots of fun things you can do with it.  I would recommend this camera to anyone</review_text>
It's amazing how much they can squeeze into such a small space.I have owned one form of the Elph or another, for the past 7 or 8 years, and they've always been top quality.  This version is no exception.  Everything you'd expect from one of the leading names in digital cameras.The screen is BIG, and the menus and onscreen information is clear and everything is very intuitive.  The picture quality is fantastic!  Crisp and hi res, with many options for size and quality.  The detail on some of my shots is simply astounding!The video capture is some of the best I've seen from a none dedicated camera.  The 640x480 @ 60 fps mode, is quite startling when you first see it.  The improved video capabilities is one of the main reasons I upgraded.The battery life seems very good.  Infact, I'd say it's a bit of an improvement over my last Elph.  I purchased an extra battery, so I could be charging one, while using the other.  I still haven't switched batteries yet :)Overall, very please.  This is a great, stylish, neat, full featured, camera</review_text>
I purchased this camera primarily as a back-up camera. But i find myself using it more and more inplace of my main camera.  It is a beautiful piece of work</review_text>
We are not big users of technology.  This bundle was very inexpensive and allows us to produce printed photos with nearly no effort.  The camera is straight-forward to use, though not a sleek as some we've seen</review_text>
I am a busy mom of two young children.  This camera is perfect for capturing all of their cute faces and happy moments.  I love the fast cycle time. I love that I can take multiple pictures in seconds. Would recommend to anyone</review_text>
I was so happy and scared at the same time.  I had never used a digital camera before in my life. Guess what?  It was so easy!!I give Kodak all the koodles</review_text>
This is the ideal starter camera for a beginner.  I found it easy to use and simple to get started with.  However the software that comes with this camera is not so great. It runs slow on my system and has features that most people won't really ever use such as a greeting card maker.You're going to want a memory card with this camera as the internal memory doesn't hold a huge number of pictures</review_text>
My only complaint: the built-in flashes on these cameras have limited range.  If you're shooting in a dark room and the subject is 30 feet away, it's time to upgrade to a digital SLR.  Otherwise - this is a great camera</review_text>
I bought this camera for my daughter and was pretty impressed. It is easy to use, takes great pictures, has a lot of options, and is very small (pocket-sized). In fact it was kind of depressing because I paid $250 for a 5MP this time last year.You will need a memory card for this camera. The internal memory only holds 3 pics at the highest res. 1 GB which will hold 400 pics.The only thing I would warn you about is: If you try to use a used memory card, you will need to format it with the camera though the menu, or with Windows, befor you use it. I tried to use one from my old camera and the transfer software wouldn't work on two different computers, it kept saying "Enumerating" and never read the pics. After formatting the card, it was fine. Also, this camera claims to support only specific SD cards from SanDisk, Panasonic and Toshiba, which is weird because I thought SD was a standard. See page 102 of the manual</review_text>
With the standard proviso that tech stuff always gets better and cheaper, I highly recommend this new camera model for the low price. I have only had it for two days, since Nikon didn't warranty my broken LCD screen on my L4. Please do be careful with the fragile nature of these electronics! I didn't drop it or abuse it, and it apparently broke in my pocket within a padded case!Back to the L10, most everything is better than the previous, low end, L cameras, with improved sound, and what is great for me, voice recording capacity, outside of 20 second voice memos attached to a particular photo. While digital voice recorders are cheap for PCs, I have a Mac and previously, only iPods with accessories, or other costly recorders, can create sound files to be then imported to your computer and then burned to CDs. With just a 512 MB card, you can record for hours.The image quality is a bit bluish, some color cast that hopefully can be corrected with software. The sharpness looks O.K., and for the price, it's fine for me. This makes a great back-up camera, as I use another more expensive L series camera. On the road, I can't afford missing a great scenic shot, or hundreds of those.The L10 is smaller and slimmer than the L4. It carries well in your pocket. It has slightly simpler buttons and controls. The lens retraction is quicker on shut-off, and the zoom is rather abrupt. Other new, handy features are characteristic of the planned obsolescence of most tech items. Goodies that will have you wanting to upgrade!It will remain to be seen how durable this camera turns out to be, but I have high hopes. I intend to be more careful, and never subject this beauty to shock or any possibility of drops.Speaking with a tech support rep, you need to have nickel metal hydride batteries with more than 2000 mAh worth of power, in lieu of what they recommend (Nikon-approved rechargables). Some of my Ray-o-Vacs aren't.I'm using only the approved SD cards, but they now support up to 4GB cards. That's great if you can trust the card not to fail--why I buy several in smaller capacities, and therefore don't have all my eggs in one basket. You'll get enough memory, then at 4 GB, for probably then, a few thousand photos storage.One major thing they can work on are the streaks that still appear in movie mode when faced with bright reflections or sun. Not as bad in earlier L's, these don't appear in final still images, but are seen in movies. You then have to remember not to shoot movies outside of evenly lit scenes. My older Coolpix cameras didn't have this problem. The movie quality is pretty good, but a bit down from my movies using my L5. Shooting movies of a train, the bells and horns are much clearer sounding than the earlier models.Despite what the ads say, I can find no VR feature on this model, and nothing about it in the manual. Unless it is enabled all the time, which it seems to be not, you may wish to wait till this excellent feature becomes standard on all models. For more serious photographers, VR is included on the higher end, new L's.Also, I see nothing about ISO capability to 800, but I haven't yet tried night or low light scenes. One telephoto came out blurred, with no blur warning, there.All in all, this is fantastic technology, all at a highly affordable price, and although Nikon isn't the top rated brand as it used to be, I'd get this as a first, around-the-home and back-up, digital camera, if you haven't owned a good one yet</review_text>
I have had two Nikon Coolpix 995 Cameras and hated them both.  I also have a Canon Rebel XT which is a great camera for more "intended" use.  But the Canon was too large to tote with me on my last trip to Asia, so, on the advice of a friend, I decided I would pick up a small digital camera in Sinapore for "pennies on the dollar".  So, knowing nothing about prices of recreational digital cameras, I picked up this camera for 220 USD and, at the time, felt pretty good about it (again, the same friend suggested that 220 was a good buy).  This place was supposed to be the electronic dumping grounds from Chinese production lines but I paid double what Amazon has it for.  I love the camera because it reliably takes good pictures with little effort inside and out and slips inconspicuously into my pocket when not in use.  I would strongly recommend buying this product from Amazon or one of its syblings such as the L11 . . .</review_text>
Batteries that came with it were gone next day, but I bought some NI-MH rechargable batteries and a charger and the new batteries are still working after over a month.  2 in camera and 2 ready to go.  The camera is easy to use and takes good pictures</review_text>
I actualy bought this camera on an impulse. My Friends and were going on a day trip so decided that i should get a camera. Couldn't be happier with the purchase. Very Pleased with how the picture turned out. Took great moving and still shots. I would recommend this camera to everyone</review_text>
Simple features, I got it for work and it does the job for what we need</review_text>
This is a quality camera, my first digital, and very simple to use and understand.  The price is right too. Just had first prints made and they turned out great</review_text>
Just purchased this camera today as replacement for my previous Kodak point& shoot 4.0  So far, Im pleased with it, easy to figure out how to use and for my purposes e.g. simple photos, it's working just fine.I really loved my other camera but my husband has permanently "borrowed it" to use at work.  I would recommend this camera for people who want an easy to use device that takes good, simple pictures.</review_text>
This is not only the ideal scope for beginners but enough of an instrument to show you new things in the sky for years to come. It is sturdy and simple to operate. It has enough light-gathering power (more important than magnification) to reveal dim star clusters, nebulae, and galaxies and good enough optics to show you the surface of planets like Jupiter, Saturn, and Mars. Affordable as this scope is, there is no reason to give so much as a glance at the numerous trashy 60mm refractors with exaggerated magnification claims that litter the market.Some advice on selection. Dobsonians like this one come in a range of sizes. A 114mm (4 ") is a bit on the small side but still a fine instrument, especially if your ability to carry large objects is limited. A 200mm (8") scope like this one is right in the middle of the recommended range. A 250mm (10") is on the big side, and you should buy one only if you are able-bodied.Some advice on use. Viewing through a telescope is less like playing a CD and more like playing a guitar. Finding objects takes a little bit of practice. To simplify it, I would suggest discarding the finder supplied with this scope and installing two finders: a 50mm "crosshair" finder plus a red-dot finder to aid in initial pointing. You will also need to buy an atlas (Sky & Telescope's Pocket sky Atlas is the best available), a red flashlight to view the charts without blowing out your badly-needed night vision, and a guidebook to lead you to interesting objects. These investments will greatly add to your enjoyment.What more can I say? This is the kind of scope that experienced observers have been trying to steer novices towards for decades. Although, I recommend that you do your homework before buying any scope--learn the sky and get to know experienced stargazers who can advise you--when it comes time to purchase, you could hardly do better than this scope.For more advice, see my encyclopedic guide here on Amazon, "So you want to buy a telescope.</review_text>
This is one of those on line item purchases that flies in the face of the conventional. This tripod combo meets the need with no extravagant bells and whistles. It is well designed and engineered from the weight of materials to the quite acceptable fit and finish for the price. I will actually smile incessantly using this combo</review_text>
I was amazed to see so many features put into this tripod. The product quality looks good too, but its base is not as strong as it should have been. When I need low shutter speeds, I always use a timer with this tripod. But it is quite effective and very good for the price it has been offered for.I hate paying half its original price for shipping though</review_text>
This thing really surprised me for the price.  You can tell it's cheaply made (with thin aluminum tubes and cheap plastic latches) but it IS CHEAP! and that's whats great about it. It's really easy to work with.  If you're going to use it every day you might want something more sturdy, but for an amateur it's sweet</review_text>
The product seems to be functional, I have not yet used it.  There was some confusion on delivery as there were no instructions indicating where the Mini Tripod was in the box.  I called the Seller, and was advised that since it was not in the box a replacement would be sent.  A day later the Seller called to advise that the Mini Tripod should be located in the handle of the full size tripod, as the handle doubled as a storage location for the Tripod.  On checking it was discovered to be there.  It would be prudent to include some directions as to the operation of the Tripod.  Other than that, it was delivered quickly, and it appears to be functional.  Thanks  J</review_text>
I work in Film Production, (both photography and video). I bought this for for my  digital Camera and my camcorder.  It's not high tech by any means, but it is very useful.  I don't like the plastic parts, but for the price it's sturdy enough.  IT WAS WORTH THE MONEY NO DOUBT!!</review_text>
I have mixed feelings about this case. It's pretty nice, but not exactly what I need or expected.It's a lot smaller than I envisioned. I can just get my Lumix FZ50 in it with the little charger, an extra battery, the cables, and the remote release. It has 3 net pockets and 1 zipper pocket, all on the tiny side. They are big enough for an extra memory card or two, but not much more. I can't fit the camera's manual in any of them. It says "Panasonic" on the front, not "Lumix" like the picture shows - not a big deal. When I get a couple conversion lenses and an AC adapter, I will need something a lot bigger.For traveling light, this one will be handy, but it isn't a complete transportation solution, by any means</review_text>
I have owned the Panasonic FZ7 for 1 year and was excited to purchase the FZ8.  There are so many excellent qualities this camera offers.It is very simple to use for a beginner and offers features to suit a professional.  The preview screen is a perfect size with its bright and vivid colors.  Settings are easy to change,Including: shutter speed, aperture, time and date, changing the focus point, and many other awesome features! The picture quality is awesome, even with the 12x zoom, my prints do not turn out grainy. Nice light weight and easy grip.Now, the dislikes....only one.  This camera does not offer an automatic pop-up flash. I have to remember to open it.I cannot comment on the video of this camera, I use a Sony Handycam for all my video needs.Overall, I would highly recommend this camera and even the FZ7 to anyone interested in starting out with a simple to use camera</review_text>
This camera is wonderful.  For the novice that I am, it's perfect.  The basic mode is very user friendly.  LCD and menus are great.  I purchased this model primarily due to the 12X optical zoom and have not been disappointed.  This model has advanced modes that I hope to master as my digital knowledge grows.  If you're looking for a camera that is  easy to use with excellent features, I highly recommend the DMC-FZ8</review_text>
I just got this last week and the quality of the photos are excellent! The videos are really good as well! No complaints so far. This is perfect for point-and-shoot folks but then the camera features a whole a lot more if you want to get creative. Just be careful in buying SD cards larger than 2Gb, but just make sure the SD card has 'SDHC' stamped on it. I made the mistake of buying a regular 4Gb SD card and it did not work on the camera. Good thing the SD card worked on my Nikon D50. Live and learn</review_text>
Got this one for my new SD750.  It takes more pictures than the original battary in full charge.  Because this one is 900mah.  Price is very good. The price you paid for the original, you can have 3 of this.  The reason I gave a 4 stars it is because it doesn't come with the cover to protect the circuit matal area</review_text>
Great battery, the life without charging the battery is bigger than the original, I bougth two for my canon SD 600 and they work perfectly</review_text>
cheap price, but the shipping cost is high comparing the price of the item. I bought two batteries, but I was asked to pay twice the shipping cost, which doubled my buying price</review_text>
This is a good battery for Canon Digital cameras.  This CTA Digital DB-NB4L battery and the original Canon batery were both used to take digital photos during a recent Mexican cruise.  This CTA Digital battery worked well.</review_text>
Good to have a backup battery available.  Used it after other battery ran out of power when away from recharger</review_text>
I have used the battery in the past few months in the past few months together with two Canon batteries. I did not went out of my way to compare their battery life, but did not discern a notable difference among them</review_text>
I ordered 2 of these batteries for my Canon PowerShot SD600.  They arrived ontime.  Charged both in my OEM Canon charger and both worked right out of the box.  Just wanted some back up for the camera - and spare batteries at this price - you can't go wrong</review_text>
I love this camera. I bought it for my trip to Paris. I found it very easy to use. One feature i didn't realize it had was video with sound. I found that very useful. I bought a 2GB memory card to go with the camera. The one it comes with doesn't hold that many pictures. The software was easy to install and use. Not really small enough for a pocket but still a great camera on a budget</review_text>
First off, let me make it clear that I am satisfied with this camera. I have had it for 8 months now and I have put it through its paces and its held up fine.But there are few things you must know:The camera has no zoom. I mean, practically no zoom. 2.2x may look decent but its pointless in any real-life situation. You WILL find yourself moving a lot with your camera to get a better shot, not standing in one place and using the zoom feature. You can never get a close wide shot - its just not possible with this camera. This camera is great for average stills but that's about it.You have to click twice to take a picture or "press halfway and then fully" according to the manual. This is a major pain. Sometimes when the battery is weak, it may take a lot of time to take a picture (and a lot of frustration), so this is not a cam to capture any special pictures or "kodak moments".Apart from these cons, the camera is great value for money and offers video and all kinds of stuff. If you're looking mostly looking to take landscape or portrait stills, this camera will do a good job</review_text>
Good camera for the $129 I paid. Does everything pretty well, and your picture modes are pretty customizable. Only qualm is it takes a second or two longer than I wish when the camera saves/loads pictures to the memory card. Might be a problem when trying to shoot consecutive pictures-- but probably wouldn't be doing it with this type of camera anyways.</review_text>
This is my 3rd digital camera and I bought this one to supplement my larger 10X zoom camera.  This one fits nicely into a pocket  or small camera bag to easily take it to all events or for travel.  I've found that it takes nice photos indoors when the flash is used....Even when the cats or dogs I'm shooting are moving around.  I've felt the life of a battery set is pretty good, but I've been using nice rechargeable ones.  Definitely get a set of 4, then you have 2 to use and 2 as a backup set.  The settings are pretty easy to figure out and change and 99% of my photos were taken on the "auto" setting and came out pretty good.  As others have indicated, indoors - without flash - can produce blurry photos, but that's the nature of almost all cameras, not unique to this model.  Glad I bought it and would highly recommend it</review_text>
I really like this camera! It is fairly simple to use, takes great pictures and is packed with features. It fits nicely in the hand and is compact enough to slip in a coat pocket or purse.We bought this camera for our daughter's birthday. She is using it with ease & especially loves the movie with sound option. In my opinion, the camera is a winner for any adult or kid wanting a good all around digital camera.My only negative is that it is a battery hog. As with most digital cameras, you will want to make sure you get rechargeable batteries and large memory card</review_text>
I gave this camera 5 stars because of it's awesome features. This camera is the perfect size for kids and you can put a video on this camera. I love this camera. I think it takes awesome pictures</review_text>
Cute, compact, easy to use - these are just a few ways to describe Canon's cool A400! This stylish digital camera is lightweight and perfect for snapping shots on the go. Mine is Sunset Gold.Plus, there are perks like macro mode (which lets you snap sharp pictures from as close as 2 inches), and lots of shooting modes (like Snow and Fireworks).And Movie Mode lets you capture video clips with sound.This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Just what you would expect from  Canon</review_text>
This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Even close-up photos turn out great. You would think this camera had more than 3.2 megapixels! You will have to get a much larger memory card though, as is the case with most digital cameras</review_text>
I use this for webcasting and video streaming from home office. The light bounces off the wall and is wonderful for reading and illuminates camera subjects wonderfully</review_text>
Got this almost a year ago and it completely changed the way my photographs are.Amazing light for most indoor photographs.  I got to do product shots, abstract shots and fantastic portraits using this great unit.Definitely recommended to anyone who wants to shoot anything indoor.</review_text>
I found this light ideal for my needs.  It's lightweight, compact and powerful and can be activated quickly when needed</review_text>
This flashlight does what it's supposed to do, and it has a good range of brightness.  I especially like the thumb power switch/rheostat -- it's easy and comfortable to operate.  My only complaint is that the circle of illumination is relatively small.  I would prefer a wider cone of light to illuminate a wider area</review_text>
This small sized Binocular is excellent for those who look for portable Binocular with huge capability and strong materials.</review_text>
This was a great purchase for my purposes - birding and wildlifing.  I had to get used to turning the center-focus with ring finger, as the zoom lever is in the index-finger position.  To use full zoom, you really need total stability, but half zoom is very useful even from a moving kayak. Right-eye focus ring is right up against the eyecups and hard to move unless you twist open the eyecups, in which case the focus ring is fine.  Focus crispness is not quite what I hoped for at full zoom, but still good for seeing field marks.  One big advantage is the light weight.  This set is as light as the smaller Nikon I lost.  Very nice</review_text>
I've wanted to purchase a pair of binoculars for a couple of years, but kept putting it off because I figured I'd have to dump at least $300 on a quality pair.  I wanted something compact, good quality, and affordable.  Not exactly an easy order.  But after reading the reviews for these bins, I figured I'd give them a try.  All I can say is wow.  These are exactly what I was looking for.  They provide a very crisp image at the lower magnification levels.  And even at 24x, although usually impractical, they are a lot of fun.  I find it easy to focus and change the zoom level with one hand which is a plus.  For general purpose viewing, these are fantastic binoculars.  The bins shipped with a black velcro-flap carrying case with a belt loop on the back, and a small carrying strap that you can attach to your bins</review_text>
Light, easy to use and amazing.  The zoom is unbelievable.  Great product at a great price.  Would recommend to anyone</review_text>
Having had binoculars in the past be either way too expensive or too cheap, I wanted a new pair that would replace a pair that was loaned out, then lost. The opportunity presented itself in the form of a trip to Canada this past September, which required something that would be able to capture the Canadian Rocky vistas, but also not be so heavy that I would feel like needing a cart to stow them in. The Nikon Eagleview Binoculars seem to fill the bill (not too expensive, but also not too heavy). They have a great zoom feature that is easily changed as well as being able to easily focus with one hand. My only complaint is that while zooming in on a subject, the light level is reduced, which occurs naturally due to the nature of optics. You can't have everything, but these were just right, allowing my wife and I to use them time and time again while observing nature. In summary, a good pair for all-around use!</review_text>
For the price, these binoculars provide unparallel carity and easy focus.  I like these binoculars so much that I showed them to a couple of co-workers right away.  One of them was so impressed that he ordered one for his cousin's birthday.  Great product, highly recommended</review_text>
Just took a two week vacation,took my binoculars along.Binoculars are very compact (easy to pack)Very clear view and the zoom feature is stellar,saw amule deer using 8 power,16 gave me a closer view and 24gave me a perfect rack view.All in all, the binoculars are even better for mypurposes than I expected )very satisfied!!!</review_text>
I ordered these binoculars for my husband's birthday. They arrived promptly and in excellent condition; well packed. We both were surprised by how powerful they are and easy to use, WOW! Very, very pleased. They are very light weight (nice for these old arthritic arms and hands). The only possible drawback is that they are not waterproof and need to be kept dry at all times, so DH will not be able to take them along on fishing trips unless he double zipper lock bags them.</review_text>
Oh my god~! This binoculars are AMAZING~! Nikon JAPAN did it AGAIN~!!! I travel all over the world, I attend all sorts of sports event, Nature Watch, and do some SPY work~! I have looked over 300 type and kind of Binoculars, and I FINALLY found this one~!! and bought it for $70 for Sale. It is even BETTER design then the previous model, very light weight, Ease of Use, Compact that fit in my pocket, and POSWERFUL enough to see Galaxy in the sky. I was little concerned if I would loose the Light as you power up the zoom, NOT SO~!!!! If you want ALL round binoculars that are made with QUALITY and right PRICE, this is THE ONE.</review_text>
I have bought a couple of binoculars in the past.  Always thinking the higher magnification was better.  That's not always true as keeping the object steady at 10 and higher with your hands is tough. The higher mags also suck up light making the image darker. Now I have an Eagleview Zoom and don't worry which model I should have chosen. For the most part it stays at 8 but when I really need to get close the zoom is great.  The turn and slide eyecups are a fine feature.Love 'em</review_text>
These TDK 8 cm (3 in.) DVD-R blanks are to be used mostly in DVD camcorders from Panasonic, Sony and Hitachi.  I use them in my beloved Panasonic VDR-D300 3CCD DVD camcorder (see my review of the camcorder on Amazon).  These DVD-R blanks are pre-formatted so all I need to do is pop one into my Panasonic and start shooting.  I shoot at the highest quality setting (called "XP" on the Panasonic) which gives me about 18 minutes of recording time.  After I'm done with one disk, I finalize it on the Panasonic which makes it playable in all DVD players as well as most computer DVD-ROM drives.  (The only DVD drives not compatible with 8 cm discs are those that suck the disc in.  These small discs must be used in tray-loading or cartridge-loading drives.  Very few people, other than some Apple computer owners, have those sucking drives.)The TDK discs, manufactured by a Taiwanese company for TDK, are quite reliable.  I've gone through two dozen and have not encoutnered any problems.  The only unknown is shelf life of these discs.  I make backup copies of my videos both on hard drives and on a regular DVD-R.  Because your own home video recordings are not encrypted, you can simply copy the files on the TDK disc to a blank regular-sized DVD-R via Windows Explorer.  It's really simple.Of course, since these are R discs, they can be used only once.  If you want a rewritable RW blank, check out the TDK Camcorder DVD-RW 3-pack</review_text>
These pages are a wonderful value for archiving negatives you want to keep.  Terrific product</review_text>
I would like to have seen it constructed out of heavier material but I also guess it would cause the price to go up.. But tell ya what, I love my equipment!!!!!!!! Does a great job and  I would order from this company again...</review_text>
These lights came in quickly and were great for filming a green screen shoot. The case is great too, because you can wheel it around.</review_text>
The Smith Victor KT900 light set has met all my needs.  I am an inspiring photographer and this kit opened a whole new dimension to my work.</review_text>
This kit, although not for the died in the wool professional, is an excellent starting point for serious amateurs to learn how to use studio lighting effectively without spending a fortune. I has the basic ingredients to experiment with and produce excellent results.</review_text>
Well, im starting with studio photography and i found in this kit pretty much what i was looking for, nice black hard plastic case to carry it, good materials quality, excellent to start a studio</review_text>
now, if I drop this camera, and I have, it keeps working. case is safe and keeps my camera safe and is small and easy to throw into my purse or pocket or has a strap to throw over my shoulder.</review_text>
The camera case was delivered on schedule.  I examined it closely and found ot to be without any flaws or irreularities.  The case was ruggedly constructed and had a pleasing appearance.  My camera fit pefectly and the front pocket held a spare set of batteries and a spare memory card.  I've used it for 1 month now and have not had any operating problems.  Anyone with a small camera that was supplied with a lite duty case should buy tis camera case as a replacement.</review_text>
although the main part of the case in which my camera resides is useful, I was dismayed when I received it as the strap had one clip broken and the first time I opened and closed the additional pocket, the zipper broke.  The only reason I have not returned it for a new one is that the cost of shipping would make it too expensive</review_text>
Fast delivery.  Product was perfect.  Nice way to do business</review_text>
I found this case to be just what I was looking for.  It is small enough to fit in my purse, but large enough to hold camera, an extra xcard, and spare batteries.  My camera was protected as we traveled overseas, but it was easy to pull it out for any picture moments we encountered</review_text>
Great little package! Small, compact, fits easily in your pocket. Took them to Giants Stadium to use from my end zone seat. Able to see action very clearly in the opposite end of the field. Easy focus for my bad eyes</review_text>
I have had this for over 6 months now and i cant really complain about it. Its compact and easy to use. However, people with glasses would have trouble using it. I use it without my glasses(there is a power caliberation that you can do to match ur eye power) and then its very clear.Easy to carry around and solid. Very good for its price</review_text>
I was a bit worried at first at the tiny size, but it is tres powerful! I bought it for a school trip to the Amazon forest and I sighted way more birds and animals than everyone else which helped get me an A in the course. Yes, these binoculars rock!</review_text>
Well, I bought the bino for my 7 year old nephew to introduce him to birding. And he loves it, infact he pronounced it "Pretty Cool". Was a good buy considering its compact and does what its supposed to do</review_text>
I have not purchased this item; however, I wanted to inform westwindtalker2 how to use these binoculars (or any other normal pair of binoculars).  First step, take off your eyeglasses.  Second step, look through the binoculars at a stationary distant object, close your right eye and adjust the focus until the object is in focus for your left eye.  Third step, while continuing to look at the same object, open your right eye, close your left eye and adjust the diopter correction until the object is in focus for your right eye.  Fourth step, open both eyes, adjust the distance between the eyepieces so the image is seen as a single object and adjust the central focus knob.  (You could also try reading the instructions supplied with the binoculars--they are available in pdf format from amazon.com from this item's webpage.</review_text>
You get about as much as can be expected for this price range.Having the 4x objective (see Meade for example that lacks it) is very desirable. Having a 15x eyepice to give acceptable quality 600x avoids much need to go to the oil immersion lens. Almost everything works quite nicely. I would recommend not using the oil that comes with the microscope - cedar oil. This is an older type of oil that is slightly yellow and harder to clean than modern synthetics. Buy a tube of modern low viscosity immersion oil from Edmund Scientific or similar supplier. I found this oil works great at 1000x and 1500x with this microscope and cleans off reasonably easily with isopropyl alchohol.I would definitely recommend purchasing this microscope, but also consider the similar featured Revelation III from LW Scientific. It has very slightly superior features, at a slightly higher price, from a company that specializes in microscopes (vs. Celestron, where their customer service knows almost nothing about microscopy; they are telescope experts).There were a few tiny initial problems with the microscope. One eyepiece had a small optical defect near its periphery. Celestron immediately exchanged it for a flawless one. The iris diaphram came very slightly off center. There are adjusment screws to correct this. The alignment error is so small I haven't bothered fixing it. The color filters, by design, are placed right on top of the (nice) halogen light source. Compare the LW-Scientific model mentioned which has fileter holder and a few other light source advantages.FYI:The achromat objectives have the typical (no better, no worse) amount of spherical aberation at the outer edge, giving you about 2/3 of the field of view in sharpest focus for  precisely flat specimen (e.g. quality blood smear). This is not a defect at this price range. Apochromat Plan objectives that ahieve 95+% freedom from spherical aberation can cost as much or more for one lens than this microscope costs.This microscope uses standard lens sizes so it can readily upgrade to better eyepieces and objectives and acommodate kits for specialized microscopy (dark field, phase contrast, etc.), as well accepting standard through the eyepiece digital image capture accessories.</review_text>
Actually, the oil is not to prevent the objective from scratching the slide, but instead to allow the slide to be viewed at that magnification at all. With that high a magnification the refraction will be very high, and a lot of light will escape before it ever gets to the eye (the light is going through glass, then air, then glass again, distorting its path greatly). The oil that is used for these microscopes has the same refractive index as the lens glass, and so light travels through it at the same speed and doesn't run off course</review_text>
This is in response to the post that there was an error with the 100x on the microscope. It's not that it's an error, but when you do magnifications at that level you have to do what's called oil immersion with the slides. This enables the lense to get close without being scratched. The instruction manual should say that. I promise I'm not making this up. I'm a biochem major with plenty of experience:-</review_text>
Well!, i have just purchased this Sony A100 body only for $[...] no kit lens for me. I bought the Sigma 28-105mm f2.8 AF for it. Reason i bought this A100 is because i got the Sony R1 a few months back, R1 really impressed me with its results images with Zeiss lens, thats motivated me to buy Sony DSLR too, Sony got great colors balance, contrasty, sharp, and good dynamic range, Not like other brands while colors are off and have yellow cast.A100 is a small and light compare to other DSLRs, it made in Malasia with light plastic, not a real pro body, but more like consumer camera, its good for me cuz i need a light DSLR, A100 is a fast camera in many ways, fast buffer for refreshing time, review, delete, start up, AF is fast too. Images are stunning sharp with the help from its in body Super steady shot. Colors are well balance, bright, and neutral. The LCD on backside has 2 neat features: If you turn the camera vertical the LCD turns vertical too, so you can see the info before shooting. When you put your eyes to the eye piece to look thru view finder, it got smart sensor to turn off LCD on backside to save batt life.The Super steady shot in body is really helps, now i can buy any lenses and sure will have all image stabilizer shots.A small thing that bother me in A100 is the shutter slap noise when shoot, it has a clumsy ( clunk)sound to it.For the price i paid, its the best DSLR in its range.The advantage about A100 is that you can buy many other lenses for it like: Minoltas, Zeiss , Sonys, Sigmas, Tamrons, Tokinas, Vivitars, and Quantaray.im happy with mine, highly recommended to whom who wants a fast , light , small, good colors DSLR. Not to mention good price too.im watching the new coming of Sony pro DSLRs coming in june 07.I use my A100 with OPTEKA battery grip, you can see my review on it here in Amazon, just hit search for OPTEKA grip.[...</review_text>
I am very pleased with this camera. I have been in photography for 55 years and I have a collection of 12 cameras, the last four of these are digital.  I have a high end Nikon and a Cannon, but I think this is the best camera I have ever owned</review_text>
you can't find a better lens for the price.  some people seem to be let down by the speed and focusing capability of this lens at 200mm or above but it should be expected that if shooting telephoto, the user would incorporate a tripod.  I originally thought about buying the tamron 18-250mm but this lens was half the price and although you lose 10mm in the width, you gain 50mm in length.for the few of the people who reviewed this lens and put it on a canon 30d or similar pro digital slr, the question i have is, why would you spend $3000 on a body and $250 on a lens???? it makes no sense!  i have this lens mounted on my digital rebel xti and it is a great match.  i would love to have a faster zoom lens with this range but i don't want to spend the thousands of dollars needed.if you are like me and enjoy photography, as a hobby and not to make a living, you should buy this lens for it's superior versatility.  if you are professional photographer and need superior quality, you shouldn't  even be looking at this lens, so please do us casual photographers a favor, and don't review this lens</review_text>
Pros: High quality construction, nothing about it feels cheap. Comes with the lens hood. Has great telephoto capability. Excellent price for a starter telephoto lens.Cons: Quite a bit of chromatic abberation around the edges at 200mm-300mm. You'll definately want to use a tripod for this for anything above 100mm since there is no IS.Overall, if you want a lens simply because you want a wide range and the ability to zoom far in get this. If you want QUALITY pictures however, look elsewhere. I'm thinking of spending ~$500 on one of Canon's Image Stabilization lenses</review_text>
This product provides great picture flexibility without the need to swap between the standard lens and a zoom.  The camera and lens fit nicely into common carrying bag.  The twist-to-zoom works nicely but may tend to zoom out while wearing/carrying around neck.</review_text>
Overall a good lens,  Focus a little soft at 300mm. The Bokeh is OK.  Canon Dig Reb XT auto focus sometimes oversearches.  Zoom control is stiff.  However,  the focal range is great.  This is a good walk around lens.  I use it 100% now.  The F 3.5 allows the chance of precious light at short focal lengths.   A very good value for the money</review_text>
I'm just a mom with a really nice camera (the Canon digital rebel) and this lens was a great birthday present from my husband.  It has so spoiled me with the zoom!  I recomend this for any amatuer - intermediate photographer.  Go For It</review_text>
It is very easy to connect and use. You can create a DVD from you JVC camcorder quickly. The quality is very good.What I used are free DVD-R disks I bought from staples during black Friday couple of years ago</review_text>
The item is a good fit for what we need to use it for.  Would most likely rate it higher but we have not used it enough to do so</review_text>
We got this DVD share station as a wedding gift. My wife and I decided to not have a wedding lunch and keep the money to buy us a JVC Everio Hard Drive Camcorder so that we could have it for our honeymoon and first few years of our new life together. We took some video and burned a DVD with the share station with the DVD that came with the burner. Then we edited a video on our computer and tried to burn it. It didn't work. So, we went out and bought more burnable dvds. I just thought I had some faulty, cheap blank dvds, so we bought some nice sony DVD + RW discs. They didn't work. I got upset and checked reviews online, and all of them were pretty much bad saying that this burner didn't work. Well, the next day, we read the instructions and learned that there is a differance between DVD + R and DVD - R discs. We learned that the DVD + RWs and the DVD - RWs didn't work with the burner, and that it is picky on which brand you use, and you have to make sure that it it is a DVD - R formatted disc. JVC, Sony, TDK, and Verbatim DVD-R discs are the ones that work. Ever since we learned that, all of our dvds have burned perfectly and everything has been great. It was a pain in the butt figuring out what was wrong, but now that it is working, I am very impressed with this burner. I hope that people who have problems with theirs will read this review and try what I suggested before getting upset and returning it</review_text>
I've had this digital camera for almost a year. It's the fourth camera I've owned. I spent quite some time searching for a compact camera that I could carry everywhere. Being an amateur photographer (and mostly taking pictures for myself and not others), I didn't want to lug around an extra bag just for my camera. It fits discreetly in your pocket or a small purse (for formal nights out). The size and weight of this camera is its best feature, and this carries through to the newer generations of this camera, too.This has been the perfect camera for everything from selling items on-line to landscape scenery. My pictures have always turned out beautifully, with wonderful color and crispness. I have discovered that the "automatic" lighting feature is not always the most ideal, but you can re-program just about anything on this camera.It's really quite a good camera, and given its price these days with the newer generations out there, it's a steal</review_text>
I simply love this camera.  I have been using for over 1 year now with no issues or problems.  However, you must learn to use the functions properly for optimum photo quality. Auto setting are great. Many of my photos look like professional portraits.  Everywhere I go people want to check it out.  Wouldn't trade for another. And I paid a high price when it first came out.  So at today's prices it is WELL WORTH the money</review_text>
I had a Nikon Coolpix which was small but too big to shove into my pocket so I bought the Sony.  I love that it's small, had to get used to making sure my fingers were not within the lense view.  Extra battery and memory sticks will run up the cost (but that goes for any digital camera).  It's easy to use since I'm not much of one for reading the instruction books yet have been able to figure things out fairly easily.  I don't do movies so can't comment on that but straight photos turn out really well (which surprises me since I've always been a really lousy photographer).  I like that I can carry it with me all the time, which I do.  I do wrap the whole camera in a small cloth envelope so the LCD doesn't get scratched up.  And I added a neck lanyard usually used for a computer flash key so I can wear the camera around my neck or wrap the strap around my hands just in case it slips out of my fingers--camera is so lightweight.  The only complaint I have is that the shutter door, which slides effortlessly to turn on the camera, slides effortlessly even when you don't want it to.  I've used up the battery many times while the camera was sitting in my pocket (so I always carry an extra battery with me).  And extra plus is loading the pics onto the computer is a breeze (no extra software needed, just the cable that comes with the camera).  There is still a slight delay between depressing the button to take a picture and when the camera actually takes the picture but it's not as bad as the Nikon.  I assume the newer versions of this camera have only gotten better.  Well worth the money (I just wish I could lock the shutter cover)</review_text>
It's everything i expected, works great and Amazon's partner service was very goo</review_text>
If you are looking for a good small camera, and have no intentions of being ansel adams, this is a good camera choice. I travel alot, and this camera is perfect because it can fit in my pockets or a small purse. It also takes pretty good pictures</review_text>
After springing for the Cybershot in August so I could have a compact camera I would actually TAKE places, I've been very, very pleased.The last camera I had was an older Sony DSC that was quite bulky, ran on batteries, and had shutter problems--but it took great quality pictures and the interface and features were perfect, so I thought I would go for the DSCT5, since it avoids ALL of those problems. Only a tiny battery to charge, no sticky shutter... and it's sexy as hell. The screen is huge and very bright.I hate taking pictures with flash in general, and I find that the flash makes nasty redeye more often than not with this camera. (And the camera gives you the impression you cant change shutter speed or anything) However! You can easily change this by going into the over/under exposure options and under exposing your photos when you are in dark environments. They come out surprisingly well and blur-free</review_text>
NO WORDS FOR THIS ITEM, THIS IS THE BEST CAMERA I EVER BOUGHT, THE PROGRAMS TO DOWNLOW THE PICTURES ITS FENOMENAL, IF YOU HAVE THE OPORTUNITIES GO FOR IT, BUYIT</review_text>
My Grandparents have one and love it. Its very easy to work. Takes great pics. Its also easy to share your pics on the TV.They love it I love it.</review_text>
I got this light to go with my full rig I use for wedding videography. Some of the lights out these are soooo expensive but I saw a lot of good reviews for this light and thought I would give it a go. Here are the goods and the bads.Goods - Works with the batteries that go to my PD150 camera so no need for silly looking belt battery pack or extra batteries. It comes with a 10w or 20w setting. So far it has also proven itself to be durable. Not that I am clumsy but I have dropped it twice and it survived. I understand the bulbs are expensive but I have used it for 2 years now with out the need for a change. It is lightweight and fits on the slide foot on the top of my camera. Most pro and non pro cameras will have this too so i use this with my tiny consumer camera and its great there too.Bads - I guess this stuff isnt really bad but for folks who might have a pro rig these are the things that might bum you out. No dimmer, no barn doors, so swivel. The one thing I will say though is that this thing is so light that I have a few times taken it off of the camera and held it in my hand up high at an angle so not to shine it in anyones face directly.I hope this helps</review_text>
This light is efficient. It is fragile, so put a lot of emphasis on not dropping it! I like the fact that it uses the same battery as my Sony VX1000</review_text>
I own this one and it is indeed a nice, even light for my VX2100. A couple of months ago, I dropped it to the floor from a 3 feet hight. It broke the plastic front into 5 pieces and now I have to buy a new one. The overall build quality is poor for this price. It does exaclty what it needs to do, bu don't ever drop it. It should have a protective casing or sleeve that comes with it. I have done a search and came across the HVL-20DX. This looks like the same model, but created some time ago for a video 8 camera. This one does come with a protective sleeve and cost a third or less of the HVL-20DW2 model. It turned out to be another model alltogether, but the protective lens on front could be used to replace the expensive 20DW2's one</review_text>
if you have pretty much ANY digital camera and want to do closeups or see what you're taking pix of before flash, you need this or similar light.  A german company makes a high-wat LED video light but it has speckled pattern, not good for closeup stills.  The light pattern on this is VERY even.  Closeup up with light in one hand and camera in other, to cover an object 6 to 8 inches.  pull back to widen light to 2 feet or more across.  Keep the video light as close to camera as possible, will reduce shadows the camera sees.  Even outdoors at 9000' in Colorado I found use for this, taking picture on shady trail where a plant was half in shade, will fix this.bulbs are replaceable.  Yet in 4 years of having one bulb never wore out, and heavy usage, 8 hours at a time.  (3 fp-970 batteries, such as batterybarn.com sells will give you 8 hours light.  the last time I got it off amazon, FP960 for $47 from computer brain.   the new 15 hour camcorder batteries power this light for about 2 1/2 hours)The onlything that eventually broke was the switch.  Don't force it, push down the middle safety button when turning it on or eventually will break it.  take battery out when travelling so won't go on accidentally.   you can add a grip by getting a disk shaped tripod adaptor and screwing a hand grip such as hakuba's monopod / tablepod combo (the most comfortable grip there is, about $25 at places like Fry's)  into the tripod adapter.It gets warm, almost hot but keeps running no problem with vent slits.   Even using it caving in Anza-Borrego, as we knew that we had for sure 2 hours on Li-ion batteries.Anyway, for indoor shooting in converence halls with bad flourescent lighting, this brings out the colors.  You can't use flash closer than about 2 feet with most objects or you get too much glare from reflection..so use a video light instead for serious indoor shooting where you can't have a fixed light stand.  use it in 10 watt mode for most objects, for tall or dark objects, switch to 20 watt.  When battery is starting to run low, the light will only go into 10 watt mode.I have the sony video light 3watt for dvd-403.  I keep this on top of camera sometimes when too much hassle to get out video light.  But it drains camcorder battery unlike this one, and light output alot lower.  good for small objects tho.and by all means, TURN ON FLASH when farther than 2' and object looks slightly dark.  this helps ALOT in your pix.  if it looks OK in viewfinder / lcd LEAVE FLASH OFF!see flashlightreviews.com for general light patterns and battery life of other flashlights incl led lights you might want to buy.IF sony would just come out with an LED version I'd be happy as a lark!  It would last 10 hours or more.Most flashlights throw uneven ring pattern so are unsuitable for lighting photos</review_text>
This is a great on board cam light.It's great to use the same batteries with your camcorder (FP series), although you need to use at least an FP-F770 (not the original that comes with the cameras) to light both bulbs. It's just great</review_text>
It just works!It uses the same Batteries as trv-900,vx-2100 and FX-1 or Z1-UI only wish it was horizontal</review_text>
I do profesional videos. This light has a good lighting patterna nd seems to hold up under heavy working conditions. It is light and fairly durable. I highly recomend it to anyone who does interior or exterior shoots. Light range is optimal from a distance of 6 to 15 ft. Get it and get a upgraded battery it will last for hours</review_text>
It's great. I hadn't any problem with phone interference.I recommend</review_text>
We purchased this camera and have been using it for a couple months now.  It is a great tool for watching our 20 month old son in his playroom during the day if you have to leave the room for anything and also at night when he makes noise and you aren't sure whether or not he is really up and awake needing you.  Pro's and Con's: Daytime - picture pretty clear but monitor small; Night vision - you can tell if he is standing up and walking around in the crib but you can't see well enough to see if he looks happy, sick or upset; Range - I can use it throughout the house but from one end to the other the picture and sound quality suffer somewhat; Battery Power - poor so I just keep it plugged into an outlet; Mounting brackets - good; and Interference with Wireless Network - completely interfered and rendered wireless network unusuable until by brother-in-law reprogramed the wireless network to a different frequency</review_text>
I almost didn't buy this camera based on all the negative reviews up here on Amazon, but I decided to give it shot and as it turned out I am extremely happy with this camera and would highly recommend it to any new parents.No it will not give you an image that is as good as your camcorder. Yes there may be some static and interference in the picture. Yes it may interfere with your wireless network (just turn off the camera whenever you go online, or if you are feeling motivated you can pretty easily tweak your wireless network so they don't conflict).But what you *do* get is a self-contained wireless video camera that can shoot in total darkness ... plus a portable battery powered video monitor for only $120. And it actually works and can be set up in a few minutes. That is amazing to me.Also there is an AV Out on the Mobi's video monitor so you can run the (included) cable directly from the Mobi monitor to your main TV set. My wife and I usually like to watch one tv show before we go to sleep, this is the one time of day we can relax and just spend time together, and it is extremely useful to be able to just hit a button on the remote and go from "Project Runway" to a real time image of our baby sleeping in the next room.You can also set the Mobi monitor to only turn on when there is movement - we set the little Mobi monitor next to our TV so if we see it turn on we can swith the main tv over to see a what is happening on our big screen.We have audio monitors but being able to actually SEE your baby is much, much more helpful. Oftentimes our daughter will fuss silently before actually waking up, so when we see her start to move around we know we need to get ready to deal with her.Also you don't need to be "gadget dad" to make this work. We just plugged ours in, set the frequency (A, B or C), and it was good to go.So, if you can afford the $120 I would highly recommend this device. It has made us much more effective parents</review_text>
Best camera in this price class. The IS feature is amazing, must have feature. The only complaint is the flash recharge time is a little slow due to 2 AA batteries. If you take lots of indoor pics, go for the Canons with 4 AA batteries (A6xx). For sports and kids this a great camera</review_text>
My current camera is an Olympus SP-320.  You can read my review on that product page, if you wish.I like the pictures I take, but I'm no pro and there is always someone whose pictures I admire more.  I have one friend who consistently takes great shots.  When a bunch of us attended a wedding last summer, there was a vibrancy to her shots that mine couldn't quite match.  Since she swore by her Canon Power Shot, I thought I'd give the A570IS a chance.  This weekend I had both the A570IS and the SP-320 with me on a weekend jaunt and took half of my pictures with each camera, swapping back and forth between the two.Both cameras use two AA batteries.  Both have optical viewfinders.  Both have more modes than the casual picture taker will ever need.In my hands, the picture quality is almost indistinguishable.  In some settings I prefer the Olympus; in others, the Canon, so the A570SI is going to be returned since I'm well within the return period.  However, if I had the option of returning the Olympus, too, I'd keep the Canon.  Here's why:* The Canon is slightly smaller.  The bulge on the Olympus makes it harder to find a suitable case.* The Canon's mode selector dial clicks firmly into place, unlike the Olympus's which is very loose.  The Olympus's dial often moves when the camera is removed from its case.  Not so, the Canon.* The Canon has 4x zoom compared to the Olympus's 3x.  Also, the digital zoom is better implemented in the Canon.  The Canon stops at full optical zoom.  If the zoom slider is released and reengaged, the digital zoom is applied.  This is true even in Auto mode.  The Olympus's digital zoom is not readily available in every mode.  When digital zoom is available or turned on, it lacks the Canon's pause at the end of optical zoom.pause.* The A570IS uses a standard mini-B USB connector rather than what appears to be a proprietary type for the Olympus.None of these--or even all of them together--are enough to make me keep the Canon and put the Olympus up on eBay or Half, but they'd be enough to get me to pick the Canon if I didn't already own the Olympus</review_text>
I cant say enough about the ease of operation, and results of this camera... The photos are superb, and it handles nicely.I cant wait to get the telephoto conversion lens for it.Not to be advised, but It dropped off my side table without the case and was none the worse for wear, thank goodness. A sturdy camera well worth the price.</review_text>
Last year, after extensive research, I bought a Canon A540 to replace my trusty Olympus D40-Zoom. My goals for camera selection where (a) compact size, (b) standard AA batteries, (c) full manual controls, (d) outstanding image quality, (e) speed, (f) optical viewfinder. The A540 fit the bill almost perfectly, with a handful of limitations that I noted in my review.This year, with Canon's release of the A570IS, I decided to upgrade, driven by the addition of optical image stabilization (IS). While the IS is impressive, I was surprised by other improvements that Canon has made. Image noise levels are significantly lower and more controlled for higher ISO captures. The Digic III processor seems to make more intelligent decisions about lighting and flash exposure, especially when its face recognition is engaged. Add a dramatically better quality LCD screen, slightly higher 7.1MP resolution, improved case, and support of high capacity SD cards, and I doubt I'll need to upgrade any time soon.Like the A540, the A570IS is for me a perfect balance of size, speed, and photo quality. The A570IS is the same physical size as the A540. It's small enough to fit in a coat pocket or small belt case yet uses 2 AA batteries.Like the A540, overall processing speed is very fast unless you're taking flash pictures (and then you should expect about 4-6 seconds between flashes depending on battery level and what flash strength the camera selected). Note that flash time is significantly better with high-capacity rechargeable NiMh batteries than with standard AAs. And, unlike some other cameras I have tried, the speed of the user interface (especially during playback) is very fast.Picture quality in general is excellent, even in low light situations. Noise at higher ISO is significantly more controlled than the A540, perhaps a benefit of the new 7.1MP CCD and the Digic III image processor. According to the documentation, noise reduction is applied at slow shutter speeds of 1.3 seconds or greater, and this can slightly slow down shot-to-shot time. There is no option to disable or adjust the noise processing, but in my experience the results are very good. When noise reduction is applied, there is a slight loss of detail compared to the A540, but the results are noticeably better on the A570IS with its built-in noise reduction than post-processing noise on pictures taken with the A540.In my own head-to-head comparisons between the A570IS and A540, the A570IS has better light metering and noticeably sharper detail on indoor shots without a flash (especially when image stabilization is engaged). The A570IS does favor slightly higher ISO in auto modes than the A540, giving generally better results without a flash. However, when taking close-up pictures with a flash, the A570IS doesn't seem to select anything lower then ISO 200, sometimes requiring a manual ISO override in Program mode.The A570IS offers a new ISO 1600 mode, but I'm not quite sold on it. Without a tripod, under low light conditions, ISO 1600 does offer the opportunity for blur-free photographs not possible with ISO 800. But the level of noise and artifacts from the noise processing don't give a very usable picture.The A570IS raises the bar with optical image stabilization, which only works when the camera is held horizontally. One of the biggest limitations of consumer digital cameras is the need to hold the camera steady to get a clear shot. At higher zooms and in night shots this problem can be compounded. I've taken a number of shots with and without IS, and it is useful but not a "magic bullet" for poor shots. Small details like far-away signs at night become clear when the IS is engaged. You can set the IS to run continuously during preview, only when the shutter is released (slightly lower battery drain), only on vertical movement (better for objects that are moving horizontally), or disabled (I have yet to find a reason to do so). And, unlike many cameras I've seen, the IS works in video capture mode.Like the A540, the A570IS offers full manual controls. With the A570IS, Canon adds two more modes (Kids & Pets and Indoor) to the mode selector wheel (instead of having to find them on the Special Scene menu). The A570IS also adds a new Aquarium scene mode, while removing the useless Color Swap and Color Accent modes. Canon has also removed the "My Camera" customization menu (for changing the startup picture and various sounds) which I never used on my A540.Although I never expected to use it, the movie mode is excellent. It's still not a replacement for a dedicated camcorder. But I have used it on a number of occasions to capture audio and video when a picture just won't do. Standard movie mode is 640x480 (VGA) quality at 30fps, but you can raise the capture to 60 fps at 320x240, or lower it to 15fps at 160x120. The A570 can now capture video up to 1 hour or 4GB whichever comes first. Video files are very large (around 1.9MB/second at 30fps) but they compress extremely well with QuickTime Pro's MPEG4 codec.With the A570IS, Canon also addressed some of my minor complaints about the A540. Most notably, the LCD screen is much higher quality and higher resolution. The case plastics seem more solid, the small rubber door covering the USB - A/V - power ports pivots open from the side not the top, and the handle area no longer has a chrome insert which had a tendency to fall off. The ring that covers the conversion lens adapter mount has a chrome trim, making the camera more attractive but at least on my A570IS it is more difficult to remove than the A540.Once again, I looked at the Canon A710IS which offers a 6x optical zoom, but has the same 7.1MP sensor, optical image stabilization and user interface with the older Digic II image processor. In the end, after trying both cameras in the store, I again settled on the A570IS. The A710IS is noticeably larger (about 0.25 inches wider and slightly taller), and the more complicated lens takes longer to startup and to zoom. Both cameras have a limited number of stops in their zoom range, but this is noticeable on the 6x of the A710IS where it is not noticeable in the 4x of the A570IS. For me, the larger size wasn't worth the extra zoom. And the benefits of Digic III are impressive.In summary, Canon A570IS Pros:- 7.1 megapixel sensor, 4x optical zoom- ISO 80 to 1600- optical image stabilization for higher ISO or zoom, even during video capture- optical viewfinder for shooting with the LCD off- full manual controls (shutter priority, appeture priority, full manual)- preset and custom white balance control- outstanding photo quality, even in relatively low light (good color balance, very low noise at higher ISOs, almost non-existent chromatic aberation)- Digic III processor offers face detection, makes more intelligent decisions on exposure, and flash levels- very good results from built-in noise reduction for slow shutter speeds of 1.3 seconds or greater- very fast startup and shot-to-shot speed (flash not withstanding)- excellent and speedy auto-focus even in low light (although the AF assist light can slow this down)- orientation sensor recognizes if you have rotated the camera to take a shot- flash adjusts angle based on wide-telephoto zoom- built-in red eye reduction during playback lets you select an area to remove red eye and save as new or overwrite the existing image- surprisingly usable movie mode- outstanding user interface: options are well laid out and easy to locate, very well thought-out record and playback options- extremely fast user interface and playback performance, even zooming in on photos- high resolution LCD screen- well built case, very comfortable grip- uses SD cards and supports high-capacity SDHC (takes advantage of high-speed SD)- uses 2 AA batteries (at least 2500 mAh NiMh rechargeable recommended)- very good battery life (approx 400 shots on 2 rechargeable NiMh AA, with the display on)- replaceable lithium battery protects settings when changing batteries- supports optional high-power flash, conversion lenses and underwater caseCons (to me, all very minor):- flash recharge time is acceptable but not great (4 - 6 seconds between shots using NiMh batteries)- preview display blanks while flash recharges- Auto ISO for indoor flash close-up pictures doesn't seem to select below ISO 200;  you can force ISO 100 in Program or manual modes- ISO 1600 is of questionable real-world use because of noise and artifacts from noise reduction- noise reduction cannot be adjusted or disabled- it is possible to insert the SD card upside down and you don't realize until you try to close the cover (would be easy to break the cover if you force this)- the markings for the battery orientation are difficult to read- no RAW image support, but you can select from 3 different compression ratios for image qualityTIPS:1) make sure you do a low-level format before you use your SD card in this camera, even if you had formatted it for another Canon camera. It makes a significant difference in shot-to-shot speed2) always use high-capacity (2500 mAh or greater) NiMh rechargeable batteries - the flash recharge time is much improved (though still 4-6 seconds)3) for indoor flash close-up shots, may need to override ISO to 100 for better quality4) for outdoor shots in bright sun, setting exposure -2/3 gives better control of bright areas5) if you use the conversion lens adapter, don't plan on using the built-in flash which is partially obscured by the adapter. I haven't tried it, but would expect the external flash to not have this problem</review_text>
I Used to have the sd600 this blows it away.Great for taking pics from a moving car.The IS is worth every penny for the zoom shots!fast action too</review_text>
Excellent case for your Olympus Camera. Soft and subtle. Fast return on your order, no problems what so ever</review_text>
I will admit, I was new at the whole camera buying experience.  Frankly, I hate having to be responsible for keeping track of something so small and expensive when I am out getting wasted, but I am glad I made the purchase.  I needed something that would help me remember what happened the night before.  It is simple to use, and there isn't one of those confusing wheels on the top with funky symbols.  This guy knows what I'm talking about.Since I was dreading having to carry around a camera, size was definitely an issue.  When I took the camera out of the box, its size blew my mind.  If there is one downfall that I've noticed, it has to be the camera is almost too small.  Make sure you use the wrist strap when using... Especially if you drink as much as I do... WOW!  Does anyone have a spare liver I could borrow?  Preferably one that is clean and free of cirrhosis</review_text>
I really like this camera its so cute, the only thing that is annoying is when I download pictures to my computer, which I do often, the camera has to be on its charger plugged in and then the cameras usb cord has to be plugged in to the computer too of course so I have cord (3) going everywhere. I wish I was able to just sync the camera into the computer by itself alone. But the camera is GREAT a very easy to use.  I really enjoy it. I would recommend this camera to you.</review_text>
This is a very good point and shoot digital camera! I tested cameras from all of the major manufacturers and decided on this one for my wife for one simple reason - the shutter lag time is almost non-existant. It's almost like using a film camera. Picture quality is decent, as is the movie quality.If you want a fast reacting point and shoot digital camera, this is it.</review_text>
This camera works really well.  I like the fact that you can take it with you anywhere because of how small it is.  It is perfect for traveling and taking pictures</review_text>
I first saw this camera on display at radio shack and fell in love with it. I loved the color, the size and the display window on the back. But they were out of stock so I searched amazon, and voila, there it was. I ordered it with 2 day shipping so I could get it right away and so far I am satisfied with my purchase. It's pretty and I can't wait to develop some photos. This camera also takes videos as well; A huge plus. I also bought a memory card and I was thinking about getting the case, but I didn't. Now I wish I could've gotten it because I like to take it places and it often just gets thrown around in my backpack (prone to scratches and whatnot). Anyways I love this camera and I hope it lasts a while because I plan to use it well. Just be carefull, it is easy to drop</review_text>
This camera is fast, small, and lightweight.  Last year, we purchased the S500, so we knew what we were getting.  The camera goes everywhere you go and will fit in any pocket.  I think the picture quality is incredible.  The camera is simple to operate and downloads the photos quickly using the provided docking station.  It isn't the big do-everything high dollar camera, but for the money, it has all the features of the big camera in a small compact case</review_text>
I was very pleased with the Canon 18x50 IS binoculars. We took them to the Galapagos Islands and they performed well. Teh IS really assists with ship rocking and minor shakes. I have a few thoughts that would make these binoculars more user friendly.1. Try to make them lighter. My wife found it difficult to carry them for extended periods of time.2. Please add fip open ocular and objective lens caps rather than the loose caps. These get lost and the ones tied to the binocular body make it easier to cover the lneses in inclement weather.3. Making the units water proof and not just resistent would be a big factor for those of us who use the binoculars in nature photography especiall in a canoe or kayak.4. Having an optional camera adaptor would be great for photography buffs.Overall this binocular is a great addition to the human eye.</review_text>
I bought these for an upcoming alaskan cruise and boy and I glad I did. We had some other 10x25 binocs that I used for years and wanted an upgrade to something more substantial. These are amazing! They are so clear and the stabilization is the most impressing aspect of them. I have used them at least once a day since buying them for bird watching, astronomy (the moon looks amazing) and for watching a new housing development go in about 3 miles away. My parents are considering getting a pair for the cruise too, I plan to share but I don't think I'll want to be without these for long. Wonderful product that I plan to use for years to come</review_text>
I needed a good set of binoculars for my wife & me. We are in excellent bear & deer country in Wisconsin and like to ride around watching the wildlife. I am a disabled Vietnam Vet and my hands shake a lot. Spotting scopes and high powered binoculars never worked well for me in the past. You touch them and everything goes out of focus. These image stabilizers work great! For the first time I can really zoom in and see clearly. They are a little heavy and you wouldn't want to carry them around your neck long. But overall I love them</review_text>
The problem with high power binoculars is that humans can't hold them steady, and that jitter makes it impossible to really look at something without a tripod. The image stabilization in this pair solves that problem and holds things rock steady. This is an expensive product that clearly distingues itself, and one of those products that technology makes seem a little magic.I have only two small complaints: First, for a product this expensive they should pre-install the neck strap for you -- not a big deal, but it would be nice for the customer. Second, I wish the lens cap covers were higher quality and attachable to the unit so they wouldn't get lost. Again, not a big deal.These are without a doubt the best binoculars I've ever used</review_text>
First, I couldn't decide between Fujinon and Canon and then I was never able to take them outside and try them out and/or compare them. So, I finally just bought a pair of Canon 18x50s and hoped for the best when they arrived and I looked thru and pushed the IS button.Boy, what a waste of several years. Why didn't I buy a pair when they first came out? I could have been using them all this time. Instead, I dithered over cost vs. results and really regret the fun I missed in the meanwhile.The only difference in these versus regular binocs is one button. When you push it, there's a little click and from then on, WOW. After investing plenty in telescopes, computer tracking mounts, etc., these should have been a much higher priority. Oh yeah, they're light enough to take anywhere and the viewing fatigue is really that much less than with others (especially since my hands are really pretty shaky anyway and I drink plenty of coffee)</review_text>
This a very durable, attractive Case & the camera fits perfectly.  The only thing I would change is the belt loop be stitched rather than the snap as the case catches on bus or airline seat arm rest and pulls loose</review_text>
I would qualify myself as an amateur who likes to record stuff when on a trip, a walk in the woods, a cruise around town, or with family. I am very happy with my purchase of the F10. It makes great photographs, it is quite intuitive for most of the important features. The small size makes it easy to stow away in a coat pocket, although I now use Fuji's carrying case that has a belt loop, which should be more convenient in the sumemr. An important part of why I love this camera is that I basically don't have to wait to take the next picture even when using a setting that produces a file size of 1.4Mb.</review_text>
This is a very good, fancy looking case for my FujiFilm camera with a nice and sturdy body. Looks awesome. The only problem i see with this camera is that it doesn't protect the whole camera, which looks good but still makes me a little bit worried when i put it in  a bag with other things.Overall, a good buy</review_text>
This is a very nice case.  Rigid, and well made leather.  Note:  this case is NOT intended to completely seal your camera -- no ziper.  The design is more rigid and also allows you to unsnap a strap to fasten the case to your belt -- very cool.  The other strap snaps open the top where the F10 slides in and out.  When attached to your belt, its really easy to quickly get the camera in and out for rapid access and the snap securely protects the camera. It works similar to a cell phone!You will need to add the small camera cord that comes with the F10 to the camera -- this makes it easy to pull it out of the case.Very happy with this case</review_text>
Rigid construction with belt loop,fits camera snugly and provides excellent protection for F10</review_text>
I would recommend this case for your Panasonic camera.  I took it on a trip to Europe recently and it worked perfectly.  I wore it on my belt, which kept the camera easily accessible without having to worry about putting it down somewhere and forgetting it.  It fits and protects perfectly, the price was right, and it weighs almost nothing.I didn't give it the full five stars only because I would have preferred better quality leather - picky, picky ..</review_text>
I live in a rural area with homes on acreage.  It's nice to step out to see what the dogs are barking at without scaring away whatever it is.  Don't expect movie style effects, but do expect to see without a flashlight</review_text>
Gave this as a present to a friend...loves it! The only complaint is that it only works (well) with absolute darkness (i.e. no full moon</review_text>
It's a nice little product and works very well.  It took me awhile to get the battery cover off though as I'm guessing they used a pneumatic drill at the factory to put that on.  I use it in the city, commensurate with my job, though and any type of red light or walk light will not be helpful for you seeing anything.  But what you pay for this little handy device isn't bad and it works within the restrictions of the tech</review_text>
I have used several types of night vision, 3rd generation that is, but as many of us can see, 3rd generation aint cheap. I went with this particular n/v because of price, and a fellow Deputy friend of mine owns one, and said he liked his. I have only one complaint the weight, it's a little heavy, but well built. Turn on the I/R, and wham it's like turning on a spot light, nice unit, works well, and if your interested in a great little night vision unit, you can't go wrong, quality product great price. Hope this helped...</review_text>
First, I know next to nothing about the technical aspects of these products. I've had this model for a month and here's what I know: This monocular is lightweight and very easy to use (just 3 buttons). I bought the inexpensive battery at the supermarket. At night with a distant street light and a quarter moon I could just make out the form of a cat over a hundred feet away, but with the infrared spotlight switched on I could see the cat in detail, like it was the middle of the day. I read the reviews of all the night vision products and decided on this slightly more expensive model. You can get some for less money, and they might be just as good; I don't know for sure. I went with this one and love it! If it suddenly dies on me or works poorly, I'll write another review to let you know</review_text>
More than expected at a great price</review_text>
this is a high quality product. i have experience in the military and have used third generation nvg's many many times while driving humvees at night w/only nvg's for night vision. this product is comparable to military nvg/s at a fraction of the cost.  second or third generation night vision will cost you thousand/s of dollars with a minimal return for performance. the later generations will last longer of course, due to first generation tubes burning out somewhat quicker than later generations. if you factor in how many first generation units you could buy for second generation units this is a mute point.  the later generations do allow viewing at longer distances and at lower ambient light levels however. for the majority of people however, first generation is acceptable. when you pick up this unit you will feel quality. it is all metal with the majority being "armored" with a quality rubber shell. the controls are easy to use, the ir is effective for most uses. it comes w/storage bag, nice bonus. it uses 123 series lithium camera batteries for longer run time and longer storage time. they are expensive however, about 6-7 dollars apiece. there is some distortion on the perimeter of your viewing, but small price to pay for price/performace of this product. whatever you buy this product for, whether for viewing wildlife, security, or just to have a cool gadget around, this is the finest first generation night vision product around. and yes, amazon is the best deal you will find. as usual, fast shipping and excellent service w/amazon. when second/third generation products come down in price, i will be the first to buy one, until then however....this simply is the finest you can buy. the only complaints i have w/this product is the omission of a tripod mount and it seems they could have designed the battery compartment latch better. minor details in an otherwise excellent product. kudos to night owl and amazon</review_text>
perfect for a family, a mother, a child, for EVERYBODY! i've had it for 4 moths and its perfect. I can take all the pictures i want, etc etc. Everybody loves the color! Loved it!Buy it!</review_text>
I bought this camera for a trip down under a couple of month ago and I have been really impressed with the image quality. It takes great low light pictures and the steady shot technology works really well for longer shutter times. The camera is very small but feels solid in the hand due to excellent construction unlike some of the Casio ultra-compacts. Well worth the extra cost</review_text>
I wanted a good quality consumer grade digital camera to take on short trips, so I  purchased this one. I think the quality of the picures is very good and it has most of the features I wanted. It was a few dollars more than I really wanted to spend, but all in all I am pleased. My main complaint is the battery life is a little on the short side, and it takes a while to see the photo you just took on the lcd screen. I really want something to hold me for about two years, by then these things will be twice as good for a fraction of the cost. For now it does what I need it to do pretty well</review_text>
I use my 2nd battery as backup on my D40x. Works like a champ</review_text>
This battery just came out, so it was great to find it and at a very good price, very fast shipping</review_text>
After reading the reviews on here I was a little hesitant about it's high maintenance care, but you just need to follow some simple directions and it should give you plenty of life.It's amazing how functional the camera is with the case on. Every button and feature can be used (except infrared sensor, which must be turned off) even the flash shines threw the opaque cover that sits in the case.Loved the case for protecting my camera while skiing one of the best days of my life, now I got the pictures to prove it.Looking forward to testing it out underwater.</review_text>
I took my camera to Hawaii with the intention of bringing it swimming, kayaking, snorkeling and it worked like a charm. Clear, sharp pictures without leaking one bit of water. I used it in salt water and had it submerged for at least 15 minutes at a time swimming in the Pacific. You have to grease to lubriate the rubber sealing ring and follow the directions carefully in order for it to be leakfree. It comes with a tube of grease for the rubber seal, and anti-fog solution that you rub onto the lens. And you have to make sure the seal is in good condition (not twisted, and completely dust free). You also have to soak the case in the sink for 30 minutes after exposure to salt water. I guess you should buy new seals periodically if you detect any moisture inside. I like the strap and it comes with a buoy to keep the camera from sinking if it falls into the water.Iit has every control duplicated perfectly and you can operate the camera just as well as if it was wasn't in the case. The zoom, menu, cursor, camera modes, power, image stabilization off, external buttons are all accessible. I took movies as well as pictures.I think this is a better solution than buying a camera that is waterproof (e.g Pentax W20). You have a ultra small camera out of the case but a tough dunkable camera when you need it.Sony makes it very clear that it is not responsible if water does leak in, but so far, the thing works well.</review_text>
I was very excited about getting this since every time I take my camera to the beach I'm worried about getting water in it. When I got it I was a little discouraged; it has a rubber liner that has to be greased up before use (little annoying, but they give you the grease, it's basically just petroleum jelly, and it goes on easily enough) and it specifically states that if you damage the product while using the case it's not Sony's fault. So, I was terrified still the first time I used it. But after getting it all together and going on a whitewater rafting trip where I was able to take pictures down the whole river without worrying, I'm completely satisfied. The case worked flawlessly, not a drop of water got in, and I had it completely submerged more than once. Took a few great underwater shots.On the down side, I was really wanting to use this at the beach and in the ocean, but it warns in the manual salt water can get on the rubber liner, dry, and leave salt crystals there that can damage the liner and prevent it from working correctly.  So, I guess I won't be dunking it in the ocean anytime soon, or at least until I can find some replacement liners</review_text>
This is a wonderful tool to have for this camera.  I love my Sony camera but my husband thinks it is too small for him to hold without putting fingerprints all over the screen.  He likes using this because it makes the camera easier to hold without the fingerprints.  I took it to the beach and didn't worry about sand and water getting in my camera, either</review_text>
First, this product has been rated 4 stars because there are no cleaning cloth provided for the lens. i took a 2 pictures of a glass door in my house. 1 is with lens, 1 is without lens.(...)this picture was in noway edited. well now that u have the results, u can think a little easier whether to buy, or not buy this product.Pictures were taken with:DCR-TRV33Pictures were compressed using:Adobe Photosho</review_text>
Very quick service and delivery.  Great value and choice working with Amazon.  Have used their web site again already</review_text>
Good value if you need a spare battery and case</review_text>
The accessory kit is just what I wanted for my new Canon SD 630.  The case fits perfectly and the extra battery is a real plus</review_text>
It is good to get the case and strap for the price that other places sell the battery only.  Unfortunately, a spare battery is pretty much a necessity for the camera.  This case is pretty nice for carrying it around.  It fits the camera tight, so is not a "travel" case.  It isn't made to fit a spare battery or charger.  But, I've found you can jam a spare battery in there with the camera.  You do have to completely remove the camera to take a picture though and the battery will fall out while you're at it.  The strap is pretty nice, but the camera gets heavy around your neck after just a short time</review_text>
My Coolpix 8800 with the image stabilization and zoom is a real pleasure to use. I just wish somebody had pointed one thing out to me.  When I finally got my computer upgraded to handle large files, and tried some camera raw files, the Nikon PictureProject reported the raw (.nef) file was un supported.When I went to the Nikon web site which listed an update to process raw files, it asked for my camera serial number. It then rejected the number with a message that I might have a camera that wasn't a Nikon US camera, and cancelled the download.I'm not sure how this could be avoided, but recommend that any purchaser of a Nikon camera register it immediately while they can send it back for a refund if it doesn't meet Nikon US requirements. I still like the Nikon cameras and lenses, but I will point out this problem to anyone asking how I like my camera</review_text>
Again, I too will try not to duplicate the efforts of other reviews.I am not a pro, but I am a pretty advanced user, and this at least my 6th digital camera (I used to work in the industry so it was easy to get them; I didn't have a whole bunch break on me).  I bought it because I wanted a great camera for hobby shooting but didn't want to have to deal with separate lenses.  This is not a "first-digital-camera"; it's better suited for people who are pretty familiar with digital cameras and are looking for a camera that can be grown into.You can choose the "point-and-shoot" option or any of several manual options.  If you wish to employ the manual controls, the camera DOES take practice.  There are a lot of bells and whistles, as someone else mentioned, and I would highly recommend reading the instruction manual and experimenting with it before you take it on a big vacation (and bring the manual too).The image quality is fantastic, even when you are maxing out the zoom.  I take my pictures at 8MP and "fine" quality; anything larger is just overkill unless you're printing 20"x30" prints.  The Nikon has the in-camera option of creating a compressed copy of any picture you take (for e-mailing, etc.).I use the Macro feature a lot, and I took a picture of a caterpillar on a plant and even at a 4x6 print size, I could see the hair folicles on its feet.I also appreciate the Vibration Reduction feature (which you can turn off) and the flip-out LCD screen.  Before I purchased it, I looked at the Canon 6MP Digital Rebel (which felt too big in my hands) and the Sony 8MP (which, like most Sony items, is of good quality but pricey).  I ultimately decided on the Nikon because it felt comfortable in my hands, had a good reputation, and had high resolution and a flip-out screen.There is lag time, as there is with any digital camera.  I don't notice that it's any better or worse than other digital cameras I've used.  If you want no-lag, you need to look at the D-70 or another digital SLR.The battery life is really very good, as far as digital cameras go, and the battery doesn't add much weight to the camera.  If you are going on vacation or spend a while getting your pictures "just right" before you take them, buy an extra battery--you won't regret it.I started using the SanDisk Ultra II 1GB CF card and since have not run out of memory during an outting.If you decide you want to go with the 8800, here are some accessories you may want to consider:Spare battery (EN-EL7)Lens Hood (HN-CP14)Nikon Lens Pen (removes dust from body and lens)1.0GB CF cardLowepro Rezo 140 AW camera bag which holds EVERYTHING mentioned here with room to spareI have had my Nikon for over a year now, and I have not experienced any lens error problems (or otherwise) so far.  I'm sorry that people have had trouble with it because it's really an excellent camera and I haven't once regretted purchasing mine.  In a heartbeat, I would buy this camera again</review_text>
I won't repeat all the stuff in the other reviews.  Let me just say that I bought this camera to replace the D100, a fine Nikon DSLR.  I was tired of the "lens fever" that is never ending.  Also, the bulk and weight of all the equipment was tiring.The 8800 has some lag, just like all non-slr cameras.  But, I've learned to live with it. I just pace myself.  The continuous shooting modes give you ample opportunity to shoot action sports.The quality of the pictures is awesome.  The zoom lens gives me all that I had with my 5 pound lens.Speed isn't everything and maybe this camera isn't for everyone, but it's meeting my needs.  I'm not going back to my DSLR</review_text>
I've owned the 5700, then the 8700, and now the 8800. I've also owned a half-dozen high-level 35 mm film cameras over the years, beginning with the Nikon S2 in the 1950s ^|^. The 8800 is a fine upgrade and the 10X zoom and VR is FABULOUS! I do a lot of macro work, and tripods are not really always necessary these new days.Best of all is the image quality: vibrant, plenty of "snap," and when recorded at 8Fine Jpeg, easily enlargeable/croppable to really big prints, with resolution to spare. AF works well, controls are more logically placed than its predecessors, still with far more bells and whistles than I'll ever use but they're not in the way. One TERRIFIC digicam. Complaints: ALL accessories are unique and available only at great price from Nikon. Bah</review_text>
The only knock on it is that it needs more dampening, but that has been covered ad nauseum in other reviews and magazine articles.  I took photos of the moon with this lens that were just stunning</review_text>
This is my first vibration reduction lens. I love it, now I can hand-hold shots if I need to. I haven't had mine long so haven't used it a lot yet, but images are sharp and contrasty. The lens feels well built but isn't heavy. The one downside is the slow minimum aperture, which means the lens can struggle to focus in low light or when pointing at something in shadow with a polarizer on the front.Do not let Amazon sell you the Tiffen Haze-1 UV filter to go with this lens, it causes focus errors and unwanted reflections in the captured image. If you want a protective filter for this lens, you have to pay the money and get a multicoated one</review_text>
I had the previous Nikkor 70-300 mm f/4-5.6 G version, which was lighter and much slower to focus and not VR. VR is a godsend, helps me handhold in low light with low shutter speeds. Very nice lens. I use it every day for my bird blog. It's about twice as heavy as the G version and that's bothersome, but for the price it's amazing</review_text>
I"M TRULY ENJOYING MY NIKON D80 AND THIS FINE ED LENS FROM NIKONIT TRULY IS A STEP UP FROM MY NIKON 8800.......WHICH WAS ALSO A GREAT PRODUCT, THIS LENS WILL REALLY DO A FINE JOB FOR MOST OF YOUR PHOTOGRAPHIC NEEDS..........BE SURE AND PUT A 67MM UV FILTER ON THE FRONT OF YOUR INVESTMENT TO PROTECT THE GLASS OF YOUR FINE LENSENJOY..........</review_text>
Absolutely great for daylight handheld photography. Legendary Nikon quality photographs are easily obtained with this lens. I use it mostly for nature photography and recently returned from Florida with some excellent close up shots of some birds. The VR works very well in hand held use. It is a big, heavy lens but is a worthy addition and deserving of the Nikon name.Dav</review_text>
The Nikkor 70-300mm VR Lens is everything I hoped it would be.  I am able to get much closer to whatever I am photographing, and the pictures come out crisp, clear and colorful.  I'd recommend this lens to any photo enthusiast</review_text>
After exhaustive research on many lens, I finally decided to plunk down the $500+ (at the time this was written) to purchase this lens.  It may not be the best on the market but it compliments my Nikon 18-70mm DX lens nicely.  I was looking towards Nikon's 18-200mm DX lens, however; the price pushed me to choose this one (as it was nearly half the price and my two lens can nearly cover all the range of the one 18-200mm).QUALITY/WEIGHT:build quality is cheap yet sturdy... the plastic is a little chinky but cuts down on the weight.  My Nikon D200 has no problem handling the lens weight, however; I have heard (unconfirmed) reports that this lens is a little heavy for the lighter cameras (D80, D70, D40, ETC).  The Ring Connector is metal and has a rubber gasket on the outside so as to provide minor protection (for the lens mount) from the elements.You also have to keep this in mind, when discussing weight, quality & price; the bulk of the price of this lens is going into the glass elements (all 17 elements of them).  It gets expensive when you place that many high-quality optics into a tube.  I'm really not that surprised a the price, although $400 price-range would probably be more suitable for this lensFOCUSING/LENS ATTRIBUTES:Focusing can be quite fast... at times.  You'll find, at the Max 300mm focal range, that the lens has a pretty hard time auto-focusing in on a subject.  At times it would focus pretty quick, at the 300mm range, while at others it cannot focus at all.  You can get around this quirk by bringing the subject into near focus (manually) then letting the auto-focus take over; it works every time. I find this focus problem disappointing especially given the price of this lens.The quality of the Bokeh (Out of focus areas of the photograph) is very nice and pleasing.  The images are sharp, vignetting (dark areas in the corner of your photos) is hard to find and lens flare rarely a problem.VIBRATION STABILIZATION:All I can say is that it works... it can come in handy.  It's not going to stop the image guaranteed for you; it's only meant to slow down the rate at which the camera moves (vibration from holding).  You can notice the difference; with it off you'll see that the image (at say 300mm) really bouncing around; then you flick on VR.  It takes a sec or two but then the image smooths out, it still wobbles around, but much more slowly.With VR enabled, you can usually go 2-3 (sometimes 4) stops down, then what you'd normally be able to do when hand holding.THE "SHOCK" TEST:I haven't "shock tested" my lens yet (IE dropped it) but I have heard (again unconfirmed reports here) that it holds up pretty well to a drop... although I would never recommend testing that out.IMPORTANT NOTE:The 70-300mm range should be noted:  Although the lens states that it is a 70-300mm zoom, this lens was intended for a 35mm camera or full-frame CCD/CMOS sensor Digital Camera.  All (or at least the majority) of Nikon's DSLR (D200, D80, ETC) are NOT Full-Frame sensors.  They are approximately 1.5x factor of a full-frame sensor (due to the smaller sensor size).What does this all mean?Well it's simple, since this is a 35mm lens and not a DX lens (ie built to account for the 1.5x factor in most nikon digitals) you have to apply the 1.5x conversion.  This means that the Nikon 70-300mm on a Nikon DSLR will give an apparent zoom equivalent to a 105-450mm lens.  I actually do not mind this apparent zoom and this should also cut down on vignetting; as what the lens projects onto the sensor is larger then the area of the sensor itself.  In short: parts of the image spills over the sensor, since this lens was meant to project onto a full-frame sensor/35mm film.CONCLUSION:Pros:Pleasing BokehFast Auto-Focus (when working properly)Vignetting is minimalImage Stabilization (VR)Flare is minimal1.5x factor (105-450mm) makes for nice zoomColors are very goodCONS:Plastic CasingNear Inability to Auto-Focus at 300mm rangePrice (even though it is cheaper then the 18-200mm DX)1.5x factor (105-450mm) might make it more zoom then you needLens could be faster (F/4 would have been nice)I love this lens, even for it's quirks, however; you may want to wait till it drops in price a little more (it falls almost bi-weekly).  It may not be the fastest on the market, but it's size, optics, image quality and VR make this a must have lens for Serious Nikon users!</review_text>
THIS IS AN EXCELLENT PRODUCT WHEN IT COMES TO FOOLING PEOPLE. I USED THIS IMITATION CAMERA ON MY BUSINESS AND NO CRIME EVER SINCE. ITS REALISTIC APPERANCE REALLY LOOKS LIKE THE REAL THING! IT ALSO HAS A RED LED LIGHT THAT FLASHES TO ADD TO THE EFFECT. VERY EASY TO INSTALL! LESS THAN 5 MIN FOR ME. JUST SIMPLY TAKE THE PRODUCT OUT OF THE PACKAGE INSTALL THE AA BATTERIES AND THEN SIMPLY MOUNT. I LIKED THE PRODUCT SOO MUCH THAT I BOUGHT MULTIPLE. IT NOW LOOKS LIKE I HAVE A FULLY OPERATING SECURITY CAMERA SYSTEM AT MY BUSINESS. WOULD HIGHLY RECCOMEND!!!JOSH R</review_text>
As advertised. Would buy more. Blinking light seals the deal. I use the real ones at home but at our office the fakes are good enough. People take notice</review_text>
Great service, the case and battery arrived on time as promised</review_text>
After I spent much money for my S80, I wanted to find the perfect case to carry it around and I am very picky!  This was the first one I considered, but after so many bad reviews, I marked it off my list and kept looking.  I bought a semi-hard case from bodyglove but abandoned it because it was too large and it made me not want to take my camera anywhere.  Then I bought a cheap 3.99 case from Target that was super small and light and protected my camera well enough from scratches while in my purse but offered no screen protection.  It was slightly too small  and the zipper kept catching the strap as I had to always stuff it in.  Finally, I decided to buy this case despite the negative reviews when I saw my sister's canon case for her S450.  This was just what I was looking for all along!  It is soft and form fitting so it will still fit in my purse.  It is easy to get my camera out quickly so I don't miss those shots!  And it even has a hard front and back so I know the screen wont get scratched or punctured while in my bag.  So if this sounds like the kind of case you are looking for, don't be scared away by the negative reviews!</review_text>
This met my needs completel</review_text>
Shipping is within the schedule. Product quality is real good. I like it and recommend to anybody else to buy this case to protect your camera</review_text>
I just needed a nice, slim case to protect the outer casing of my camera -- I wasn't looking for anything heavy duty, no storage compartments, no bulky padding. Love it</review_text>
I received the merchandise on time as promised in excellent (new) condition. Thank you.</review_text>
The case is well worth it - a perfect fit and quite protective, the camera strap fits into a hole in the flap so it's all very compact and efficient.</review_text>
I am completely satisfied with the overall value of this camera.  The picture quality is great and it is very easy to use.  The LCD is clean and bright.  The video capture lacks a little, but for the price I don't think you could get any better.</review_text>
After owning and using the camera for a month or so now, I am delighted with it.  I have only replaced the batteries one time, so don't know what the review hullabuloo about that was for.  small lightweight, many features.  choice of 6 meg, 5, 4, 3, 2, and 1 meg photos at fingertips.  What I really decided on this camera for was the MACRO capability as I take photos of very small coins, and must be able to get in within an inch or two to do that.  It preforms magnificantly.  My previous camera had to add additional lens to do this which was a hassle.  I love the Samsung digimax S600.</review_text>
This camera takes awesome pictures, even at long distances in infinity mode.Just got some pics of a moose 1/2 mile away. The only complaint I have is the battery usage. I've had the camera powered on for probably 20 minutes total, and it shut off due to 'low battery'. Testing the batteries indicated ~80% power left, so I don't know if there's a flaw in the camera's power sensor or what.</review_text>
I got this camera for my daughter for Christmas...it is a great little camera!!  Small enough she can throw it in her purse and go and it takes great pictures.  It has many cool extra little features too...like memo and movie.  Only fault we've found is it does not come with a memory card.  Not a big deal as it does have internal memory, she just went out and got a new memory card to hold extra pictures.  I'd highly recommen</review_text>
I purchased this for my son and he really likes everything about the camera. He loves the quality of pictures.  He did mention the camera has a proprietary cable that hooks to his computer - just an FYI</review_text>
This radar gun works for hockey pucks too.  I crouched behind the net and zapped the oncoming slapshots.  Just remember to wear protective gear when behind the net, especially a full face helmet.  When the shots miss the net, the pucks will bounce off the boards and find you.</review_text>
This radar gun works fine for me.  I didn't have the problems others have reported.  The trigger does have a sweet spot as reported in another review, but it is a minor problem. The gun has a baseball mode, but I use it for measuring the speed of cars. It works whether the car is coming toward you or away form you. I also tried it from my vehicle and read the speed difference between me and cars passing as well as the combined speed of mine and those approaching. You can easily figure the real speed by additon or subtraction. I was surprised to find it will read my speed just by  pointing straight out the windshield.  I don't know how, but it does. I guess it reads stationary objects up ahead, although there were no signs or bridges nearby. It claims to read car speed at 1300 ft, so maybe it was locked on a structure far off. The smaller the object, the closer it has to be. I locked onto a 14 mph dog at about 200 feet</review_text>
I bought this tripod a short while ago, and I'm extremely glad I did.  It's very light and easy to carry around, even without a carrying bag or even a handle, neither of which it comes with.  The bubble level built into it is very handy to have and works well.  And with a little practice, you can break and set it, camera attached, in 10 to 15 seconds (provided you keep the quick release tab screwed to the bottom of your camera, like I do), so you won't miss that once in a lifetime shot.  It's also very inexpensive and easy to use, with a head that has a fantastic range of movement.  And while the legs, when fully extended, don't bring it all the way up to eye level, it brings it close enough to keep you comfortable while looking through the camera.  If need be, just buy a small folding travel chair to carry with you and use with the tripod</review_text>
Received the tri-pod yesterday, purchased based on positive reviews on Amazon, very disappointed. The tri-pod is 80% plastic. All the controls are plastic, how long will this last is debatable. The weight should have been a clue. Lesson learned see it in person first. Would not buy again.</review_text>
I bought this tripod just a few days ago through Amazon.com.  First, it shipped on time and arrived on the first estimate date.  It's got the basic features, and although it may not stand up to the wilderness, it certainly is well made.  All the movements are smooth, and don't jerk at all.  I have owned a couple of cheaper tripods from wal-mart, and paid $25 for them.  This is only a little more money, but you get a lot of quality for the price</review_text>
I bought this at amazon at more than $40..now it's $5 less after only 2 weeks. Sheesh..Anyway, the tripod itself is stylish with it's black color and very useful because of it's 3 way pan and it's maximum height is around 56". It's lightweight and it seems durable enough for normal photoshoot sessions. If only this had a case or something, then it will be easier to carry anywhere you go. Might have to buy a separate case for that purpose</review_text>
First of all i'am satisfied with Amazon free shipping i got the tripod after a week wich is before the begining of the estimate date.The tripod is really nice and good looking, it's black and metal and controlers and knobs are very smooth also it gives you the ability to move your camera to different angles.I got this tripod because of one reason, which is that i failed to take pictures at night using the night scene mode (which is the best of the camera's settings to take pictures at night) without coming out blurry and simply, this tripod does the job</review_text>
Light, easy to use and adjust, classy looking....its a Sony!  I am very pleased with the VCTR640 and would highly recommend it. It is very stable and pans with ease.  You can spend more....but you will not find a better product!</review_text>
This tripod stand is very sturdy and its not that heavy that means you can carry this stand with you very easily. The only thing it lacks it the Case with the handle with the help of which it could be easier to carry it.</review_text>
well i bought this on wed night and recieved it fri night, you just have to love amazons free shipping, it simply amazes me at how fast they ship out.now about the tripod, its mostly metal which i like and its all black which i also like. it has a bubble level which comes in very handy when outdoors on uneven surfaces. all the controls move very nice and smooth which was my biggest concern with buying a tripod online and not being able to try it first hand. though i read some reviews online about this tripod and i was happy with what i read. i only wish that it had a handle to make it easier to carry but i have only seen bigger tripods with the handle. all in all its great and i love it, also it was only 5.94 since i used my 25GC from amazon weeeeeeeeeeif you dont want to spend much i def recommend this one as it out performs all the crap that circuit city had to offer</review_text>
I owe alot to this little camera.  I just bought the nikon D80 and I am keeping it because it has never let me down.  It got me a job as a photographer with it's clear images and high resolution my clients were always stunned (i do architecture photography)...I now have a very succsessful freelance business and I am a PROFESSIONAL PHOTOGRAPHER!I can't say enough on how much I appreciate the opportunity this camera gave me.  I LOVE THIS CAMERA!!!Also I may add its a trooper...I have used and abused and never has it gotten wierd...People look at it and always tell me"wow big camera it looks very professional...and i would laugh and say nope its a pro-sumer camera...but its feels like a pro![............]***WARNING***This is not a camera for portraits or for action***BUT ITS GREAT FOR OUTDOORS, NATURE, ARCHITECTURE, ECT..</review_text>
This camera proved to perform better than I expected. Easy to operate, yet has so many bells and whistles. There are several tools and capabilities that come with this camera, it is very important to read the manual in its entirety in order to maximize the benefits. The basics stuff on it is so good it might deceive you into thinking you got it all. Its wide angle lens coupled with high resolution is an excellent solution for photographing my artwork for further work on my computer or for reproductions/printing.</review_text>
This my 3rd Nikon Coolpix.  995, 4500 and now the 8400.  Excellant photos, controls and the wideangle is terrific.  Nothing short of what I expected.  I could go on and on about its great auto and manual features.  However, just a word of what I don't like.  No ability to connect a remote control, probably just my gripe, but would have been nice to still utilize the USB port and the Nikon remote or the after market digi-snap that I used on my 995 or 4500.  Oh well. ALso, the limited ability to use various threaded filters for the len.  Nikon's (3) selections are limited.  I have found that a 37mm adapter to 52 or 55mm will work...but you still have to watch out very carefully not to cross thread putting it on AND taking it off. Lastly, when using their 3X tele converter from the 995 or 4500 it becomes a fixed focal length no zoom at all.  Also their 2X works as well for the applications I have use that on.  If you can live with these short comings you just love the output from the 8400.  I also had to adjust when using the "extra fine", getting 132 photos on a 1 GiG CF card.</review_text>
Update 3/06:Well, after using this camera for 3 months I have to come back with the following feedback:-it is heavier and bulkier than many 5mp cameras (does not fit in a standard pocket-size portable camera bag)-sometimes people's lips come out BLACK or PURPLE in the pictures-the shutter lag time is annoying (as someone reported above).  I haven't yet figured out a setting where the camera will take one shot exactly when I press the button if I just took another shot within the last few seconds.  So I get a few pictures of people with frozen smiles on their faces or miss some shots.  Can anyone offer some advice for this sticky situation?-other than that, I still love the camera - great resolution and if you have the red-eye reduction on it works pretty well, battery is easy to rechargeOriginal review:I purchased the Nikon Coolpix 8400 12/05It was rated first in Advanced Compact Digital Cameras category by Consumer Reports 11/05We got a big discount buying this camera through Amazon.com when there was a limited-time promotionIt was actually shipped by Ritz CameraComes with neck strap, battery and charger!  Does not have built-in memory so you need to separately buy a compact flash card.  A high-speed CF card would be a good idea.  I would also recommend you buy an extra rechargeable battery and a camera case.Per specs:  "Coolpix 8400, lens cap, strap, USB cable, audio video cable, rechargeable Li-ion battery EN-EL7, battery charger MH-56, remote controller ML-L3, PictureProject CD-ROM"I have changed the settings to take pictures in "Fine" resolution and they are running 1,600-2,500 KB in size.  "Extra fine" mode is also available but I don't think I will need to use it unless taking a super-important photo.We are upgrading from a Nikon Coolpix 5200 (the zoom button broke when I dropped it on the deck).  The 8400 is black, not silver, and a bit larger/heavier.  This digital camera is a big step up.  The 8400 seems to have better red-eye correction and a good backlit mode.  Some people have complained that on another Nikon camera the red-eye correction is automatic, whether you like it or not, however on the 8400 you do not need to worry about that because it is optional</review_text>
I bought this unit from Ritz Camera for $399.00, at that price it is a great value. As noted by another reviewer there is no memory card thankfully i had a few at home. The photos i shot the first time were stunning. Again if offered for $399.00 it is a no brainer for an 8mp digital camera</review_text>
I switched to digital a few years ago, and my little Olympus was fine for outdoor shots, but I missed my old Pentax Spotmatic, especially indoors without a flash.  I got this camera because of the recent lowered price.  I am very pleased that with the Nikon it's like having my old camara back, but with digital. It does everything extremely well, and learning the operation was simple.  I especilly like the P mode. I was worried that the steep discount in price meant something was wrong with the camera, but this doesn't seem to be the case.  Comparing it to similarly priced digitals, this is a great buy!People seem to be going for the big telephotos, but the wide angle lens is very handy. And I always wanted a Nikon...</review_text>
I took my first pictures ever using this film and it came out looking all right.  I suppose it wasn't crystal clear, but that was probably my fault.  I also think it has problems with low light.  Is that my fault?  Probably.  Who knows, it was nice to get it developed at Target, though</review_text>
This film worked really well for me when I took my first photography class. The price is right, and it performed well for the weekly asignments given to us in class</review_text>
This film is really a good one - I used about 3 rolls of these films and very happy.  I have also used Ilford XP2 Super - but, I prefer Kodak film.  I had taken several portraits with just home decoration light-stand and desk lamp - the film exposed correctly because of higher ASA.  Also, I like the convinience of printing in local shop.  The development cost is same as color printing - it is the best way to get B&W print cheap</review_text>
This is not true black and white film, it is color film with no color... but the results can still be quite nice if you ask the photo lab to print it on true black and white paper. You can have your prints back the back next day or even in 1 hour, depending on the lab. This is much nicer than the hassle of having true black and white sent away while you wait for a week</review_text>
I rated this camera at 5 for two reasons:1.) A highly polished product for a steal of a price.2.) It was more than I asked for when I walked into the store.I bought an Olympus D-460 for $450 a long time ago. 1.3 MP & 3x optical zoom. Then I bought this, a 5MP 6x optical zoom *with stabilization* for a quarter of the cost of the other one.I went in looking for a 5MP w/3x optical zoom and removable storage with the expectation of dropping $200. I did...but I also walked out with a 1GB SD card and an in-store repair plan. I've had enough experience with digital cameras to know that some type of plan is a virtual necessity.No, this is not a high end camera, nor does it pretend to be. But if you want something with decent resolution, with a bunch of presets, yet still allows you to customize your own shot, then this is your camera.I've been snapping pictures ever since I got home with it...taking some really difficult shots...the TV...the computer. Stuff in a dark closet. The only thing it couldn't do was take a decent picture of me...then again, a professional photographer with a $3000 camera and photoshop couldn't get a good picture of me. :-</review_text>
This is a wonderful camera.  It's simple to use, has fabulous zoom and a fantastic price.  I'm so pleased with it</review_text>
I originally bought this camera because of my job, now I use it for almost all of my picture taking. I have a 35mm canon rebel G EOS but I was always running to have film developed. I bought this camera so that I could get my pictures easier (and cheaper).It is a really easy camera to use. Mostly point and shoot, but it does allow you to control many options.We do a lot of horticultural diagnostics at work and are always getting calls to come out and figure out what is wrong with a plant or id an insect, plant etc. In macro mode this camera takes the best pictures of insects and small items. Our diagnostic clinic has been able to id mushrooms and diseases from this camera's pictures (which says a lot for this camera's quality).The size of the camera is awesome. It's small and lightweight and can fit in a purse or pocket. I was able to go out into an extremely muddy horse pasture yesterday to do diagnostic work and I was able to not worry about my camera because it was tucked away safely in my pocket. This is not something I could have done with my 35mm.I also use this camera outside of work. It does really well in low light. I have been able to take pictures in a dark auditorium during a choir concert without the flash on and the pictures come out great. It takes great landscape pictures.The software to download the pictures into the computer is really easy to use. Its set up to automatically download the photos as soon as you plug it into the USB port using the cable that comes with the camera. No special docks required.The only drawbacks to it are:1- you really need a SD card to supplement storage. Without it you can only store 4-7 pictures.2- I also recommend getting rechargeable batteries. These have saved me numerous times because you can tend to go through the batteries pretty fast when you use it as much as I do.Overall I highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I have been very pleased with this easy to use camera. It takes very good quality pictures and the price can't be beat</review_text>
This is a no brainer.  Works great to soften up the flash, in both direct and bounce application</review_text>
I have used this for a few months now and have really noticed a difference in my photos.I have a Nikon D50 and SB-600 flash. Prior to this purchased I had some very harsh flash effects such as over exposure on the faces and drastic shadows behind the subjects.Since then, I feel that I have been able to manage those effects much more easily.For the cost of the item, I would recommend it to anyone who uses flashes and wants to mute the effects some</review_text>
For such a simple product the difference in the lighting of my photos was dramatically increased when added to my SB600.  When taking close up photos faces are lit up and come out very clear.  Definitely a great addition to my camera gear</review_text>
Very simple, yet very effective diffuser. Gets rid of harsh shadows that a flash unit gives without one. Also softens the light and has great coverage when used as specified in the instructions</review_text>
I owned one of the previous models that was originally sold throughWallgreens as a returnable "one-time use" video camera.The theory was that you didn't actually "own" the camera.You would pay $30 for it; shoot some videos;then return it to the store and get a DVD of your videos.But of course, people figured out how to hack the camerato add a USB cable and download the videos, so you didn't needto return the camera to get the videos.So this new PSV-351 looks like the "legit" model that Pure Digitalcame out with to satisfy the demand of all the people buying theolder models and never returning them. Smart move! Instead of complaining,give pople what they want. If you can't beat 'em join 'em.Even at three times the price of what I paid for my hacked versionI would easily buy another legit one.I loved my hacked PSV. I kept telling people that "Pure Digitalshould sell these!" It's a very simple camera. It doesn't tryto pretend to be more than it is. It has very few features.But what it does do it does well. You push the big red button and it records good quality video (quality is impressive for the price).I'm a big fan of simple products that  work well -- like a Nintendo or an iPod.This camera looks a bit like a toy, but it's durable.This would actually make a good toy for a kid or an adult.The ergonomics are nice. It's comfortable to hold.The quality of construction is very good.I like the fact that it runs on two ordinary AA batteries, soyou don't need a charger.I would buy another one of these -- or maybe even a few of them.Buy a bunch of them and pass them out at a wedding.Duct tape one to your motorcycle helmet. Tie one to a kite</review_text>
I bought this on a lark, it just seemed like such fun and though I bought it back in Dec, I finally really used it today at a wedding, and I was shocked! It took great video inside the church where my (low end) digital camera could not. I wasn't sure how the video would actually turn out, but it was GREAT considering by the time things were done I paid $[...] for it. The built in software is wonderful (though i wish I could download it to the computer) and I made a "movie mix" of the wedding with the camcorders software and how fun is that! Shoot, for the $[...] if all I got was the wedding video it was worth it. I really couldn't believe how clear the video was with this little "toy!" I don't understand any negative reviews, it's cheap, it's fun and it does a heck of a lot for [...] bucks. Pure Digital Inc. has a $[...] rebate on their website. Buy it, use it, have fun!</review_text>
First off, this camera is simple to use, and is a very convenient size (about the size of a fat ipod).  The video quality is pretty decent, i use it to upload to youtube and myspace videos.  I would recommend it for just that, if you're looking to uploading videos to the internet.  Videos can be saved really easily (and the usb port being directly on the unit is so handy) and can be edited/spliced with microsoft movie maker.  (using this program also cuts the MB size considerably!)My only complaint is the so-called 30 minute recording capability.  I had a 3 minute video on my card and it said i only had 21 minutes left of recording.  After i filled the card i noticed i did not have a full 30 minutes, maybe 18-20.Oh, and the audio is a bit on the funky side, mainly because it tends to give a lisp to any 'ch' and 's' sounds.  Look this camera up on youtube to see examples</review_text>
As a Mac user who favors still photography, I do like to take bits of video here and there, and this fits the bill perfectly.  Have only taken video indoors so far and I've found the video quality to be perfectly adequate (no faces hidden in the shadows).  Sound is fine, too.  The software included functions fine on my Mac (although I think you have to have the camera plugged in to see video you've stored on your computer).  Have also imported the AVI files into iMovie easily</review_text>
The camera works fine and I record performances of the various bands I play with. The sound is ok (just remember to keep your fingers away from the mike), and it records fairly well in most nightclub situations, but if it's dark, the video will be dark as well. The USB connection is a great thing, but remember that it needs to be disconnected via the software before you jerk the camera away from the computer. I damaged the hard drive with my very first use, and now I can only record 16min. of video before I'm full. It was MY fault</review_text>
Because of its shirt-pocket size, this digital camcorder is easy to bring along on family outings and such. I originally bought it because I plan on attending my sister's graduation and didn't want to bring on the plane both my very large semi-pro Canon digital camcorder and my digital still camera with all its lenses. I took the Pure Digital on a business trip by plane just to check it out and it was great fun. Simple to operate, and the results were surprisingly sharp. The only two drawbacks: 1) like any small device, could be easy to drop it, and 2) it seemed like the batteries were getting kind of low, and boot-up time was getting longer and longer, after about 40 or so minutes of recording. I recorded about 55 minutes, and it was still working. but, if you need to be quick about capturing precious/important moments, might want to carry a spare set of batterie</review_text>
I was tired of trying to keep up with the tapes, charging, carrying, etc. of my old (2001) video camera.  Whenever we wanted to use our old video camera, it was such a hassle and it was heavy!A friend showed me her PSV-352 and I was instantly hooked.  It is soooooooo easy and tiny that I just throw it in my purse or backpack for the kids and we're off.  We keep it in a basket on the counter so it's accessible at a moment's notice.  Downloading the 60 minutes of video onto a CD is easy because the software is on the camera itself and it automatically loads.  The video quality is amazing, plus, it runs on 2 AA batteries so no charging!!!!  It's been great to tape the kids singing Happy Birthday to Grandma and Grandpa and send it to them via an email birthday card.  You just scroll through each video to view and the kids love seeing themselves instantly and are more eager to "perform."  As a busy working mother of two, this has been a joy to use and I highly recommend it.  :</review_text>
I was one of those holdouts that carried lots of prime lenses, disdaining zooms as "a compromise".  No doubt, I missed some fine lenses because of this.The lens that sold me on zooms is this lens, the 16-45 f/4 Pentax.  The lack of distortion, the contrast, the fine color control, all finally convinced me that a zoom can perform some of the functions of a prime.I've been using this lens for a while.  In my studio, the 50mm primes have become the main portrait lenses with the digital cameras.  But now, I'm not afraid to use a zoom lens on a job.  A big step for me!It extends quite far when zooming, a fact I don't like, and for those who care, the on-camera flash is blocked by the lens hood (I use studio strobe, so it's of no import to me).  As a modern lens, it has a polycarbonate barrel (they don't seem to be inclined to make zooms in the Lmited series.  Too bad).If I could use it on the film cameras, I probably would.  No aperture ring means it's definitely meant for the current cameras.Despite all that, I highly recommend this lens.  It's a great "walk around" lens, going from very wide to moderate telephoto (remember, it's for the APS-C sensors).  Image quality is astounding to an old grouch who loves primes, and even for a lens in general it's right up there.If you're faced with the choice of the kit lens or this lens, take the 16-45.  If you are serious about your craft, or you make a living at it, it's well worth the price</review_text>
This lens is sharp, works very smoothly and has beautiful color.  It's a first rate lens.  I only wish it was just a tad bit longer - 16-60mm - that would be the equivalent of 24-90mm.  As it is it is the equivalent of 24-67.5mm in 35mm terms.</review_text>
I bought this lens for my 35mm pentax camera, since I'll be buying one of the dslr bodies sometime. It is fantastic: very very sharp and with great saturated color. On par, sharpness-wise with my Zuiko (50mm f1.4 & f1.8, 85mm f/2) and Nikon primes, but with better color! The contrast is good as well, there are rumors that the lens underexposes a bit - perhaps it does, but that works well with film.On a film camera, there's vignetting when you zoom wider than 21mm - but that's a nice special effect, a sort of semi-fisheye at 16mm. Also, using the supplied lens shade isn't a great idea when shooting with 35mm film cameras, as the vignetting starts early.There's no aperture ring, so if buying this for a film body, make sure it's compatible with the FA-J style lenses. On my PZ50 body, I can't set aperture, but it works fine in program and shutter priority mode.Overall, this is a super lens, the best I've owned</review_text>
After getting into the HDTV revolution and then finding out how many items I wanted that require an HDMI connection a solution was needed. With an HD cable box, a new PS3, and only one HDMI connection with my HDTV I needed more HDMI options. This product gave me those options.  With 3 HDMI inputs I now have all the connections I needed and one extra.  This product is compact, and very easy to install.  It includes an HDMI cable and that saves you the cost of another one. The shipping was incrediblely fast, less than 2 business days!  Many other products like this cost a great deal more.  Buy this product, you'll love it</review_text>
It is very small, extremely well made, and works perfectly.  The Belkin Pure HDMI cables are also another great value.  No signal degradation noted with this switchbox - seems completely transparent.  I would buy another one</review_text>
Well like many of you out there I got a HDTV for Christmas. Then along came the Upconverting DVD player, HD DVR, and the PS3! Most HDTV's only have 1 HDMI input. How was I going to make use of all this new amazing picture quality when I can only connect 1 HDMI input at a time. So to Google I went. I came across quite a few HDMI switches. Some really expensive but I did not recognized the brands. Then I saw the PureAV by Belkin (being a Mac & iPod user I definitely recognized Belkin). So I bought it... I mean I had too what else do you do? It has 3 connection in and one out to the TV. Works exactly like it should. Has a remote and everything. Solid really small unit. Lay to packs of cards side by side and you have the size of this unit. But I am extremely happy with the unit. (Oh by the way it comes with 1 HDMI cable and as we all know those little suckers can be EXPENSIVE! All my other ones at the Philips 6ft HDMI cables from Walmart for $32.</review_text>
This camera is very easy to use, the pictures are excellent. My family loves it!</review_text>
I received the camera in mail yesterday.  As I walked back to my dorm, I thought that perhaps there'd been a mistake; there was no way this light package could be it.  There's no way this could be the camera I'd just ordered last Wednesday.  It's probably the memory card.I opened the box and sure enough, it was the camera.  Made of steel and incredibly light and small, this camera is a major upgrade compared to what I used before it.  I dare say this camera is probably the last one I'll use (barring a disastrous drop) for a while.  It takes clear pictures, even though I have shaky hands.  I am going to recommend this camera to a friend that has never had a camera.As I become more accustomed to using the camera, I'll probably end up updating my review of it, and something tells me that it'll consist of primarily positive things</review_text>
It is a great camera for the quality and the price. The only downside is that it is so small, i am used to camera that feels and weighs like a camera. (i think it is a little smaller than a deck of cards) so if you want small, this is the camera for you. or if you want a great camera and you can adjust to the compactness, purchase this camera</review_text>
I love this camera.  It has lots of features and doesn't go through batteries real fast.  The pictures are clear not fuzzy.  You can do panorama and stick them together.  Wonderful feature.  My only regret is that I could not afford one with more zoom</review_text>
Very easy to use camera that takes solid pictures. This camera allows for zooming and has sound while taking video. I like that you have the option of cliping pictures out from the video clips. This allows for some humerous pictures. I really like this camera.I did have a problem with the zoom button 2 months after buying the camera and after about a month of not using the camera. I had to press the button really hard for it to zoom. I called Amazon to take back the product but they were not very helpful with informing me how much money they would refund me or how I can take it to HP if it were under warantee.All in all, the camera is very usable and I plan on keeping it and have not had any other problems with the camera</review_text>
For a digital Camera with 6 mp for this price. It is great, I don't know what most people be buying a 8 and 9 mp camera for, b/c if you are not blowing a picture up bigger than a 10 X 12, then you don't need nothing bigger than a 6 mp camera. I seriously like this camera. HP is doing a good job on Photosmarts. This camera takes great pictures and the zoom is incredible. I am a soldier in Iraq and I have been taking nice pictures with this camera everysince i bought it</review_text>
I tried digital. I really did. But I could never get the really gorgeous shots I got from my old Yashica SLR which gave up the ghost several years back. I also could not really "focus" on what I was shooting...just pointed and shot because there was no film to run out of. The result? Pointless pics that weren't even that good looking. Digital just didn't feel "right." So about 8 months ago I decided to go back to film. What to get? After much research, I finally decided on the Canon T2. Absolutely brilliant camera. My favorite feature? I can let the camera handle focus, etc. OR I can go COMPLETELY MANUAL. May not seem like a big deal, but it feels so good being in control of what the camera does when you want to be. And of course, that means letting your imagination go...something sorely lacking in digital. Couldn't be happier and no more pointless pics. Okay, maybe a few, but they still look good. And isn't that the point</review_text>
Having just gone back to using a film camera from digital (my wife still uses digital) I have found this to be an excellant camera so far. I have taken 6 rolls of film and everyone one has came out perfect. I would recommend it</review_text>
I recently purchased the Rebel T2 camera body only after my Canon EOS Rebel 2000 gave its "last gasp".  I had been a Canon user since 1979 with an AE-1 (that I still have).I liked the fact that the T2 body plugged immediately into the two EF lenses that I owned (28-80mm and 75-300mm), which protected my previous investments.  I was taking pictures within seconds of opening the package and loading batteries.  And although I have my sights set on a Digital Rebel at some point soon, you just can't beat the quality of traditional 35-mm film and photoprocessing.As an upgrade over EOS Rebel 2000, the LCD located on the camera back is easier to read.  Also, the T2 seems more "solid" to me, but lighter in weight.  I took the older EOS Rebel 2000 with me on a couple 75-mile backpacks (which probably led to its early demise), and so I now have a new-found respect for the lighter design.As a final note, I also appreciated the ease of ordering via amazon.com.   There are plenty of web sites offering the same Canon T2 camera back, including those which would have saved me a few dollars. But none had the long-standing relationship I have had with amazon over the past several years</review_text>
I got this after switching from a digital camera. The digital cameras didn't offer the depth I wanted and not having proofs was a big drawback.I am by no means an expert on photography, but I do know a great photograph when I see one, and this camera takes beautiful shots.This is a beautiful camera. Elegant in design; the grey body with black accents is definately an attention grabber. People will look at your camera.It definately has brains to back up it's beauty. Loading film is easy and quick. It has about 8 or so presets. There is the automatic "point and shoot" mode which you'll probably use the most. It automatically compensates for light, adjusting shutter speed and aperture for the perfect shot. The quick autofocus allows you to grab your shot quickly, without waiting for the camera to decide to take the picture.It also has settings for portrait shots, close ups, night, landscape, no flash, and many others. Those are settings that maximize the camera's features for those particular shot. It also has a program setting where you can program shutter speed, aperture, flash and film advance. Though with the comprehensive presets, I don't think you'll ever need to use it.The 28-90 lens that comes with the kit is nice, and has a selector for autofocus or manual focus. It also, of course, can be removed so you can add other lenses. The zoom is powerful and leads to beautiful shots.Overall this is an unbelievable camera. Great price, features, and pictures will be the best you've ever seen. They are very crisp, clear and have almost a 3D lifelike quality to them, something I've never seen outside of a professionally taken photograph. This camera is awesome</review_text>
After researching several cameras in this price range, I bought the Rebel T2 last month. It has met my expectations and perhaps then some. After recently trying out a friends camera in the 150.-ish range, I partially regret spending what I did. It all comes down to what you need, want, and how many bells and whistles you like. For the money though, compared to the competitors, I still think I made a good purchase. After all, if I use it for ten years, which I most likely will, I will have surely got my moneys worth. Bottom line: no complaints with it</review_text>
Some years ago I bought a Canon Rebel, one of the earlier ones, it was not so great, kept if for a while and then sold it.I have been into digital for some time now, but, its great, but it is not film, not by any chance.I have a very old point and shoot, I started taking pictures with either Kodak of Fuji film, I then brought it into my one hour developer and had the negs developed and digitized onto a CD.The results were gorgeous, at that point it was time for a new SLR, there are not so many left right now.I saw The Eos Rebel T2 with the 28-90 Mark III zoom lens, it was impressive, light, but with just a touch of heft, great grip,viewfinder, very fast autofocus, it even looks great.So forgetting my previous experience with a Rebel a long time ago I bought.This is a superb camera, this is just no way to praise it, I love this camera.Since getting it I,ve shot 10 rolls of film, all were digitized onto a disc, touched  up where I felt they needed it, (a simple procedure.I shot a roll in a hanger at a former Naval Aviation Base here, all kinds of aircraft were in different stages of reconstruction,it was a photographers paradise.The results I am getting are better than a very expensive  digital camera.I cannot recommend the T2 even more, if you want one get it now, I think these cameras will be gone soon.Canon you did great job.</review_text>
YO! This camera is just perfect for those getting into photogrophy! Although im only 14 years old, I know what i'm talking about. I have had this camera for 3 weeks now and it is just inspirational. I got into photogrophy from Transworld Skateboarding Magazine. The photogrophers have amazing pics! Truly inspirational! I'm leaving for christmas to go to England next week and can't wait to shoot some nice pics. I tend to favor fast action pics. With Al Servo (funtion automatically set in sports mode)  i can just point and shoot and the camera automatically adjusts the focus of the object during the pictures. I love to customize. The easiest customization setting that i always use for outdoor action pics is the Tv mode. This mode allows you to customize the shutter speed. First make sure you are in a bright lighted area to ensure fast shutter speed. The brighter the area is the faster the shutter speed you can set. I like to hold down the shutter button for a rapid fire of 3 frames per second. Awesome! I love the sound of instant photos. I cannot even descride what it is like. Try it out! The T2 is a great camera for begginers at a great price. Remember this review is only a "guideline". It would be good to make a decision on your own. If you try hard and can't come to a decision, that is when you can rely on other peoples opinions.If you want to see some cool pics from the magazine(...)</review_text>
I looked at digital cameras for months - literally - before I just decided to lug around a 35 mm SLR. As everyone probably already knows, megapixels matter a whole lot when you're talking about blowing a picture up to a larger size. What's great about film is that unless the picture was taken out of focus, or in bad light, you can use a negative to blow something up and the quality really doesn't start to go down until you're making HUGE prints. (How huge exactly I don't know, but the biggest I've blown up was around 4x4 feet, and still no trouble.) The prints I've gotten out of this camera so far have been stellar. ( I use fuji film -- I think it's better than Kodak, even though Kodak has better commercials. Give it a try!)The camera itself is not too heavy, granted, it's not the convenience of a tiny digital camera, but it's  not as bad as I'd expected to carry it around all day. The neck strap is nice, the manual is actually easy to comprehend.  I like a camera that has buttons for a lot of it's features on the body -- it seems complicated at first, but once you know how to use the features, they're much easier to access than they would be if you were scrolling through a menu.  The T2 seems worth the hundred or so more dollars than you would pay for the very similar Rebel K2 by Canon.One thing - make sure you take the batteries out if you're not going to be using it for a week or more. It seems like they go dead if they're in the camera, even if it is off</review_text>
I recently started a small photography business doing Black and White shots of kids in their natural environment. I wanted a camera that took quality shots, but was still cost effective.  I most definitely found it. My cannon takes great shots and allows me the mobility needed to chase kids around.  Very pleased.</review_text>
It's a good fit for the E-900. It doesn't have a center hole in the flap for the lanyard. It's leather on the flap, the rest is nylon</review_text>
Conversion lenses have always had a poor reputation. Typically generalizations like fuzzy, corner falloff and so on. The Panasonic DMW-LT55 Tele Conversion Lens appears to be the exception. Mounted on a Lumix FZ50, it produces images that are sharper than expected. Not as sharp as those that would be produced by a Nikkor or Canon, but sharp and detailed enough.There is no noticeable falloff at the edges or corners. No vignetting either. Contrast is excellent.On the FZ50, the LT55 can be used handheld with the camera's Optical Image Stabilization system activated. That is, frankly, astonishing.A neat trick on the FZ50 is being able to reduce the resolution of the image from 10 megapixels down to 3 megapixels (just using the center of the sensor) and effectively increasing the power of the tele converter to that of a 1,137 mm lens. The images aren't bad.The converter is lighweight and easily attached to the FZ50. Any filter on the lens must be removed first. No adapter is required.Overall, the FZ50 is a nice knockaround and travel camera. It's light, has an incredible 12x Leica design approved lens, a 10 Megapixel sensor and just about every feature you could want. Adding the LT55 to your kit gives you that extra-long telephoto you've always wanted to carry without doing damage to your back. Neat product.Jerry</review_text>
I enjoy birdwatching and naturally I wish to photograph the birds I see when I can.  I used this lens with the FZ7 on a trip to Maui.  I saw the i'iwi and apapane, but those birds flit around too much for me to be able to get a pic. However, I was able to get a couple decent pix of the a'eo (Hawaiian stilt) at a distance of about 300' so I was pleased.  I will be going to Port Aransas to see the whooping cranes soon and am very much looking forward to using this lens then.  NOTE: Although the image stabilization of these Panasonic cameras is excellent you absolutely still need a tripod in my opinion to make the best use of this fine piece of glass</review_text>
I am definitely an amateur photographer - so for what it's worth, I am very pleased with this camera. Having previously owned the ex-z1000, I can say this camera is a big step up.I had to buy all the extra cords for transferring pictures for my z1000, but this one came with everything I needed.Also - The battery life is great. Plus - the shutter response time is much quicker than the z1000. You can choose from 7 different picture sizes/pixelation. up to 10 megapixels!The Video camera is pretty sweet, too -- You can zoom in and out during filming.One neat features is the Audio Recording - like a little pocket tape-recorder. The only thing is, my computer doesn't automatically detect the audio files when transferring -- I have to go in and manually select them. (This might just be something with my computer setup, though).All-around, I'm very pleased with this camera!</review_text>
I bought this to replace my polaroid izone camera (which was TERRIBLE). You will be amazed at how small this camera is. It fits in the palm of my hand. I love the black color. All of the controls are easy to use after you mess with it for little while. Make sure you buy one with an extra battery, because they take the lithium ion batteries. The battery life seems very good so far. The pictures it takes are very sharp clear and colorful. You wont be disappointed</review_text>
When my Exilim EX-750 fell in the cooler, it was over.  I loved that camera, but couldn't bring myself to get a refurbished one for almost the price of what I paid 15 months prior.  So, I "upgraded" to the Exilim EX-Z1050. It's even easier to user than the Z-750. Changing the most used settings is very quick. The LCD is bright outdoors, so even though there is no tiny viewfinder it's not a problem.  I highly recommend this camera</review_text>
This was an awesome buy!  It takes great pictures and is easy to use.  It has wonderful features and simply love the compact size</review_text>
This camera takes amazing pictures. There are so many settings with this camera. I was very stuck picking a camera at first, then I narrowed it down to either this camera or the Canon SD900. I decided to get this one because it was $80.00 cheaper. It gives a lot of bang for your buck. Also in the continuous shot mode you can take so many pics really quickly. Great Battery life. My grade for this cam is an A</review_text>
Just got this camera a few days ago and i will admit i was hesitant to buy it because of the bad reviews the Z1000 got.  My video camera has a built in 4 megapixel camera, but i was not happy with the quaily of the still pictures, so i started looking around for several months.  I love the look, and i have taken tons of pictures outside and inside and the quality is excellent!  I love the quick burst mode of taking many pictures at the same time.  Buy this camera, it is an incredible deal and an awesome camera</review_text>
I had many great experience with this camera. The touch screen is so easy to use and the picture scan is wonderful. I took this camera to Huntington Library and my pictures came out wonderful!! The colors are so true and beautiful. I took a closed up picture of a pink flower and it came out so clear and nice.</review_text>
I purchased the Sony DSC-N2 10mp camera about a month ago.  I liked the features and the large 3" LCD screen but I was a little nervous about the touch screen.  However, after reading a few reviews that I would give it a try.   The touch screen works great and the camera takes great pictures.  It has a very fast startup and quickly saves the pictures without a noticeable delay even using the highest resolution.  It has high ISO sensitivity and when activated takes great pictures in almost pitch black conditions.  The menus are easy to use and allow quiet a bit of customization.The online ordering from Amazon was easy and the camera arrived in factory boxes within a couple days via UPS.  I was very satisfied with my purchase</review_text>
all around positive experiance ordering this camera.Reasonably priced and arrived on time.I'am very please</review_text>
Right out of the box I began using this great camera.   Great quality pictures and very easy to use.   I am glad I purchased it</review_text>
I purchased this product because my last digital camera had the Zeis lens and took great pictures.I am THRILLED with this camera.  It takes such crisp, clean and clear pictures.  The screen is huge and is so easy to zoom in/out and side to side.  There are so many cool features on the camera itself with no need to download to a computer to make changes.  The battery life seems to last a long time.  You also have the capability to save pictures to the camera itself without a memory stick.  I think it only saved 5 pictures but it was nice to test.I was disappointed that the memory stick I had in my previous Sony camera was not compatible with this camera.  I bought a 2 meg pro card and it holds tons of pictures.  The battery needs to be charged outside of the camera and not directly while in the camera.The camera isn't cheap but it is well worth every penny for a picture freak like me.</review_text>
This Sony N2 10.1 mega pixels replaces my old Sony 3.2 mega pixels Cyber-Shot. I love this camera. The pictures are nice and clear even I used 5 mega pixels. Actually, 5 mega pixels is enough for me. The touch panel is easy to use. 3" screen is very big to veiw your pictures and videos. All my colleagues and friends love this camera too. Reasonable price and easy to use. The only thing that I don't like is the picture is too bright when I select auto flash light. Otherwise, this is a perfect camera.</review_text>
I bought this ring to fit a wide angle lens to my Sony DSC-W1 and it's a perfect fit. I love it. Very high quality. The only drawback is, of course, how the lens blocks the flash a little</review_text>
Very easy to use, customers should be informed when purchasing lenses that adapted is required.</review_text>
the sony VAD-WA conversion lens adapter lets other lens attchments and polarizing effects filters to be used in sony cybershot cameras. it works just fine however, when this adapter together with the lens attachments and/or filters are on, a considerable portion of the picture, particularly the bottom center, gets dark. the reason for this flaw is (just what other reviews mentioned) the flash is just above the adapter which causes a dark shadow to the bottom center portion of the picture. everytime the flash is used, specially at night or low light conditions, the shadow is cast which blocks the bottom 5-20 percent of the picture.a slave flash attachment may solve this problem but according to it's reviews, it has a reputation of not firing off, gives too much light, and the expensive price tag.overall, i still give the sony VAD-WA conversion lens a 4 star</review_text>
I was going to purchase this same item with Sony but for a whole lot more! This product allowed me to capture awesome views in Hawaii. Totally recommend it for your digital camera</review_text>
What can I say?  I needed it to connect the zoom lens to the Sony camera.  Worked great</review_text>
It works perfectly! Sure it's a bit of a pain to have to have an adapter to attach the lens to the camera but it's so simple to use. It attaches very smoothly and easily to both the lens and camera. The mount is very secure and stable. Yes there is a bit of a "tunnel" effect until you use the W/T function on the camera but overall it works great</review_text>
What can I say about this adapter except that it works on my W5 perfectly. Just screw it on like a lightbulb and then attach whatever lens you bought with it. Easy, easy</review_text>
Sony VCL-DH2630 Telephoto Conversion Lens for Compatible Cybershot Digital Cameras (Purchased on 07/17/2005)Sony VAD-WA Conversion Lens Adapter for the DSCW1/W5/W7 Digital Cameras (Purchased on 07/17/2005)You need both. They allow you to get shots that the camera telephoto can not pick up in detail. I learned this the hard waywhen I took a series of shots of three wolves stalking a dozen caribou. I have little splotches. I swore then to get a telephoto. You need both for items to function. They are relatively heavy and the size of the camera. There is just one magification no adjustment. So what you see is what you get. It does expand your use of a good versaltile pocket camera. I buy it again</review_text>
If you'e looking for a replacement or extra battery for your Nikon digital camera, this one beats the Nikon original hands down.  Not only is it significantly cheaper, but it has a greater capacity.  The Nikon battery is rated at 650 mAh.  The Digital Concepts battery is rated at 800 mAh</review_text>
I am happy with this purchase. The flash serves well its purpose</review_text>
This Sunpak flash is a very nice flash for the price. It is very cheap compared to other 3rd party flash manufactures. The Auto mode for this flash works really well. I say the exposure calculated by the flash is accurate 90% of the time given under normal lighting. There might be some tricky lighting conditions that could fool the the flash in Auto mode... but then again, nothing is perfect. I use this flash with my Fujifilm S9100 digital camera and it's very simple to use. Even though it might take some pratice, but it shouldn't scare you from using a manual flash. Plus, you should feel like a "real" photographer if you are able to use a manual flash. Just tell the flash what ISO  you are using and the how far the subject is from the camera, the flash will do the rest. In return, the camera will tell you what aperature to use. For the shutter speed, just set it to the highest speed that your camera could synchronize with an external flash and everything should be ok. Also, if you feel that the exposure is a little too dark or too bright, just adjust the shutter speed on step at a time to compensate it. For the battery life, I get about 100 shots out of 4 rechargeable batteries (NiMH at 2500 mAH). Anyway, this is a really reliable flash for the money. You don't really have to spend big bucks on original manufacture flash such as Nikon or Canon. Just get Sunpak flash and it should work the same, if not better. Thanks for reading.</review_text>
I have a Panasonic Lumix FZ50 digital camera and, when I use the wide angle extension on my lens, I can't use the intrnal flash (the lens casts a shadow). So, I began shopping for a flash. I was shocked when I saw the prices of the Panasonic flashes for this camera ($300 and $500). After searching the Internet, I found the Sunpack 383 flash. I was a little nervous buying it. I worried it might not sync well or have some defect since the price was so much lower. Well, I received the flash, slipped it onto my camera's hot shoe, and it works beautifully. No glitches and the results are great. I particularily like the 3 automatic settings -- maximum distance, intermediate distance and maximum depth of field. It also has a great bounce flash head that can be pointed in any direction. Reference marks give the exact angle of the bounce. I'm very happy with this purchased and thrilled that I saved quite a bit of money.</review_text>
Real bright flash,work great with my camera.Lights up a long way, away,getting more into my pictures.Camera flash isn't enough flash,383 flash makes up what the camera can't reach</review_text>
I use this with my Olympus E-500 and it works perfectly every time.  I'm not going to get into to much techie stuff here,  but if your on the fence with this flash,  don't be.   Buy it, it works great</review_text>
Highly recommended. Does a very nice job without taking a big dent on your wallet. I bought this one after reviewing others' comments and am very satisfied. Even the batteries last well :</review_text>
I purchased this camera looking to take more manual control over my video projects.  And that is exactly what it has allowed me to do.  It has the right balance of manual controls (as well as automatic modes) and price.  It has given me the flexibility I was looking for.  The weight balance is good, the controls are easily accessible and battery life is very good</review_text>
I recently purchased the GL2, and am very pleased with the results I'm getting so far.  Image quality is great, especially for such a small and lightweight camera.  The manual focus is really nice.  The zoom is amazing.Should you buy this camera?Maybe.  The GL2 falls into an odd mid range.  If you just want an easy to use camcorder that has great image quality, i'd probably reccommend one of the small panasonic 3ccd cameras.  And if you want a digital camcorder that has broadcast quality video or high definition, then you want to step up to the next level.  So, basically you could spend under a $1000 and get a good simple camcorder, or you could get the next level of quality at $4000+.  But for this price--$2200--this camera is great.  Even though it's not 24p, there is something about the image to me that is very well suited for film..</review_text>
i got the camera from amazon about 3 months ago and its amazing. the features are amazing.</review_text>
This unit is pretty awesome especially with frame.Also, a noteworthy thing is this camera first does 16 x 9 and then encoding producing a higher quality image than a comparable Sony model.I've actually owned the precursor unit to this one, the GL1, and was also pleased with it.This camera has the hotshoe feature and the longest OPTICAL zoom in its class.Optical VS Digital, optical definitely wins.This camera is all-a-round useful and also, this unit is actually the preferred camera of choice for many sports film-makers.If you take this thing to the slopes like i have, strangers will come up to you and instantly recognize the unit.Great with kenko lenses.Only actual thing I've seen is that it doesn't like low light, so adding a VL-3 is a must, or a VL-10 is recommended.One thing to watch out for is that you must keep care of the camera. For example, you must get yourself a tape-head-cleaner. The Maxell's are a good buy, but you could go OEM if you want to.Also, don't cheap out on the cassettes.In my 6 years of using the GL1/GL2, I've always used TDK and JVC tapes. The JVCs come in a 6-pack and can be found a a best buy. The TDKs also come in a 6-pack, and you can find them at Costco.For more reference, I have pushed this camera beyond its specification as it has been rained on, snowed on, and frozen to the point where there is actually lag in the LCDs and yet, it still works like brand new.Definitely a good buy !</review_text>
I wanted to shoot my first short film, so I shopped and shopped until I found this one, best price for the best features, looking back, I should have saved my money. With websites like mandy.com and others, you can easily make a film by putting the 2K towards hiring a junior or if your lucky, mid level DP w/ their own better equipment for about 200-400 a day. If you have a short film in mind and a dedicated work ethic w/ tight scheduling, you can make an entire film this way.BUT- if you want to shoot and get used to holding a cam and setting the shot and angle and lights and actors and everything else incvolved, this is a perfect starter cam.I actually wish I would have saved up the cash and bought a 24p cam like the DVX100 or an XL2 but this is great for entry level kids shooting their first flicks which will mostly be garbage anyways so... make up your own mind</review_text>
Alright, so I've been reading some of the reviews that people have put in here about this camera, and I just want to offer up the nice statement that "If you gave this camera 3 stars or less, you're a retard." I'm pretty sure amazon won't allow me to say it, but it's true! This camera is so freakin' great! I own this one and the xl1s, and this is my "toy" camera. I'm just a 24 year old kid, so maybe my opinion means nothing to you. If so, then stop reading this. No one asked you to, anyway.This camera sells itself. Compare it to some others in the same category (make sure you're checking out the GL2 and not the predecessor GL1). The $2999 asking price here is way too high, though. Shop around, and you should be able to find a new one for about $1750 or so. That and the extended warranty that covers cleanings once a year. SO worth the money. I take her (my camera ... her name is "Mandy") everywhere, and I've already made enough short movies for people to have her pay for herself. And she can take a beating, too. I took her from 75 degrees at 8,000ft above sea level to 23 degrees at 12,000ft in less than 6 minutes time and she didn't complain at all. She was a definite plus for our snowboarding trip!Tired of reading all of those specs that may not make sense to you right now? This camera is usable by someone who has never used a camera (which was me before I made my purchase), and adjustable to have everything completely manual.My only qualm is the "noise" in LOW LOW light. That should be expected, though. For that I use the xl1s ("Jessica"), but don't let that stop you from your purchase of this.This camera is incredible! I seriously love it.</review_text>
Pros:The video quality for the GL2 is excellent in good lighting and still good in low light but has noticeable noise.  The image stabilizer works great even if you don't have a steady hand, even full telephoto won't make you nauseous. The analog to digital feature is nice being able to convert just about anything to digital. The full manual controls are great for anyone who wants to control how their video comes out. The automatic modes are pretty good but that's not why you would buy this camera. Even the automatic focus and aperture work good but are kind of slow. This can work to your advantage if someone walks in front of the camera or you pan past a window, but if it loses focus or changes the aperture it doesn't bounce right back.Cons:This camera is notorious for faulty tape decks. If it doesn't give the EJECT TAPE message it still requires constant cleaning  with a head cleaning tape, about every  5 hours horizontal lines appear on the LCD. The photo feature is kind of pointless, only 1.7 Megapixels, anyone who could afford this camera would already have camera that would take better pictures. And it can't be used while recording, requires a seperate shooting mode.Summary: All around great camera but gets dirty easily. Video quality and manual controls are top notch.</review_text>
I have to agree with the previous poster, this lens is very impressive.  The pictures of this item do not represent how big this lens actually is.  This thing is massive and heavy, yet you definately can wield it without a tripod. Makes a great addition to an already amazing camera. Much better than using the digital zoom by itself, but then, digital zoom combined with this lens is equal to about 400mm. The lens comes in a padded SONY drawstring bag with caps for ends. Definately recommended</review_text>
I have a DSC-R1 (see my other review) and have recently added the telephoto accessory lens from Sony to the toolbox.  Oh, and its companion "adapter" too.  This is not a cheap lens nor is it a lightweight one, but it seems to be a good one.The front element of this baby is nearly 5" in diameter.  What does that get you?  No loss in f-stop to start with.  That's right, the light-gathering ability of Sony's addition to the already phenomenal optics of the Carl Zeiss Vario Sonnar costs nothing in terms of your ability to "paint with light".  (On your credit card, is a different calculation may appear.)  The size of the lens makes necessary the adapter "sidekick" mounting bracket.  Why?  Without it, the lens is unbalanced and, rather than a cheap screw-on extender, this allows the primary lens to gain a few elements to become a credible telephoto.  It also has the advantage of allowing for the quick removal of the tele and use of the zoom on the primary lens with the adapter in place.So you have a vision of running along the sidelines capturing every grimace on the quarterback's face as the defense floods over him?  Not with this lens.  Spring for the $8,000 Canon outfit, get two as you might get sacked yourself, and have an assistant to hand you your equipment.  Hiking into the outback to capture the dawn mating of the Kookaburra?  There are better choices.  (Note to friends of the Kookaburra: I have seen one, and heard one, but have no actual experience with their reproductive practices.)  On the other hand, if you occasionally need a bit more reach and can manage a tripod for mounting, then by all means pick one up.And speaking of "picking one up", this lens can be hand-held and deliver acceptable results (better than using digital zoom or enlarging to get the same magnification), but only for nearly still subjects.  For example, a yacht race from the race deck at the club.  (My choice)  The digital zoom (2x 120mm) at lower mega-pixels was good enough, but not great.  A natural 200mm beats a stretched 120mm any day, which is what you get with the digital zoom alternative, but for fast shooting the combo may be too, shall we say "bulky".Which brings me to my main point: why are we doing this?  Photography I mean.  If you see a camera a way to capture the visual poetry that your mind sees, then this camera and the combo will work for you, and you'll enjoy the experience.  If you see a camera as a cool tool that makes a statement about who you are, well join the gear heads in the photo chat rooms and natter on about max-mega-pixel-mania and spurn the "point-and-shoot" in favor of a bag full of expensive interchangeable lenses.  Frankly, some of the best photographs of all time have been captured on the spur of the moment, "point and shoot".  With an excellent 24mm-120mm lens mounted on the camera, you'll get the shot 95% of the time.  If you need to stretch you view a bit farther from time-to-time, by all means spend the $400 or so on this telephoto combo and look forward to some good photography</review_text>
This is a great camera - especially for the price.  HP makes the camera-computer interface software very user-friendly and it takes great pictures as well.  It has a nice big LCD screen and the Lithium-Ion battery lasts for a long time for me.  I recommend this camera very highly</review_text>
It seems as if every time I want to use the camera, the battery is dead. I find that if I charge it and try to use it the next day, I should expect very much. I'm going to purchase a new battery and see how that goes, but I shouldn't have to do so</review_text>
This is my first digital camera. Prior to this I had a simple Kodak point-and-click model which pretty much the quality of a disposible.  I use much higher grade cameras at work both 35mm and digital.  This camera gives you the 5.1 MP ability though most shots only require the 3MP.  I like the 32MB internal memory though I've also bought a 256MB card for traveling. The 5x zoom isn't as cool as I initially thought it would be and digital zoom works sometimes and not others but you must understand what digital zoom really is.  The camera takes very clear and optimal pictures. Better pictures then I've taken on anything else I've owned before (and some of the work cameras as well).  The size is small enough to put in your pocket but not too small for one with larger hands. The different flash options and shooting scenes can turn difficult pictures into what you want to capture.   The panoramic shot sequence is an especially favorite feature especially for shoreline shots.  I've also bought the R-Series dock and enjoy its ability to transfer my pictures faster and charge two batteries at once.This camera is worth the price you pay but I believe its a 2005 model so it may not be the most up to date but it does a great job.</review_text>
Now that I've used the camera for a few months I'd like to update my review (scroll down to see original).  The problem I mentioned about using the camera in bright sunlight can easily be fixed by increasing the screen's brightness.  Battery life has been great, far better than my last camera with rechargeable AAs.  Camera is super easy to use and gives great pictures.  For example, I frequently change modes depending on the lighting and that feature is easily accessed from a button on the top of the camera, not through a series of menus.  Friends have been impressed that you can zoom in video mode, something there cameras cannot do, and the built in help screens.  Used the panorama feature on a recent trip to Vancouver and was simple to use and gave great results.  I highly recommend this camera for its size, features, and ease of use.Original: I'm really enjoy my new R817.  It's easy to use and the buttons are all in the right places.  Menus use are easy to follow.  Friends I've showed it to all liked the feel and ease of use without no dials.  I bought it for the size and zoom and I'm not disappointed.  Like all cameras without a view finder, it can be hard to see the screen when shooting into direct sunlight, my only negative.  Also bought the quick charger for the extra battery and case and like the case.  Looked at the new Nikon L1, but the one in the BestBuy was broken so I have no idea how it works.  I figured this was not a good sign</review_text>
I have seen and worked with other digital cameras, and became boggled quite easily with all the options... not to say this one doesn't have them...but, really, there are only a few buttons on the camera, and each one of them can get you to everything you need!  I was a little scared with setting up the software to download my photos, and it was easy too!  Everything was neatly spelled out for me, and extremely friendly.  I use my camera every day, and I can get some fabulous up close photos of all the flowers in my garden, including any bugs inside, with the macro option, which is also a breeze to use!  Buying and shipping were easy, too</review_text>
So far, I like the camera and the quality of the pictures. Once you get used to the red eye flash going off numerous times before actually taking the picture (and possibly losing the moment) it's pretty neat. The screen is awsome! SO clear! Some of the scene settings DO require a tripod as the shutter speeds are a lot slower and thus can result in some shake. The one thing I am really not happy with is the macro feature. I love to take close up shots of insects, flowers and even nail art etc, but this has a very annoying feature: the camera focuses CONSTANTLY (in out, in out, in out) like it's having a convulsion or something. You have to try and grab the best focus (shot) when it is "doing its thing" and 9/10, the pic is blurred. I wish there was a way to just shut that off and focus it manually. It's pointless having the ability of a macro shot of as close as 1.6" if it's out of focus cause the camera can't make it's *&^%#$% mind up what it's doing! I AM going to write to Nikon and see if they can off any suggestions on this. Maybe there is some firmware that can be downloaded to fix it. I dunno. Other than that, I am very pleased with my purchase and WOULD recommend it</review_text>
The pictures are sharp and the colors are true.  The extra large viewer is the envy of our friends. The only thing missing from this camera is image stabilization.  It goes everywhere that we go, you know, we don't leave home without it</review_text>
This is a good point and shoot that Nikon has come up with. The screen is HUGE and bright. The playback on this LCD is great. The camera itself is very light and very thin. It is the size of a credit card and about half the thickness of a cigarette pack. Taking photos is a snap and this camera starts up real quick. In general it performs like a champ.Had a few issues with focusing correctly. SOmetimes the pictures would come out blurry, when they shouldn't have. The WIFI is a joke. I tried everything to set it up, BUT NO. It wouldn't work. I don't know anyone who has succeeded at this. if you are buying this camera for the WiFi -- DON'T.OTHER THAN THAT - A SOLID SHOOTER</review_text>
I purchased this camera after getting a junior mint stuck to the lense cover of my cannon.  The cannon was bigger and bulkier, but came with more bells and whistles (color select, super awesome macro, 6x optical zoom).  While this camera doesn't have all the fun extras the cannon did, it does have the small size, no extending lens to knock while shooting or get rained on (or junior mints stuck in) and the menu is easy enough to navigate that doing manual settings is almost do-able for a novice.  in other words, there aren't so many extras clogging up the menu choices that you give up on what you were trying to do.  While the macro on the cannon was better, the macro on the Nikon is good enough for the general point and shoot and the colors are FAR more saturated and in depth.  The screen on the Nikon is also a lot larger.  another cool feature is the battery.  The Nikon uses a li-ion batter which you never have to remove from the camera housing.  To charge the camera you simply plug it into the dock it comes w/, OR if traveling you can bring just the cable between the dock and the wall and use it to charge the camera.  While the cannon was nice, I'm happy to have a cheaper smaller easier to use camera</review_text>
This is an excellent digital camera!!! The picture quality; features; design. 5 stars well earne</review_text>
This is a great case for the Coolpix 5700.  It holds everything I need for the basic camera outing.  It holds four batteries in the front zippered compartment, and several memory cards in the zippered inside compartment.  There is also a pocket on the outside.  It holds a small, bendable leg tripod in the belt loop on the back.</review_text>
I was looking for a case to hold my Nikon 5700 - nothing bulky, just something that would offer some protection while dragging it around on vacation.  This case fits the bill.  It is a nice quality leather - and holds the camera snuggly. If I HAD to find something that wasn't perfect with this case, it would be that the camera strap (the one that same with my 5700) doesn't fit as nicely in the case as I'd like it to. It takes a bit of arranging, but it does fit.   This is really such a non-issue, but I wanted to mention it.  I will keep my camera in this case within my larger multi-camera bag for home storage and for travelling on the airplane (where my charger and tipod are kept).This small case is great for taking the camera out on day trips.And for such a great price - I HIGHLY recommend this to anyone</review_text>
100% all NIKON, some of the best pictures I have ever taken.  When I went to the Kodak print machine to print them out, I had a line of people looking at the print quality.  You cannot go wrong here, Amazon had the best price of everyone</review_text>
Great camera case for nikon 5700 made for and fits well.Does not carry much gear but why should it its not a camera gear bag. It fits my needs</review_text>
This case fits the camera well, along with space for an extra battery and several compact flash cards.  DO NOT buy this case if you use filters.  There is no extra space for the large 67mm adapter or the filters themselves</review_text>
I bought this camera for my 9yr old son because of the price (less than $100)and it turned out to be better than any of the canon digitals I have owned. I learned log ago to use rechargeable batteries, so I wouldn't let any  posts regarding battery drain sway you from a purchase. My son has autism and  gives this camera a workout. It's taken plenty of abuse and up to 500 pictures per week for the past six months. The video and lighting modes are incredible too, I get a lot more "keepers" out of this inexpensive camera than any I digital I have owned to date</review_text>
I'm not 13 I'm 15 but I do not have an account to comment.I bought this camera through amazon for my Graduation present. I have it for already a few months and its a good camera. Its easy to use, lots of different settings, a large nice screen, even makes long movies.Its not as small as the other more expensive cameras, but its not huge and bulky. There is a few negetive things to it:It uses batteries, and charging it mean you have to buy new ones. I solved this problem by buying rechargeble batteries, they last longer and you can reuse them. The battery life on this camera is not that great too. Well that might be the fault of my duracel batteries. If this camera would have better battery life then it would be five stars.Overall this is a great camera, with a great price. Good for teens and beginners to cameras plus is budget friendly. I got it under $120</review_text>
I own two of these little cameras. The first was purchased for work and I liked it so much that I purchased another one for the family. The second one I purchased (Christmas 06) has already bit the dust! Not long after that, the 1st one started having issues. I sent the 2nd one in for repair over a month ago and haven't heard a word! Not sure if it's worth sending the 1st one in or not....not mention that the support on their website is a joke and time waster!! If you buy this camera...hope you have better luck than I did! I've had a canon slr for over five years and it's never had any issues or malfunctions!!!</review_text>
I bought my camera during the Black Friday sale after Thanksgiving and I just love it--I haven't had any problems out it--It's a great little camera especially for first time users like me--Make sure to have plenty of batteries--I bought the lithium and have taken over 100 pics and the battery is still good--I would recommend this camera to anyone-</review_text>
After reading the reviews before I bought this camera, I was skeptical because there was some very negative feedback as well as mostly positive. This camera functions very well and I am very pleased with every aspect of it's performance -- especially for the price. Rechargable batteries are a must!</review_text>
I got this camera for christmas and it is great. I have had 3 cameras and this has been the best. The screen is big and the camera runs good. I would say that if your buying a camera and want to buy a cheep one that is great buy this one. The functions have loud sound and the camera takes great photos inside and out. Dont listen to the bad rewiews because there just lying, and they do it to all of them. Listen to this rewiew if your getting a camera.Thank</review_text>
The function is good, lots of mode and easy to use. But now even S700 is less expensive</review_text>
I bought my K10D in Dec 06 after owning a number of Pentax cameras over the years and being very pleased with the engineering. The combination of features, if executed properly, make this camera the best buy in 10MP DSLRs right now.  I postponed my review because I wanted to get some real field experience.  I just went to Mexico, and panicked because I left the camera instruction manual behind.  I can now report on that trip. I did a little fumbling at first, mainly because I didn't have the manual, but I was soon able to find the combinations I wanted, and the camera performed both flexibly and intuitively.  The AF button and the exposure compensation button are very well placed.  I found myself in difficult lighting situations often, and both AF and exposure metering worked quite well.  I also took some hand-held shots that I normally would use a tripod with (such as at 450mm), and very few came out fuzzy because of camera movement.  In a few cases, I used bracketing, and was easily able to obtain a good balance of details in one or more of the bracketed shots.  Exposure metering worked so well that I stopped bracketing.  I particularly liked the display modes: I could boost the brightness to see the display even in bright daylight, and deep zooming gave me a good check of whether a shot was "soft" or not right at the scene.  The rechargeable Li Ion batteries, although not readily available in stores, seem to last forever (even using power zoom, and full-bright display, and some fill flash).  I believe that I could have shot all week (700 shots in RAW (DNG) + JPEG) with the battery grip attached. In summary, this camera was a pleasure to hold, very easy to use and manipulate, and resulted in a high percentage of crisp photos (even if the percentage of well-composed shots was lower because of the photographer).  I bought it because of its compatibility with Pentax lenses, 10MP sensor, shake-reduction technology, larger display, and especially the dust and water seals.  But what makes me quite happy about it is its overall ease of use and good results.  I am still discovering its features, but I already know that this camera frees me to be creative in ways that other cameras have not in the past.  Some of the features on this camera are unique (new program lines) and some are available only on cameras costing several hundred dollars more, making the K10D a good choice and a best buy.  Once again for Pentax, the engineering is supurb.</review_text>
I've had it for several weeks now and it seems like a great camera.  I am still learning new features. I would highly recommend it</review_text>
A million words have been written about this thing, and this is not an attempt at a comprehensive review, so look above or on dpreview-com for complete info.I looked at Canon, Nikon, Pentax and Sony DSLRs.  The Sony makes sense if you already have a bag full of Minolta lenses, which I don't.  Canon and Nikon put their image stabilization in the lens, which makes their 'good' lenses significantly more expensive.  Canon EOS is not backward-compatible with their old FD lenses, of which I -do- have a bagful.  Pentax is backward-compatible with all K-mount lenses made since the 1970s, and will even take 645 and 6x7 lenses, with adapters.Sooo,  I set out to ease into DSLR ownership with a K100D, then started reading the reviews, and it was a bunch of little things that made me want the K10D.  The viewfinder has an actual prism, not a mirror cage like cheaper cameras, the displays are backlit, and the low-res mode (1800 x 1200px) is exactly what I want for certain applications.  With 10 Mpx, I can point & shoot if I have to, and crop (somewhat) more later.  And the controls are more 'classic' camera-like than the 'scene modes' on beginner cameras.  Not to say this would be worth the price difference to everyone, but I bought the K10D, and the Pentax 12-24mm / 4.0 lens,  and am very happy with both.Digital cameras use less of the image projected by the lens, so your lenses are 'longer' than they would be on a film camera.  Downside: for a 'journalist lens', had to buy the 12-24mm, which is equivalent of 18-36mm on a film camera.  Upside:  my old 50mm / 1.4 is now equivalent of that top-of-the-line portrait lens I never felt I could afford.  Pentax plans to introduce in 2007 a 16-50mm / 2.8  and a 50-135mm / 2.8, which sound fantastic - but let's see what they cost before we get too excited.  Meanwhile, Sigma, Tokina, and Tamron offer some very adequate alternatives.Camera and lens together are pretty heavy, just like an older SLR, and the LED screen cannot be used as a live viewfinder - no image gets to the sensor while the mirror is down - so you have to hoist the camera to your eye to compose a shot.  No problem, I'm used to it, and it's common to all DSLRs.((My personal feeling is that the SLR platform is just about done.  It's hard to see the need for the mirror box in a digital camera, which can use the actual sensor to compose the shot through the lens and display it on the back. Future top-end digital cams will probably be a lot flatter, like the old rangefinder cameras.  Look at the Olympus E330 or Panasonic DMC-L1 to see what direction I think we should be headed.))Having said, I am very happy with the Pentax K10D, it behaves as it's supposed to, and an affordable (barely) 12-24mm rectilinear lens was unthinkable just a few years ago.  This camera has a ton and a half of features and capabilities, and I am still sorting them out.  There is definitely a learning curve if you are to get the most out of the camera, but there are also two full program modes, including 'green zone', so you can start shooting right away with good results.  Pictuers come out great.  Colors, brightness, and contrast need almost no adjustment or photoshop-ing, which has not been true of any other digi-cam I have ever owned.  Happy with this, until the next big thing comes along</review_text>
I was pleasant surprised with K10D as it combines built-in image stabilization, self-cleaning sensor, easy-to-use image controls and sealed body. It's just fills right in my hands. I'm not going to repeat all good pints that can be found in previous reviews. But I want to comments on some "Cons". Yang from MI point out that: "10M is not much bigger than 6M (*ist DL), it is good to have but don't expect a big difference..." More pixels isn't give you better image. You wouldn't see a difference on 5X6 or 8X10 in print. But if you want to print 24X36 in print this when you need more pixels. Overall it's a GREAT camera and a big step forward from istDS/K100 series cameras. I like that K10 has more controls on the body that before was bared in menus. I like RAW button big time.  What hold me from give K10D five stars it's AF. Even AF much improved from DS still not as fast as Nikon D70S. Highly recommended</review_text>
I do photography as a hobby for over 20 years. I love Pentax cameras because the lightness and for the lens compatibility and this is the best SLR I have ever had. I still need to test some of its features. But I am very happy with the quality of the pictures. I upgraded from istDS that I got two years back. The shake reduction come very useful when I take pictures of my 2 year old son who can not stay at one place. I used to get many blurred images with ist DS at low shutter speeds and this camera handles that very well. The colors are very natural and I like the fact that I can save images in both RAW and JPEG at the same time. I usually use RAW to store my images and JPEG for the web and email. The image processor may not be as good as what u may find in Nikon or Canon but the RAW images are very impressive. I think I finally got the right camera to really replace my older film based Pentax SLR and still I can use all those expensive lenses I have without having to spend more money. If u are an owner of Pentax SLR with many lenses and wants to go digital, there is no better choice than K10D unless u have a lot of money to invest on a camera and new lenses</review_text>
I owned a *ist DL for about 8 month and bought this upgrade. I don't have any experience with Cannon or Nikon. So my review is mostly based on a comparison to *ist DL. Hope this will help those in the same situation.I am not a Pro and will not be a Pro. So I only need a decent but inexpensive camera with a handful choice of lenses. I bought K10D mainly for (1) shake reduction (2) dust removal (3) RAW button (4) 10MB CCD. Of course, there are plenty other features to expect. At this pice level, I think K10D beats Cannon and Nikon and any others. Plus, I have had a DA 50-200mm and a couple of K and M42 Takumar manual lenses. Sticking to pentax is the best for me.After about 150 test shots, I can share you some of my opinions:Pros:-- Shake reduction is great (but it has its limit)-- dust removal comes handy-- RAW button is very useful-- manual choice of any one of 11 focus points, great for composition-- faster focus than *ist DL-- rich functions, e.g. SV mode, program line-- support ISO 100Cons:-- Weather-seal does not mean too much if you don't get weather-sealed lenses-- 10M is not much bigger than 6M (*ist DL), it is good to have but don't expect a big difference (but this is not Pentax or K10D's problem)-- Battery meter drop from full to empty without stopping at a half-empty status-- PentaPrism viewfinder is not brighter than the pentamirror of my *ist DL (at least no noticable difference)-- shutter release is not as crispy as *ist DL (just a personal feeling)It's bigger and heavier than ist DL. Great ergo design. I am happy with K10D. I take one star off for the cons listed.PS: the ccd/stablizer slides inside (even power off) when you flip the camera. a little scary when I first got it. But after some reading I think it is "normal".</review_text>
A wonderful and affordable housing to take your camera places you normally can't! I took my Canon S80 down to 110 feet and got wonderful photos! My only advice to scuba divers is to buy an external strobe and bracket. The flash on a point-and-shoot camera is not powerful enough to give you the colorful photos you really want</review_text>
I have used this case for my S80 on multiple dive trips and I am impressed not only that you have virtually every control function available but also the picture quality that you get. I was a little worried at first with one of my dives that was supposedly right at the cases's rating of 130'. I actually logged the dive at 146' and the case held up fine. I knew I took a risk though. Just make sure you clean the o-ring every so often, re-lube it and soak the case in some fresh water once you return from your dive trip and you have a long lasting underwater housing. Looking forward to many more dives. The weights are extra, but very useful so your camera won't float up and stays more steady. Just make sure you strap it down to your BC and not loose it if you use the weights :</review_text>
Compact, sturdy, well engineered. Easy-to-manipulate controls. Thoughtful flash diffuser. Beefy silicon o-ring should last a long time. External mount will come in handy for tripod usage. Love the $150 price and free shipping with Amazon</review_text>
I've used the camera for snorkerling, and as protection down the Colorado River in the Grand Canyon last summer.  It's one of those purchases that I really feel gives me my money's worth; I would buy it again in a heartbeat.  The case is very durable, and fits neatly in a standard pelican case.  Unfortunately, the camera's wheel control cannot be manipulated while inside the case.  This problem with the wheel control is minimal, and can generally be avoided with a little planning.  The wheel control is the only reason I don't give this case 5 stars</review_text>
As usual Canon has produced a quality product matched perfectly to a great camera. I have had this camera down to 100 ft. without a problem. I think this camera/case combo is one of the best you will find without spending over $1000 bucks and many much more expensive units can't match it's performance.My only complaint is that the multi funtion wheel on the back of the camera is not accessable when in the case so you cannot use most of the manual funtions that require use of the wheel. Like manual focus and adjusting the flash, exposure comp. and white balance. This is a major consideration for the prosummers out there</review_text>
This well-designed case allows you access to almost all the functions of the camera---zoom, video, auto and manual settings.  The camera is able to take superb pictures even with overcast skies.  We lubricate the gasket, as recommended, each time, and have had no leaks.  The picture quality possible with a good camera like the powershot S80 and a waterproof case so far exceeds that of disposable underwater cameras (I usually manage one decent shot/camera) that there is no comparison.  Since you can take as many photos and videos as you want, and see them immediately on the monitor, you know whether you got the shot you wanted.  We took some neat photos half above the water and half below.  A flash diffuser spreads light from the flash, so that you get even light when you shoot that lobster hiding under the rock.</review_text>
This optional charger has the benefit of being able to charge batteries for the Alpha more quickly than the standard charger supplied with the Alpha. It displays the amount of time left to for a regular or full charge. Although it has a charging bay for two batteries, batteries can only be charged sequentially and not simultaneously. One downside is that unit is relatively large, being much larger and heavier than the standard charger</review_text>
I bought this camera mostly for home movies, and after doing extensive research on camcorders.  First was the decision of going to Hard-drive over DVD or Tape.  The ease of downloading videos to your computer, plus the fact that it's the way most camcorders are going to be heading in the near future made this almost a no-brainer.  Then was the question about which model to buy.  I chose the SR82 over the SR42 and SR62 because of the extra storage capacity, and the improved resolution over the SR42.  The video resolution for the SR82 is good enough for most televisions.  If you want HD video, you will need to spend at least $200 or $300 more for an "entry-level" HD camera.  I'm not too worried about the 1MP still photos because, let's be honest, I'm not planning to use this camera to take pictures!  I have a digital camera for that, which has better resolution, low-light performance and options than a camcorder will ever have for taking pictures.  Plus, it has a flash, which camcorders usually don't have (unless you're willing to add an accessory shoe and external light).Picture quality as I mentioned is pretty good, even in low-light, and the camera is very intuitive and easy to use right out of the box.  Downloading to a computer was a breeze too.  Do get however an extra battery, since the one it comes with usually runs out pretty fast</review_text>
I just picked this camera up a few days ago and boy is it great.  Easy to use right out of the box.  Have not purchased a Sony Camcorder in years but I needed a new one.  Not having to pop in a tape or a disk is great.  I was a little worried about not having enough space on the hard drive in the camera for enough recording time but the 60GB drive gives you plenty of room.  I just plug the Camcorder via USB into the computer push one button and it's on a DVD.  The picture quality is outstanding and the camera itself is incredibly light and small.  Love this camera!!! The only down side is the camera does not have a view finder.  You really don't need it as the LCD screen is better. If you are like me and like managing your media on a home computer then this is the camera for you</review_text>
The camera bag is excellent. This is a great deal for getting the extra battery you need as a backup for your camera with a well constructed camera bag and UV filter</review_text>
This kit was all I expected and more. The bag easily holds my EOS XT Rebel both of my lenses,external flash, batteries, chargers.....with room to spare. The bag alone was worth the price, the battery and filter were a great kicker</review_text>
Great deal on excellent case, excellent battery, and normal filter for terrible camera</review_text>
You can't go wrong with this bag, it's extremely sturdy and well-built. Quality that you expect from Canon, as usual. If you have just purchased a Canon digital SLR or are planning to, I highly recommend getting this. If you have the kit lens, the 58mm filter will come in handy and of course an extra battery is always good. I've already filled it with my 4 lenses, a notebook and pen, the Rebel XT manual, my filters, two CF cards and other accessories like the remote trigger for the XT. And I still have room left. The velcro/pad configuration system is great because it doesn't lock you into having to always carry the same set of equipment arranged the same way. And the tripod straps were a pleasant surprise</review_text>
This bag is a lot bigger than I had anticipated.  It is well constructed and has a lot of compartments to put all your goodies in.To give you an idea of size, I am currently carrying:-Digital Rebel XT SLR-Canon AE-1 Program film SLR-10 rolls of film-extra battery and charger-a few filters-lots of various camera odds and endsAND I STILL HAVE TONS OF ROOM LEFT!  I haven't even began to max this bag out.  I am very happy with this buy and extras that come with it.</review_text>
My initial thoughts were this is too expensive but when you consider the quality bag and a Canon battery, the price starts to become reasonable.The bag is a high quality bag and, in an effort to give you an idea of what it can hold I will describe one load.Digital Rebel with attached lenseFilm based EOS without attached lensetwo additional lensesone flash unitowners manualsspare batteries and chargerextra memory cards and filterscables, hand and shoulder strapsAnd it still had additional room for more gadgets and toys. It does have tripod loops which I don't use.As far as the Canon battery, I've read that other brand batteries aren't anywhere near as good so getting a genuine Canon battery is good ... I guess ...The kit includes a haze filter which is generally considered a "that's nice, who cares" since they are generally cheap enough to be considered a freebie.I'm really torn between a 4 or 5 star rating.  Based on the quality of the merchandise, it would get a 5. Based on the price, I'd have to drop the rating.Mark</review_text>
This case is accurately represented--fits the G7 like a glove--very sturdy.  I was expecting it to be a little larger.  The accessory holder is nice for an additional battery/memory card.  However you can not carry the accessory holder in the main case.  I would recomend this case to those looking for a convenient, "on the go" type of case for the CAMERA ONLY.  For those wanting to tote batteries, chargers, accesories, or lens adapters with the camera you'll have to look elsewhere for a larger case</review_text>
For Christmas, I received the Cannon G7. A very nice and expensive camera. I did not want to trust it to a soft case. This case is sturdy, but not hard. It is comfortable to carry around. Easy to slide the camera in and out of. I like that the strap of the camera is what I wear around my neck rather than having to try to fit it into the case. It comes with an attachable mini case to house the battery and/or memory cards. I highly recommend this case</review_text>
The case is well designed to protect the camera and can be mounted on one's belt or worn over the shoulder (the strap of the camera protrudes from the case to make shoulder use possible). The case has a small holder for an extra battery and an extra SD memory card. I think that I will find the case useful, though I have bought an inexpensive soft case (about $10) that may be handier than the hard case. Since the Canon G4 is a high-end digital camera, it may be best to have the hard case to protect the camera in certain situations, even though the soft case might be handier in other situations</review_text>
As usaul, just wish you could ship direct to me in Holland.  I have to have it sent to my daughter in the US and then forwarde</review_text>
I agree with the first review posted here for the most part. I will add that I have tried the software and was not impressed.  First, upon installation I received an error message that said the software was not Windows certified, and that the installation could cause my system to become unstable. Well, it did. After installation, my system crashed on a daily basis. I have sensed uninstalled and contacted Sony. They basically said it doesn't matter that it is not Windows certified because it is Sony certified. Alrighty then. Once I uninstalled, the crashes stopped. Will be looking for 3rd party SW to use. It also worth noting that the camera is equipped with a USB port, which I was told at Best Buy could be used for downloading video to your PC. The cable is not included of course. When I did have the software installed, it did not recognize the camera when hooked up to USB port. In the PDF and hardcopy manuals included, the USB interface is poorly documented. In the chapters where it mentiods the IEEE interface, it says this must be used to download the video. Does not mention USB as an alternative. When I took it back to Best Buy for answers, it even stumped the Geek Squad. According to Sony, you have to select the USB Stream function on the on the cameras integrated menu. I still cannot get it to work after following Sony instructions. Usually, USB ports on a camcorder are reserved for downloading still shots on cameras that have a slot a for flash memory. The HC38 has no such slot. They should have left off the USB port and put in a mic/earphone jack. Plan on installing a firewire capable expansion card if you don't have one and forget any ideas of downloading via USB</review_text>
I have had a sony Hi-8 Camcorder for ten years now, and was genereally pleased with it. However, I wanted to go digital. I didn't want to spend too much money, certainly not on my first digital venture. I did a lot of online reading, and got the impression that HDD cameras didn't perform too well, and mini DVD limits your time, so went for miniDV.I have had the camera just over a week at the time of writing.Pros: Good clear image. Audio Quality. Nightshot Plus. Ilink. Small size. Ease of Use. 40x Optical zoom.Cons: Sony Accessories, particularly batteries are far too expensive. I shall be looking for 3rd party sources. No headphone jack. No accessory shoe. Cannot control playback except via touch screen LCD. No firewire cable supplied. Cannot charge batteries off camera without purchasing a seperate charger.Comments.It comes with some basic editing software on CD, but I cannot comment on this, as I have Adobe Premiere 1.5, and I am using this with no problem at all. If you want to transfer your video into your computer, you need a firewire cable. Usually for a PC you need a 4 pin to 6 pin one. You can buy them on Amazon MUCH cheaper than the local stores, so I recommend ordering one if you decide to buy the camcorder.All in all, I am pleased with it so far in terms of video and audio quality. One annoyance. If you buy another battery, you also need to buy a charger, as the power supply you get with the camera will only charge the batteries whilst they are in the camera. This isn't much use if, for example, you want to charge a battery at home, while you use a fresh one outdoors. The extra chargers are around $40, as well as the cost of another battery of course. By the time you buy an extra battery, that off-cam charger, a case, a couple of filters, and a firewire cable, you can almost double the cost of the cam itself!</review_text>
I really think this camcorder is great. I'm amazed at how good the picture is for the price. It's nice and light and easy to carry around, and I got tons of great video from my family's recent trip to Disney. I'm not a real technical person when it comes to these recorders, but I can certainly say I'm very happy with it esp. for the money.</review_text>
The Canon ZR800 camcorder is a solid little unit with plenty of features for the most folks.  And with a great price, it's surprising that Canon even included an external microphone input (after all, 90 percent of video is the AUDIO).  Actually, I bought the ZR800 as a "deck" to play and capture mini-DV tapes that were recorded on my prosumer camcorder (avoiding wear and tear on the expensive cameras), but once I tried the ZR800 I loved it and often use it for day to day use instead of hauling around huge camcorders</review_text>
This Camera is Great, it's small and compact and very easy to use. We Love it</review_text>
For people who look for similar solutions simplest, effective and cheapest solution</review_text>
Very well made and works well in the field when you are taking shots quickly. I have noticed a better quality of light falling on my subjects with no red eye. I have not had a situation yet to test the shadow of my subject falling further down but it goes to reason if the flash is higher over the lens the shadow would be effected</review_text>
This is a great product, does exactly what it is supposed to do and does it well.  It's simple and reasonably inexpensive.  Solid feeling on the camera.  I picked up this version after a disappointing experience with the folding model.My only beef is that I have to rotate my camera the "wrong" way for a portrait oriented photo.  This puts the shutter release at the bottom instead of the top.  It works, but is slightly awkward for me.  Not a biggie and it really does help the pictures due to the favorable position of the flash.</review_text>
It keeps the flash over the lens at all times, in both landscape and portrait orientations.  Positions the flash far enough away from the lens to avoid red-eye.  Also is nicely balanced with SLR with battery pack and flash mounted</review_text>
This is why sony is hot! This sexy little (yes its really small the size of a pack of cards) it takes perfect clear and crisp pictures and the battery life is a long 320mins perfect for a vacation, make sure to get a memory stick with it though, because w/o it it only holds about 15 pics. This is my first digital camera and I would definitely buy sony again</review_text>
I love this camera.  The color is great, so fun and makes me feel unique.  The screen is a great size, and it takes great pictures.  Good with the red eye issue.  The menu is great too, when you scroll thru things, it tells you what it does so you don't have to memorize it all.  Takes fast pictures, but not one after another, like I was hoping.  But it does open fast.  Don't be fooled by the big memory, you will still need a larger card.  Depending on the size pic you want, you can take about 30 to 50 pics on the memory alone.  But all in all I love this camera and it was a great buy</review_text>
This is my first digital camera, i did a lot of search and finaly i decide for the DSC-W55 in black, and is what i was looking for, small enough to have it in my purse, have a lot of functions, and is very easy to import pictures to my computer, you only connect the camera with the USB cable and you don't need to install the software that came with the camera, I have windows vista and i didn't have any problems transfering the pictures, is the best camera and the price is great, and you can choose the super saver shipping and save more.you will love this camera too, is small, very pretty, have lots of options, and take great pictures.Some one wrote in a review that this camera feels like plastic, and that's not true, looks very durable to me and I think is a good product and worth every single dollar you spend.Is easy to shoot pictures in the Auto adjustment mode, to start taking pictures the sooner you charge the battery, because this camera have an internal memory you can buy a memory card later.Well hope you have lots of fun taking pictures, Good luck..!</review_text>
I bought this as a present for my wife.  I was looking for something that she could carry in her purse.  the automatic functions are easy and functional.  It is not an enthusiasts camera:  too hard to get into the menus.  The screen is easy to turn off(this sucks battery power).  and it even has an optical viewfinder(a rare finding lately)  the optical viewfinder helps to get steady pictures for those of us with the shakes.  The pictures are clear and the colors are excellent.  The drawback is the that sony batteries cost an arm and a leg.  The wire for downloading pix is multifunctional and very proprietary(read that as expensive if you lose it</review_text>
The Sony W55 is the followup to the successful and popular W50. It's a very good compact camera, easy to carry and easy to use, and reasonably priced - so most people will be happy with it.Not much has changed from the W50, which in this case is a good thing!One change is that the W55 is a 7 MP camera, rather than the W50's 6MP. Honestly, that's not a big plus, as they haven't made the sensor that catches the light any larger.  Same (good) lenses, same size sensor = the same (good) pictures, but not better.  (Though it might help a little on features like Smart Zoom.)The obvious change is of course the colors.  Don't make too much fun of that!  There are 4 DSC-W series cameras in our family, colors would have kept my mother-in-law from taking my sister's camera home with her.  A little personalization is a good thing.The internal memory has been expanded (to 56MB), but I've never used the internal memory on the cameras that have had it, so I'm not sure that matters much.  It might be worth knowing how to use as a backup, for another dozen or two shots if your card is full, or you have some other problem.The controls, menus and interface on the W55 are reasonably easy to use.  For example, the W55 has easy access to the various scene modes (twilight, etc), with some explanation on the screen of what those mysterious little icons mean (so you might actually use them, since it tells you what they do!). If you're new to digital photography, there will be a learning curve.  But if you've used other cameras much, especially Sonys, you can pick this up and use many of the features right away.Read the short introductory guide that comes with the camera, though!The rechargeable battery should easily last you for a full day of shooting - hundreds of shots - with no problem. (Be a little wise about turning it off when you're not using it!) So you probably don't need a second battery, unless you're going into the woods for a while.  It's nice not to have to mess with bulky AA rechargeables. Also, lithium ion batteries don't have a memory effect, so don't worry about partial recharging. Just charge the battery each night. So - before getting a second battery, try it for a while and see if you need it.But get a case - something to protect the screen, at least.  A fully closed one might help resist rain and splashes a little, too.You'll also want to get a Memory Stick Pro Duo card - Pro cards are faster, and you need the smaller Duo size with this camera. Get a 1-2GB card so you don't have to think about running out of memory too much - if you shop carefully, you can find them for so little these days that it's well worth avoiding running out of memory.  You might want a spare card if you plan to travel for more than a week, or use the video mode often - which is surprisingly good (though a bit dark) if set to fine, but uses enormous amounts of storage at that setting.You can stretch your memory, and your hard drive space, by using one of the lower-resolution settings to take snapshots.  You don't really need 7MP for all your photos!The W55 will take better photos than those credit-card type cameras that have a tiny lens system - optics will always make a difference in a camera.  Any reasonable person will be very happy with the pictures from the W55, given the size of it.The camera will be a little slow and often take disappointing pictures in low light and dark situations.  Try the High ISO mode in low light no-flash situations - the picture quality suffers some, but most people will find it useful. Realistically, no ultra-compact camera will work really well in that situation - if you need that often, think about something with a bigger lens and bigger sensor. Good light always gives the best pictures with any camera. There are limits to what you can currently expect from any ultracompact camera.The W55 offers enough controls (through the scene modes and the Program mode) to allow a fair amount of control over the pictures, for an automatic camera.The charger is fairly compact and rated 100-240V, so while you'll need a plug adapter overseas you won't need a voltage converter. The battery charger is a little slow, though probably OK.Keep this camera charged and handy, and you'll find you take a lot of pictures because it's easy to carry and easy to use</review_text>
I really love my first digital camera! I searched and I searched and I finally found what I wanted.  The pictures are crystal clear, the movie playback is exceptional - you only hear what you're supposed to, no loud background noise or static, no muffled noise.  The pictures come out so clear that after you take the picture you can zoom in 5X and count the pores on your face! I love it! I don't think I could ask for a better camera.  I hope this camera will last me atleast 4 years or more or until I graduate from college.  If one is in the market and can afford it, get this camera! There are cheaper cameras but if you want to get a camera, get a good one, that doesn't mean it has to be expensive, but in my opinion you get what you pay for. Thanks for reading. Happy buying</review_text>
This is an awesome product and made the perfect gift.  Another eviewer extolled the virtues of the flexible hood and I totally agree.  Thank you</review_text>
This is a large hood and I doubt there'll be any lens glare at wide to medium zoom positions with this thing on! At full zoom though, at least on my Nikon Coolpix 5700, there's not much hood shielding the sides of the lens from glare because the lens is so far out. I haven't had any trouble with this, it's just an observation I made.This hood is all rubber except the ring containing the mounting threads, they're metal, so if you knock it against something likely it won't get damaged, (the hood OR what ever it knocks against) due to the soft rubber; 'good idea Nikon'. The interior of the hood has ringes molded into it, to reduce reflections, I'm sure. The only downside is the thing looks like a toilet plunger because of its shape and size and you would not want to have it on if you were trying to be inconspicuous.</review_text>
I've owned the Nikon HR-E5700 lens hood for almost as long as I've owned my Nikon 5700. The lens hood screws on quickly and can be removed just as quickly. Not only does the hood shade the lens from outside glare but its firm rubberized nature also protects the lens from accidental side-to-side dings and accidents.There really shouldn't be a time when you need to use the lens hood and the speed light (flash) at the same time but if you did then the flash is going to be obscured by the lip of the hood leaving a darker shadow on the bottom of the image.If it weren't for the popup speed light I would leave the lens hood on permanently since it adds to the general bulk of the camera and makes the 5700 (and the 8700) 'feel' a bit more substantial a bit more like a prosumer digital camera.</review_text>
This bag is working great for my GL2.  It is not easily crushed.  The craftmanship is excellent</review_text>
I'm not very picky when it comes to certain items. This camera case does a sufficient job of carrying my camcorder (Panasonic AG-HVX200P) as well as a few other things. I have space for a few batteries, the AC power supply, audio/visual cables, tapes, and other necessities. It is soft and padded on the inside and protectively firm on the outer front and back sides. It should be understood that this case is good for carrying a camera. Microphones, extra cables, cords, and large amounts of tapes (more than 10) may not fit neatly without putting some effort into how you pack the case.This case works very well for a camera of this size (L 16" x W 5" x H 8")</review_text>
It worked as stated however I was dissapointed to learn from the Golf Professional that it cannot be used in official tournaments  as assistance with the slope is prohibited!!!  The price is competitive and the merchandise was shipped promptly</review_text>
Product is very convenient and easy to use. Will provide distance to many different objects: trees, bunkers, water, flag, etc. Better than a lot of caddies</review_text>
This is an incredibly accurate range finder. It amazed me to see how far off some of my clubs yardage markers were. This is very easy to use, is very accurate and a blast to play with.  The amazon price is easily 450 cheaper than anywhere else I could find.</review_text>
I love my rangefinder! I've had it since Oct.2006 and forgot it at home only once.I've trusted my Pinseeker over tee box yardage markers, a myriad of GPS in-cart units, sprinker heads and the usual variety of yardage to the center of the green course markers 200, 150, 100. I believe what it tells me and it has been highly accurate. I'm reluctant to share the yardage info with my fellow players unless asked, to avoid chatty debates and responsibility for their errant shots.(you'd be surprised...)A few things to be aware are, the flags must be clearly visable of distant out of focus shrub branches that can interfere with the laser sensor, low light overcast conditions can be difficult to accurately measure distance and lastly, if you've heavily consumed too much COFFEE or too many martinis the night before, shakiness will prevail. You may want to add a tripod to your bag. %</review_text>
gift for avid golfer who really liked it and can't wait to use it - in Alask</review_text>
Easy to use.  Clear optics.  Ranges very well up to 1000 yards, but not much further</review_text>
I bought this rangefinder to take to Myrtle Beach for a golf outing. Since we play a different course every day, I hoped it would give me true yardages on a course I hadn't played before. It out performed my expectations. Every golfer knows that the yardages on the course are to the center of the green. But some greens are 1 to 2 club lengths more. This rangefinder gave perfect yardages for me.This rangefinder has three modes of operation. You can use it for hunting with the first mode, which just gives you yardage to any target you aim at. The second mode is the pin seeker mode for golf. You aim at the flag and press the button and it gives you the yardage to the flag. The third mode is the pin seeker w/slope mode for golf. You also aim at the flag and it gives you the distance to the pin plus or minus the slope to the green(this mode is illegal for USGA tournaments).It was very helpful off the tee. You could aim it at a fairway bunker or hazard from the tee and you could get a yardage that would let you know whether you could carry it.I found it very easy to operate and a great product.</review_text>
I have only used it a few times and like it, especially the slope feature (I'm not a tournament player), but I must point out that it took me a while to learn to steady it enough to get good readings.  It still takes me too long to get readings when the flag is more than 200 yds away, especially when there is no wind and when the background is cluttered.  Perhaps I will get better results with more use and practice.  I play with friends who are low handicappers (I'm not) and who don't waste time on the course.  While they ask me for readings when the slope of a hole is great, I usually don't have much time to get readings and keep playing at a steady pace.  The instruction manual is too sketchy for my liking</review_text>
This is my third Bushnell in 5 years (lost one, the other was no good over 150 yds).This is one great piece of equipment. Everyone that uses it just smiles. The Vertical yardage is great, but its like have a tach in your car, after a couple of weeks you know how much to add for elevation. Leaves its predecessors/competition in the dust. You should buy this for two reasons:1) It is UNCANNY how fast it finds the flag, just have to get it close.2) It finds an object at 350 yards as easy as it does at 100. It just finds flags faster.This is probably the only piece of equipment in my bag that I did not pay to much for.</review_text>
The Camera has fullfilled mostly all the expectations. Only the anti blur system(super steady shot)was quite disapointing because most moving objects apears as blury as at my other, and oldest, Olympus digital camera. I really expected more from it</review_text>
This has to be one of the most versatile compact cameras ever.  The 3" display is awesome. It makes it very easy to frame subject and also for editing & modifying pictures. With this one, I own three digital cameras and by far, this is the most convenient and easy to use. The prompts in the menu are very logical and easy to follow. The movie feature is also awesome. The sound quality is the best I've seen in any camera this size.Very impressed!!</review_text>
I used to have a Canon Powershot. I am happier with color from Sony. It gives me true sunset color. It seems to have wider range of color especially in red zone. Skin tone is more real and livelier</review_text>
nice camera to own for casual consumerproscompact camera and touchscreen 3" screenout-of-box slideshow with music and many transition effectsconslittle heavier than prior modelsgrainy picture at higher optical zoom levelcolor are not as natural as nikon camera</review_text>
Of course this camera is not a digital SLR. Since I have received it, I have taken more pictures in one month than I would with my SLR. I take it everywhere with me because....well because I can now.... I loved my Rebel but it was too bulky for vacations and fun. I will miss the features that it offered me, but this little guy catches a lot more of the fun..</review_text>
I purchased this camera after more research than I put into buying a car - well almost. It has turned out to be very easy to set up. The touch screen menus work smoothly and intuitively. You can almost throw the manual away unless you want to get really technical. The automatic setting has covered just about anything that I've wanted to do so far. Battery life seems good and I especially like the fact that there is no protruding lens to get broken/jammed. I gave it only four stars  because the last item - durability - has yet to be tested. So far, so good</review_text>
The camera takes great pictures but as stated above...IT IS NOT IMMEDIATELY PC COMPATIBLE.  There is NO FIREWIRE CABLE INCLUDED...and if you try to pick one up at Circuit City it is another 20-50 bucks...so check out the GS85...I am getting my cable for 5.00 off ebay and will amend my review when I see if it works...</review_text>
I compared this camera against the GS85 and the GS320, I found the OIS to be exactly the same on all three models, as is the body, the GS320 at 500 bucks DOES give you a leica lens, it's true. But comparing the picture from these three proved to me that the GS80 gives better blacks and a more colorful image, at 279, its a great deal.Its important to note that all three of these cameras come with firewire as standard, something thats lacking on Camcorders of almost any price range by other manufacturers. Firewire is essential for video editing, make sure that whichever Camcorder has Firewire and not USB</review_text>
This is a good case, but i would prefer one that it can be a little bit small, because is bulky. But on the overall, is a very good adquisition for the people that wants to take underwater photography</review_text>
The waterproof case arrived in perfect (new) condition overnight as promised.  I was especially impressed because it was coming to me on my vacation in Maui and shipped on a holiday.  Thanks for saving our vacation photos</review_text>
Tested the case at home in a water bucket per instructions.  No leaks.  Went on a dive trip and the first dive I put in some toilet paper and closed it up.  Went to 75 feet.  No leaks.  Second dive, removed tissue and put in the camera (A610).  Performed flawlessly for 17 dives.  Excellent case.  Highly recommend the case and also the toilet paper test</review_text>
All camera controls and features seem to be accessible, a quality seldom (if ever) found in aftermarket waterproof camera cases.  The flash diffuser, easily installed or removed underwater, really helps obtain professional results in the inevitable low light conditions found underwater.  Canon's manual provides valuable tips and encourages a lot of self confidence for the new user, like me!  Canon says a single hair can cause leaks at the waterproof seal, so you'd better have your eyeglasses, when sealing up, if you normally wear them</review_text>
If you're like me and just want to take pictures and not "photographs" and don't want to spend a lot of cash, you'll like this housing. Dove three times before I got the nerve to put the camera inside but, it performed beautifully</review_text>
I recently purchased this product for my son ( a marine biology student) and we used it while snorkeling in the Caribbean on a recent cruise . The product perfomed well and was very easy to use .This product allowed for all of the features of the Canon camera to be used to its fullest and the outcome was some outstanding underwater shots of blue tangs ,parrot fish and a rather menacing looking barracuda that had taken temporary residence under the dive boat in St. Thomas. Looks like an expensive piece of plastic in the box - performs like a Swiss watch</review_text>
I recently enjoyed two dives in Hawaii...one during the day and one at night. The underwater case worked very well. I was very pleased. I also use the case any time I am around the beach or near salt water and sand in order to protect the camera. If you get the case wet, you have to rinse and wipe off the lense or you will have water spots on your pictures. Of course this would be true of any case.The only negatives are that the flash is a little week since it is a somewhat obscured by the case. And if you push the on/off button too hard it may jam the camera on/off button down. It only takes a light push to turn it on and off.Overall it is a great product</review_text>
Finding a low cost but durable camera case for scuba diving is not easy, but Canon is well known for having a line of cases for many of its digital cameras.The WP-DC90 follows the legacy of many Canon scuba cases by providing buttons to operate all features of the camera.  The sealing latch is most unlikely to be accidentally opened underwater and a flash diffuser and LED shield are provided.Unfortunately, the case has some minor annoyances.The camera flash is useless without the separate diffuser, as the built in flash is partially obstructed by the lens port and thus, lights subjects unevenly.  The indispensable diffuser clips onto the lens port and sits infront of the flash, and is prone to physical abuse.Both the diffuser and LED shield snap onto the camera and can easily be dislodged by the bump and grind typical of dive boats.  Both come with laynards to tie them to the camera housing, which then leads to danglies than easily snag underwater.  I've already ripped one such laynard and partially damaged a diffuser from an older model camera.  Special techniques and clips have to be devised to hold the diffuser and shield more securely such as in rough conditions during high surf shore dives.The many buttons is a mixed blessing.  My previous Canon flooded by exceeding its depth limitation, and that led to leaks that began around the lens housing; otherwise minor leaks can occur with a dirty case O ring.  With depth, the control button O rings increasingly become tight, such than the buttons become inoperable near the case's depth limit.  I have yet to experience a leak from the buttons themselves, but most underwater cameras allow only a minimum of controls to reduce the risk of flood from many moving parts.</review_text>
After reading horror stories about underwater housings, I decided to spend the extra little bit to get a brand name kit as well as the kit made by Canon (the same maker of my camera [A610]). I was careful to read and follow the directions, but could only test it in my kitchen sink. So, with a little confidence, I took it to the Caribbean last week and sank it to about 15 feet for half an hour. I was impressed that the kit worked perfectly. Not a single leak or anything. I ended up taking it out on three different days and had to clean all the salt water and sand each night, but as long as I keep it clean and lubricate the gasket each time, I'm hopeful that it will give me many months/years of service.My friend calls it the "chick magnet"? I brought it with me to Margaritaville in Grand Turk after snorkeling and got a lot of attention</review_text>
I was initailly reluctant to buy an underwater case due to the risk of possible camera damage if the case failed; however, I couldn't be more pleased with the performance of this product.  The installation was simple and logical.  The performance underwater, shooting both stills and video, was superb - it was surprisingly easy to access all of the camera's functions while submerged.  In no way did this case hinder my abilities to use the camera as I wanted to.  My only regret is not buying this product earlier.</review_text>
I've had the camera for over a year, and taken several thousand pictures with it. It's pretty darn good overall. I've been pleased with the image quality, especially for scenery shots. It does fall somewhat short with portraits of people in many cases, though. Easy to use. Minor durability problems.</review_text>
Gave this to the in-laws for Cristmas and they were taking pictures the next time we went to visit. Definitely buy additional memory, the internal memory is really more of a back-up</review_text>
This camera works great.  And the batteries last quite awhile too.  Good quality pictures.  A good deal for the price</review_text>
I canceled this order because shipment wasn't going to arrive in time for christmas</review_text>
I bought this camera for my wife for Christmas and after I bought it she was talking and said she did not like HP products. Well she opened it on Christmas and said it looked nice. After she took about 40 pictures with it I could not pry it out of her hand with a crowbar.. It takes great pictures and is very easy to work. She even let me take a couple of pictures with it. So it shows you don't have to spend a lot of money to get a great camera. Keep up the great work HP..</review_text>
My husband got this for me as a present and I love it.  Easy to use.</review_text>
I've had Canon digital cameras for the past two years and with my first, opted to purchase the accompanying Canon camera case. Though it's a good fit, it has a couple of flaws that caused me to look elsewhere for a case when I got my second digital camera this year.This time around, I chose the Tamrac case because, unlike the Canon, it zips closed. The Canon has a flap closure that creates two big gaps on either side of the case, allowing small particles to get inside the camera itself. Second, the Tamrac features not only a belt loop, like the Canon, but a nice shoulder strap. This means the user can carry the camera hands free without having to put it in a purse or backpack.This case fits many small film and slim digital cameras (go to Tamrac's website to download a spec sheet that lists camera/case compatability), so don't expect a custom fit. For my Canon A510, this case is a bit on the long side, but no so much so that I have to be concerned about it shifting around too much in the case. It's a good bag from a great manufacturer for a decent price. Recommended</review_text>
These batteries are well worth the price.   We've tried regular alkaline batteries and rechargables, and both will lose power very quickly after only one or two photo sessions, resulting in slow response.  These lithium batteries hold a strong charge for months at a time, and never seem to give slow response even as the charge starts to drop</review_text>
I've found these batteries to last longer and perform better than standard brand batteries.  Delivery was great as usual</review_text>
I received the merchandise in working condition promptly, and at the lowest price.  I will use Amazon again</review_text>
I had excellent service from this company and will reorder titems again for my camera</review_text>
Product was delivered in a prompt manner and was received in perfect condition</review_text>
Arrived on time. the battery gave me the promised time usage/recommend to all digital camera user</review_text>
This batteries are a godsend! I was frustrated with my camera (d580 zoom) because the batteries didn't last at all. I used these on my tour through Europe - they lasted over 2 weeks of CONSTANT photo taking, reviewing, turning the camera on and off... They were great. I also have the rechargable AA's, but I would rather pay for these because they last so much longer. Worth the money.</review_text>
If you ignore the one star rviews that some people are actually giving for the reviewers(in which they are correct in doing so, but incorrect in reviewing the battery for it) then you would see the average go up.  I buy these all the time for my D550z.  I have done alot of research and not only is this the best battery solution for the D550, it is a pretty good one.The D550z is your common camera that takes great pictures. and these batteries last a long time, We have a young baby and we are both photographers and have taken over 3,000 pictures in the last sixteen months, that number is not exagerated.  These batteries generally last two or three months. Sometimes with flash, sometimes with the screen on.In short, These batteries are great for your basic common camera and will be eaten up by power hungry cameras like the E10 and 20.They last way longer than alkalines and niMH.  I personally don't like the rechargable solution because you spend a lot of time charging batteries that die quickly. For every time you load these batteries you are going to change Nimh 3 times and charge for a total of 5 hours.  Charging for that much time is expensive in itself. $15 every two to three months, for the amount that we shoot, is a bargain, and a bargain over time spent. These should last the regular point and shooter much longer</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras, of many brands but I must say that the Casio Exilim EX-Z600BK is one of the best ultra digital cameras on the market.Pros:Fast OperationBig, Bright LCDGreat BodyNice PicturesCons:No ViewfinderNo Manual ControlsAdditional Comments:LookRating:The camera looks as it is on the online images. Its a nice dark, glossy black but doesn't smudge or keep finger prints easily.SizeRating: 5/5Its very tiny. You can hide it by clasping of your hands.FeelRating: 5/5Its has a great feel. The buttons are small but not awkward.  Its light too. You can hardly feel it in yout pocket but its balanced and comfortable to hold.This camera is practically perfect. This is an honest review. Its a great value for the money. I recommend it.</review_text>
In Special for Latin American People: Soy de Venezuela y tuve el inmenso placer de comprar esta camara las pasadas navidades, a traves de mi tarjeta de credito y un currier que me llevo la camara hasta la puerta de mi casa en Valencia Venezuela, supero todas mis expectativas en cuanto a calidad y precio, cuenta con Garantia Internacional, una Bateria recargable que realmente es duradera, la calidad de las fotos impresas es realmente extraordinaria, y cuenta con un sinfin de opciones que hacen de la Exilin EX-Z600 una excelente selccion, la recomiendo a cualquiera con los ojos cerrados y digan Whisky!!!!!</review_text>
My husband purchased this camera for me for my birthday last year.  His Aunt and Uncle had one and we thought it was simply amazing.  Since our purchase, we've help several of our friends and family members buy the same camera through Amazon. Actually, we've bought 4 other ones besides the one that my husband bought me for my birthday.  I highly recommend this camera to everyone.  It's small, has many neat features, and the quality of the pictures is the best I've ever seen from any digital camera.  Don't just take my word for it, buy one and see for yourself.  It's very affordable.(best feature</review_text>
I chose this Casio because of the price, good shot-to-shot speed, and most important for me was the charging cradle and battery life.  I got so tired of running out of battery in the middle of the day.  All cameras should having charging cradle, just like your cordless telephones</review_text>
I did a LOT of research about digital cameras before making a purchase.  Probably 50 hours on [...] and [...] and price checks on 10 different websites and asked everyone I knew what they liked and didn't like about their cameras.  I AM SO HAPPY I PICKED THIS ONE.  It is very lightweight yet durable, sleek and attractive if that's what you want.  The large viewfinder is a great asset.  Great zoom capabilities although I will say the picture quality (on the screen, anyway) is somewhat compromised (gets a little grainy) on the max zoom.  I will probably only use 6 or 7 of the "Best Shot" modes on a regular basis but it's fun to experiment with them all.  VERY LONG battery life.  I took this camera on a 7-night cruise and didn't have to recharge it at all.  I have 2 friends who are ready to buy new cameras and they are going to get this one</review_text>
I purchased the camera after my old one (casio EX Z-40) was broken and since I loved my old one very much I was concerned if the new one would be as good as the old one was.It is 10.000 times better!The automatic mode helps unexperienced photographers to take great pictures. But by using the individual modes and settings the results are even better. I tested the camera in any situation during a 6000 mile roadtrip across the American West and it did not disappoint me at all.The only thing that is a bit annoying is that everytime you switch the camera on it will automatically go to the snapshot mode and you have to switch through the different modes again to adjust the settings that you need. But surely there is a way to figure out how to avoid that, I'm probably just not patient enough to find out how since all the other models of casio cameras that I have tested do not show this problem.Overall, I can highly recommend the camera for all types of photographers!</review_text>
I don't think anybody is going to pretend that the little Casio Exilim EX-Z600 6.0 mega pixel camera is the best camera ever built or takes the best pictures in the world.  But for under $[...], it's hard to beat and does everything advertised.The size is perfect, one of the smallest, slimmest cameras made, easily fitting into one's [...] pocket, even when enclosed in a small case.  The viewing screen is probably the biggest and brightest you'll find, so aiming and shooting is easy as it can be.  The range of modifications (size, contrast, sharpness, saturation, etc.) to taking and managing pictures seems almost endless, yet the various menus the camera offers are simple to navigate.  And the camera's docking stand makes downloading pictures to one's computer as well as charging up the camera a snap.  Moreover, according to Casio, a single charge will afford one up to 500 or more snaps.Picture quality?  It's perhaps not as absolutely clear and well defined, even at its maximum six mega pixels, as the best cameras; although, to be fair, the best cameras often cost three-to-four times as much as this one.  So, as far as I'm concerned, I've no complaints, and the pictures I've been taking are a delight to the eye.  The Z600 makes picture-taking fun again</review_text>
I love just about everything about this camera.  It's nice and small, it's easy to use, it takes nice photos.  But, I haven't figured out yet how to get good night photos, 'though, I've used "Best Shots" (a feature on the camera). I've had it 3 months and am still learning it.  But, all in all, I love this little camera.  The price is right, it does what you want it to and if you get the camera sun shield, from any camera store ($19.00), you'll be glad you did</review_text>
This protective case is custom made for the Sony Apha camera. It protects the camera more than a generic case would, plus there is no wasted space, making it compact and easy to handle.I like the fact that it has the usual carrying strap and in additon has a handle on top and a belt loop for a hands free option. There are additional pouches built in that I use to carry the computer interface  cable and an extra memory device.For $39.99 I feel it was a good buy.P.S. - If you use the lens hood, remove the hood, turn it around and re-install it onto the lens before inserting the camera into the case; it will save some room</review_text>
This is a must have for the Alpha.  It fits so well and looks great</review_text>
Frame was very easy to setup with USB or wireless, took all of 5 minutes to get the wireless configuration done and working</review_text>
I have one of these on the wall in my sitting room and it brings me a smile everytime I use it ... I can see the photos (about 80 at a time) that I have uploaded to it ... uploading is a breeze using the wireless network and the software on the PC works really well and has handled any picture I have thrown at it... Okay so it is a little pricey but for a gadget freak like me it is a must have item in the digital home :-</review_text>
I've tested the other Pacific Digital frames and the feature of using any standard 8x10 frame is really what I like the most. I got this unit (which comes with a Dlink USB to 802.11b dongle) and tested it with my Linksys router. After configuring windows correctly (which they now have posted on the web site), I was able to see the frame from my PC with the bundled software. There was a small learning curve, but I really like this method of copying over photos instead of wires. It takes about the same amount of time and you can name the frames if you have mulitple units (like living room, office, etc).Overall this has the best resolution of the units I've seen and removing wires is GOOOOD</review_text>
This is a very easy to use, well built housing. I've used it on multiple dives to 100 feet and it met all of my expectations. For the price, it cannot be beat.If you dive you need to add the weight kit Canon WWDC1. Without weights the housing and camera float. I have added two plates (one plate recommended by Canon) to my housing as I find the extra weight adds stability. I wish Canon would include the weight plates, but if you are only snorkeling or using this in a pool the weights are probably not needed.I have only two small gripes. The first is that the function selector dial is in an awkward position and I found that I would often accidentally switch from camera to movie or playback mode when holding the camera. I have since learned to check the mode every time I bring the camera to my eye. My second gripe is that there is no case for the camera housing. I'm using a neoprene foam wrap I picked up in a camera store.I would not hesitate to buy this housing or other Canon housings again</review_text>
I bought this before I went on a trip to Florida.  I took it out in the water one day to take pictures of people riding the waves and another day while snorkeling.  It was also a good insurance device when we were kayaking.Only drawbacks are that it is hard to see the screen under water and that you have to make sure that you wash the salty water off.It was a great investment for my camera and I am looking forward to using it in Costa Rica this summer</review_text>
Not only did this product allow us to bring our camera into the water and get some really cool pics while we were in the Caribbean; it also gave us peace of mind knowing that our valuable camera was in our possession as we enjoyed the water rather then leaving it unattended on the beach</review_text>
One of the reasons that my wife and I bought the Canon was for this waterproof case.  It works very well.  It takes about 5 minutes to get all set up, and I'd strongly suggest taking it for a dry run at home before you do it in the field (except lubing up the seal; save that for the real deal).  Our pictures came out very well and the camera was safe the whole time.  A couple of things:  First, getting the rubber seal out of its channel can be a hassle, and is best done with two peole, one to squeeze the seal so it lifts up and the other to pull it away.  Avoid using fingernails, since you might scratch it.  Second, it's very easy to accidentally knock the lever on the back from the "underwater" mode setting to the "movie" mode setting.  If the camera starts to shoot a movie, that's probably what happened.  Just flip it back and keep shooting away</review_text>
We got it while on honeymoon in Hawaii, and it was wirth every penny. It workd well and gives you the freedom to take your digitaal camara to places you otherwise wouldn't.</review_text>
Yes, it costs a bit more than a disposable camera.  But like other reviews have siad, if you spent $400 + on the camera, why not have the underwater case.I was amazed at how well it is built.  I felt totally safe putting my camera inside of it.  And it takes great pictures.  If you are in the ocean, the waves and current can make it difficult to take the pictures, but practice makes perfect.  One tip, when in the ocean try to get as close to the subject as possible so the flash will help brighten the colors.  I came home with a few shots were everything is blue and green.We live near the water and have used this case once or twice a week since we got it.  It really is amazing</review_text>
This is my third Canon UW housing.  I sold or gave away the other two, as I have moved up from the SD110 (3.2 mp) to the S500 (5 mp) and now to the SD550 (7.1 mp).All my previous cameras are still in great working order, and still being used on a regular basis, both inside the housings and out (You can see my previous reviews and photos for those housings elsewhere on the Amazon site).I am an underwater tour guide in Hawaii, so I put my housings through more day to day abuse than the average consumer.  And mine have all held up well.You need to be religious about soaking and rinising the housing after use.  And occasionally lube the o-ring.  And do not store it in the heat (sealed up in the car on a hot day, etc.), since this will likely warp it, and cause it to leak.Other helpful hints that I can give, are:1) Get a soft carry pouch for it, to help ward off scrapes and nicks in the plastic housing (I use a Coleman Stove pouch) while transporting it.2) Do not put the camera in the housing while you are in your air conditioned hotel room.  Wait to put it in, until you are outside.  This will minimize the chances of condensation forming inside the housing as it warms up.This housing is a little better than the other two, in that there is a shade for the LCD on the back, which makes it a little easier to see in bright conditions and while it is in the housing and you are wearing a mask.My only complaint about this housing is the lack of a thumb rest for my right thumb.  The other housings had one.  But this one cannot, due to it's small size.  Since the LCD is much bigger than the other models I have used, it means all the controls are shoved way over on the one side of the back panel, leaving you little room to hold onto it.  Since I typically wear gloves in the water, I have, on a few occasions, knocked the camera out of one shooting mode and into another.  Not a real big deal, it has never cost me a photo, but you need to look at the display to be sure you are in the right mode.  Just a minor complaint, and I understand why, since the camera is so small and the LCD very large for the size of camera.Overall a great product for the price, especially if you like to be able to take nice quality UW photos while on your snorkel/dive vacations</review_text>
It's insane to spend $180 for a piece of plastic, but it's also insane to spend $400 on a camera and then need to buy disposable cameras when you go scuba diving.  This is a nice design, not too heavy, and it does the job perfectly.  I only wish it were half the price.</review_text>
This is an excellent camera for daily use.  It has lots of functionality, its easy to use, and it takes outstanding pictures.  Never will you need more than 7.1 mega-pixels for anything you want to do with a little camera like this.</review_text>
For the most part it is a good product.  Taking pics in darker places seems to be a minor challenge due t othe different features.  Also, when zoomed, pictures taken are sometimes not as clear as you would like them to be</review_text>
This camera is great. It's got really clear images, and I like the macro feature so much. The LCD screen is very cool.. It's big and clear. The only con is that the size of the camera is a little big compare to some other brands like sony. But overall I like it a lot</review_text>
The Canon Powershot is a very good camera with the exception that the Red Eye Reduction does not really work. I have read the instructions over and over againg, but the "red eyes" persist.</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my wife 2 years ago, and it has been in very heavy use since. It is always in her purse, has been with us on many trips and has always performed flawlessly. Battery life is adaquate, the camera itself is small enough to be carried with you anywhere without becoming a burden, and it is amazingly sturdy.When I needed to get a camera as a present for a freind recently, I was delighted that this model is still on the market - and very attractively priced. I think that the cost / performace factor of this camera is the best in the market at this time (Jan. 2007)</review_text>
Takes excellent pictures and very easy to use. Very good camera and a good size</review_text>
simply put--take three pictures side by side and the camera stitches them together to make a wonderful panoramic shot...no computer is even needed.  three snaps and the shot is done!  the camera has excellent Kodak colors and 7MP of detail.  the camera also has a nice zoom and can take super wide shots with its 23mm lens--no need to back up across the room to get everyone in the shot.but it is the simple panoramic feature that make this camera unique.  wonderful for scenery, etc.  with the wide angle lens, it is no wonder real estate agents are snapping these up...</review_text>
I am unable to comment on the effectiveness of the product as it was given to my daughter(an accomplished amateur photographer)as a gift.  I can only attest to the fact that the product arrived on time in good condition and was exactly what my daughter had requested on her holiday gift wish list</review_text>
I got the EN-EL3a as a free replacement for the recalled EN-EL3 battery.  (Check Nikonusa dot com to see if your EN-EL3 has been recalled.)  It's perfect for my D70 -- and as another reviewer has pointed out, it gives you slightly more power juice -- about 7% more.  If you are looking to buy an official Nikon battery this is a good value.  BTW you can find generic brands (also here on Amazon.com) for about $20.  I'm not saying whether you should buy a Nikon or a generic OEM one.  After all, Nikon screwed up with the EN-EL3 so I can't vouch for their safety.Like the original EN-EL3 this is likely to be made in China</review_text>
This also works on D50, mine actually came with this unit instead of the EN-EL3. It's slightly higher capacity so that's a nice bonus, plus cheaper then the EN-EL3 so it's a win-win.I took pictures all day on just one battery so it will last a while. It's good to have as a backup anyhow.If you're planning to upgrade to the D200, I'd suggest their new EN-EL3e, since that also will work on D50/D70 (but the opposite is not true so don't try to force a EN-EL3 or EN-EL3a into the D200!)</review_text>
This is actually a 1500mAh battery as opposed to the original EN-EL3 which was "just" 1400..  So a very slight increase.  This is the new battery that was released with the D70s, but it does work in the D70.Check out kenrockwell[dot]com to verify.Nikon doesn't list the mAh specs for this battery on their website</review_text>
While offered as a remote for the Stylus Digital camera, this remote is a match for the Olympus E-500 digital SLR camera.  The unit is reliable, works perfectly with the E-series cameras, and works as expected</review_text>
Yes this remote control will only work with the sensor in the front of the camera. However do to the lack of a cable release function on the E 500 camera. The RM-1 remote control is just about your best option when you are trying to perform Micro or Zoom photography.</review_text>
Very nice piece of equipment. Great for taking self portraits. I had very prompt delivery. Thanks Amazon !</review_text>
Part of the fun of taking group shots with digital cameras is the dance of setting the timer and running into the shot. Watching the blinking light count down. This remote allows me to fire off my Olympus E500 in either 2 or 10 second countdown from within the group. I actually purchased it to make time exposures because it is important not to physically move the cameras in "bulb" mode. I have not tried this yet, but I'll update the review when I do. I gave it 4 stars only because it is a very small unit and may be easily be misplaced. Amazon had a nice price for this</review_text>
This remote works well, but a new one needs to be manufactured, that supports more functions in the E-300 and E-500 Cameras</review_text>
I got this very handy accessory item to go with my digital camera. It's compatable and very handy for taking family pictures on holidays where you can be included in the picture.I know the camera's have self timers, but who wants to run and be breathless to get in the frame in time before the camera fires.This way you can take more time to compose your picture and it turns out great. I highly recommend this if you plan on taking pictures at any family gathering-or taking informal portraits at home.</review_text>
On a snorkeling trip we used this camera both in and out of water, and the results were terrific. It produced some hysterical pictures of my husband and I underwater!  The fish turned out well, as did the coral. We looked like dorks! It was fun and easy to use</review_text>
The figi underwater camera out ranks  many others due to the fact after going through the beefed up security scans when developed it has bright color and clarity. others turn dark</review_text>
We used this camera on our honeymoon for snorkling and it was great! The pictures were a little grainy, although I credit that to the silt in the water more than the camera quality since the out of water shots came out great too.  The lever on the front was much easier to use than a push button and the strap was perfect.  We bought a Kodak in Hawaii when these were used up and the picture quality was significantly worse than the Fuji.  We would definitely use these again</review_text>
I purchassed this camera for my first ever snorkling trip when I went on a Bahama cruise.  Overall, I was VERY pleased.  The pictures came out clear and the camera was easy to use even under water.  The only issue I had with it was almost to the end of the roll of film the turn wheel jammed and ceased to work.  I lost the last two pictures.  I'm not sure if it was a defect in the camera, or if I was over zealous in turning the wheel in my excitment of the event.  Considering the quality of the developed pictures, I would certainly try this camera again.</review_text>
If you are reluctant to invest $$$ in a 'real' underwater camera, this will do fine as a temporary solution.I realize it's not rated to go beyond 17 feet but I took two of them to 90 feet and had no problems whatsoever - all seals held and I could wind the film just fine.Only slight critizism is that the pictures come out more blue compared to the Kodak MAX (which I used at the same dive site a year earlier).  But hey, if you're going way beyond the manufacturers specs, you're not really allowed to complain...For snorkeling (down to 30 feet), the pictures come out real nice</review_text>
I am very happy with the resulting prints from this camera.  I've used other brands in the past and never have had such bright colors and in focus shots.  The winding mechanism is easy to use.  Finally I have pictures of my diving expeditions to remember.It's even suited for kids over ten to use.  Mine had lots of fun with their own Quick Snap</review_text>
This little case is very convenient, especially if you the extra battery, which I do. I had it all the time with me on my trip to Turkey, and it got the attention of everyone who saw for its sleek design. Perfect fit that goes right on your belt (or in your purse as my fiancee found out). Great buy. Highly recommended.</review_text>
This charger will fully charge a BLM-1 lithium battery in 2 hours (or less if it's partially discharged). There's a red light that indicates it's charging; and it turns green when the battery is fully charged. It's a very dependable and small unit, so you can store it in the camera bag with minimum space required.</review_text>
These are for anyone on a budget that wants to upgrade from that old pair of travel binoculars or from Uncle Fred's 1954 hand-me-downs. They are *Waterproof* (very important, it's easy to confuse these with the lower-quality Nikon Action range) and fogproof, with clear and bright images. Very solid feel and compact for a full-size Porro-prism design. The 7x35 version of the Action Extreme won the highest position in the Cornell Ornithology Lab 2005 binocular shootout out of 15 budget entries -  probably because the 8x40 was not tested.Yes, they aren't perfect - higher price will get you sharper optics, lighter weights, and slightly better handling - but at this price the only alternative I could find is the Leupold 6x30 Yosemite for around 25% less - and that model is a 6x magnification.I'm not sure why, but many sites don't cover the warranty on these. You get excellent support from Nikon USA - a 25-year no-fault warranty with a $10 fix or replace fee for the original owner. Combined with the low price and build quality this could be the last pair of binoculars you will ever need to buy.</review_text>
When you buy a product that is designed and meant to fulfill certain needs, just expect the best performance out of those features.The PC55 is a camera for the everyday home shooter, easy to use and made with the best SONY quality for one of the smallest MINI DV camera ever created.If you are thinking about buying this camera don't hesitate one minute, this camcorder is one of the kind, it gives you pretty much the flexibility and video quality of a regular camcorder but with the amazing bring-it-in-the-pocket size and all the coolness and attention that it brings along (let it be your best Ice breaker, believe me it works like heaven!). I work for a camera store and let me tell you: we haven't received one return of this model during the time I've worked there (8 months), which proves the high quality SONY has built into this model. I have been using mine for a few months now and all I can say is that "the product is great... period!".Let's get real, the 500 bucks you are paying for it is not for the film quality kind of movie you get in the picture (for that you need to spend at least a couple of thousand dollars) but the portability and worriless of no need of the big luggage a camcorder used to be in the past" (some times people don't realize a motorcycle couldn't be compared with a truck or vise versa).About the picture shooting option, well let's see! A camcorder is for videos and a digital camera is for photos, if you want to have them both in one package, that brings excellent quality, you'd have to spend a lot of more money than if you bought them separately, let me explain you in a few words, the average photo quality for a MINI DV camcorder is 1.3mp or lower (the same quality you get out of your cell phone camera)  to be honest with you, the manufacturers add this option just to give it an extra feature and at the same time take more money out of your pocket, with tape less digital cameras it happens the same way, the video and sound quality are very poor; so why bother paying more for a camera with both functions being excellent (there are quite a few out in the market now, starting around $1200 for models of similar size) instead buy two little cameras, one for each use, for half of the price.If you are looking for a cool, high quality & durability MINI DV camcorder with the smallest size available in its kind, The SONY DCR-PC55 is your BEST option.To finish, I just want to wish you all enjoy, more than the product, the unmemorable moments you will live with your loved ones because of this little fellow</review_text>
The camera is one of the best considering the price and the size of it. The only problem I found is that it has not a light, so you will need to buy the external one, if not all the shots that you do at night will be very dark</review_text>
I have own this camcorder for 6 monthit's a good camcorder, esay to use, easy to bringAs it's design purpose, PC-55 is enough for home useOnly one thing I want to mention here, before I buy this camcorder, I thought that I can record video on MS duo in mepg format, and it's easy for post-edit on PC, you know, tansfer a MiniDV tape to computer may need a huge space to save.However, when I replay the video which stored on MS, the sreen was full of mosaicfortunately, when use DV type to record, this situation never happens. good quality.The one press photo button also becomes useless because the bad quality</review_text>
If you want to capture every precious moments, this is the right camcorder for you. It's easy to operate and the video is crisp and clear. The sound is pretty good as well. You can also take still picture and video at the same time (thanks to the memory stick).Don't burn your video using your computer, it took me time to download to a CD or DVD. Instead burn them as you watch them. It's quicker that way.You will love it the first time you use it</review_text>
I've had this camcorder for a week now and I think it works great .. except for the touch screen feature. That takes a little getting used to .. especially when accessing the special features (such as fader effects) while filming.The digital still quality is poor when recording directly to the memory stick .. but the same images taken as a still from prerecorded tape is much clearer.All in all it is a good product .. just takes some getting used to</review_text>
Had this camcorder for few months now and it has been put to a lot of use. Compact, light, and easy to carry around. Tons of features which takes getting use to since most of it is touch screen.  Battery life is pretty good. Video quality is excellent as well. Very happy with the purchase, and I have had no problems so far</review_text>
use less than 3 times, the touch screen doesn't work.don't know why~</review_text>
This camera is excellent!  I used something very similar as a Videographer at the local TV station.  This camera to me is just as nice as the $40,000 DVC Pro camera!!  Great quality picture, excellent for Johnny's Soccer games!  Has a built in digital stabilizer for those with shaky hands.  Overall the best small camera I have EVER USED!!</review_text>
SO MUCH PRAISE ALREADY...WHERE DO I BEGIN?Well this is simply the best camcorder I've ever owned or used. At this level I've used the GL2 in the past. But I bought the VX2100.I took some footage of a lake recently and thought I was looking at film when I played it back on my HDTV. The color was beautiful and natural looking!  One rule. The better the lighting the better the picture!My first camcorder was a JVC in 87' VHS-C that was just about the same size as this camcorder now. But me-o-my, what a difference digital makes!!I dig the iLink from my camcorder to my PC and TV and my DVD recorder. ilink can run the show!Many manual features that lets a dude take control and play around when he has to and wants too! On screen menu really simple and the manual for this is well written and straight forward. But I must admit that some of the dubbing info is over my head at present as well as using memory chip tapes. But I'll get there.12X zoom could be more but it can also be plenty! Stabilization works fine for my needs, but alot of what I shoot is tripod mounted! "Put it on the TRIPOD" {what movie was that from?} ha ha.The 2 1/2" LCD is a bit small, works fine, but I find myself gravitating to the eyepiece. It's quicker to use and saves battery life. But the LCD is great to turn 180 degrees to shoot yourself with {ha} and use the remote with!You might want to buy the Sony 970 battery. Don't waste or risk on other brands, this one battery I used for 6 hrs straight doing an interview and it still had life in it!! The one that come with it is of course a small battery that lasts about 2 1/2 hrs. Thats rec. play-back, stand-by etc etc. Just these two batteries is all I need!!!!!!Also I added a wide angle lense. The Canon 58m wide anlge works fine with this unit.Some lighting too; How about Smith Victor 2 umbrella 250 watts lights. Makes indoor shooting look like a TV show!Lastly a mic. Depending on your use, you might want a shotgun mic for outdoors, or a lav mic indoors. The on camera mic is for people speaking rather close.All in all I couldn't be happier that I bought "this" camcorder. I read and looked around quite awhile before I bought. I think I have more Sony products in my house than any other and this is now no exception! Lights, camera, action!</review_text>
I love this camcorder!It is fantastic in low light, and good lighting too.  I was torn between this and the new HiDef camcorders out right now and chose this one mainly because of the low light ability.  I have not been disappointed at all.  There are numerous manual controls to tweak to any shooting condition.  Almost all have separate buttons dedicated to perform then individual functions.  It balances very well, and while it is heavier than the small cameras it really does not feel that way after a short time using it.I would buy this again</review_text>
This camera has been in my eye for roughly 3 years now and now that it is finally in my possession, I could not be more pleased. As the previous owner of a Canon Optura 300, I had been craving a more professional camera for a very long time. My Canon, while being possibly one of the best 1-chip camera I have ever used, was far too small for what I needed to accomplish with it. I craved for more manual control, an easier layout, a more stable camera, and full and in-depth control over white balance and focus. The VX2100 fulfilled all these requirements spectacularly. I use this camera primarily for filming skateboarding and snowboarding videos and short films and it is seemingly tailor made to suit the needs of those who documents these sports. Here is a short synopsis of what makes each of the features on this camera so fantastic.Layout: This camera has a great layout. From the zoom and focusing ring near the front of the camera to the record button and zoom rocker on the handle, to the dedicated Audio and White Balance buttons on the back, everything is easy to find, well labeled, and intuitive in its placement.Manual Control: This camera has some of the most indepth manual features of nearly any prosumer camera on the market today. As I stated before, this camera is mostly button instead of menu driven, it saves so much time when you're at a spot and you only have about 5 minutes to get the shot, you just hit the dedicated white balance button and !voila!, vibrant and accurate color reproduction at the touch of a button. The focus and zoom both give the right amount of resistance when turning, making it easy to get the exact focus and zoom that you want. The color shift feature is also very useful, allowing you to change the camera's settings so the CCDs pick up all the colors perfectly (the VX2100 is notorious for having a colder, more bluish picture compared to the VX1000). The integrated Neutral Density filter is quite useful on those really bright days when glare is overwhelmingly present and distracting. Overall, this camera is incredibly in depth in the sheer choices you can make to tweak the picture just right.Maneuverability: This camera is just the right size when it comes to handheld filming. Most of the weight of the camera is towards the front, but is perfectly balanced from the top handle. The camera is also not too long, allowing you to get closer to the subject when using a fisheye and allowing you to manipulate the camera in tight quarters.Overall, this prosumer camcorder is another winner for Sony and should be seriously considered by anyone who is either an aspiring filmmaker, or is looking to buy a top class camcorder. An excellent buy!</review_text>
This camera is fierce competition for Canon's XL1S. It has the features you need, the Sony name, and flawless transfer. WARNING!: This is NOT for the amateur home videoer. The parameters are begging to be tweaked - just for fun. Settle for a Handycam if you're just filming Billy's soccer game. This one right here is made to be USED. Good for media students, career filmers/editors, and anyone who wants to REALLY have some interesting fun...Sony doesn't disappoint on this one</review_text>
I had reservations about buying this camera after reading the few negative reviews citing excessive 'noise' with low light situations and certain ISO settings.  Knowing I would mostly be using the more simplified features the majority of the time, and given all the generally positive reviews by others, I decided to give it a try. I must say I am very satisfied with the camera.  Granted, I generally use the normal or simple mode for most shots, but have used all modes several times since purchasing the camera and it takes wonderful shots, indoors and out, low light and bright sunshine.  The user manual is very easy to understand and gives setting suggestions to correct some of these noise problems. I have not had any negative experiences with it.  I bought it as a replacement for an Olympus Stylus that I damaged on a ski trip and although that camera was a great point and shoot and took nice pictures, this Panasonic is far better.  Combine that with compact size, sturdy build and good looks and you have a great camera.  I bought the leather Lumex case that Amazon sold with it as a bundle and it is very good quality leather and snug fitting so as not to add bulk to the compact size.  Nice item.</review_text>
This camera is one of the best of its kind: ultra compact, great quality of construction, friendly menu, excellent lens (thanks to Leica) and a very attractive price.It peforms according to the Leica reputation, extremelly well.  The image stabilization boosts the end results.  However do not expect results similar to more expensive srls as you will be disappointed especially in cases of 8x10 or even larger images as noise becames a factor- for smaller images you should have no problems and you will be able to capture your moments with ease.Again this is one of the best choices for a compact digital camera in a market segmant that there are plenty of options</review_text>
The Leica lens was a great bonus for my decision to add another camera.  I love the size.  My other Panasonic/Leica camera took several falls on a long trip and never stopped performing.  It is discontinued, so it is now held together with duct tape.  This DMC-FX07 is a wonderful replacement.ps.  I bought a cell phone belt case that is leather with magnetic closure for a perfect camera case.  ($[...]</review_text>
I found these reviews that customers wrote to be very helpful in my pursuit of buying a digital camera. I was looking for something that was small, so that I could bring it with me wherever I went, and something that was going to be easy to use. I also love to color options that are available becuase I like to be different. This camera is very user friendly, weather you are making your way through the buttons yourself or are reading the manual, which is actually very easy to understand. I haven't used all the options on the camera yet, I basically bought the camera in order to take some snap photos of my friends and to post items on ebay. So far, everything has been a success and I would recommend this camera to anyone who is looking for a camera that is going to be user friendly, and take a great picture without having to be an expert</review_text>
This is an amazing compact camera, with all the wanted features. I was looking for a camera that is compact and has good optical zoom as well as takes gr8 pictures. I was stunned by how much this little thing can deliver. It's just too amazing...I would definitely recommend it.PS: There are lots of better camera available with similar or better features, but they come at a large price.</review_text>
I love the camera, but you may want to know that Nikon has dicontinued this item. It's been really hard to find replacement parts.</review_text>
This camera really delivers. I appraise real estate and take from 40 - 100 pix a week.  I want a SLR for serious work, but this camera is great for appraisal work because it is so handy. I have a clipboard in one hand and a laser measuring device in the other with the camera in my shirt pocket. I can switch LMD and camera as needed.I was afraid it would be easy to lose but so far so good and I haven't dropped it nearly as often as my Coolpix 4300 which I gave to my assistant.The one annoying feature is the on/off switch. It is difficult to depress and must be held down momentarily to operate. A far better system is a lens cover which slides back from the lens to turn on and close to turn off.  That is the only improvement I would recommen</review_text>
This little thing is perfect for anyone who is looking for a sleek, compact digital camera that will take amazing photos. I took it to Europe and was amazed at the shots it took - portraits, close-ups, landscapes, action, indoor, outdoor. No complaints</review_text>
I absolutely love this camera. I did my research before purchacing and what I found has held to be true. The flash is the only issue. It is not strong enough to take far away shots. This camera is exactly what I wanted though, a small lightweight camera that takes excellent pictures and I can carry it almost anywhere</review_text>
I'm very satisfied with this product. Picture's quality could be a little better, but its features are excellent. Its dimensions are perfect for taking everywhere, and it's very easy to use</review_text>
This is a tiny camera that fits pockets, purses and center consoles easily. As such, you are more likely to have this with you than, say, your digital Hasselblad and ten lenses. If aliens land on the street in front of you, you will get the shot on your S3,  not on the big camera that is at home.A small camera is also discreet. People tend to react when you point a big impressive looking camera at them, but hardly notice the small S3 rectangle. It does not attract too much attention to itself or me and that is a good thing.There are two ways to use this camera:One is to simply keep it on automatic, shoot lots of shots of well-lit scenes and delete the bad ones. This is a very effective technique used even by many professionals. The automation is hard to beat.Or, one can actually read and understand the manual and practice all the functions again and again until it all becomes second nature. There are lots of modes like portrait and landscape, and even exotic ones for fireworks and such. Each mode has specific automatic settings that optimize the results.Full automatic is just fine for most subjects, but if you want something special, a shot that could really be something, then it is worth the time to get into the proper mode. That is how I have been using the S3 and the results have been fine.Some reviewers complain about blurry shots. No modern camera blurs anything that is still and well-lit. Blur results from slow shutter speeds relative to camera shake or subject movement. The S3's little lens requires a slower shutter speed to compensate, to allow all the light that is needed by the sensors to capture an image. Handheld shots with slow shutter speeds are blurry with any camera.We are used to seeing big serious cameras on tripods and little carefree cameras being used handheld. Actually, it is more likely that the little camera should be the one on the tripod. In addition to their small lenses, their light weight and small size make them harder to hold still. Note, too, that flash freezes movement and eliminates blur. However, tiny cameras have small flashes that do not have much range and so do not work to prevent blur at longer ranges.My first twilight photos with the S3 were attempted with me holding it against trees, pressed to car roofs, etc. The only good results came when I used a tripod and fired it off using the self timer so that human hands were not at all involved.The usual daylight shots of people, scenes and things are not a problemMost of my prints are 4X6 and are really very sharp and well exposed in either the automatic or manual modes. I avoid shots that are not well lit or too far away for flash. The prints are generally much better than what I used to get from 35mm. It is reasonably fast with little lag time or waiting for images to be loaded. The camera itself is metal and   very solid and precise.The S3 comes with a little dock with an ac plug to charge it and a usb cable for downloads to your computer. Some people do not like the idea that you have to take the dock with you to recharge and download on the road. To me this is not a problem in that the dock is very small anyway and it is better to have all those connections on the dock rather than on a tiny camera.I have had perfect luck so far with Nikon photographic products and tend to trust that brand, so I bought the S3 over some other very compelling models. Nikon also does a very good job with programming exposure, focus, white balance, etc.I thought about maybe 4 stars because a little light camera can use vibration reduction in all modes, but a really effective and full time VR would likely cost more and I have not missed it anyway.If you need what this camera lacks, then you have to step up to a bigger and much more expensive DSLR. You can spend more, carry more and get more. It works that way with film and it does with digital as well. I would like a DSLR also, but the S3 is an excellent camera with a lot of options to make great photos and it would get a lot of use, even if I had that elusive digital Hasselblad, just because it would always be with me</review_text>
All digital camera's force you to make trade-offs...it's the hard cruel fact of personal photography. The Coolpix S3, has been a near perfect grab and go camera for the four photographers in our family. Picture quality, to our eyes, is great! When compared to our Rebel XT or D70 cameras, the S3's shots loose a bit of information but only through comparison to much more expensive equipment. This camera is VERY easy to use for those new to digital photography. The pre-programmed scenarios are easy to access and provide great shots. The camera has proven sturdy, and survived a couple bumps and bruises without drama. We always keep it in the ballistic nylon case, though, to protect the screen.  I'm convinced that many of the problems people cite about the S3 (or S1)are the result of unfamiliarity with using the camera's features more-so than a defect in the camera (save the white-spot issues which we have not observed to date). Red-eye reduction is semi effective but no more than in any of the dozen newer cameras that are in our hobby room. The free online photo editors cure red-eye much better than any of the in-camera solutions. If you're looking for a digital camera that can always be at-hand and deliver a great photo, the S3 should be on your list to check-out</review_text>
Sony does a great job again. It could be a bit better in low light conditions, but with the 'back light' option it works well.</review_text>
The camera works really well and we've had it now almost 2 years. My wife dropped it on the road and cement floors a few times accidentally but it still works (although the exterior is banged up a bit). One person indicated that it's really hard to transfer video to a PC.. We have no problems at all using Pinnacle Studio to do transfers and then copy to DVD. (thru the doc station fire-wire</review_text>
This might be the worst product ever. What good is a camcorder if it is virtually impossible to get the video onto your computer. The support is horrid; the software is worse. Stay away from this one. Too bad really, most of my previous electronics equipment was made by Sony, but I will NEVER buy them again</review_text>
The sony dcr hc32 is one of the sleekest cameras for it's price. However, I find the little touchscreen to be a tad difficult to use without a stylus (wonder why Sony couldn't include one). If you have stubby fingers like me, it takes a while to get used to the tiny menu buttons. Inevitably, the screen gets covered with thumbprints. I started using the top-eraser of a small pencil.Sony is also notorious for not providing larger optical zoom,  even on its high-end camcorders. In fact, this camcorder fares better than some of the more expensive Sony mini-dv's. Though 20x is probably okay for casual use, it would help to have some more. Lastly, be aware that the package with the extra battery and docking station is not worth much. I was irked to find that the battery can only be charged while its loaded onto the camcorder (which can then be set in the dock or take ac power directly). This stupid feature means you cannot charge a battery while simultaneously recording off a second one, basically defeating the purpose of an having extra battery.I would recommend considering the Canon zr600 which is cheaper, has more optical zoom and widescreen recording capabilities. It is almost as small, but I think it still lacks an external  battery charger</review_text>
This camera is fantastic.  I also own a $3500 Sony mini-dv and the picture quality of this camera is virtually identical.  Transfer what you've shot to DVD, or just play it right off the tape onto your TV and you will be blown away by the broadcast quality of the image.  It's very small, and has some great easy-to-use features for shooting in the sun, shade, action,etc., and even extreme darkness. A built in lens cover is also convenient.After owning this camera for only about 5 months though, I got an error reported with other Sony mini-dv's "dirty tape head."  Well, the tape head was actually fine but the damn message wouldn't go away no matter what I did, so I had to have it repaired. I had bought it at Sears but wanted to use Sony for the repair and after telling them the truth and that I was very disappointed, blah blah - the $212.00 to fix the camera I just bought for $450.00 was not fair - they agreed to take the camera and fix it for no charge.  (The point is that Sony is making an effort, I believe, to satisfy their customers.) Nonetheless, because of the problem I had, I feel compelled to recommend that a person purchasing this camera go ahead and buy the SONY warranty - directly through Sony before the 90 day manufacturers warranty is up.  (It's only $117 for 3 years and you'll have piece of mind.)  Should you have to buy a warranty? No. Do things break? Yes.  Hell, I've had plenty of stuff break that just became useless.The point is, this camera is really awesome and worth owning. You can charge it without using the dock however the dock is cool for transfering to your computer or any other source. The battery that comes with it lasts really long too. This camera also has analog capabilities which can be handy for transferring old VHS tapes to mini-DV</review_text>
For some 50 years, beginning with a Leica IIIG I bought in the 1950's, I have used a variety of 35mm and digital still cameras. I figured it was time to try my hand at video.I spent several days researching the variety of entry level video cameras and finally decided on the DCR-HC32. Given the slight difference in price between the bare camera and this package, I went for the package.The handycam arrived a couple of days ago and I immediately put it to use filming one of my grandchildren. It was not long before I realized that capturing images on video is more complicated that when using a still camera. I put the Handycam down and picked up the Operating Guide.After spending time reading the Guide and checking out the multitude of options this little camera provides, I called my grandchild back for more product testing. The results were gratifying.It does not seem possible that such a small videotape can provide such crystal clear images, but it does. I experienced a bit of shake when zooming, even with SteadyShot turned on, but that may be at least in part attributed to these old hands.I conducted most of my early video trials in my den at night, with a single overhead flourescent light providing the only illumination. Even without slowing the shutter the color was beautiful. I sent my grandchild to a shadowy corner about 20 feet from the camera to try out the Super Nightshot. It worked well. Color was thin but good. Then I turned out the light and shot with Super Nightshot Plus. What I got was an incredibly grainy black and white image that was recognizable as human, but that's about all. I have ordered an Infrared light to use in very dim to dark light.Filming video outdoors on a bright sunny day, the results were crystal clear and the color was excellent. Sound pickup more than a couple of yards from the Handycam was disappointing. I wish this camera had a jack for an accessory microphone.Still picture quality certainly could be better. However, I have a fine digital still camera to take care of usual still photography work The still images this Handycam creates may not be of studio quality, but the ones I made are certainly adequate for sharing or adding to a family album. I do not doubt that there will be times when using the Handycam that I would like to capture some special moment in a still picture. For this use, the Handycam works just fine, as far as I am concernedI am well pleased with this little camera and unhesitatingly recommend it to anyone interested in buying a quality introductory level video camera. Using Sony's DVM60PR3 cassettes image color and clarity are surprisingly good. I urge anyone not familiar with small video cameras to heed Sony's suggestion and spend time with the Operating Guide while the battery is getting its first charge.</review_text>
The camera is great for point and shoot users. It is very easy to use (although the camcorder menu is a bit tricky) and has very decent images. The software provided is not great.</review_text>
I purchased this camera just a few weeks ago. I really love the Sony brand. Just a few comments though. the price for servicing is a standard fee. No matter what you send in thats the price. Be it a Digital camera or your camcorder. These devices have to be opened in a clean room. these rooms are filtered to that tiny particles like dust or your skin cells do not get inside. and the operators have to wear those white suits to keep all that contamination to them selves. This is not Slappys TV and VCR repair we are dealing with. Any foreigh material getting inside or on your CCD will dammage the camera and you don't want that. Keep in mind that these rooms cost millions of dollars to build and maintain. If you are worried about that then get the warranty. Any company charges around the same price. Check with other companies. Kodak charges about that much just to open the camera up. And if you are experiencing problems with ANY electronic device out of the box return it or swap it out. they cannot test every single unit. Usually they test several out of a batch. So if your unit is not operating to your expectations then by all means its your money go and take care of it!That aside, I'm glad my Powermac came with the Firewire cable I needed for the camera. For several years it has just been in a drawer. The manuel does not explain fully that it is required to transfer the video from the tape using this. (at least for Mac users). Taking Video was easy and transfering it to the Mac was simple. The Camera comes with Video editing software but I just used IMovie and IDVD to make my DVD's and VCD's. And Since I already had Toast for the Mac It was easy to burn the movies to disc. Otherwise stick with the software included.For those pining about not having a Memory card included you are not missing much. The quality of the pictures and movies you take to the card are not noteworthy. You need plenty of light, the photos are very grainy as the photo mode on the memory stick does not have a high Megapixel rating, and the videos are chopy. So other than just taking small images to possibly keep for reference this feature is useless.The Camera does have a video out port on the camera itself so you can leave the docking station at the computer and when wanting to connect to the tv just use the av cable alone with the camera.I do not hear any motor noises on the recorded tape. Though it does make some noises when turning the unit on.The menu system is fairly easy to navigate and the Easy button makes it "easy" for anyone to pick up the camera and shoot.Remember that you are not getting a professional camera this is for consumer use and will not have all the features and functionality of a $2,000-$3,000 model.</review_text>
The professional reviews sold me on this camera, the experience of buying it through Amazon exceeded my expectations.  The camera arrived ahead of schedule and the camera performs great - even after I dropped it once</review_text>
I did a lot of research on camcorders, and I mean A LOT!!  I spent weeks reading all of the professional and user reviews, which left me even more undecided then when I started the search.  I finally narrowed it down to the Canon Elura 100 and the ZR 850.  The Elura was being discontinued and was therefore difficult to find as a reasonable price, so I chose this one!First of all, the zoom works well on this camcorder.  It is very powerful, and the image stays fairly clear until you reach about 80% of the zoom.  The motor noise is not that bad, and it not noticable at all if there is other background noise.  The image quality is good, just steer clear of low light situations.  The image gets very grainy in low light.The size of this camera is very nice.  The available features suit me very well.  Overall, this is a good camera for the money.</review_text>
The following camcorder is the first camcorder I have ever owned. I purchase it because I am interested in taking home movies as keepsake. For that purpose, this digital camera will work perfect for anyone, However, if you keep your expectations too high, you will probably be disappointed.Many people have complaned about motor noise on camera's along this line, if you purchase the zr 800, you can use an external mike of as high quality as possible, and avoid this background noise. If you are like me, and wanted the higher offered pixel ratio, then you can get the zr 850, which lacks the external mike and the possibility of preventing that noise. The noise, I might add, appears to me little more than a suddle white noise in the background, which can easily be filtered out with most video editing software.When recording to the sd card (the plus of the 850), the movies shot are rather low resolution and appear a bit blurry for me. Part of this could be the videos I have shot this way consisted of a lot of close ups. This camera does not seem designed for doing much in the lines of close ups. The night vision does a very good job in pitch black. A small led on the front of the camera adds extra light. Unfortunately this is the only light you get, since any high powered light isn't available to attach to this camcoder. The led doesn't add very much light, and with any low light area, the picture resolution is severly hindered, but still seeable considering how dark it is.The still pictures look decent, but obvious static that you would easily not see on any modern digital camera are very evident, so definately don't purchase this as a digital camera replacement. The battery lasts about 45 minutes, the guide suggestions you can buy larger batteries that will increase the life.Since I kept my expectations so high, I expected the resolution to be a little better on the camcorder in general. It is decent enough, and so is the sound. I just expected more than I should have with a small handheld camera. The camera feels great though, it is easy to carry, easy to use. You run pretty much no risk of getting your fingers in the way of the view finder. It is very comfortable and easy to use. Very little instruction is needed to figure out just about everything you can do with it.My biggest beef with this product, which really has nothing to do with the product itself, is that it didn't come with a firewire cable or capturing software. This means you can't transfer stuff to your compuer out of the box. Rather, you need to get a firewire cable (presuming you have a firewire port) for up to $35 as the price at best buy. You probably should order a cable with the camera. The capturing software is available from the canon website, just requiring you to register your product. After trying several programs, roxio seemed to work the best for me trying to capture video. At that capturing video is a breeze, although that has more to do with software than the camcorder itself.Besides that, its a good product, it comes with a remote control if you happen to be filming yourself, and av cables so you can put the image on the television. Not the best on the market, but a pretty decent camcorder, especially at the discounted price.</review_text>
I compared several digital photo frames before deciding on this one. I managed to get one of these off another website for $110, It was the best among the three that I have.  I had the digital spectrum 5" photo frame which could play music and video and all but looks like a toy and the resolution was poor with limited viewing angles.  The second one that I had was from Radio Shack - Optimus  - it was 7" but the photo display was the same as the 5" as the 7" was horizontal not diagonal.  (It's like the widescreen format but when you display a normal picture, it would only display black bars at the side. The Optimus has fantastic resolution and viewing angles but it does not accept CF cards and does not play videos.   Finally, I settled on the Royal 8". For the price - I think it was the best in terms of value and function among the three.The pros of Royal PF80  : (1) Accepts CF, SD, MMC, MS; (2) Plays avi video (minus sound), (3) fantastic resolution and viewing angles; (4) 8" diagonal screen is big enough to be seen across the room; (5) Comes with remote; (6) Removable silver frame but there was not extra bezel in the boxThe cons : (1) No speakers and no sound output; (2) AC wire is a little short; (3) Setup is not fully plug and play. You need to select a few buttons before it would play, (4) The build is still plastic but at least it was painted like a photoframe and thus, does not look like a toy .The quality is comparable to the Westinghouse 8" sold at Bestbuy but at half the price !</review_text>
We originally were very interested in getting the keychain, but were turned off by the following:1.  The poor reviews of the display quality2.  The small screen size3.  How the keys would damage the keychain over timeWe decided to buy the digital photo album and it came within days of ordering.  We loaded the pictures before giving it to my son's grandmother.We are happy with the following:1.  Picture quality2.  The screen is larger3.  The price of the case was reasonable less than $10.4.  It is easy to load photos and simply to use, good features when giving it to people who are NOT very handy with electronics.We spent $20 more to buy this item, it seems so reasonable compared to the keychain.  What they don't specifically tell you is that this unit comes with NO memory.  The extra $20 we spent over the keychain ends up being about $45 more when you have to factor in buying a memory stick.  I was wondering why the keychain tells you how many picture it can hold and this one doesn't</review_text>
I ended up buying this camera (even though I heard bad things about Kodak) because I liked the feel of it in my hand.  I don't like small thin cameras.  And it is somewhere between a point and shoot and and SLR.  Since I can't afford an SLR I went this. I have to say I love the camera.  I have already shot enough pics and printed them on my printer and they came out great.I love all of the features.  It reminds me of my 35mm SLR that I still own and use from time to time.  I don't find any lag in taking the pictures.  However, if you are on auto shoot, it needs to focus first before you take the shot.  But my 35mm SLR did the same thing.  I thinkg the shutter is just fine.  I would reccommend this camera to someone who needs to upgrade from a point and shoot.  After reading the reviews, I am seriously thinking about getting an extended warranty for it.  Escpecially since my last camera crapped out on me 1 1/2 years later.The only thing I seem to have a problem with is my fingers like to hit the control buttons on the right side of the camera while I am trying to take a picture.  It could be that I am a lefty and all of the controls are on the right side. But for the price, you can't go wrong.</review_text>
I've had this camera 5 1/2 months and it's on it's way to the shop to be repaired the 2nd time.  First time they did nothing to it.  Not sure what was wrong with the tech.I bought this for good quality pictures to frame.  When I'm ready to photograph it sits in the shop.  Would I suggest this camera for a serious photographer?  NO I would not.  My trip is in 30 days and where is my camera?  Not with me!I'm very disappointed.  I thought Kodak had better products and repair set up than this.  Buy the extended warranty if you get this camera.Outside pictures are white.  Inside pictures are red/blue lines across.I have grandchildren on the way and no camera to take them. *sigh*I could go on but you get my point on this.Kodak has much proving to me to sell me again</review_text>
Wonderful pictures. Prints great pictures.</review_text>
Great pricezoom is excellenteasy to use even for non camera buffs like meclarity is beautifuldifferent scene options deliver great pix: "snow" captured each flake and agreat shot of my daughter in the snow with fantastic color.portrait setting gives perfect detail-you feel like you can reach out and   touch the subject in the photobattery life is very long- I have been using my camera for a month and have not had to recharge!Settings are so easy to use that you actually use all the different options to get the best photoI bought a 1 GB memory card, so I don't know how many photos you'd hold without that.I use with Adobe Photoshop, and uploading is a snap.I have owned some expensive cameras, but this is by far my favorite.I really can't think of any negatives. I am really happy I researched a lot of cameras and bought this one</review_text>
I purchased this to replace an Olympus camera that was pretty much junk from the day it was new. I was hesitant about Kodak because some of their earlier cameras were complicated and hard to use.I wanted to buy a camera to use for product pictures for business and for use for family photos, vacations and such. My previous cameras have been used only for product pictures because the image quality was fair at best. The prints made from the digital images were not of photo quality in my opinion.The Z612 was a pleasant surprise. It is easy to use, controls are fairly simple. You do not need an engineering degree to use it. Screen is bright and fairly easy to see even in bright light. The quality of the pictures is great. Zoom is fantastic. The auto focus is a wonderful feature that actually works very well.The bad - the "easyshare" software pretty much hijacks all of the images on your computer. It installs it's self so that it automatically starts when you boot your computer, changes all of the image icons to the easyshare icon. It does not offer many options for installation or operation. It appears to work OK but it is more of a problem than a problem solver for advanced users. I personally use Photoshop and do not want other generic software trying to be the dominate image editor.The camera should come with a memory card as well as the internal memory. At this time the memory card is sold seperately which adds another $ 30.00 to the price of the camera.Camera comes with a neck strap no wrist strap. A wrist strap would be a nice addition to prevent the camera from making it all the way to the ground if it was dropped while in use.Overall it is a great camera and a great value. I have other digital cameras that cost three times as much that are virtually useless.</review_text>
So far, this is the best camera I've ever owned. I chose it over the Kodak z710 because not only did it have a more powerful zoom, 12x as opposed to 10x but the view screen was much bigger. 2.5 inch compared to 2 inch. It doesn't seem like much but that's a big difference in view screens. Also, this one came with a rechargeable battery and charger. The z710 didn't. It's extremely easy to focus and taking pictures with it is a breeze. The battery holds up for long periods of time. My old camera batteries didn't hold up near as long and it was only a 3.2 megapixel camera. This camera definitely offers a lot of bang for your buck. I would buy again in a heartbeat</review_text>
wonderful camera. picture quality is very gud. I clicked thousands of pics and i didnt had any complaints. My brother took it from me when i visited him. Now I am planning to buy one more. Preview screen is also nice. Video quality is also wonderful.In all excellent product from kodak. i bought it from amazon. I had bought so many things ranging from memory card to notebook from amazon and i admire them. Delivery is gud n safe</review_text>
The Tamrac 5273 backpack was the perfect fit for my SLR digital camera with dual lenses and accessories. This product is well made with padding and definitely fits my ruggedized lifestyle. The majority of the backpacks that I looked at were either too big and bulky or would not accomodate my set up. Simply put...perfect</review_text>
Pretty good small bag. Although a little tight for the camera body since it is positioned near the top where the pack is curved, there is plenty of padding and a tight fit does not cause any harm to the camera. The pads wear a little and the fit gets better over time, so this is not really a big deal, but it did make me worry initially. The padded velcro dividers in the bag can be positioned just about anywhere to make any combination of compartments. The bag also has a ton of extra pockets and compartments that were able to handle all my storage media, cables, batteries, etc. I have room for the camera, two other lenses, and the lens hoods on the inside. I am still trying to figure out if I can include my compact conventional film camera in the bag somewhere. Another great thing about the design of the pack is that the bag readily accepts other velcro attached accessories for water bottles, film, or other gear. I may see if my other camera will fit that way. There are two issues that might be a problem. 1 for the pros is that the bag is too small to handle larger lenses and professional gear. 2 for the beginner is that it is 1/2 the size of a regular backpack and not as convenient as a plain 35mm camera case if you are just headed out to the family picnic. One general gripe is that the straps will defninitely be a pain for those that prefer to carry it as a tote rather than wear it. They are not detachable. If they were, this would be nearly perfect for my needs. That said, I'm pretty happy with it and I won't be looking for any other cases</review_text>
I'm not sure why people are complaining about this backpack being so small since the description and pictures are accurate (though it looks smaller in real life and the scale is not all that obvious).I easily fit a medium sized camera with a 28-300 lens attached and and an 18-55 lens directly below it.  I don't have other lenses to fill up the side partitions of the main compartment, but could easily fit 2 to 4 more lenses (depending on size) in these areas.  The sides of the main compartment seem a bit tighter to fit things in, however.Even being conservative, this pack should fit a camera with lens attached, 2 additional lenses and a flash in the main compartment.In the smaller front pocket I fit 2 memory cards, compact lens cleaning kit, larger lens cloth, 8 AA batteries, compact charger.  A mini-tripod or compact water bottle would fit in the outside pocket/strap.Don't expect to carry huge amounts of additional things in this pack aside from additional small items like keys, wallet, map, cell phone.You're not going to be putting your thermos, picnic lunch and jacket in here.  It's not even as big as most computer backpacks, but it certainly doesn't claim to be.  You might fit some small additional items, but not anything bulky.The construction seems good and it's reasonably rigid and well padded.  It's a good value for the price</review_text>
I have 2 digitial slr cameras, 2 lenses, and a add-on flash. When I looked as the picture of this product, I saw that it held an SLR and 5 good sized lenses ... When I got the product, it was EXTREMEMLY WELL CONSTRUCTED but also smaller than I had hoped.I decided to keep the item based on the quality of construction and not include the flash inside the bag.Take care.Jac</review_text>
This is a well made bag which can carry most all of your camera needs.  I found it works well to carry on my camera on airplane trips.  I can pack 3 lenses and a slr camera body.  Room for accessories and a way to strap on a small tripod makes this a good bag for hiking.Well worth the cost for the value</review_text>
i've had this camera pack for a while now and i just can't live without it. after reading tons of reviews and researching other sites and stores, i decided this would fit my needs best.it's small, light weight and carries EVERYTHING inside it without drawing attention to itself. i can carry my canon 20d with all my accessories plus a few personal extras all day without back pain or tiring out. trust me, when it's Mardi Gras in the Big Easy, that means a lot!I CARRY THE FOLLOWING IN MY PACK:(while i was able to fit everything listed below inside, mind you, it's tightly packed)**Canon 20D with 100mm lens attached (without hood) and strap**18-55 Kit Lens**Promaster External Flash Unit with 2 Stofen Omni Bounce diffusers**backup camera battery with charger**3 4/packs of AA batteries (for flash unit)**all my owner's manuals plus a medium sized handbook (i'm a beginner)**lens cloth and small airblower bottle for lens cleaning**cords for hooking camera to TV and PC**2 backup memory cards (the red flap is extremely handy to keep track of used cards)**small notebook & pen, few personal items such as chapstick, headband etc...**cell phone (hooked on the outside)**water bottle (hooked on the outside)**sunglasses (in outer pocket -meant for the tripod)PLUS:1. size - perfect for a medium sized female2. construction - extremely well made, sturdy fabric, lots of padding and does a great job at keep humidity out (big deal down here)3. organized - with it's repositionable/removable compartment dividers, packing what you need is a breeze...plus there are lots of hooks & such on the outside for additional options...and you can add a tripod if you choose.4. color makes it look like any normal back pack.5. price was great for what i got.MINUS:(very minor, but these are my reasons for giving 4 opposed to 5 stars)1. rain flap over zippers make opening and closing somewhat combersome, but you get used to it. besides it's like an extra layer of protection (both from rain and thieving hands).2. if you want to fit an external flash along with extra lenses, you may consider a larger bag.3. it doesn't really do a great job at carrying my tripod. it becomes too difficult to get my camera in and out of the pack with a tripod attached (you have to remove the tripod before you are able to open the bag, not the most convenient while walking around).</review_text>
Purchased this unit new for $160.  Good performance - with a little practice, was getting readings well over 800 yards, even in bright sunlight.  Also like the fact that it uses standard AAA cells.The housing design leaves a bit to be desired - it's bulky, and the battery cover is not very secure.  Can see losing the cover easily.  Not as ergonomic as more recent models.Overall, $160 for a rangefinder that has genuine 800 yard performance, is a good deal</review_text>
Picked up a Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000 Laser Rangefinder used online at another site for alittle less than half the new price.Works very good and was worth every penny I spent on it. Easily ranged objects and animals well past 800 yards.</review_text>
This product is rugged and forgiving.  Accurate to +/- 1 ft., this is an absolute must have for all serious bowhunters.  Lightweight and easy to use, I find only one minor design flaw.  It is designed for right-handed use and is slightly cumbersome for those who choose to use it as left-handed hunters (I am).  Even with this minor design flaw, I still am very satisfied with this unit and would not hesitate to recommend it to others.  Most encounters are under 50 yards and ease of use and accuracy are critical elements in a hunt.  I harvested a nice elk this year at 52 yards using this unit.  Thanks Bushnell</review_text>
I havent gotten these before but they look like a good pair of binoculars.I suggest adding these to your wish list if you like the outdoors</review_text>
I use this great product when playing golf and while hunting. Plus it is just fun to have and a great discussion item. It is very accurate and precise</review_text>
This camera case is stylish, compact and fun! Be aware that there is not much extra space inside to store camera cards, and definetely not room for extra batteries. There are plenty of larger camera cases for that purpose; this camera case is for stepping out in style</review_text>
I don't like pink so I bought the blue bag.  I had bought a black one, but it was so skimpy I returned it and prayed until this one arrived. I had no trouble with Amazon crediting me for the return, either.  It was so cute!  I'm too old for "cute," but I kept it because I needed a case for my new HP R717.  It is small, yet padded enough to trust that your camera will be cushioned if you drop it.  I have dropped my camera and it was not injured.  It has a little pouch inside to store an extra battery for my camera, not the big AA batteries, but the flat type that come with my R717.  I recommend this little bag, or the pink one, even if you don't like pink...or blue.  They are well cushioned and snug, but not too snug you think they will tear.  The are sturdy and have nice shoulder straps and magnet closures</review_text>
The camera fits perfectly. The case is very stylish.  Best of all, its Pink</review_text>
I love the size and style of this little camera bag. It's only a single compartment and the shoulder strap is nice and long. Long enough to use around the waist as a fanny pack.  The bag itself isn't padded inside and it's rather stiff. A tight fit for my camera, but good protection I think. I just wanted to keep my camera from getting scratched up and this does the trick nicely</review_text>
pretty and comfortable. could be more practical with a couple of inner pockets</review_text>
Bought this to go with the pink camera I bought for my 12 yr old daughter for Xmas. Nicely made, protects the camera and it looks cute!</review_text>
I bought the pink case for my mom, as I bought her a new HP digital camera for Christmas. It's so cute, and the camera fits in it perfectly</review_text>
Only used it once so far and it worked great</review_text>
I bought the C-533 version along with the printer dock 3, and I love this outfit! Small, lightweight, and takes great pictures! My only two complaints, number one; the cartridge/paper kits are hard to come by locally, and when I can find them, they are outragiously high in price. Number two; I run an older windows 98 computer, and the software for windows 98 was not incuded. I had to download it, and after the download, it is complicated to set up, and had to contact tech support to find the name of a hidden driver file so I could locate it and install it. I do realize that windows 98 is becoming the system of the past, but there are many of these systems still out there.</review_text>
I purchased this bundle last week on Amazon, first the price ($170)was amazing and it arrived in only two days with standard shipping.  I was able to use the camera right out of the box, although after a few pictures I did need to put it on the printer dock to charge it but a couple hours later it was fully charged.  This is an awesome bundle, it even comes with a small pack of paper so you can start printing pictures right away, which I did and the printer is very easy to use just plug it in, put the camera on top, press the print button and you have a great picture a minute later.  This is my second digital camera and I am so impressed with it, this is exactly what I was looking for. I wanted a camera with a higher number of megapixels, my old camera had 1.3, and I wanted to be able to take a picture with no delay in between the time you press the button and the time it actually takes the picture. If you have kids you defenitly don't want a delay.  I did purchase a memory card since the camera only holds about 11 or 12 pictures on it's internal memory. If you are looking for an easy to use camera with good picture quality and the ease of printing your pictures at home then this is the perfect camera & printer for you.</review_text>
I bought this camera kit as a gift, and the recipient loves it! They put it together and started to charge it while I was at their home, and by the time I left they were already able to use it.It comes with a rechargeable battery, some start up printer paper (more is sold separately), and a CD program that allows you to upload the photos into your computer to edit. The photos print out relatively quickly, and they are very, very clear and colorful. The camera takes very good pictures.For the price, it is a fabulous product, and I would recommend it to anyone. I am planning to buy this for myself very soon</review_text>
VERY EASY TO USE. GOT IT FOR MY MOM FOR CHRISTMAS. SHE LOVE IT</review_text>
I bought this camera for my teenage daugther. And she love it to deaf. This is the besy buy of the year, she can't put it down. It's a space saver.</review_text>
I was very nervous because this item did not ship when expected but both times I called customer service for updates they were very helpful and I did end up getting this in PLENTY of time for Christmas. I would definitely buy from them again</review_text>
I gave this to my folks(who are completely clueless when it comes to anything electronic) for X-mas and they worked it out.They love it. I must say I was actually impressed with the color quality of the pics. Good stuff</review_text>
this was by far one of the greatest gifts ever received and greatly enjoye</review_text>
I am always taking pictures and I am so thoroughly impressed with Fuji  film and especially the 200 ISO that it's the only film I will use- Kodak  doesnt seem to deliver the results I want and when I tried Fuji- it became  my favorite right off- great colors, bold, doesnt mute them like I found  Kodak to do- highly recommend</review_text>
I was on vacation last February, and I do not want to carry my expensiveCanon Eos, so I get this camera for the trip along with the SP Studio Mi-di Slave Flash: the result was extraordinary! Specially in backligth situations with the camera fillflash option, and indoor & nigth shoots with the slave unit suport. The results was incredible for a point & shootcamera. Vicente Cardone, Barranquilla, Colombia</review_text>
The camera is defintely worth the amount they are charging for it.  My daughter just loves it.  She is always taking pictures, all the time.</review_text>
I bought this as a present for someone who isn't technically saavy. They absolutly loved it. The easy to use functions and great photo quality made this an excellent gift.</review_text>
This is a very nice camera and very easy to load and use. It takes wonderful photos</review_text>
It's original Nikon, so no qualms about swapping it with the battery that came with the camera while that one's recharging</review_text>
I bought this battery as a back up to the one that came with my camera and I am pleasantly surprised at how long it stays charged.  I use my camera almost everyday and I've only had to change it twice. I highly recommend it</review_text>
Charge lasts a long time and through most of a 512 digital card. I keep a charged one as a back-up</review_text>
Bought this as a backup battery for my Nikon Coolpix 7900.  What else can I say, other than it's identical to the one that came with the camera, and at this point I'm not sure which is which.Are there cheaper replacements out there? Yes.  Was I going to risk my $350 camera to save $10 on a generic brand battery that might burn up?  Nope.  Peace of mind is worth a few extra bucks, but the extra cost brings it down to 4 stars</review_text>
If you go to remote places, you need to have at least one extra battery for your camera.  At this price (used), I'd even buy three.  Even though this is rechargable and lasts longer than AA Batteries, you will lose a lot of battery charge when transferring images to another source (computer) or viewing them on the LCD.  You might figure 125-150 picutres on one battery, but the video will use even more</review_text>
this battery is awsome charges in 2 hours or less and is actualy good for 150 pics or more as promised. You can get one of the knockoff batteries from a sell here on amazon for $6.88 that as far as I can tell works just as good. I have one of each but only for a few days now and each as been through a full charge and drain and I noticed no difference between them</review_text>
Modern 400 speed films are better in every way than the slow 100 speed films when I first started shooting 35mm.  Because of this I see no reason to shoot anything slower than ISO 400 these days.  Of all the color films I like Fuji Superia the best; the colors are rich and saturated without looking unatural.  Grain and sharpness are very good for a fast film.  This is now my standard film.  I buy bricks of Fuji Superia X-TRA and onsies and twosies of everything else and my pictures have never looked better</review_text>
I've used this film on a few occasions under different lighting situations and I suggest everyone who's into photography from the level of beginner to professional to use this film. My prefered method of using this film is a combonation of exsisting light and strobe...including on camera flash! It's a great price and provided you process using a professional laboratory, the results will be extremely pleasing</review_text>
As I have read the previous comments about the superiority of Fugi film to Kodak (and I agree in part), however, it should be pointed out that the reason Fugi film worked so well on the Long Island sound photo shoot is because Fugi film lends itself more to the greens and blues in the color spectrum while the Kodak films lend themselves more to the warm yellows, oranges and deep reds of sunsets and Vermont landscapes in the fall.  Fugi film is exceptional but its quility is limited just as is Kodak</review_text>
On an outing to the park with my nieces, I shot 5 rolls of film.  I used several different film types: Kodak Gold 200, Fuji Superia X-tra 400, Fuji Superia X-tra 800, and Fuji color slide film.  By far, the best pictures were from the Fuji 400 speed film.  BAM!! The colors just jump out and grab you.  Great skin tones.  The grains on this film are superb when enlarged to 8x10.  I am looking forward to trying Fuji's 100 and 200 speed films</review_text>
While the picture quality of the 400 speed doesn't quite compare to that of the 100 speeds, this film is simply awesome. The sometimes artificial colors (punchy reds and deep blues) really bring out the 'pop' in most scenes (especially grey days). In terms of an all around consumer film, this is simply the best and is what I use when I shoot with my P&amp;S. What makes this film so spectacular is that even with the higher speed, you don't have to sacrifce picture quality and color saturation, making it possible to hand-hold even in dim or night situations. The colors are great and the picture quality is nearly indistinguishable from slower speed films. Simply put, the only film that I like more is Fuji Reala</review_text>
I got this camera for the use in a digital photo class.  It was wonderful.  There wasn't anything that confused me when I first got it, and it took great pictures.  The software was a little tricky because it moved all of my photos to a different place that gave me very little access, but that was easily taken care of by uninstalling the software and using the USB cable by itself.The 10x zoom is great, but if you move at all your picture can be quite blurry.  I would get a tripod to use when you have it zoomed really far in.Overall it's a great camera that takes great pictures and good video</review_text>
I have a similar issue as another reviewer had... my Z740's LCD screen failed a few months ago. I turn on the camera and all the screen shows is solid white. The little eye-piece viewfinder still displays fine, and the pictures & videos still come out fine, but I can't use the lcd screen as my viewfinder any more... which was one of the biggest reasons I bought the camera...Others online have had this problem, but I can't find anyone who has gotten it resolved. My camera is well out of warranty, so I have no hope of Kodak fixing it.Otherwise though, it's a great camera... very impressive actually. I just wish it hadn't died after a year and a half of occasional use... :-</review_text>
This is the camera I use and it works great! I was surprised at how well it records video too! It's very easy to adjust the camera to the environment you are photographings. The zoom is excellent and doesn't seem to drain the batteries much. I would recommend this camera to the amateur or professional.</review_text>
Very easy to use, have been using it for over two years now.  Great quality pics and easy to print, command, and choose options quickly.  Also take fast photos so you do not miss any moments.  Also like the video mode for shot blips when I forget or do not want to carry the camcorder</review_text>
I bought this camera last summer. I have taken enough pictures to put up a review now. I LOVE THIS CAMERA! Pure and simple, it has met and exceeded my expectations. The pictures it takes are very nice, sharp, focused, and crisp. It has so many features that you can play around with. I have probably only used half of them more than once. It has a very nice LCD display, or you can take pictures through the traditional peep hole. On the view screen it will always tell you, which mode you are in, gives you a nice centering square, and what picture you are on, etc. The zoom on it is awesome, although I haven't used that much to date. You can take close up shots of flowers, insects, etc., and it still get everything just right. Three of my favorite features though are: the option to take video clips, and the fact that you can shoot photographs in black and white or sepia color, which gives your pictures a real antique or historical feel depending on what you are going for. It will even let play around with shooting night picturs, or different landscapes near and far. When you print out the pictures off your computer, if you have any kind of decent printer you will be almost shocked how detailed and crisp the picture is. I would almost swear that it is better than film pictures. I couldn't stop looking at it, because I was so amazed! For a person like me that mainly takes normal snapshots most of the time, I don't know what else I could ask for in a camera! Moreover, you can't go wrong on the price. Is it a little more expensive than other cameras? Sure! However, for the features it has it is well worth it. It isn't exorbinent to begin with. By the way, for you people that like to shop around for the best price like me, I went to 3-4 different stores in my area that had cameras like this one, and the best price I found was here at Amazon. If you buy it, you will love it, end of story.</review_text>
I received this as a Christmas present.  This digital camera works fine for still shots, pictures of my family, etc, but for action shots, kids playing outside, basketball games, etc. it is a BIG disappointment.  I took 47 pictures of my son playing basketball in our school gym and only 5 of them were worth keeping. I've taken to several games/activities to try it out. I've tried using the different functions, adjusting the manual setting, and playing with the zoom but nothing has worked.  Many of the shots are blurred, have shadows (because of movement), or are so dark the people can't be seen.  I wish I would have known this before I asked for this camera.</review_text>
This is the only Camera you will ever need! I have had mine for 1.5 years and not only are the pictures great but I use a 2GB memory card for Video and the quality is amazing!!!  I can take a video, load unto my computer and have a DVD for the family to watch in less than an hour (if you can't wait just plug in the cord and hookup to your TV and watch the video straight from the camera).  I have retired my digital SONY handycam (which is a great video camera).I have used this camera extensively for the 1.5 years traveling to China, Europe and the US - no problems - Friends and Family are amazed at the quality of the pictures</review_text>
If you are looking for a DSLR for under 700 bucks this is the camera to get. This camera improves on the *ist DL in almost every way. The shake reduction is awesome, battery life is great, pictures clear, the 11-point AF is a godsend for these cameras, the kit lens is the best compared to Nikon and Canons kit lenses-it produces sharp and clear images, and the fact that it uses AA batteries and SD cards is also great. My only gripes are the slow buffer speed when it comes to continuous shooting (3fps then 1fps). Once again this camera is not ideal for the sport enthusiast who needs conitinous shots constantly but it still holds it's own. I also think they could of have improved the Auto-Focus a tad more (although the 11-Point AF helps greatly in lowlight and low contrast situations). This camera is easy to hold for long periods of time especially compared to the Canon Rebel XTI model (which caused my hand to cramp up within 5 minutes of holding it). Also, the lenses available for this camera and the prices/quality of them is unmatched. If you want to get into serious photography but don't want to sell a first born, start with this!</review_text>
Having grown up using Pentax SLR Cameras and Lenses I was very intrigued by the K100D and the ability to reuse some of my K mount lenses.  I am extremely impressed so far with image quality, the built-in flash (no red eye problems so far) and the almost instantaneous shutter of the camera.  Having been oppressed for so long by the compact digital cameras I have reinvigorated my love of photography and can't wait to explore the many features of the K100D.  The auto-focus has been very good so far with just one occasion where it didn't seem to adjust properly, but that also could have been operator error</review_text>
I finally added the K100D to my Pentax collection. I started with Pentax SLRs over 30 years ago. Spotmatic, then ME Super, then ZX-7, a IR focus Point and Shoot along with many lenses and accessories.A few years ago I tried switching to digital and have not been really satisfied with the lack of the feel of a 35mm SLR. But liked the convenience of immediate download of pictures and ability to select, fix and manipulate the images prior to processing.Along comes the K100D and I couldn't resist. It has the feel and sound of the 35mm. It's been fun dusting off my old equipment and putting it to use again. Best of all it's been great to look at photography as a creative hobby again versus just point and shoot pictures that I got myself into with the other small digitals. Got a few great shots during that time but not many. I know that is all in the mind but having a great set of tools tends to get the mind going better.Anyway, the camera works absolutely wonderful. My old lenses, Sigma Auto Focus zooms from the ZX-7 work flawlessly with the K100. Have not tried the manual lenses yet. Image stabilizer feature is well worth it. Test shots handheld in low light conditions with slow shutter, over 400mm and macro are very stable.Guess I'll need to seal my 35mm bodies in a bag and wait until they are antiques to sell them.I do a lot of internet shopping, buying and investigations. Amazon had the best buy on the K100 with lense, shipping and Amazon VISA promo. It was delivered in 2 days. I was impressed with the product and service through Amazon.</review_text>
I've had this product for over a month and have used it extensively during my vacation and business trips.  As a DSLR novice, I enlisted the advice of two of my very experienced friends.  Although Canon and Nikon lines are a bit of the standard, I think that the Pentax K100d is where the money is at.  It stacks up with both the Nikon D40/50 and Canon D3 quite nicely in terms of picture quality.  it has a nicer grip and feel, in my opinion, to the Nikon D40 and the image shake reduction has been a godsend during those critical low-light, no-flash picture taking opportunities!I would highly recommend this camera for any novice who does not already own a set of lenses from either of the other two manufacturers.  Great camera with great features for a killer price.</review_text>
This was my my first DLSR.Pentax made the transition clean and effortless with the K100D.It has enough auto features and modes to make things easy for one coming from P&S's plus all the Control an exerienced Photgrapher could want.All this and it can take ANY K mount lens and work in Manual mode with any of them plus it can work fully auto with the AF ones.The 18-55mm kit lens was a big surprise, lotta quality for very little cash</review_text>
Bombproof construction, takes rechargeable AA's, compatible with a bazillion K-mount and M42 screw mount lenses made over the years. The optical quality of Pentax's lenses is legendary, and they are plentiful and inexpensive on the used market. I mostly use my K100D with a 40-year-old Super-Takumar 50mm f/1.4 screw mount lens, and the lens' optical quality and build quality blow away just about any modern lens...best of all they run about $[...]. I'd like to see you do that with a Canon or Nikon DSLR</review_text>
I got the camera via Fedex within five working days after ordering.  The camera and lens were factory fresh with a US warranty.  I'm still trying to learn all of the features since this is my first digital SLR, but so far, it's taken good pictures.  I would order from this company again</review_text>
This camera is performing flawlessly and provides much higher quality results than the Kodak P850 it replaced.  The built-in anti-shake was a must have feature, which limits the DSLR field dramatically.  I see no reason to buy expensive anti-shake lenses such as Nikon and Canon want you to get.  In camera anti-shake is for 99% of users the superior solution.I was concerned about battery life with the AA solution, but using the Sanyo eneloop rechargeables has worked out great.   These batteries don't have the high self-discharge rate which is normally associated with NIMH batteries, so you can leave the camera sitting for a few weeks and still be ready to go</review_text>
Easy to carry and lots of room for your Canon CP Printers</review_text>
Great little bag for carrying not only a digital camera printer but has room for the camera, extra film, memory, etc.  The bag is well constructed and is easily carried via the shoulder strap.  Lots of pockets that come in handy.  Also very stylish.  Great value</review_text>
First class item, looks and feels expensive but isn't.Plenty of compartments to store all your needed piecesfor the printer as well as the camera. Sturdy strap for over the shoulder carrying</review_text>
I took a long shot at buying this thing because of little or no online information about it.  Hopefully this gives you a good idea of what the bag is like so you don't have to aimlessly search the internet for its product features - like I did.I wanted a bag that was genuine (Canon) and that held all of my stuff so I wouldn't have separate bags for each individual item.  The CPB-100 case had plenty of room for all my digital camera accessories: camera (Powershot s70), printer (CP-220), cards (3 compact flash cards), battery charger (CB-2LT), all 6 of my manuals, printer cleaner, and printer charge chords.   And all of the items fit into a slot of some sort - they aren't randomly tossed into the bag.There are 4 compartments:  a very large, extra padded, zip compartment (with large, padded 2 slots) for your printer and some other large accessory (I put my printer chords here); a large, zip compartment with 3 sleeves (I put the battery charger and printer cleaner in the first, camera in the second, and 3 memory cards in the third); and a medium, front, zip compartment for books or flat accessories (I put my 4x6 printer card holder and 4 product manuals in).   There's also a small, velcro compartment on the back which I put 2 more small 3x5 manuals into.  I still have extra room (though not much) to place more accessories.The quality is very durable water-repellent canvas and the front straps appear to be faux leather - the front straps clip shut with magnet clips.   The shoulder strap has a padded shoulder rest and can extend plenty for your height.   The bottom has 4 plastic plates that keep it upright, and keep it from getting dirty, when placed on the ground.I fit the bag perfectly with my accessories.  I'd recommend the bag if you have close to or equal the amount of items I did - unless, of course, you want to haul around extra bags for some reason : ).  Good luck shopping!</review_text>
1. Cannot do live video capture of streaming from a tripod, since the firewire and USB interfaces both require the HandyCam Station to be in place (which covers up the tripod mounts).2. Transferring video from this to a Windows machine is terrible. Works fine with a Mac, but iMovie on the Mac is inadequate for capturing video for use on web. Capturing video on Windows is a nightmare to setup...especially if you use a variety of computers.</review_text>
We bought this digital camcorder just under a year ago and were very happy with it...up until last week.  The LCD screen just quit working.  No mishandling or anything.  We can still record using the viewfinder, but who wants to do that when one of the main reasons we bought this model was for the LCD screen for recording and viewing.  Another issue that comes up when the screen quits working is that in playback mode, you must utilize the play/rw/ff controls (and in record mode the entire control menu is unaccessable as well) by touching the screen.  When the screen doesn't work, this is an issue.  You can still use these controls IF you flip the screen over and shut it back into the camera (screen facing out) and then guess where the buttons would be...challenging because they're upside-down now, and backwards.  Sony apparently only has a 90-day warranty, so we are now requird to pay $136.74 for labor to get the LCD screen repaired.  Thank goodness it quit working LESS THAN A YEAR after we bought it new, because for the first year at least parts are free!?We realize things don't last forever, but when one buys a $600+ video camera from a reputable name like Sony, you expect it to work for at least a year.  And if not, for things to be made right at no charge to you.Very disappointing.  Buyer beware</review_text>
My second Sony camcorder is even better than the first, and is light enough to take along on frequent travel trips, including spas in the US and Canada. I am going to Quebec City and will certainly be able to compactly pack, use and edit anything I take with the Sony camcorder.My one complaint is that the strop gets in the way when I place the camcorder on its shoe</review_text>
This camera is simply the Best: Best price, Best machine, Best quality.With my PCMCIA Firewire 400 card i can produce DVD with excelent quality. Don't need anymore lots of tapes to store everything I film.Great seller: The camera arrived within the 2 days delivery time</review_text>
I was excited when i received my handy cam . I pictured all Niagra falls , ocean city , washington DC , New york etc etc etc.. The vedio quality was gr8 outdoors and it was just more than what i want...For Indoor the video is not good .. when you shoot at night its not visible and if shot in night mode every thing comes like 1930's black and white, and not real.I also used stills and they were good for 1 mb shots. Outdoors they were as you may want them too but indoor or at night they are useless...So over all it is giving me what  i expected it too ..I can safely say it met my expectation with it performance. Not an outstanding deal but really a worthy deal to make ..I recomand this camera to people.</review_text>
This is one of the best camcorders in the market today and I would definitely recommend it to anyone planning to buy a Mini-DV camcorderPositive factors:- Very small and easy to hold with one hand. Can be easily attached even to a mini-tripod with ease.- Excellent widescreen video and hi-fi audio.  Your videos finally get that "Hollywood" feel when you shoot movies in 16:9 ratio (widescreen format).  Even if you don't have a widescreen TV currently, you will very soon have one as more and more people are buying them.  So its better to buy this camcorder and shoot in 16:9 format to enjoy your movies later in widescreen format.-  Includes widescreen rotatable LCD so what you see is what you get when you shoot in 16:9 ratio (widescreen format)- Good battery life.  One extra battery is enough.  You can easily manage a day's worth of shooting with two batteries before recharging them again- Includes docking station making it easier to connect to computer or TV.  If you have a good computer with a firewire port, please buy a firewire cable to connect the camcorder to your computer.  You can download your movie in excellent clarity in .avi format and edit it as required- Make sure to change the audio setting to 16 bit (instead of the default 12 bit) for very good hi-fi audio- Touchscreen menu system is great.  You don't have to search for any buttons as they are all available in the touchscreen menu itself.- 12X optical zoom is more than sufficient for ordinary home videos.  Anything more produces more "shaking" and would necessiate the use of a tripod.  When you shoot without a tripod, 12X is the best zoom you can achieve without worrying about shaky videos- 1 MP widescreen still photo.  You can use this feature if you forgot to bring your digital camera.  The photo clarity is not good so please don't expect great shots.  Since the photo is in 16:9 format, you can take panoramic photos and cover more people in group shots- Nightshot:  Cool feature that records using infrared light.  Useful for shooting at night as you can record a video even in 100% darkness- Color widescreen viewfinder - Very useful when you are running down on batteries and need to use the viewfinder.  The color widescreen viewfinder gives an excellent picture and is as good as the LCD in clarityNegative factors:- Outdoor videos especially in bright sunlight are overexposed.  So please adjust the white balance when shooting outdoors.  Add the white-balance menu to your shortcuts so that you can easily access it and return to default once you start shooting indoors- Sensitive microphone may pick up button clicks (best to turn off the button click "beep" sound).Notes:- Use a fresh cassette after recording 2 or 3 times on the same cassette.  The head tends to get dirty if you re-record on the same cassette more than 3 times- You can edit movies in Windowx XP using Windows Movie Maker, but beware it does not support 16:9 ratio video.  Hence your videos look ugly as you shot them in 16:9 but Movie Maker converted it to 4:3.  Invest in Pinnacle Software version 9 or 10 for better movie editing capabilities.  Pinnacle is the only software, I am aware of, that preserves teh 16:9 ratio.  Even Roxio could not allow 16:9 format.- You can also invest in wide-angle lens as it gives excellent coverage</review_text>
Another superb product from Nikon with an unbelievable NO fault 25 year warranty.  Great binoculars for boating and outdoor use.  Its water and fog proof. Hard to make a better product</review_text>
Although I don't have a lot of experience with good binoculars, the Nikon Action Extreme has impressed me with its quality, image brightness, field of view, and image sharpness. It's a fairly large binocular and will tire your arms after extended handheld use. An excellent value for the price</review_text>
This binocular simply fell into my hand as though it were made for me personally. Love at first feel? Yes!I compared this binocular to several others in the same price range, here is what I found:Fit and finish: Nikon is easily the equal of any Vixen or Pentax or Olympus (I didn't try Canon).Feel: Nikon was by far the best.Optics: Nikon did something clever here. First of all, they gave this one a wider field of view than, for example, the Pentax PCF. Looking through the Pentax (and, by the way, I have a high regard for Pentax and *love* their Papilio series, but that is another binocular for a different purpose) after using the Nikon, the view seemed dimmer and claustrophobic. With the Nikon, you have that wonderful feeling of actually being "out there" in the field or in the sky with your object. And everything is so bright and sharp! The Nikon really excels in sharpness at the center.However, Nikon did another clever thing (and I checked a couple of pairs of these Nikon binos to see if this was true generally, and it was): at this price point you can't possibly have the whole field of view perfectly sharp. No binocular is perfectly sharp at the edges. Here is what Nikon did, best as I can tell: they put the sloppiest edges at the outside and top of the field of view. Wow! Think about it: if you had to compromise somewhere, you want to compromise AWAY from the center and bottom. Why? Because, the inside edge of the FOV of each barrel is where the object will be. And, most likely (especially for terrestrial viewing), the object or its environment will also be resting on or near the bottom (think of a bird in a tree or an animal on the ground) So, Nikon seems to have made sure that the bottoms and inside edge of the FOV was as sharp as possible, while allowing the far outside and top edges to be a little worse. Smart!There is some chromatic abberation, but that, too, is unavoidable at this price. Even some very high priced camera lenses (with only one barrel to worry about) have this. The CA is not at all objectionable. A little rim of faint purple at the edges of the FOV in high contrast situations.A very nice binocular. Not too heavy, not too big, very comfortable to use, excellent imagery, top-of-the-line sharpness-at-center, great construction. I expect to get a lifetime's enjoyment out of them.</review_text>
bright, clear, wide of field view.(That's it.Whatelse you need?)chromatic aberration is on edge of it, but it's not a big problem with observing a STAR!good product with good price.highly recommend!!!</review_text>
I purchased this product to put in my car to be a deterient for possible vandals.  It is great because it looks like a real camera and with the blinking red LED light, it make vandals think that they are being monitored.  I really like this option as to spending tons of money on a real camera.  Plus, you do not have to worry about privacy issues because it is not a real camera.  Not only that, this imitation camera is portable so you can use it with any property</review_text>
I like this camera. The size is great, it's cool to carry around and has a wow factor. The screen is HUGE for a camera this size. I love it! Navigating the menus is graphically pleasing. Pics are ok, flash works decently.I have one nagging problem: the video. (NOTE: I've only taken indoor video. Outdoor, daytime video may not be a problem.) If you get the right lighting and adjust the settings just right, you will get a good looking video for this type of camera. My problem is, it's rare to have everything so perfect. When you look around the room without the camera, you can see things normally. When you look at the same room with the same lighting through the camera, it's almost completely dark. You have to put the "low light" setting on all the time. The problem is that this setting is blurry, so you have to move the camera around very very slowly to not get a headache watching the video. (The manual suggests you only use this setting with a tri-pod. HA! This is the only way to see anything indoors!) The bottom line is: I have to constantly adjust settings on the camera before I take video in order to get decent viewable quality.Exacerbating the problem is that the video lights are two LCD lights, and they are absolutely useless. They have a flashlight "pointing" effect rather than a flooding effect. So if you use it, the center of your view will be lit in a circle and fading to dark towards the edges of the screen. Even with such poor performance, the lights are still too bright for ppl to look at the camera while it's on.Speaking of completely useless, don't even bother using the image stabilization. It makes the video EXTREMELY blurry... unusably blurry. They should rename the feature "Image Messer-upper".Having said all that, I really do like this camera. I've focused on the video because it's probably the one thing that bothers me about this camera. Everything else is great. Even though I've harped on the video, it is possible to get decent quality video once you adjust the settings. It just nags me a bit that it's not easier. I shouldn't have to turn on the low light setting ALL the time, and that setting shouldn't make things so blurry.Then again, I bought this camera for $200 on Aiptek's website and got $100 worth of accessories for free. So I try to remind myself that I DID buy a low-end pocket-sized camcorder. And that's probably the most important thing to remember. If you buy this multi-function camcorder for what it is, you get a great product. If you want a $1000 high-end camcorder the size of a small digital camera, you're not going to get it for $200.UPDATE: (16 Mar 07)  I finally got a chance to use this camera outside on a sunny day.  The video was EXCELLENT! BEAUTIFUL!  I am SO MUCH MORE pleased with this camera now that I know that, at least in normal daylight settings, I can get GREAT looking video.  No "low light" setting necessary.  No blurriness at all!  I even played it back on my tv, and it still looks great!</review_text>
I bought this camcorder for my husband for Christmas.  He wanted something to pop into his pocket for impromptu events.  We have an old Panasonic VHS-C camcorder, but the battery never lasts more than 30 minutes and it is getting harder to find a VCR to play it on.  We wanted something that would record directly to an SD memory card, and this is the only one we could find.  However, so far, it has performed very well.  The 3X optical zoom works good and the outdoor videos were perfect.  In fact, my husband filmed my granddaughter jumping on the trampoline, and he was able to get a freeze frame of her in mid air.  It was not blurry or anything.  The indoor videos were not quite as good, but he hadn't figured out how to turn on the flash/LED light for low light situations yet.  I figure with that turned on, the indoor videos will be very good.  So far, we have been very pleased with this camcorder.  We bought a 2GB SD card to go with it in order to have enough memory for what we want, and I also bought an extra battery.  I would certainly buy it again</review_text>
The prior review decrying Aiptek/Macintosh incompatibility is flat wrong. MPlayer plays Aiptek's ASF (MPEG4) files perfectly. I suspect there are other programs that would do the job as well, but haven't researched it. MPlayer is free, and took me all of about 10 minutes to find and install. Download and be happy.FWIW, today I bought the similar Aiptek PVR (no optical zoom, and half the price on sale at a major chain). I intend to use it skiing, where I don't want to risk a more expensive camcorder or deal with additional weight and bulk.In purchasing the Aiptek, I was expecting very basic VCR quality, and that's what my camera delivers in a small and inexpensive package. Build quality seems entirely adequate for this class of product. The user interface is very easy to pick up. In my view, this is a useful and versatile device.Especially when paired with a Mac. :o</review_text>
I tried digital. I really did. But I could never get the really gorgeous shots I got from my old Yashica SLR which gave up the ghost several years back. I also could not really "focus" on what I was shooting...just pointed and shot because there was no film to run out of. The result? Pointless pics that weren't even that good looking. Digital just didn't feel "right." So about 8 months ago I decided to go back to film. What to get? After much research, I finally decided on the Canon T2. Absolutely brilliant camera. My favorite feature? I can let the camera handle focus, etc. OR I can go COMPLETELY MANUAL. May not seem like a big deal, but it feels so good being in control of what the camera does when you want to be. And of course, that means letting your imagination go...something sorely lacking in digital. Couldn't be happier and no more pointless pics. Okay, maybe a few, but they still look good. And isn't that the point</review_text>
Having just gone back to using a film camera from digital (my wife still uses digital) I have found this to be an excellant camera so far. I have taken 6 rolls of film and everyone one has came out perfect. I would recommend it</review_text>
I recently purchased the Rebel T2 camera body only after my Canon EOS Rebel 2000 gave its "last gasp".  I had been a Canon user since 1979 with an AE-1 (that I still have).I liked the fact that the T2 body plugged immediately into the two EF lenses that I owned (28-80mm and 75-300mm), which protected my previous investments.  I was taking pictures within seconds of opening the package and loading batteries.  And although I have my sights set on a Digital Rebel at some point soon, you just can't beat the quality of traditional 35-mm film and photoprocessing.As an upgrade over EOS Rebel 2000, the LCD located on the camera back is easier to read.  Also, the T2 seems more "solid" to me, but lighter in weight.  I took the older EOS Rebel 2000 with me on a couple 75-mile backpacks (which probably led to its early demise), and so I now have a new-found respect for the lighter design.As a final note, I also appreciated the ease of ordering via amazon.com.   There are plenty of web sites offering the same Canon T2 camera back, including those which would have saved me a few dollars. But none had the long-standing relationship I have had with amazon over the past several years</review_text>
I got this after switching from a digital camera. The digital cameras didn't offer the depth I wanted and not having proofs was a big drawback.I am by no means an expert on photography, but I do know a great photograph when I see one, and this camera takes beautiful shots.This is a beautiful camera. Elegant in design; the grey body with black accents is definately an attention grabber. People will look at your camera.It definately has brains to back up it's beauty. Loading film is easy and quick. It has about 8 or so presets. There is the automatic "point and shoot" mode which you'll probably use the most. It automatically compensates for light, adjusting shutter speed and aperture for the perfect shot. The quick autofocus allows you to grab your shot quickly, without waiting for the camera to decide to take the picture.It also has settings for portrait shots, close ups, night, landscape, no flash, and many others. Those are settings that maximize the camera's features for those particular shot. It also has a program setting where you can program shutter speed, aperture, flash and film advance. Though with the comprehensive presets, I don't think you'll ever need to use it.The 28-90 lens that comes with the kit is nice, and has a selector for autofocus or manual focus. It also, of course, can be removed so you can add other lenses. The zoom is powerful and leads to beautiful shots.Overall this is an unbelievable camera. Great price, features, and pictures will be the best you've ever seen. They are very crisp, clear and have almost a 3D lifelike quality to them, something I've never seen outside of a professionally taken photograph. This camera is awesome</review_text>
Some years ago I bought a Canon Rebel, one of the earlier ones, it was not so great, kept if for a while and then sold it.I have been into digital for some time now, but, its great, but it is not film, not by any chance.I have a very old point and shoot, I started taking pictures with either Kodak of Fuji film, I then brought it into my one hour developer and had the negs developed and digitized onto a CD.The results were gorgeous, at that point it was time for a new SLR, there are not so many left right now.I saw The Eos Rebel T2 with the 28-90 Mark III zoom lens, it was impressive, light, but with just a touch of heft, great grip,viewfinder, very fast autofocus, it even looks great.So forgetting my previous experience with a Rebel a long time ago I bought.This is a superb camera, this is just no way to praise it, I love this camera.Since getting it I,ve shot 10 rolls of film, all were digitized onto a disc, touched  up where I felt they needed it, (a simple procedure.I shot a roll in a hanger at a former Naval Aviation Base here, all kinds of aircraft were in different stages of reconstruction,it was a photographers paradise.The results I am getting are better than a very expensive  digital camera.I cannot recommend the T2 even more, if you want one get it now, I think these cameras will be gone soon.Canon you did great job.</review_text>
YO! This camera is just perfect for those getting into photogrophy! Although im only 14 years old, I know what i'm talking about. I have had this camera for 3 weeks now and it is just inspirational. I got into photogrophy from Transworld Skateboarding Magazine. The photogrophers have amazing pics! Truly inspirational! I'm leaving for christmas to go to England next week and can't wait to shoot some nice pics. I tend to favor fast action pics. With Al Servo (funtion automatically set in sports mode)  i can just point and shoot and the camera automatically adjusts the focus of the object during the pictures. I love to customize. The easiest customization setting that i always use for outdoor action pics is the Tv mode. This mode allows you to customize the shutter speed. First make sure you are in a bright lighted area to ensure fast shutter speed. The brighter the area is the faster the shutter speed you can set. I like to hold down the shutter button for a rapid fire of 3 frames per second. Awesome! I love the sound of instant photos. I cannot even descride what it is like. Try it out! The T2 is a great camera for begginers at a great price. Remember this review is only a "guideline". It would be good to make a decision on your own. If you try hard and can't come to a decision, that is when you can rely on other peoples opinions.If you want to see some cool pics from the magazine(...)</review_text>
I looked at digital cameras for months - literally - before I just decided to lug around a 35 mm SLR. As everyone probably already knows, megapixels matter a whole lot when you're talking about blowing a picture up to a larger size. What's great about film is that unless the picture was taken out of focus, or in bad light, you can use a negative to blow something up and the quality really doesn't start to go down until you're making HUGE prints. (How huge exactly I don't know, but the biggest I've blown up was around 4x4 feet, and still no trouble.) The prints I've gotten out of this camera so far have been stellar. ( I use fuji film -- I think it's better than Kodak, even though Kodak has better commercials. Give it a try!)The camera itself is not too heavy, granted, it's not the convenience of a tiny digital camera, but it's  not as bad as I'd expected to carry it around all day. The neck strap is nice, the manual is actually easy to comprehend.  I like a camera that has buttons for a lot of it's features on the body -- it seems complicated at first, but once you know how to use the features, they're much easier to access than they would be if you were scrolling through a menu.  The T2 seems worth the hundred or so more dollars than you would pay for the very similar Rebel K2 by Canon.One thing - make sure you take the batteries out if you're not going to be using it for a week or more. It seems like they go dead if they're in the camera, even if it is off</review_text>
I recently started a small photography business doing Black and White shots of kids in their natural environment. I wanted a camera that took quality shots, but was still cost effective.  I most definitely found it. My cannon takes great shots and allows me the mobility needed to chase kids around.  Very pleased.</review_text>
I recently purchased this camera and I'm loving it. As a whole it's very easy to use and carry. I'm a college student going into photograpy and this is a great starter camera. I have a feeling this one is going to be with me for a very long time</review_text>
I love this camera.  It is handy, goes in my purse everywhere.  Sure it isn't a Canon Rebel or remotely like it, but it is fast fast fast, holds a charge, takes a great wide angle shot and takes superb macros.  I don't use the movie feature but it has it.  There is a lot to offer in this little camera.  I have people stop me all the time and ask what brand it is.  Buy it and be happy :</review_text>
I have owned Canon Powershot S-series (S330), A-series (A540, A570is) and the S2 IS.  I wanted a 28mm wide angle point and shoot, so I bought this because Canon's SD800 IS is outrageously priced.  I'm a Canon fanatic, so be prepared for multiple comparisons.  However this camera is worth crossing over to Panasonic for.PROS - I definitely enjoy the 28mm feature.  The bright rear display is wonderful, the OS is quite intuitive as well.  Also it gets great battery life.  The ~ 300 shot estimate in the specs is pretty realistic.CONS - Compared to Canon cameras this is my conclusion -All of Canon's camera have much truer white balance presets.  Even with RED & BLUE fine tuning options, indoor dim lighting is really hard to do, as is snow lighting.This camera takes much more saturated and contrasty photos than Canons do.  Even when the FX01 is set to be less-vivid, it's way more saturated than Canon's most vivid setting.  The end result is a dramatic and unrealistic photo sometimes.The CCD noise is another issue.  This camera's sensor is much noisier than Canons'.  Nothing dramatic and deal-breaking, but don't expect the same crisp, clean shots a Canon will take.Finally Panasonic image stabilization.  It really does not hold its own against Canon.  I used the 570 IS and handheld shots that were a 1/4 second, and sometimes longer, with decent results.  The same goes for the S2 IS (which I HIGHLY recommend as a digital camcorder/super zoom hybrid).  The panasonic's sensor doesn't seem to match the ISO standards that you set it to, and it wants slower shutter speeds at f2.8 ISO 100 than a Canon set at the same f-stop and ISO.  So, despite the FX01's Mega OIS, its longer shutter speeds mean you still get shake that you wouldn't with an equivalent Canon.I know Canon, Canon, Canon.  Well, I told you I'm biased.  After reading these cons, why would you get this?  It's 1/2 the price of the SD 800 IS (if you shop around) and it's a must have for city photos, big landscapes (skies look so cool with wide angle) and it's vital for indoor group shots!Buy it, but don't expect the world from it</review_text>
I deal in major brand cameras and Panasonic cameras are my personal favorite! I've seen people whine about the "noise" they make many times but have never found it to be a problem. I own the FZ10 and the FX01 for my personal cameras. The FX01 is a very fast camera and takes great pics! I love the 28mm wide lens. Compared to most cameras I've used the FX01 does a real good job of metering the light and exposing the images.I love Panasonic's solid build and reliability. They may not be as popular as Canon or Sony but in my opinion are every bit as good.</review_text>
I am accustomed to using a larger point and shoot zoom. This is a sleek pocket sized point and shoot that gives exceptionally sharp pictures. It focuses very swiftly I would suppose due to the Leica lense. The battery life is good. I do notice that photos tend to calibrate a little to the blue range. I like to have a little more zoom. Overall,I like it very much</review_text>
this is my fifth digital camera, and i like it the best by far.  it's also the cheapest.  it's my first wide-angle and my first silver-not-black:  as someone else said, i don't see how i would ever go back to a non-wide-angle after this; but i do wish mine were black.  i have noticed the colors are faded in fluorescent light, but for macro it is excellent--much better than the more expensive camera i already had bought for macro purposes (canon.)  i also love the battery, which seems to last forever.  i bought a replacement lenmar battery which is also great, and cheap, but it got some bad reviews because it was described as being for the wrong model camera, not the fx-01.  (if you read the customer reviews, you can figure out which one is the right one for you.)i do have problems understanding the display, which shows options that don't correspond to any place on the camera you can select the options at.  (i guess i should look at the manual.)  also, i don't like the software and decided not to download it at all.i bought this because i wanted a camera made by a computer company as much as a camera company, that is, i wanted it to work.  also, someone had sent me an email about the history of leica, and how they saved a lot of jews from the concentration camps.  the other nice thing about this camera is that i use it a lot more because i carry it with me every day:  it is tiny and the battery always works, so why not?as for the graininess, on my desktop the pics look fine, and i would not be raving about this camera if it were not very easy to take good pics with--but i have to admit i haven't used it for printed pics so far</review_text>
I bought this camera more than half a year ago. My intention was to get a decent camera for images, but then also be able to use it for filming short movies.I'm very pleased with its performance. In good lighting conditions, colors come out to be amazing. I really really did not expect them to be so vivid and sparkling! In darker conditions, well, it still works fine, not nearly as bad as I expected from some other reviews. Photos might be grainy or not as vivid anymore, but the stuff is still perfectly suitable to show the photos to people.As about filming, it's terrific. I mean, resolution is great (sth like 848 by 640 or so), better than what one could possibly expect from a regular camera. And the quality is super awesome, looks very neat on computer screen. Respect.It has to be pointed out that you cannot zoom while filming, but not many cameras out there can do that.Oh, it's also very small with a gigantic screen and great battery life. A great buy</review_text>
Good product but the color was not so attracticed</review_text>
Easy to set up and easy to use.  We recently upgraded to a different Kodak camera and have been enjoying the EasyShare dock.  Our previous dock for a different Kodak camera was going strong after 4 years.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Great camera for the technically challenged. Easy to setup. Easy to use. Great features. 8MB...6X is all you need</review_text>
I bought two of these dock kits as christmas gifts for my mom and grandma who received the cameras as gifts earlier in the year. Great prices on the dock kits too. The dock is great for people who have trouble getting the pictures off their camera and onto their computer. Or those who always take their camera to the drugstore to retrieve and edit their pictures! I'm very happy with this purchase</review_text>
The dock makes transferring photos and charging the camera battery a snap.  If you don't have a dock you don't know what you're missing, but it's a great addition.  I've owned many Kodak products and have been satisfied with each and every one so far.  This dock and the accessories are no exception</review_text>
It works as advertised.It will (for me anyway) only charge the Kodak battery pack !I shoved some nice high end LithIons and it would not charge them.Oddly the camera dock for my old DX4900 will charge almost anything</review_text>
Easy to get up and running, the unit goes into slideshow mode after power on automatically.  Picture quality was excellent. Easy to put pictures on a memory card and have them show up.  Recommend re-cropping your pictures to 16x9 aspect ratio so you get a full picture.  Unit can accomodate std. 4x6 format as well, but will not fill the screen.  Small Quirks are:- When in slideshow mode, you can't hit the pause button to ZOOM in.- Very poorly designed stand that WILL collapse after a couple of weeks.- Documentation is lacking (typical COBY style)- No support for QuickTime video popular in some digital cameras- Unit has a faint lingering glow on screen after power down which doesn't go away unless you unplug the unit</review_text>
This digital picture frame has a very good LCD display. As long as you resize your digital photos to match the resolution of 860X480, the pics. will fill-up the frame. One drawback is your original pics. will be cropped. My 1 Gb CF card can display over a thousand pics. Color and brigthness are still good even if you view it 6 to 8 feet. If you want you can change the frame to  wood if you are handy. Overall I'm happy with this Coby DP102.</review_text>
My friends have similar products that they paid up to 3x more.  Quality is very good...easy to use...such a great gift for almost any occasion</review_text>
I'm like most people with a digital camera. I take a bazillion pictures, develop 10% onto paper, and then banish the other 90% to computer storage archives. I mean, I'd love to display a lot more of those pictures from my computer, but who has the wall space or time to organize all of those prints? That's why I decided to get a digital picture frame. I had been looking for quite some time, but was always turned off by the small-ish LCD sizes or poor resolutions. Then I came across this Coby 10" widescreen unit, with the 800x480 pixel display! There were no reviews on Amazon (at the time), but spec-wise it had what I wanted; a larger display and higher resolution.I took the chance and ordered one and am I glad I did! The display is huge, and the pictures look crisp. Colors are pretty accurate when compared to that of my calibrated LCD computer monitor. The interchangeable frames (it comes with a black one as well as the white one) make it easy to match with your dcor. The litte remote is easy to use, but easy to lose as well, so make sure you place it somewhere easy to find. The built-in MP3 player is a nice touch. The speakers aren't that great (it is a picture frame after all), but it's nice to have the frame play music while in slideshow mode. There is a variety of transition effects to choose from. I haven't tried playing videos on it, so I can't comment on that feature.That being said, there are a few things that prevent me from giving this 5 stars.1. The adjustable stand is made of cheap feeling plastic. I've seen other frames that have much nicer backs. Yes, I know it's the front you are looking at, but the stand should be sturdier, in my opinion.2. The angle of the stand, while adjustable, is simply held in place by friction. It actually has one setting that it can click into, but then it is angled too much to view at a normal position.3. There seems to be a software bug that causes the display to act weird in slideshow mode. Well, to be more precise, if you are in slideshow mode and you choose either the Fade, Mask, or Cross Comb transition effects, then the very top horizontal pixel line starts to show black sections. It looks like dead pixels, but once you exit the slideshow (or use other effects other than then ones I listed) everything is fine. I have recreated this problem, but I don't know if it's just my frame or all of these. No biggie. I now use no transition effects it is perfect.4. This is not really a complaint about the product but more about Coby's specs. On their website they state the LCD is 800x480. Great! So I ordered the frame and then resized a whole bunch of pictures to that resolution. However, when I got the frame and started using it, I noticed that all of my pictures had black (blank) bars on both the left and right sides of the picture. It turns out that the resolution is actually 860x480 (which I found out after some trial-and-error). It would have been nice to know this ahead of time to save me from having to re-resize my pictures. Plus, sizing pictures to 860x480 is a really weird ratio... kinda like getting 4x7 prints.I ordered this from Total Electronics (one of the Amazon vendors) and it arrived quickly. When I reported the "dead pixel" problem (which turned out to be a software bug, not a defect, so to speak), they responded to my email quickly and offered to take it back no questions asked. Now that's customer service!Overall, I am very pleased with this product. In reality, it rates 4.5 stars. I'm the type of person that agonizes over something before finally buying it. With this purchase, that was totally unncessary!</review_text>
I just received my COBY dig. frame. Put about 25 pics on a memory chip and stuck into the device.Pressed slide show and it started working. Minimum frame time is 5 seconds and I wish it were faster for my needs (window display in gallery), and the color is not perfect, but it was only about $107. so I'll live with it</review_text>
Picture taking is my life!!  I would almost be board at family functions without a camra in my hands.  I got my Vivitar camra at a pawn shop for $10 and it is amazing.  I took it to my PaPa's house over the summer and i got some beutiful pictures.this is an easy camra to work an i love the way it takes vidio even if it is soundless.  for the 4th of july i took some videos of the fireworks and it was so much fun to look at even without sound.This was not my first camra what so ever.  I have had many other camras and have camras that cost well over 500 dollors, but this camra is just fine for me.  The only thing I don't like about it is the zoom.  When you zoom in to like 4x it makes the picture really blurry.  But if you are expirenced in photo taking it shouldn't be a problem.I recommend this camra and i thinkj it was a good find.</review_text>
I find this a great little camera for the money. For my needs, it is just right. I find it takes clear pics, very small, so easy to carry. I have no problems with it at all. I can carry it in the case on my belt or in a pocket. I recommend it highly</review_text>
I purchased this camera for my 5 year old grandson.  It's small enough to handle and large enough to hold steady during an exposer.  The general operation of this camera is very simple and easy to use.  The image doesn't stay in the window very long after the exposure is made, but it's easy to preview later</review_text>
I got this little thing 2 months ago for my birthday, and am quite happy with it.  I took it with me on a vacation to Japan, and was able to take home tons of picture memories.I'll start with the cons:1) You have to hold it still for several seconds when taking pictures, or else they will turn out blurry.  This is only a real problem when taking spur-of-the-moment pictures, or if in a hurry, which does not happen too often.2) Flash is extremely bright, so close objects will wash out.(Just turn off the flash and this is not a problem)3) Digital zoom - not as good as optical, but not too bad.Now for the pros:1) This thing is small!  It came with a neckstrap, so I wore it as a necklace during my vacation, and it was so light I barely noticed it.2) Lots of memory- my 512mb card holds at least 530 pictures/videos, and there's still room.3) Really easy to operate, I was able to change the flash settings, delete pictures, use the self-timer, take video and review pictures without even having to read the instruction manuel.4) Quick and easy file transfer to my computer-just hook it up to the USB, and drag and drop.5) Extrememly bright flash, while listed as a con, is also nice when taking pictures in the dark, as they will show up as if it is the middle of the day, provided you are not too close.Overall, I gotta say I love this little camera.  Sure, the picture quality isn't the best, but if you are in decent lighting conditions, and you can hold still for a few seconds, you can get some good quality pictures</review_text>
This is a good camera for the money. Don't be expecting amazing 5mp pictures or anything. If you are in a dark area, it is hard to see on the screen what you are shooting. Of course, when you actually take the picture, the flash brightens the area. If you are not still, pictures can be a bit fuzzy...but a 20$ tripod can take care of that problem. Small, can fit in a purse or pocket. Great for kids, comes with a carrying strap so they don't drop it. All in all, I would recomend it for someone who is starting out and wants a VERY basic camera, or for a child. If you are looking for high quality photos this is not the camera for you. I bought it for my 14 year old sister who uses it to take pictures at the football game, and put them on her website (which does not require high quality photos). Her photos look pretty decent when printed in a 3x5 size.</review_text>
As advertised brings things in closer as all telephoto lens do. Only wish it would fit into my underwater equipment I have for my video camera</review_text>
First one I ever owned.  Overall performance is pretty good and I am satisfied with picture quality.Battery life is short and downloading could be made easier</review_text>
Pro's:no recording media to change, long record time. Small and lightweight.Con's:for the price, I can't think of any.I think some people seem to forget that this model is considered a budget HD camcorder. You ARE NOT going to get "brodcast quality" video out of it. You ARE NOT going to get good low light performance. What you get is an affordable, compact, decent HD camcorder for a shoe-string budget. Nothing more. You are paying for the convenience of not having to change tapes or dvds, bottom line.I've had mine now for about 9 hours and so far I've only done test shooting with it in low-light conditions. On Auto the results were less than exceptable. If you take a little time and learn the manual controls then you will get satisfactory results. There will be some "noise" (grainy picture) but again, this is a "bottom of the barrel" camcorder.I've read many reviews on this device (and the other Everio G models around this price range) and people all complain about the poor picture quality and I just want to say for the last time... It's a budget HD camcorder. Yes, I know I'm repeating myself but I want to put this issue to bed. If you want really nice picture quality, pick up one of Sony's new Hi-Def HD camcorders. Mmmmmm...might set you back about $1200.People have complained about the mod file. Idiots. Thats all I got to say. The included software converts it to Mpeg2 for you. Duh!?! In no time I had my 'test video' shot, downloaded, converted, and edited using windows movie maker. Please keeep in mind that this is the FIRST CAMCORDER I'VE EVER BOUGHT. THIS IS THE FIRST TIME I'VE EDITED VIDEO ON MY COMPUTER!Also, Format the hard drive before you begin to record. Some people complained that picture quality was worse than that of a web cam. Through my countless hours of searching for the "truth", I came to the conclusion that this may be why. They don't even mention that until page 39 of the manual.One of the most frustating things I've done in my life was research and read reviews for camcorders. Geez, what a can of worm that was. I'm trying to make this as blunt as possible for the next guy who reads this shopping for a camcorder so he doesn't get stuck on the internet every night for a week and a half trying to find out the truth about this thing. "Don't listen to the complainers. They didn't know what they were doing". IT'S A BUDGET HD CAMCORDER!So far I'm very pleased with this product and The quality thus far is more than exceptable for my needs.For the record I'm a Lighting Technician/Designer for an Audio/Visual Company with some knowledge of video technology, but have limited hands-on camera experience</review_text>
This is my first time to buy things online, but I think that's great.It's very easy to use, and very light.I think I like it</review_text>
Since I really only have a few small gripes, I'll list them first! The indoor quality isn't great-- even with the 'fix' listed below-- the colors are mostly washed out so the picture looks nearly black and white, and depending on how much light is available when you adjust the white balance, it can almost take on a sepia tone appearance. Also, in low-light situations, the camera seems to 'search' for something to focus on, causing the subject to blur in and out over and over. Other than that, I've been very happy with my purchase. I did a lot of online searching thru models here at Amazon, and read tons of reviews for many different cameras, and this one seemed to have the MOST positive feedback.The pros:Excellent outdoor and daytime (well lit) indoor shooting.Amazingly smooth zoom! Even at 32X the detail is amazing!Very easy to use out of the box, easy to understand menu!Excellent design, great attention to detail!Very small and light!Love the 20 Gigabyte HDD memory!Very easy PC interface, quick transfer of files.Power Producer works as easily as Windows Movie Maker.Packed with features I haven't even discovered yet!Needless to say, I really am not disappointed with my purchase. Anyone who thinks they should be able to get feature-film quality from a small, compact camcorder for less than $500 is disillusioned and naive!</review_text>
I have been using this camera for about 2 months, taking it on a cruise as well as filming a couple college choir concerts.  All went well, exceeded my expectations, based on other reviews I read.  The only problem I have seen is with lowlight indoor filming, however the fix I came across supposedly works, but I have not had a chance to try it yet (see fix at end of review).  The 20gb drive was plentry for me, cpaturing several hours of HD quality film, still with plenty of drive space remaining.  I have had very few problems with the software, the ones I did have are more around lack of a manual, but have figured out thru trial and error.  Overall, I would highly recommend this product to anyone interested in a new camera.  Plus you can stop buying tapes.Lowlight Fix (note I do not take credit for this, found it on the web but do not remember where).  Here is the text exactly as I found it, including the comments at the end.How I get good low-light/indoors video (do the following steps indoors with the camera in capture mode):1) Disable the "Gain Up" feature (major contributor to the grainy low-light video)2) Turn on "Manual" mode (via AUTO button)3) Go to the manual control menu (down on the 'stick')4) Set AE to '+2'5) Highlight 'MWB' in the WB menu, point the camera at a sheet of paper (position the camera so the sheet of paper fills the view of the camera) and press and hold the middle of the 'stick' until 'MWB' stops blinking (about 5-10 seconds).6) Set S.sp. to 1/607) Press down on the 'stick' to exit the manual control menuAfter doing this, my indoors video quality is MUCH better (no more noise/grainy video). The settings will be saved, even if the battery is removed or depleted; they will return even if you switch to AUTO mode then back to MANUAL.</review_text>
This camcorder is great!  It is small, and very light.  It is easy to use.  The only thing I don't like is that the extended battery sticks out from the back of the camera so far.  Even the battery that it came with looks too big.</review_text>
The Everio GZMG27 HDD Camcorder is a wonderful camcorder with lots of handy features at a value price.  Although the battery that comes with the camcorder has a limited life, I didn't feel that this was a huge drawback since I always like to buy a spare anyway.  The 20 GB capacity seems to be more than adequate and it is easy to transfer to other storage media.  The zoom feature is powerful enough to bring out the flaws on the face of a Hollywood star and the Automatic shooting mode allows you to start taking good videos straight from the box</review_text>
I got this wide angle lens for my Sony DCR-HC96.It fit great (as it says, it's 30mm).I've had wide angle lenses in the past which created distortion in the corners of the frame - that's not the case with this lens as far as I can see.  I'm happy with the picture quality.If you intend to film indoors, my advice is definitely get a wide angle lens.  For about $30 it's well worth it.</review_text>
I have a Sony HD camera and do professional work with it here and there but I would not be able to do it wihout a wide angel lens.  There is so much a 30 mm lens can do and this lens explands the possibilities 100fold.  Next time though, I'll buy the high grade lens.  This thing is not going to last much</review_text>
This wide angle lens works better than I expected.  I bought this for my Sony HC-96.  It increases the field by about 30%.  I was able to sit in the front row of a children's musical and still fit all the kids on the stage in the frame.  I had expected edge distortion but it's not that noticeable unless you carefully look for it.  I suspect that it interferes with autofocus at times during zooming as the focus seems to fluctuate a little bit on high zoom.  It's useful in tight quarters when you need a wide angle shot</review_text>
The sony wide angle works as advertised.  I am very happy with it.</review_text>
I have only use a few times, but for the price it does a great job</review_text>
The product description says to match Sony DCR-DVD105, which is completly FALSE. I just got the len and is worthless</review_text>
Lens was exactly what I was looking for in a wide angle lens for my Sony Mavica Digital Camera. It adds just enough width to take family photos without having to back up too far.  Great for travel landscape photos. Lens is easy to use and not too cumbersome</review_text>
This is a great lens. Sharp as a tack. Big but not heavy. It's a Kodak, that says it all.</review_text>
this lense does everything i had expected,  the clarity is amazing and amazon's  price is considerably less than other competitors and the shipping time around the holidays was wonderful.  i paid for two days and got it in 2 days!!!!    over-all amazing product!!!!  buy i</review_text>
Works very well with my Z612 Kodak.  Not sure about the technical terms but field of view is noticeably increased with little, if any, distortion.  As with the telephoto, images are sharp and bright.  Quality lens.</review_text>
I am pleased with the purchase of the wide angle lens for my Kodak DX-7590 digital camera.  BUT! I am disappointment that the lens can not be used with the cameras built-in flash it, produces a shadow.  Kodak does not offer an external flash for the DX7590</review_text>
This lens work very well with the camera</review_text>
I ourchased this lens for my P850 Kodak camera to expand my wide-angle viewing options. I have had other Kodak lenses for an eariler camera, and was very happy with them. While not a fisheye lens (and therefore not allowing for fisheye effects), the lens definitely increases the field of view dramatically. Pictures taken with the lens are very sharp with no distortion, as sometimes happens with accessory lenses. The only issue I have had is the lens does add weight and bulk to the camera while in use, but it is well worth it for wide shots</review_text>
When you buy a product that is designed and meant to fulfill certain needs, just expect the best performance out of those features.The PC55 is a camera for the everyday home shooter, easy to use and made with the best SONY quality for one of the smallest MINI DV camera ever created.If you are thinking about buying this camera don't hesitate one minute, this camcorder is one of the kind, it gives you pretty much the flexibility and video quality of a regular camcorder but with the amazing bring-it-in-the-pocket size and all the coolness and attention that it brings along (let it be your best Ice breaker, believe me it works like heaven!). I work for a camera store and let me tell you: we haven't received one return of this model during the time I've worked there (8 months), which proves the high quality SONY has built into this model. I have been using mine for a few months now and all I can say is that "the product is great... period!".Let's get real, the 500 bucks you are paying for it is not for the film quality kind of movie you get in the picture (for that you need to spend at least a couple of thousand dollars) but the portability and worriless of no need of the big luggage a camcorder used to be in the past" (some times people don't realize a motorcycle couldn't be compared with a truck or vise versa).About the picture shooting option, well let's see! A camcorder is for videos and a digital camera is for photos, if you want to have them both in one package, that brings excellent quality, you'd have to spend a lot of more money than if you bought them separately, let me explain you in a few words, the average photo quality for a MINI DV camcorder is 1.3mp or lower (the same quality you get out of your cell phone camera)  to be honest with you, the manufacturers add this option just to give it an extra feature and at the same time take more money out of your pocket, with tape less digital cameras it happens the same way, the video and sound quality are very poor; so why bother paying more for a camera with both functions being excellent (there are quite a few out in the market now, starting around $1200 for models of similar size) instead buy two little cameras, one for each use, for half of the price.If you are looking for a cool, high quality & durability MINI DV camcorder with the smallest size available in its kind, The SONY DCR-PC55 is your BEST option.To finish, I just want to wish you all enjoy, more than the product, the unmemorable moments you will live with your loved ones because of this little fellow</review_text>
The camera is one of the best considering the price and the size of it. The only problem I found is that it has not a light, so you will need to buy the external one, if not all the shots that you do at night will be very dark</review_text>
I have own this camcorder for 6 monthit's a good camcorder, esay to use, easy to bringAs it's design purpose, PC-55 is enough for home useOnly one thing I want to mention here, before I buy this camcorder, I thought that I can record video on MS duo in mepg format, and it's easy for post-edit on PC, you know, tansfer a MiniDV tape to computer may need a huge space to save.However, when I replay the video which stored on MS, the sreen was full of mosaicfortunately, when use DV type to record, this situation never happens. good quality.The one press photo button also becomes useless because the bad quality</review_text>
If you want to capture every precious moments, this is the right camcorder for you. It's easy to operate and the video is crisp and clear. The sound is pretty good as well. You can also take still picture and video at the same time (thanks to the memory stick).Don't burn your video using your computer, it took me time to download to a CD or DVD. Instead burn them as you watch them. It's quicker that way.You will love it the first time you use it</review_text>
I've had this camcorder for a week now and I think it works great .. except for the touch screen feature. That takes a little getting used to .. especially when accessing the special features (such as fader effects) while filming.The digital still quality is poor when recording directly to the memory stick .. but the same images taken as a still from prerecorded tape is much clearer.All in all it is a good product .. just takes some getting used to</review_text>
Had this camcorder for few months now and it has been put to a lot of use. Compact, light, and easy to carry around. Tons of features which takes getting use to since most of it is touch screen.  Battery life is pretty good. Video quality is excellent as well. Very happy with the purchase, and I have had no problems so far</review_text>
goo</review_text>
Pros: Compact, lightweight, portability, easy to use, big screen, good reproductionCons: Microphone sensitive to wind, getting used to not having a viewfinder, bad low light performance.Summary: I picked this camera as an upgrade for my old Canon ZR10. The first reason I chose it was the small size and portability. With a good light conditions, this little beast do its best shots, but in low light conditions this camera disapointed me (specially compared with mi old ZR10). Please don't buy it if you have plans to use it for stills shots because it has a low resolution.The included handycam station have all the ports (Firewire, USB, power, video) you need to conect it.The big touch screen is a must, because the screen is the only way to access the camera controls (besides some of them in the edge of the screen).You can have a camera with more characteristics and better image quality for the same price, but if your concern is the size and portability this will be your best choice in the world of the mini DV format</review_text>
the camera is good in many perspective.. one is that it offers... a very clean cut design.. Everything works out of the box.. just pop in the battery and the memory and turn it on, press the button to take the photograph. However, the quality of the zoom is a little bit blurry.. And there is no image stabilizations.. I tried taking pictures while i was hiking up the mountain... all the images came out with motion blur.Those images that you take when standing still and not walking.. its' quality came out great. Good pixel quality.I didn't like the silver skin on the camera so much. I am a big fan of the color black.. And now that canon came out with powershot a640 (in black).. [...</review_text>
HiI bought this camera after having the powershot A80, which unfortunatley got stolen. I loved th powershot A80, and this camera, being the younger successor to the A80 is also a good camera. It is fast, has good picture quality, the battery life is great and it is a really good camera if you are new to getting into phtoography and want to learn a little more about shutter speed and aperture.One of my only gripes is that it doesn't seem that great in low light. It always moans at me about taking a potentially unsteady shot when the light is low, and I don't remember the A80 ever being that fussy. But I think it is down to cramming 7 MP into the same sensor size as the 4 MP of the A80, so each pixel becomes smaller, and therefore less sensitive to light.I have taken some really great photos with this camera, and would only replace it by moving up to a digital SLR, however I would still use it as an everyday carry around camera.It's metal frame construction makes it quite robust too. I have dropped it on many occasions, once on a solid stone floor, from 6 feet, and aside from a little dent in the casing, it worked fine.I recommend it</review_text>
I am a advanced amateur photographer. Love this camera for the results it has to offer for the price. Very impressed by the results. Brought Nikons, returned it. With 4 NiMH rechargable batteries, it will run for weeks and takes a good amount of time to get drained. I dont use LCD to review my pictures till i complete the shoot for the day. Normally i shoot with Canon 10D DSLR. I carry Canon A620 all the time for Emergency situations. Love the self-timer, other manual options, colors mode .. etc. Its a really playful camera with truly great results. I always shoot with ISO-50 to keep the image noise low. So, I will recommend the same. Video shoot and output is ok. You cannot zoom while shooting the video though. This camera is really tough and My kid dumped it several times on the ground and I have not seen any problem</review_text>
When I bought this camera I had no idea of the potential that this little powerhouse would bring. I took this to Italy on a trip with my dad and proceeded to take 800 pictures. Along my two weeks journey through Rome, Venice, Florence, and southern Italy, I slowly learned the many features and settings that this camera has to offer.People were amazed by the clarity, and how professional each picture looks.This is the camera to have!Stephen John BecciaAuthor of The Treelanders--Journey to the Giants</review_text>
This camera is great for our use -- I wanted a high megapixel camera so I could blow up pictures and frame them, and that's exactly what I got.  I love the option of being able to turn the viewfinder so it doesn't get scratched, but sometimes the digital options are a bit difficult to figure out (i.e. changing the mode, changing the flash).  Once you get it, it is easy to get back, though!We recommend this if you want a heavy duty camera - it isn't tiny, but it fits in my purse and best of all doesn't break at the first drop! :-)</review_text>
I think Canon makes some of the best cameras on the market today that are also pretty affordable.  I am really impressed with the excellent quality of photos taken with this camera.  It takes such vivid and clear pictures with excellent color reproduction.  I rarely have to edit any of pics I take unless it has to do with cropping or zooming.  I am very happy with this model.  I'd say the only minor "complaint" I would have is that it is a bit heavy with the 4 AA batteries intalled and I've dropped it a couple of times when I felt like I didn't have a "good" grasp on it.  The swivel LCD doesn't close totally flat anymore but it still works and produces excellent quality pics.</review_text>
I'm not a professional photographer or even a serious amateur, though I do take thousands of photos.  I bought the A620 about 8 months ago because I wanted something small but good to go along with my much larger new Nikon D50.  Both cameras were replacing an old 3 MP Fujifilm and a Minolta film SLR.  We took the A620 and the D50 on a major trip to the Canadian Rockies and several U.S. national parks.  The D50 was my "default" camera on the trip--frankly, I was afraid to "risk" the shots on the A620, especially since there were many times when I needed a wider-angle lens than the A620 provides.  Then, one afternoon, at the top of a mountain in Jasper with a spectacular panoramic view, the D50's battery ran down.  I was crestfallen, forced to use the A620.  For the rest of the afternoon, I worried and fretted about how one of the major highlights of our trip wouldn't be captured as well by the A620.  Well, to make a long story short, several weeks later I uploaded all our photos from the D50 and A620, and the ones from the A620 at the top of that mountain were better!  I was amazed--nicer color, sharper, just plain better!  Now I totally trust the A620 and actually use it far more than the D50 because it's a lot easier to take along.  I still prefer the D50 for indoor flash shots--there's a lot of red-eye with the A620--but I have to say, if I'd bought the A620 before the D50 and given it a good test run, I don't think I would have bought the D50, even though I really like it.  Sometimes portability is much more important than you think it's going to be.  I got the A620 brand new for under $200--it was a great deal and is a great camera.  I think it's especially good for people like me who aren't likely to delve into all the intricacies of settings, etc., but still take a lot of photos and want them to look great.  From what I've read of other reviews, though, both here and on other sites, this is a very nice camera for more advanced photographers as well.  Good job, Canon!  Next on my wishlist:  something similar to this camera but with a wider-angle lens and longer telephoto...and, of course, less red-eye with flash!</review_text>
I looked at three different digital cameras thoroughly, and this is the one I eventually chose. I'm glad I did. It takes very good pictures, and the settings are a lot of fun to mess with.Pros:color choice: For those of you without the money to buy Adobe Photoshop, this lets you pick a color and the picture only shows that color. It's really amazing, and a lot of fun to use for effects.manual: it's got manual settings (along with some others) for those of us who know how to use them and want a little more out of a digital camera without buying an SLR.Sturdy: In my opinion, it's a good camera; won't break easily. My dad dropped my first one onto concrete and the only thing that broke was the flash (yeah, that's pretty important, but if you keep the camera in a case, unlike I did, you'll be fine). I'm also not afraid to move the flip screen a lot; it doesn't feel like it will fall off.7.1 MP: this is awesome. I can zoom in a ton on my computer, even if I can't with my camera. I get a ton of detail and can pick out what I want, even if it's really far away. I took some pictures of tigers at the zoo and I could zoom in so much I could see their fur. It was awesome.Automatic settings: If, like me at first, you dont' know how to use all those crazy manual settings, there's a ton of other settings to pick from that you can use for pretty much anything. It makes it really easy for quick shots, no matter the conditions.Cons:No movement: If I try to take a picture of something moving fast, most of the time it's blurry on the auto settings. I have to go to manual settings, and if the lighting is crappy, don't even try it. The shorter you make the shutter speed, the less light gets in.Focus: because it's digital, you can't focus on your own, and the camera just picks something it thinks is most important. There's tricks to get it to focus on what you want, but it's a little hard.Weight: It's a little heavy, but it's worth it. It takes four AA batteries, but if you get rechargables, you're fine.I haven't owned any other cameras, at least, this was my first digital, besides the family one, so I'm not as knowledgable as some others, but I've had it for quite a long time, so I've gotten used to it. It's a good camera, definitely worth the money</review_text>
Love it. had it for several months now and have yet to find something wrong with it. If you've owned a digital camera before, there absolutely no learning curve what so ever.Just follow your guts and you'll find the function you want.But all the frequently used ones are right there at your finger tips.I personally love the custom timer function that allows you to set a delay up to 30" and take up to 10 pictures! You never have to go back and forth...Use Energizer e2 Lithium batteries and you'll be wondering if you have the camera in your hands as it becomes soooo light</review_text>
Hey I think that this case does it's job and isn't too bulky. I can store extra memory cards in there as well as extra batteries. If you have a  DSCS40/S60/S90/S600 Digital Camera, then I think this would work well to protect your investment!</review_text>
This is a nicely padded case with a separate front pouch that will easily hold a couple of batteries and a memory stick if you need it to.  It fits my DSC-W100 (3.75 x 2.5 x 1 inch, "excluding protrusions") fairly loosely.  Both pouches have high-quality double zippers.The case is too bulky for most pockets.  I have a separate leather case that fits snug enough for that, but the leather case has absolutely no room for accessories.  I can fit the camera in the leather case inside the main pouch, although it's a squeeze.This case has a belt loop and a clip for a strap, but no strap.  If you just want a hand strap, you can thread your camera's own strap out between the double zippers and through the clip.  That arrangement will allow you to take the camera out and free it up very quickly.  I wouldn't want to carry the case with a strap over my shoulder -- for me, it's too small for that, even in the case.This is the perfect case for me to keep the essential camera items together, whether in a drawer, in a travel bag, or in a car.  It feels very rugged, like ballistic nylon.  Again, my only reservation is that it's too bulky for a pocket with the possible exception of a winter coat pocket.  It's a high quality case, relatively expensive, but worth the money</review_text>
The case is great, but as someone else mentioned there is no strap.  That is big draw back when carrying the camera</review_text>
My camera (DSC-W100), batteries, and memory stick pro duo all fit nicely, neatly, and snuggly in this compact case.  The only drawback is that it doesn't come with a strap to carry on the shoulder or wrap around the wrist; instead it has a loop for your belt and a clip for a strap (not included)</review_text>
I just purchased the Sony DSC-S600 Camera and happened to stumble across this special case made for that model.  I just wanted to say I luv it! Its cute in size, real soft inside, zips very easily and has a front pocket to hold you memory chip or even batteries. Camera fits real nice inside as well. Only thing I wish it had is a strap...with this case your more going to be carrying it in your hand if you dont mind that, but you can however hook it to your belt.</review_text>
Its great for the camera DSC-W7 and other from this series since it's small and stylish. Besides it doent have "Sony" writen on it, just a Cyber-shot logo. It also have a small secon pocket for storage of adicional batteries and memory sticks. My only complain is that this second pocket is not big enough to keep also my A/V and USB cables</review_text>
I just needed a case for my camera (S90), and I wasn't going to pay  40-60 dollars for some leather case. The inside of the case feels like a blanket, except it happens to be paddded. It won't stop a stampede, but any common bumps (inside the car/bag) should cause no problems. The front pocket has a netted sleeve, kind of like the ones behind car seats to keep magazines, etc. It's good because it keeps your batteries and memory from moving around too much. My camera is pretty sturdy itself, but I was getting tired of it flying around in my car unprotected. No worries now, and I get to carry an extra pair of batteries with me in a convenient place. I give it 4 stars simply because it does its job, it's a case, it protects my camera. If it had some ridiculous padding that would allow me to throw the camera around and not worry, then I would give it 5 stars. If you don't need a case with diamonds on it, this is a fine buy</review_text>
Having just purchased a new digital camera I needed something to keep it safe. My camera fits inside this perfectly. It has a belt loop in case you want to carry it around that way. The zipper handles have the Sony logo on them. A very sturdy, well-made case, though I would like to have seen the inner linings a little better suited to protect against inclement weather just in case. Other than that, this is a terrific accessory for your Sony camera</review_text>
This camera takes virtually worthless pictures and the camera settings are very difficult to change/adjust.  The included instructions are a joke.  Save you money to buy something else</review_text>
my twins both rec'd these cameras.  They can take the camera with them to school trips or on vacation. They even took pictures at their own bday parties.  Plug the camera into the computer and play with great borders.  The twins are having so much fun with them.</review_text>
This is the second time I bought this item, has a great quality is not too big. Good one</review_text>
I purchased this cable to use with my iPod, after learning that Apple had simply switched the leads when they manufactured their own "iPod AV cable." They did that to trick people into purchasing their own AV cables. At any rate, this AV cable by Sony is higher quality than iPod's, has good length, and works with iPods (and various other video products I'm sure). For the iPod, simply plug the red plug into the video port on your TV and the yellow plug in the red port on your TV</review_text>
Enables the Sony Vaio notebook to output Stereo Audio and Composite Video to RCA plugs for input to Television and stereo amp. Works just as advertised</review_text>
It is a good case and the extra battery is very usefull on trips or events</review_text>
I received a new Nikon Coolpix 4800 camera for Christmas and decided that the camera case was an absolute must.  The case is very durable (and fits the camera like a glove).  They even sent an additional battery with purchase and made this already great deal, a super value as well.  This is a Highly Recommended Purchase</review_text>
I must agree with the others who have reviewed this item - it's perfect. I knew I would be receiving the Coolpix 4800 for Christmas, so I looked around online for a camera case. My search took me to Amazon and this wonderful camera case/battery combination. The camera fits in the case nice and snug, and you can carry your spare battery in the zippered pouch located in the front of the case. There is also enough space in the zippered pouch for an extra memory card (in it's plastic container), but the fit is a bit tight.In conclusion, I feel that the Nikon Coolpix 4800 Case & Battery Kit is one of the best purchases I made at Amazon in the past year</review_text>
very nice camera case, and the battery was an added bonus. all for half the price a battery would cost.now my camera has a safe home and i'll never run out of power on my adventures....!!</review_text>
If you own the Nikon Coolpix 4800, this kit is a great buy. You get an extra battery, which you should have anyway, and the case that fits the camera, for close to the price of the battery. This case is perfect for the camera. I got this kit with the camera and went for a 2 month trip with it all. I had room for the spare battery and a spare memory card in the front pocket and enough room in the main pocket for both the camera and battery. I needed to remove the battery because it does not last in the camera, but with this case, that was never a big issue. Also, the case has an easily adjustable strap that allows you to carry it easily. All in all, if you have the camera, in my opinion, this kit is necessary</review_text>
This isn't a professional camera but for snapshots, its a dream! Its very easy to use if you handle the camera like any 10 year old would. (Just start hitting buttons, till you've figured out how it works.)My only issue is taking pictures of trees and flowers. There is a setting for this scene, but no matter what I do, the shots come out almost unreal looking. Pictures of people come out great! :)The software is useless unless you have Windows 98, but the camera itself works without the software on any higher programs like XP.I was hoping to make larger prints from this camera, but I'm beginning to think its not going to produce anything larger than an 8 1/2 x 11. I think its partly the fault of digital printers thoough</review_text>
I bought this camera for my boyfriend for his birthday in February (2007) on the condition that I could take it with me to Florida for my week of vacation in March.  I love this camera!  I also brought my 4 year old ($500) Sony digital camera, and used both throughout the entire week.  My photos from both cameras were awesome, and I was very surprised to note that the photos taken with the Casio were somewhat better than my more expensive Sony.  I'm sure some has to do with the technology (being that my Sony is much older) but I think a lot has to do with the Casio just being a great little camera.  The BEST SHOT feature is awesome and takes the guesswork out of changing environments.  I used the SCENERY choice the most, but also used FLOWER (for closeups of flowers and other things) and the PORTRAIT choice for pics of my friends and family.  I also took some pictures on the regular AUTO setting, which also came out great.  I loved how fast this camera is - I was on a boat ride and dolphins began jumping through the boat's wake and in one fluid motion I grabbed the Casio, hit the ON button as I swung my arm over the side of the boat and instantly clicked the shutter button - I got an incredible shot of the dolphin jumping through the air!  All of that occurred in the time it would have taken my old Sony just to turn on.  I never would have gotten that shot with the Sony.  I highly recommend this camera!!!  And it's so small it fits in a shirt pocket.  A definite plus</review_text>
I purchased this camera for the pocket size and the great reviews.  I remember seeing a movie (can't remember which) where the hero hands a gun to the heroine and she says she doesn't know how to use a gun.  "Point it at the thing you want to kill", he says.OK, so I can point this camera at the thing I want to take a picture of, but what are all the icons on the screen?  A User Manual does not come with the camera (only a quick reference), so I go to the Casio website and download the 250+ page manual.  I am a technophile, so it's entertaining to me to explore the features of this camera, but I've had it almost 2 months and I still don't know many of the major features.  WIth time and study, I'm sure I'll finally understand my Casio Exilim</review_text>
This is a great camera for people like me who mainly just want to point and shoot and not deal with too many settings.  I was even able to teach my mother-in-law how to use the one we got them (she's a little technologically challenged).  There are a bunch of different "best shot" settings that are easy to use, but honestly most of my pictures have turned out best using just "snapshot" or auto mode, regardless of the environment/time of day, etc.  It would be nice if you could charge the battery just by plugging in the camera, but I guess you have to pay a little more for that feature.  The photo software that comes with it is not good, but there are plenty of other things you can use out there for free</review_text>
I've had this camera for a little over a week now (I know its not that long) and its been everything I hoped for.  I took it out on a day trip and snapped 80 photos, loaded  them on the computer and they were amazing, better than most of the pictures my friend's cameras take.  It's small and pocket size and takes great photos, what more could you ask for at that price</review_text>
I got this camera to replace a 3.2 MP Nikon Coolpix... and it instantly gave me a wow effect. The camera is so thin, it fits comfortably in your pocket to go anywhere. And the screen is beyond huge (my Nikon only had a 1.3 inch screen, so this is a major upgrade). The only disappointment would be the actual "resolution" of the image. I mean... the picture files themselves don't seem to be able to be zoomed in on the computer as much as I was expecting without becoming pixilated. But I guess maybe that's how it's supposed to be, 6 MP doesn't mean you can zoom and crop for eternity? Either case, I soon got over that... because the pictures always turn out great. Colors are accurate, pictures are VERY clear, even in a variety of situations, and the Best Shot modes are actually useful, unlike on my Nikon in which they didn't help very much. Also I must say that this camera is very fast at taking pictures, starting up, and recovering from the flash going off. Which is great. It's so annoying when you have to stand and wait with the "black screen" while the flash reloads or something. Finally, I will say that the included rechargeable battery is AWESOME! It lasts for... almost eternity. You can take hundreds of pictures on one charge... so great! Previously, I would always need to have spare AA batteries along, but not anymore! This camera will fulfill the needs of any normal person who isn't expecting an SLR-camera. I would recommend it to anyone. Before purchasing this camera, I put a lot of research into it's competitors. I say: Buy this one. It's great</review_text>
I bought this camera as a gift for my 15 year old daugheter.  She loves it for many reasons.  It's so slim, she can put it in her back pocket and take it anywhere.  It's easy to use and she has gotten a lot of great shots with it.  She doesn't print out many of her photos, but emails them back and forth with her friends.  Her best friend has a canon elph and the pictures don't look any better than the shots my daughter takes with her new Casio.  The only problem we have ever had with it is one time the lens wouldn't close when she turned it off.  We had to take the batteries out and them put them back in.  Then it worked fine.  This only happened one time and she's had the camera for about two months now and uses it pretty often.  I think this is a great little camera.  It takes a nice picture and wasn't too expensive</review_text>
I normally prefer purchasing a Canon or Sony when I shop around for cameras.  I bought this Casio primarily for gifting to a relative (a novice photographer), so I did not worry about reviews on barrel distortion that I came across in many forums.  For the price I paid, I am happy with the product.  The form factor is excellent and the 3X Optical Zoom is decent.  The barrel distortion was plainly visible in many photos, which is the reason I believe this camera was phased out for the more expensive Z7x series.  Other than the barrel distortion, I am quite happy about the product in itself</review_text>
Arrived quickly.  Vendor was willing to ship to APO address, which I appreciated.  Item worked perfectly</review_text>
Sorry it has taken so long to give a review. I received my package on time and just the way the seller said it would come in. I was very pleased with my purchase and I would buy from them again</review_text>
perfect cables for perfect price.  same cable @ WorstBuy $30 got it here for less than $2.  Works perfectl</review_text>
Price is right, came very quickly, in great shape, exactly what I needed. Don't let the review of someone who didn't check what they needed first dissuade you.  I used this for my Kodak EasyShare DX7630. Perfect</review_text>
This cable works great.  I found the same cable at other places for 4 times the price... Highly recommend</review_text>
When I searched to purchase this my friend Charlie recommended it too, so I knew it would be great.  You don't have to worry about constantly changing the battery.  Also, this is the perfect time to buy it so you don't have get the one battery can work on every camera.Bob</review_text>
I recently bought a Canon S3 IS camera and was pleased to note that it uses AA batteries rather than the costly rechargeable batteries I had in my Canon G2 (about $50 per).  I didn't however want to go to the expense and bother of constantly having to replace AA batteries.  I was delighted to find this rechargeable option and purchased.  To date, it works great.  I can use rechargeable batteries most of the time and have non-rechargeable batteries for emergencies (e.g., trips)  Great find and purchase.  Good valu</review_text>
it's everything they said it was.  compact light and a blinking light to tell when it's chargedpaul</review_text>
I have noticed an over all performance upgrade in my Canon A630 since purchasing these batteries. They last a long time and the Camera operates faster all together. The lag time has reduced in between photos trememndously</review_text>
I went with the Canon batteries & charger to avoid any problems with the Canon digital camera they are used for. Whenever I've used rechargeable batteries in an electronic device, they never seem to last long enough. So for the camera, I went with the same brand batteries. I've taken probably 100 photos, use the flash and zoom often, and had the camera on for almost two hours straight in a photography class and the batteries still don't show any loss of power with respect to the camera's battery status indicator. And since this kit comes with 4 batteries, I always have 2 charged spares. Maybe cheaper rechargeables would work, but it wasn't worth the risk and hassle if they failed right when I needed them</review_text>
I simply love this camera.  I have been using for over 1 year now with no issues or problems.  However, you must learn to use the functions properly for optimum photo quality. Auto setting are great. Many of my photos look like professional portraits.  Everywhere I go people want to check it out.  Wouldn't trade for another. And I paid a high price when it first came out.  So at today's prices it is WELL WORTH the money</review_text>
I had a Nikon Coolpix which was small but too big to shove into my pocket so I bought the Sony.  I love that it's small, had to get used to making sure my fingers were not within the lense view.  Extra battery and memory sticks will run up the cost (but that goes for any digital camera).  It's easy to use since I'm not much of one for reading the instruction books yet have been able to figure things out fairly easily.  I don't do movies so can't comment on that but straight photos turn out really well (which surprises me since I've always been a really lousy photographer).  I like that I can carry it with me all the time, which I do.  I do wrap the whole camera in a small cloth envelope so the LCD doesn't get scratched up.  And I added a neck lanyard usually used for a computer flash key so I can wear the camera around my neck or wrap the strap around my hands just in case it slips out of my fingers--camera is so lightweight.  The only complaint I have is that the shutter door, which slides effortlessly to turn on the camera, slides effortlessly even when you don't want it to.  I've used up the battery many times while the camera was sitting in my pocket (so I always carry an extra battery with me).  And extra plus is loading the pics onto the computer is a breeze (no extra software needed, just the cable that comes with the camera).  There is still a slight delay between depressing the button to take a picture and when the camera actually takes the picture but it's not as bad as the Nikon.  I assume the newer versions of this camera have only gotten better.  Well worth the money (I just wish I could lock the shutter cover)</review_text>
It's everything i expected, works great and Amazon's partner service was very goo</review_text>
NO WORDS FOR THIS ITEM, THIS IS THE BEST CAMERA I EVER BOUGHT, THE PROGRAMS TO DOWNLOW THE PICTURES ITS FENOMENAL, IF YOU HAVE THE OPORTUNITIES GO FOR IT, BUYIT</review_text>
My Grandparents have one and love it. Its very easy to work. Takes great pics. Its also easy to share your pics on the TV.They love it I love it.</review_text>
This is a nice accessory kit and considerably less expensive than buying all of the components separately. If you want an Olympus-branded battery you can't go wrong here because they throw in the neck strap and case and still it is cheaper than buying the batter alone</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras and this tops them all!!!!  Everything they say about it, is true.  I love not even having to think about batteries, I didn't believe what people said about the battery life, and I was just happy I didn't need to think about batteries, but I just got married and my 13 year old daughter took more than 100 pictures with this camera and her pictures are almost as good as the photographer I hired and yes the camera battery lasted all day and thru the next 4 days on our honeymoon with another 200 pictures taken, no low battery light!!!!!  I even going to buy my parents one.  Also, one more note I love how fast you can take pictures, no wait 4 seconds between shots.  I had a Kodak digital before only 1 1/2 years old and hated it, I hated the download procedure, it didn't put your pictures onto your hard drive, but in it's own little cubbyhole and trying to attach them to your email was absolutely a nightmare, you'd have to identify the picture copy it to your desktop, remember what you called it and then attach it your email.  This is the main reason why I purchased this camera.  I will never own anything else, especially a Kodak.</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras, of many brands but I must say that the Casio Exilim EX-Z600BK is one of the best ultra digital cameras on the market.Pros:Fast OperationBig, Bright LCDGreat BodyNice PicturesCons:No ViewfinderNo Manual ControlsAdditional Comments:LookRating:The camera looks as it is on the online images. Its a nice dark, glossy black but doesn't smudge or keep finger prints easily.SizeRating: 5/5Its very tiny. You can hide it by clasping of your hands.FeelRating: 5/5Its has a great feel. The buttons are small but not awkward.  Its light too. You can hardly feel it in yout pocket but its balanced and comfortable to hold.This camera is practically perfect. This is an honest review. Its a great value for the money. I recommend it.</review_text>
In Special for Latin American People: Soy de Venezuela y tuve el inmenso placer de comprar esta camara las pasadas navidades, a traves de mi tarjeta de credito y un currier que me llevo la camara hasta la puerta de mi casa en Valencia Venezuela, supero todas mis expectativas en cuanto a calidad y precio, cuenta con Garantia Internacional, una Bateria recargable que realmente es duradera, la calidad de las fotos impresas es realmente extraordinaria, y cuenta con un sinfin de opciones que hacen de la Exilin EX-Z600 una excelente selccion, la recomiendo a cualquiera con los ojos cerrados y digan Whisky!!!!!</review_text>
My husband purchased this camera for me for my birthday last year.  His Aunt and Uncle had one and we thought it was simply amazing.  Since our purchase, we've help several of our friends and family members buy the same camera through Amazon. Actually, we've bought 4 other ones besides the one that my husband bought me for my birthday.  I highly recommend this camera to everyone.  It's small, has many neat features, and the quality of the pictures is the best I've ever seen from any digital camera.  Don't just take my word for it, buy one and see for yourself.  It's very affordable.(best feature</review_text>
I chose this Casio because of the price, good shot-to-shot speed, and most important for me was the charging cradle and battery life.  I got so tired of running out of battery in the middle of the day.  All cameras should having charging cradle, just like your cordless telephones</review_text>
For years now I have been buying "bargain" cameras with the foolish notion that I did not need a nice one. Finally, I got sick of it and bought the Exilim EX-Z600. This camera is awesome. The screen is huge, the picture quality is great, it is easy to use and is sooo small. Overall, a great buy.The one downside is that I can only connect it to my computer using the dock. Luckily, I have an SD card reader, so I normally just use that to download my pictures</review_text>
I did a LOT of research about digital cameras before making a purchase.  Probably 50 hours on [...] and [...] and price checks on 10 different websites and asked everyone I knew what they liked and didn't like about their cameras.  I AM SO HAPPY I PICKED THIS ONE.  It is very lightweight yet durable, sleek and attractive if that's what you want.  The large viewfinder is a great asset.  Great zoom capabilities although I will say the picture quality (on the screen, anyway) is somewhat compromised (gets a little grainy) on the max zoom.  I will probably only use 6 or 7 of the "Best Shot" modes on a regular basis but it's fun to experiment with them all.  VERY LONG battery life.  I took this camera on a 7-night cruise and didn't have to recharge it at all.  I have 2 friends who are ready to buy new cameras and they are going to get this one</review_text>
I purchased the camera after my old one (casio EX Z-40) was broken and since I loved my old one very much I was concerned if the new one would be as good as the old one was.It is 10.000 times better!The automatic mode helps unexperienced photographers to take great pictures. But by using the individual modes and settings the results are even better. I tested the camera in any situation during a 6000 mile roadtrip across the American West and it did not disappoint me at all.The only thing that is a bit annoying is that everytime you switch the camera on it will automatically go to the snapshot mode and you have to switch through the different modes again to adjust the settings that you need. But surely there is a way to figure out how to avoid that, I'm probably just not patient enough to find out how since all the other models of casio cameras that I have tested do not show this problem.Overall, I can highly recommend the camera for all types of photographers!</review_text>
I love just about everything about this camera.  It's nice and small, it's easy to use, it takes nice photos.  But, I haven't figured out yet how to get good night photos, 'though, I've used "Best Shots" (a feature on the camera). I've had it 3 months and am still learning it.  But, all in all, I love this little camera.  The price is right, it does what you want it to and if you get the camera sun shield, from any camera store ($19.00), you'll be glad you did</review_text>
Excellent camera... for someone like me, a lazy and un-technical person its a life saver for this high-speed, hi-tech world we are living in!!</review_text>
Absolutely wonderful camera! I did a lot of research before buying this camera and I was really pleased with the shipment and quality. It takes fantastic and  clear photos!</review_text>
I had the older model of this and wanted to upgrade.  I love both of them, but am very glad I upgraded. The pictures are clearer. I love the Casio cameras.  Small, user friendly, holds up well. Great all around</review_text>
I love:How quick and responsive it is.How tiny it is (without being "I lost it again" tiny).I'm surprised it's sub $200, seems like a camera worth much more than that.The photos it takes are gorgeous.The video it takes is surprising good quality.The battery lasts quite an impressively long time, and recharges quickly.Screen is gorgeous.Menu navigation is easy.Only downsides:(This is minor) focusing takes a tiny bit of getting used to. It'll shoot without you focusing properly if you get trigger happy.It feels a bit fragile - like an iPod (although I've already dropped it and it survived fine) so you'll want a decent case for it</review_text>
this is the best camera i've ever saw and my daughter loves it.</review_text>
Pro: this camera has a big screen, long-life battery, and light weight, which is easy to carry around.Con: the size is a little big for a man to hold one hand, let alone women</review_text>
This is a very cool camera and it has a really good design. It has 7.2 Megapixels and it is anti shake. Very good for kids to adults who are new at photography, or good for anyone who just wants a nice sleek design with very good photo quality</review_text>
I rate it 4 stars because I'm sure there are far superior cameras out there, but I don't think you can get them for the price.I've only used the camera for about a day now, but it took great pictures of my horse, even in his stall. The flash is really good and the pictures turn out so nicely, this is my first digital camera that I've owned so I was very surprised at the quality. It's pretty easy to fidle with and pretty user friendly to me. It's so tiny, I'm afraid to put it in my pocket or in my purse for fear that it might scratch-but that's not a bad thing, it makes it very easy to carry around, like carrying around another cell phone. It took good pictures in a poorly lit horse stall, so I'm very excited to see how well it does at a horse show or at a concert (the primary reasons I got the cameara) in even darker settings. Hopefully it will do well. You may have to mess with the colors in low lighting, through photoshop on your computer, but once you do the colors turn out perfect</review_text>
Good product, like the price.  This is much less expensive than the current pinseeker 1500 models, I bought it on ebay used for $150 so you may be able to find it for less (look under hunting AND golf rangefinders for this model).  This does not have the pinseeker feature of the newer models but normal mode and scan mode work perfectly for ranging flags that have no reflectors (although you may need to try more than one time and have relatively stable hands).  I was able to range a flag at 270 yards, and was able to range the top of a telephone pole at 375 yards (but it was windy so the flag was straight out and a little cloudy).  I would estimate that this will work for ranging flags on a calm sunny day (these don't work as well on a sunny day because the laser used is a visible light laser and gets a little interference from sunlight) at 215-230 yards for a flag (which is what I need it for).  Less expensive alternative than the pinseeker, and I really like the performance, very impressed.</review_text>
Purchased this unit new for $160.  Good performance - with a little practice, was getting readings well over 800 yards, even in bright sunlight.  Also like the fact that it uses standard AAA cells.The housing design leaves a bit to be desired - it's bulky, and the battery cover is not very secure.  Can see losing the cover easily.  Not as ergonomic as more recent models.Overall, $160 for a rangefinder that has genuine 800 yard performance, is a good deal</review_text>
Picked up a Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000 Laser Rangefinder used online at another site for alittle less than half the new price.Works very good and was worth every penny I spent on it. Easily ranged objects and animals well past 800 yards.</review_text>
This product is rugged and forgiving.  Accurate to +/- 1 ft., this is an absolute must have for all serious bowhunters.  Lightweight and easy to use, I find only one minor design flaw.  It is designed for right-handed use and is slightly cumbersome for those who choose to use it as left-handed hunters (I am).  Even with this minor design flaw, I still am very satisfied with this unit and would not hesitate to recommend it to others.  Most encounters are under 50 yards and ease of use and accuracy are critical elements in a hunt.  I harvested a nice elk this year at 52 yards using this unit.  Thanks Bushnell</review_text>
I am a female bowhunter who really had trouble judjing distances on green fields. This is a great product . It is easy to use and very accurate</review_text>
I havent gotten these before but they look like a good pair of binoculars.I suggest adding these to your wish list if you like the outdoors</review_text>
I use this great product when playing golf and while hunting. Plus it is just fun to have and a great discussion item. It is very accurate and precise</review_text>
I had the chance to test it in Catalunya, Spain, for the Formula 1 tests. Very nice sound, long-lasting battery and small.  Great deal</review_text>
I have to agree with Scipio's review.  I have stopped using this mic for a few reasons. 1) I forgot to turn it on one time and lost a lot of valuable sound on my footage.  2) I never know if it is working or not as it doesn't integrate with the camera, so how do I know when the batteries are dead??  Scares me to use it not knowing if its working or not.  Sound quality was great for the few times I have used it, but I'll be looking for a hot shoe mic now</review_text>
I bought this mike to go with my Canon mvx150i whichhas an appalling problem with tape noise beingpicked up by the internal mike.I wanted a compact solution, so I steered away fromthe bulky canon zoom mike.This mike solved my problem beautifully. The qualityof the sound is wonderful and the tape noise is non-existent.And it's small and cute.As the previous reviewer points out:This mike does not work with the smart shoe.And if you forget to turn it on and you have the mikeplugged into your audio in, you get silence.However, I've *never* had the battery cover pop off.And its not a zoom mike. It has a wide and a narrow setting.Not the same thing at all</review_text>
Camera case fits my P3 camera perfectly, a nice protective skin.  Unfortunately, that's all it is, it provides no real protection from shock.  Just don't throw your camera and case around, drop it, etc... and you'll be fine with this case</review_text>
This leather case is a perfect fit for my camera.  When I saw it initially, I was worried that it didn't have a strap but my camera came with one.  The case keeps my camera snuggly tucked away to avoid scratches</review_text>
I bought this case together with Nikin 5900 digcam. The case looks good and compact. But the main problem is with the pockets. There are two pockets for SD cards in the main pocket and one outer pocket for the battery. The problem is that when you open the case to take the camera, all the pockets are also open and stuff can fall from there. Specially when its on your belt.I won't use this case</review_text>
Very capable and sophisticated shooter for the price...a littlelacking in optical zoom. Easy to use, takes detailed pics andcan copy documents</review_text>
This pouch is nifty and a real cute size. I'm glad I purchased it</review_text>
This is a nice protective case for my Coolpix 5900.  I can fit two batteries in the little pouch.  The velcro closure is easy to use and the camera fits nicely in the case.  It seems to be durable</review_text>
Good product, like the price.  This is much less expensive than the current pinseeker 1500 models, I bought it on ebay used for $150 so you may be able to find it for less (look under hunting AND golf rangefinders for this model).  This does not have the pinseeker feature of the newer models but normal mode and scan mode work perfectly for ranging flags that have no reflectors (although you may need to try more than one time and have relatively stable hands).  I was able to range a flag at 270 yards, and was able to range the top of a telephone pole at 375 yards (but it was windy so the flag was straight out and a little cloudy).  I would estimate that this will work for ranging flags on a calm sunny day (these don't work as well on a sunny day because the laser used is a visible light laser and gets a little interference from sunlight) at 215-230 yards for a flag (which is what I need it for).  Less expensive alternative than the pinseeker, and I really like the performance, very impressed.</review_text>
Purchased this unit new for $160.  Good performance - with a little practice, was getting readings well over 800 yards, even in bright sunlight.  Also like the fact that it uses standard AAA cells.The housing design leaves a bit to be desired - it's bulky, and the battery cover is not very secure.  Can see losing the cover easily.  Not as ergonomic as more recent models.Overall, $160 for a rangefinder that has genuine 800 yard performance, is a good deal</review_text>
Picked up a Bushnell Yardage Pro 1000 Laser Rangefinder used online at another site for alittle less than half the new price.Works very good and was worth every penny I spent on it. Easily ranged objects and animals well past 800 yards.</review_text>
This product is rugged and forgiving.  Accurate to +/- 1 ft., this is an absolute must have for all serious bowhunters.  Lightweight and easy to use, I find only one minor design flaw.  It is designed for right-handed use and is slightly cumbersome for those who choose to use it as left-handed hunters (I am).  Even with this minor design flaw, I still am very satisfied with this unit and would not hesitate to recommend it to others.  Most encounters are under 50 yards and ease of use and accuracy are critical elements in a hunt.  I harvested a nice elk this year at 52 yards using this unit.  Thanks Bushnell</review_text>
I am a female bowhunter who really had trouble judjing distances on green fields. This is a great product . It is easy to use and very accurate</review_text>
I havent gotten these before but they look like a good pair of binoculars.I suggest adding these to your wish list if you like the outdoors</review_text>
I use this great product when playing golf and while hunting. Plus it is just fun to have and a great discussion item. It is very accurate and precise</review_text>
I bought this camera to take with me to Disney World.  I have a digital SLR but didn't want to use it on this trip as it is a little heavy for carrying all day - just wanted a small camera which would go in my pocket.  I am certainly not disappointed with my purchase - I took over 400 photos and have only deleted 20 of them.  The majority of the pictures were sharp with excellent color.  I used the optical zoom quite a lot - and this worked really well.  I disabled the digital zoom.  All the pictures were taken at the highest quality so I could edit later if necessary.  I took a lot of night shots of firework displays - some of the pics weren't so great - but others were very good.  I would certainly recommend this to anyone wanting a convenient, easy to use camera. The menu is easy to navigate and I found the batteries lasted a long time.  It's nice to be able to buy regular AA batteries to use as an emergency.  I spent a lot of time in the evenings scrolling through all my pictures, so the batteries were really put to the test!  I do like a viewfinder and this camera does not have one - but it really wasn't a problem and even the shots I took when I couldn't really compose the image worked well</review_text>
i was looking for a cheap camera and i found a great camera for a nice price... it has a lots of features that i dont know how to use yet, cuz u need to read the manual very carefully but when u know the function of every button i think is very useful camera.... great for traveling, it has been my savior in my european tour...one bad thing, doesnt come with rechargables batterie</review_text>
This is the first digital camera that I have owned and I have found that it is a greater starter camera.  I have tested others but found this one to be easy to use and operate.  The features included are basic however very easy to understand after the first hour or so of tinkering with the camera.  I would recommend this for a friend</review_text>
We'd ordered a different one that was taking forever to ship so we ordered this one instead.WE love it!!!   It takes great pictures!!! Easy to use!!!   My favorite part is when buying the ink and paper, you get enough of both and know exactly how many pictures you can print out</review_text>
Pictures come out great - nice camera easy to use - I bought this one for my mother in law after she saw my wife's camera and dock.good deal for a good price</review_text>
I am very pleased with the Kodak EasyShare C643 camera. We bought it for our vacation trip and came back with some fantastic photos. I would recommend it highly</review_text>
I made this purchase on Amazon.com and had it sent directly to my Niece in Texas (I live in Oklahoma) as a Christmas present because my Niece had just had her first baby and I thought that no new Mom should be without a camera. She loves it. Every communication I get from her mentions her excellant camera.</review_text>
hiii it is a good case for sony very good but I briefer for you to bay case can holds your camera & extra battery you will need it</review_text>
This camera deserves 5 stars if you need a camera that easily fits in your pocket or purse and is ready to use whenever that picture or movie moment arrives, even under water. Considering the varied picture taking situations, action, and lighting conditions, the performance was beyond my expectations. The only significant limitation is seeing the display in bright sunlight or under water, even when the screen is set at its brightest. However, aiming was intuitive enough that I never missed a shot and I was able to change modes even under water (but I did practice switching between underwater wide 2 and movie ahead of time). One feature that would be an improvement would be the ability to zoom while taking a movie.I received this camera just a couple days before leaving on a cruise so I didn't have any time to practice with it. Be careful not to have your finger in front of the lens, especially under water where you may not be watching the screen. Also be aware that when you zoom in for movies that the image movement is also magnified. The wide angle underwater movies are much better than at full optical zoom (digital zoom is off). After a couple days the controls were easy to use to change modes and review pictures and movies.I used 1 gig cards and the highest resolution which provided about 240 pictures or about 40 minutes of movies. Switching back and forth was easy. Movie recording will continue until the card is full or the battery runs out, not just short clips. My clips were too short until I was comfortable that I would not quickly fill up the memory card or run out of battery. Under water pictures were superb with a natural shift in color toward green. I recharged the battery every other night. The battery was able to take about 100 pictures and 15 minutes of movie between recharges. I recommend a spare battery as it did indicate it was getting low a couple times and ran out once.The camera was also used in daylight, inside, with and without flash, even night shots (the auto setting was better than Night Scene for harbor lights at night. The camera was steadied on the railing).I purchased a lanyard with metal clasp at Sports Authority for a dollar which provides a very secure leash. With the lanyard around my neck I could tuck the camera in my shirt pocket. I was always ready for the next picture opportunity without worrying about dropping it.I'm very pleased with the picture quality although it may not match a camera with a much larger lens system, but it was great to be able to take pictures and movies when I would not have had my larger camera available. The 15 fps movies do not match a 3CCD digital video camera, but they are acceptable. I even recorded short clips during live theater performances (with the screen brightness set at its minimum) and I was pleased with the quality from this tiny camera.</review_text>
I RECENTLY RECIEVED MY NEW CAMERA, AND I AM THRILLED.  I HAVE BEEN RESEARCHING WHICH CAMERA TO BUY SINCE DECEMBER (WHEN OUR LAST CAMERA WENT CAPOOT).  THERE HAVE BEEN MIXED REVIEWS FOR THE OLYMPUS SW SERIES, BUT COULD NOT RESIST THE APPEAL OF THIS CAMERA'S UNIQUE FEATURES.  I CANNOT WAIT TO TAKE IT INTO THE POOL THIS SUMMER WITH THE KIDS.  SO FAR, THE POINT AND SHOOT OPTIONS AND PICTURES HAVE BEEN LOVELY.  ANY PERSON CAN SCREW UP PICTURES WITH ANY CAMERA, BUT THIS CAMERA HAS SO MANY FEATURES TO AVOID THAT.  MY HUSBAND AND I HAD A WONDERFUL TIME TAKING EXTREME CLOSE UP SHOTS OF OUR GARDEN.  I HAVE NOT SEEN THAT QUALITY, AND HAD THAT MUCH SATISFACTION FROM A CAMERA SINCE WE FIRST SWITCHED OVER TO DIGITAL.  I AM VERY PLEASED, TO SAY THE LEAST, WITH THIS PURCHASE.</review_text>
I have an Olympus 770 SW (NOT the 720 SW), for sure...and I like it. I have had five digital cameras before, and this one is terrific. Considering that it's a sub-compact pocket camera, image quality is fine (not equal to that of a digital SLR, but I don't want to carry around a big box like a DSLR). Shadow detail is especially impressive. Operation is smooth and intuitive. The screen is fine, even outdoors. Shutter lag, a big concern of mine as I like to photograph my kids at sports, is minimal and can be zero if you prefocus. The number of custom scene settings is impressive. I bought it because of the waterproofing and shockproofing, and because of prior good experience with Olympus over the years, but I'm just as happy with the pictures it takes under normal circumstances too.A few gripes that stop me from giving the camera 5 stars:1. The battery cannot be recharged when it's in the camera. For a total of $80 or so, you can get an external power source and a cable, and together they let the camera run a long time without draining the battery, but they don't charge the battery. Battery life is fine for a day of normal shooting, but if you use the camera actively, every single night you pretty much have to unlock the case, take out the battery and charge it, then remember to put the battery back in the next day. Each charge takes 5 hours. I'm going to take the same $80 and instead buy two extra batteries to be comfortable--One in the camera, one reserve along with me, and another charging at home. Even so, it will take some planning and thinking to keep batteries ready all the time on a vacation. It would have been much nicer to have a holster or a charging socket on the case.2. The case is actually smaller than it needs to be. It could be significantly bigger and still fit in my shirt pocket, which is my standard size requirement. As it is, the advanced engineering is impressive to pack all the features in a tiny box, but the camera is more expensive than need be, the lens is smaller than it should be (depending on zoom position, the lens is between f/3.5 to f/5.0, which is pretty weak), it's harder to hold the camera than need be, and if the case were bigger, there would be room for a nice little charging socket too.3. There is indeed a background, almost mechanical noise introduced when filming videos. It probably can be filtered out, as it's very constant and very low pitched, but it's mildly annoying.4. Time between shots is too long--it takes several seconds to save each shot at full resolution.5. You can use the internal memory only if there's no memory card in the slot. Given the slow transfer speed to the card, it sure would be nice to be able to save a dozen or so shots very quickly to the internal memory and then transfer them to the memory when you have time.For all that, though, I'm really looking forward to using this camera on a forthcoming sea kayaking and snorkeling trip this summer. With one camera, I'll be able to take snapshots above and below water, also modest videos underwater (there's a special scene selection to do just that)</review_text>
I just bought this camera before making a trip to Disney and I absolutely love it.  My pictures were just beautiful.  They were very clear and very sharp.  This is a really nice camera for anyone</review_text>
This is one of the best point&shoot camera, Auto focus works perfectly fine, it just requires little practice.Night shot picture quality is unbelievable. Very Sharp and natural colors and big zoom.I would highly recommend this camera, just spend little time to learn how to get steady green light(focus) and you are good to go</review_text>
Have a Lacross charger and using these batteries.  These batteries blow away both the Rayovac 15 minute 2000mAh and the Energizer 2500mAh batteries.  I have a baby monitor that chews up batteries and these batteries last for over 3 hours on one charge.  The Energizer and Rayovac last about an hour at most.  I have been using them for about 2 months on non stop rotation and have seen no performance degregation.  Also in my digital camera, I can leave these in there for weeks, shoot many shots and they are still going.  With the others I can't leave them in there as they simply loose power to quickly.  Cannot say enough good things about these batteries.  I would highly reccomend them to anyone and make sure to bundle it with the La Crosse charger</review_text>
Because of the low price of these batteries, I was expecting that some of them may have been duds. However, I am pleased that all of them seem to work. I have had these batteries for about a month, so I cannot comment on their long  term reliability. Also, I have not tested whether they are really 2650mAh or not. I have used them mainly for my MP3 player's portable speakers and some battery operated foot warmers and they have worked well. One thing though, the 'shoulder' of the battery on the positive end seems to be very slightly highers or the 'nib' is a little bit shorter than most batteries. This means these batteries may not make a good connection in 100% of electronics. I had this problem only with a cheap portable radio was was able to solve it by sticking a little bit of aluminum foil between the battery and the contact. Most electronics do not have this issue</review_text>
I love this camera.  It is handy, goes in my purse everywhere.  Sure it isn't a Canon Rebel or remotely like it, but it is fast fast fast, holds a charge, takes a great wide angle shot and takes superb macros.  I don't use the movie feature but it has it.  There is a lot to offer in this little camera.  I have people stop me all the time and ask what brand it is.  Buy it and be happy :</review_text>
I have owned Canon Powershot S-series (S330), A-series (A540, A570is) and the S2 IS.  I wanted a 28mm wide angle point and shoot, so I bought this because Canon's SD800 IS is outrageously priced.  I'm a Canon fanatic, so be prepared for multiple comparisons.  However this camera is worth crossing over to Panasonic for.PROS - I definitely enjoy the 28mm feature.  The bright rear display is wonderful, the OS is quite intuitive as well.  Also it gets great battery life.  The ~ 300 shot estimate in the specs is pretty realistic.CONS - Compared to Canon cameras this is my conclusion -All of Canon's camera have much truer white balance presets.  Even with RED & BLUE fine tuning options, indoor dim lighting is really hard to do, as is snow lighting.This camera takes much more saturated and contrasty photos than Canons do.  Even when the FX01 is set to be less-vivid, it's way more saturated than Canon's most vivid setting.  The end result is a dramatic and unrealistic photo sometimes.The CCD noise is another issue.  This camera's sensor is much noisier than Canons'.  Nothing dramatic and deal-breaking, but don't expect the same crisp, clean shots a Canon will take.Finally Panasonic image stabilization.  It really does not hold its own against Canon.  I used the 570 IS and handheld shots that were a 1/4 second, and sometimes longer, with decent results.  The same goes for the S2 IS (which I HIGHLY recommend as a digital camcorder/super zoom hybrid).  The panasonic's sensor doesn't seem to match the ISO standards that you set it to, and it wants slower shutter speeds at f2.8 ISO 100 than a Canon set at the same f-stop and ISO.  So, despite the FX01's Mega OIS, its longer shutter speeds mean you still get shake that you wouldn't with an equivalent Canon.I know Canon, Canon, Canon.  Well, I told you I'm biased.  After reading these cons, why would you get this?  It's 1/2 the price of the SD 800 IS (if you shop around) and it's a must have for city photos, big landscapes (skies look so cool with wide angle) and it's vital for indoor group shots!Buy it, but don't expect the world from it</review_text>
I deal in major brand cameras and Panasonic cameras are my personal favorite! I've seen people whine about the "noise" they make many times but have never found it to be a problem. I own the FZ10 and the FX01 for my personal cameras. The FX01 is a very fast camera and takes great pics! I love the 28mm wide lens. Compared to most cameras I've used the FX01 does a real good job of metering the light and exposing the images.I love Panasonic's solid build and reliability. They may not be as popular as Canon or Sony but in my opinion are every bit as good.</review_text>
I am accustomed to using a larger point and shoot zoom. This is a sleek pocket sized point and shoot that gives exceptionally sharp pictures. It focuses very swiftly I would suppose due to the Leica lense. The battery life is good. I do notice that photos tend to calibrate a little to the blue range. I like to have a little more zoom. Overall,I like it very much</review_text>
this is my fifth digital camera, and i like it the best by far.  it's also the cheapest.  it's my first wide-angle and my first silver-not-black:  as someone else said, i don't see how i would ever go back to a non-wide-angle after this; but i do wish mine were black.  i have noticed the colors are faded in fluorescent light, but for macro it is excellent--much better than the more expensive camera i already had bought for macro purposes (canon.)  i also love the battery, which seems to last forever.  i bought a replacement lenmar battery which is also great, and cheap, but it got some bad reviews because it was described as being for the wrong model camera, not the fx-01.  (if you read the customer reviews, you can figure out which one is the right one for you.)i do have problems understanding the display, which shows options that don't correspond to any place on the camera you can select the options at.  (i guess i should look at the manual.)  also, i don't like the software and decided not to download it at all.i bought this because i wanted a camera made by a computer company as much as a camera company, that is, i wanted it to work.  also, someone had sent me an email about the history of leica, and how they saved a lot of jews from the concentration camps.  the other nice thing about this camera is that i use it a lot more because i carry it with me every day:  it is tiny and the battery always works, so why not?as for the graininess, on my desktop the pics look fine, and i would not be raving about this camera if it were not very easy to take good pics with--but i have to admit i haven't used it for printed pics so far</review_text>
Good product but the color was not so attracticed</review_text>
I have a Rebel XT with lenses, flashes,etc.  My wife wanted a small easy to use camera so I got her this for her Birthday.  She got it last night and was up all night taking pictures around the house and experimenting with the wide range of options available.At first she thought the camera was too complicated but after staying up all night using it, she is living it.As a Professional Photographer, this camera is great and I may have to steal it for events as a quick way to take some pictures. It has all of the features and super resolution to make a great companion (as long as she lets me take it)Highly recommended for anyon</review_text>
Great camera, just chosen as editor's choice by PC mag as well.[...]I have it for about 3 weeks now, couple of family parties later I am really happy with this little one. Fits even in tight jeans pockets, and is quick to take pictures. Face recognition works really well, not flawless, but really amazing. I took about 300 shots so far and they are mostly great quality, some indoor pictures without the flash are a bit blurry, if you don't hold it steady.My 4 year old niece was running around with it and took nice shots just on her own with the automatic setting, pretty amazing. Flash can be a bit strong when to close indoors. It takes fast pictures and is very easy to understand. I still have to read the manual, though. ;-)I added a fast 2GB card and even the video quality is pretty good, althought just avi format, not mpg. Sound is great. It even has a speaker when you play the video for review. Outside pictures are outstanding quality. I had some outside self-timer family pictures enlarged at the store to 20-30cm, and the picture quality is awesome. Highly recommended when you want a camera you can carry with you at ALL times</review_text>
Truly an amazing little camera. I was looking for something small that I could stick in my pocket when I go out everyday but still took sharp pictures. This camera does all of that and more. Its small and solid and still manages to take gorgeous photos and very nice videos. I highly recommend this camera to anyone looking for a easy to use and very portable camera</review_text>
This replaces my 2.1MP Digital Elph that I use when I don't want to carry my big SLR (Digital Rebel XT with L series lens).Positive:Instant start-up, menu navigation and zoomScreen quality comparable to video iPodComfortable and intuitive button placementStrong flash (for camera size)Modern/traditional camera aesthetics (great looking)Acceptable battery lifeCamera operation was obviously well thought outLow price for what you getNegative:Poor low-light shooting without flashLots of noise at ISO more than 200No image stabilizationZoom ring spring a little too strongPlastic battery doorThis is a perfect pocket camera if you care more about ease-of-use, aesthetics, size, and price than trying to capture a print-worthy photo.  Overall I'm very pleased with this camera, but only because I have a SLR to capture important moments/places.  Think great MySpace photos rather than great family Christmas cards.</review_text>
I did all sorts of research on the SD600.  I had made up my mind that the SD600 was the camera for me.  The SD1000 is the newer kid on the block and therefore did not have many reviews.  And that is why I am here today.  The SD1000 is the newest version of the SD600 with a few additions.  Those few additions make this camera AWESOME.  I love the ISO choices.  I was zooming on my local Calif. freeways at around 80mph and decided to take a few shots of passing signs out my passenger window.  At the high speed the ISO caught such great detail that I could clearly read the sign later at home.  That means that despite the small size the camera filtered out the shake of my hand, the shake from the road, and compensated for the fast movement. The color options are very much the same as other Canon Powershot models.  MACRO is so much fun to play with on this camera.  The button layout is easy to figure out.  Lighting options like White balance are a button push away.  With the Face Detection option on you are sure to get a great photo of the family.  I have been playing with it none stop for over a week.  Get at least a gig for memory.   The only downside that I have found, and it is a minor one, is that when the battery warning comes on it means that you have 1-2 more pics and then it shuts off.  I ordered another battery ahead of time and it was worth it.  The batteries charge in about 30-40mins. This is a great camera.  If you are thinking about the SD600 step up and get the SD1000.  You will not be disappointed with it</review_text>
Canon all the way! I've had an s230, sd300, sd400, sd630. I really did not like the feel of the SD630 very much after living with it for a while. I also didn't like the button placements..was not comfortable with it. It DID take great pics and video. BUT, I moved to the SD1000 (black), have had it one week and love it!Of all the Canon point-and-shoot digitals, this is my favorite. It is tiny and so pocketable. A pleasure to use. The switches and buttons are where they should be and feel good. The screen is 2.5 so people who want 3.0 need to go to the SD750 which is basically the SD630's replacement with the Digic III processor. Same form factor.If you liked the SD200, SD300, SD400, SD450 or SD600, you will love this!My only reservation is how great ARE the pics from this little camera. I'm sure they are excellent but the jury is out on how good they are compared to earlier Canons. I like vivid pics so I may have to set the camera to vivid.Got a good deal at Amazon</review_text>
Pro photographer here. have been using so many different digital cameras .. because i am very picky.  this camera is fantastic. great looking sexy design. simple easy to use. fantastic looking pictures.. fast and easy and small size fits in your pockets. great micro function. great movie mode. sharp and accurate color pictures.. best compact digital camera in the market.   well always new things coming out and surprise me but  at least for now/so far this is the best one in the market right now- in point and shoot/compact camera catagory. canon makes great camera..</review_text>
This is a pretty good camera, loaded with lots of features.  The pros include the 10x optical zoom, use of SD card, and battery consumption.  Also, with this camera you have the ability to buy add-ons such as zoom lenses and such - makes it nice for those that are just past beginner experience.There are a couple of cons that I've found, the most important being the picture quality.  Although it does have the capability to take great photos, you have to make sure and wait several seconds between shots to ensure that they'll come out looking great (in my opinion, anyway).  The size is okay, although it is kinda bulky for being so small.  I prefer something that size to also be slim - it's not so easy to carry around because of this.Overall, this camera is very easy to use</review_text>
I got this camera for the use in a digital photo class.  It was wonderful.  There wasn't anything that confused me when I first got it, and it took great pictures.  The software was a little tricky because it moved all of my photos to a different place that gave me very little access, but that was easily taken care of by uninstalling the software and using the USB cable by itself.The 10x zoom is great, but if you move at all your picture can be quite blurry.  I would get a tripod to use when you have it zoomed really far in.Overall it's a great camera that takes great pictures and good video</review_text>
I have a similar issue as another reviewer had... my Z740's LCD screen failed a few months ago. I turn on the camera and all the screen shows is solid white. The little eye-piece viewfinder still displays fine, and the pictures & videos still come out fine, but I can't use the lcd screen as my viewfinder any more... which was one of the biggest reasons I bought the camera...Others online have had this problem, but I can't find anyone who has gotten it resolved. My camera is well out of warranty, so I have no hope of Kodak fixing it.Otherwise though, it's a great camera... very impressive actually. I just wish it hadn't died after a year and a half of occasional use... :-</review_text>
This is the camera I use and it works great! I was surprised at how well it records video too! It's very easy to adjust the camera to the environment you are photographings. The zoom is excellent and doesn't seem to drain the batteries much. I would recommend this camera to the amateur or professional.</review_text>
Very easy to use, have been using it for over two years now.  Great quality pics and easy to print, command, and choose options quickly.  Also take fast photos so you do not miss any moments.  Also like the video mode for shot blips when I forget or do not want to carry the camcorder</review_text>
I bought this camera last summer. I have taken enough pictures to put up a review now. I LOVE THIS CAMERA! Pure and simple, it has met and exceeded my expectations. The pictures it takes are very nice, sharp, focused, and crisp. It has so many features that you can play around with. I have probably only used half of them more than once. It has a very nice LCD display, or you can take pictures through the traditional peep hole. On the view screen it will always tell you, which mode you are in, gives you a nice centering square, and what picture you are on, etc. The zoom on it is awesome, although I haven't used that much to date. You can take close up shots of flowers, insects, etc., and it still get everything just right. Three of my favorite features though are: the option to take video clips, and the fact that you can shoot photographs in black and white or sepia color, which gives your pictures a real antique or historical feel depending on what you are going for. It will even let play around with shooting night picturs, or different landscapes near and far. When you print out the pictures off your computer, if you have any kind of decent printer you will be almost shocked how detailed and crisp the picture is. I would almost swear that it is better than film pictures. I couldn't stop looking at it, because I was so amazed! For a person like me that mainly takes normal snapshots most of the time, I don't know what else I could ask for in a camera! Moreover, you can't go wrong on the price. Is it a little more expensive than other cameras? Sure! However, for the features it has it is well worth it. It isn't exorbinent to begin with. By the way, for you people that like to shop around for the best price like me, I went to 3-4 different stores in my area that had cameras like this one, and the best price I found was here at Amazon. If you buy it, you will love it, end of story.</review_text>
This is the only Camera you will ever need! I have had mine for 1.5 years and not only are the pictures great but I use a 2GB memory card for Video and the quality is amazing!!!  I can take a video, load unto my computer and have a DVD for the family to watch in less than an hour (if you can't wait just plug in the cord and hookup to your TV and watch the video straight from the camera).  I have retired my digital SONY handycam (which is a great video camera).I have used this camera extensively for the 1.5 years traveling to China, Europe and the US - no problems - Friends and Family are amazed at the quality of the pictures</review_text>
I shopped around online for quite a while before I settled on this tripod.  I narrowed it down to this one and the Slik U9000.  All other things being equal (from what I could tell), I chose this one for aesthetics.  I have not had a chance to use it yet, but it looks very sturdy, not cheap at all (cheap is a relative thing, I'm not a professional, so for me it's fine).  I'm glad that I bought it.  It is well worth the price</review_text>
Good product but not suitable for medium format cameras and slr cameras with large telephoto lenses</review_text>
So far the tripod has served me very well.  Light, full height adjustments, and quite stable for its weight</review_text>
Like the other reviewer - I checked out tripods at a camera store. Hadn't heard of Velbon, but a quick Internet search showed them to be a recognized name in tripods. I needed a tripod for my Nikon D50 (especially with the 70-300mm zoom lens), and perhaps a video camera, and the DF-60 fit the bill - lightweight, quick to set up, leveling bubble, detachable baseplate, etc. Sure, it's pretty much all plastic, but if you take care of your equipment - shouldn't make that much difference for non-professional use. It's stable enough with the built-in leg brace spreader. The price at the camera store was almost $70 - Amazon beat them by a mile. Received it in a few days. So far - everything I though it would be. Highly recommended if you need a lighweight tripod. Now I need to get a bag so I can sling it over my shoulder</review_text>
I went to the camera store to look at tripods.  I noticed this one, It went very high which was a main trait I was looking for.  It felt strong, not flimsy like many other tripods on display.  the panning was smooth and you can flip the head on its side for vertical pictures.  It seemed like the perfect tripod for except for the price...$80.  I checked it out on amazon to find it was only a mere 40 something.  I havn't used it yet, but i know i'll be very happy with it.</review_text>
I like it. It's light in weight and easier to handle.</review_text>
I got this lens with D50 package. It is not a pro-lens by any stretch of imagination, but it works well in 99% of the situations. The only limiting factor that I found is the f4-5.6 range. In some situations (mostly indoor) you are forced to use flash. However, we are talking about dimly lit rooms at this point. I've done some indoor action sport shooting with this lens - a gym lit by fluorescent lights and this lens had no problem delivering quality pictures without use of flash. (Crisp sharp images, correct colors, no distortion) Focusing was not an issue</review_text>
For the money you cant beat it.It's not a pro lense.It doesnt have a pro lense price.First you need to learn what your doing.A F/4-5.6 isn't a low light lens. You need to use a flash for that.Outdoors it's fine.Its a lense not a photographer.If you dont know how to use it, it can't teach you.If you do, you'll love it</review_text>
For the price that I paid for it, this lense is the best zoom lense any Nikon photographer shold have. I picked this one (over 70-300mm Nikon lense) as it fully complimented my Nikon D50 with 18-55 lense. I was using it outside to make photos of my son swimming polo game and I couldn't understand what other reviewers were saying that this lense is slow at stopping an action. I was able to freeze actions of the game to each water splashes then the ball was flying and hitting the water surface. I am hightly recommending this lense</review_text>
For a beginner or an avid photographer this is really the lens to buy.  The clarity of the picture is quite nice and weighs no more than the 18-55mm lens that comes with the camera.  I am very pleased with the performance of this product and would highly recommend it to others. I have not noticed grainy pictures like some others have said and as for the plastic on the focus, you would never think twice about it.  Great lens! Thanks Nikon for making a product that is reasonable yet high in quality! Works great with my D50.</review_text>
I wanted to get a decent start with a digital SLR, but for a hobby camera, I can't justify spending $1000 on one lens. This zoom lens gives me sharp results in good light, and passable but grainy results in low light. If you learn the strong and weak points of this lens and use it accordingly, you won't be disappointed. If you aren't willing to learn to work your lens, you probably won't be happy with the high-dollar ones, either. ;) This makes a good partner to the 18-55mm kit lens with the D-50.If you're up for spending the extra money, skip the other lenses and get the 18-200mm Nikkor for about $1000.Another good choice in this category is the 70-300mm Nikkor, also available on Amazon</review_text>
The lens does exactly what it is supposed to do.  Quality high, price competitive.  I am very satisfied with it</review_text>
This lens is as sharp as the primary lens. It's only draw back is the need for a side flash</review_text>
The adapter is great. No issues, and the shipment was received in a very quick time-frame.The lens blocks the flash on the Canon G6, but other than that, the pictures have turned out great!  It was all that I was hoping for</review_text>
I thought twice before buying this lens. It wasn't designed specifically for my Canon A620, it required the purchase of an adapter ring, and it blocks the flash.Having said that, the lens feels good on the camera (even with Canon's plastic adapter) and the pictures are what I was hoping for. I use it all the time. It's great for assembling panoramics, and doesn't suffer from any unexpected distortions (beyond the horizontal bending you get from any wide angle lens).Highly recommended</review_text>
If u r like me that likes to take pictures of the places visited and like to capture the atmosphere of the place this lens will do. The Pictures are not perfect but they are good enough</review_text>
This semi-hard case is very cumbersome in terms of handling, at first I couldn't really put the camera in. So, it's quite unusable, otherwise the protection level is good.I wouldn't recommend it. Only if you are masochist :-)</review_text>
a tad hard to get into and out of...but high quality and quite protectiv</review_text>
This is a great little helper if you plan to have your camera around your neck for a long period of time and want some protection.  It's not the easiest thing to get into, expecially with a lens on, so I wouldn't have this on my camera if I thought I would need a quick shot.  But if you're hiking (and taking some time setting up most of your shots) this is a nice alternative to having to keep your camera in a protective backpack the whole time.  Worth the money, well made, but not "easy in, easy out"</review_text>
It's a pretty neat case. Fits nicely. But it can only accomodate a camera and maybe an extra CF card. If you want to carry a spare battery, battery charger, usb cable, etc, then this case is definately not for yo</review_text>
I love this camera. I bought it for my trip to Paris. I found it very easy to use. One feature i didn't realize it had was video with sound. I found that very useful. I bought a 2GB memory card to go with the camera. The one it comes with doesn't hold that many pictures. The software was easy to install and use. Not really small enough for a pocket but still a great camera on a budget</review_text>
First off, let me make it clear that I am satisfied with this camera. I have had it for 8 months now and I have put it through its paces and its held up fine.But there are few things you must know:The camera has no zoom. I mean, practically no zoom. 2.2x may look decent but its pointless in any real-life situation. You WILL find yourself moving a lot with your camera to get a better shot, not standing in one place and using the zoom feature. You can never get a close wide shot - its just not possible with this camera. This camera is great for average stills but that's about it.You have to click twice to take a picture or "press halfway and then fully" according to the manual. This is a major pain. Sometimes when the battery is weak, it may take a lot of time to take a picture (and a lot of frustration), so this is not a cam to capture any special pictures or "kodak moments".Apart from these cons, the camera is great value for money and offers video and all kinds of stuff. If you're looking mostly looking to take landscape or portrait stills, this camera will do a good job</review_text>
I bought this camera six months ago for my 12 year old daughter.  It was her (and ours) first digital camera.  I read so many reviews prior to selecting this model.  The reviews for this camera were so helpful.  This camera has been so easy to use and it takes excellent pictures.  Rechargeable batteries are definitely a must! This camera is the best camera for this price, no doubt about it.  We have taken still shots and videos.  It is so fun to have the option to take a video.  We have some great clips.  All I can say is we are so happy with the camera.  We would definitely choose it again</review_text>
Good camera for the $129 I paid. Does everything pretty well, and your picture modes are pretty customizable. Only qualm is it takes a second or two longer than I wish when the camera saves/loads pictures to the memory card. Might be a problem when trying to shoot consecutive pictures-- but probably wouldn't be doing it with this type of camera anyways.</review_text>
This is my 3rd digital camera and I bought this one to supplement my larger 10X zoom camera.  This one fits nicely into a pocket  or small camera bag to easily take it to all events or for travel.  I've found that it takes nice photos indoors when the flash is used....Even when the cats or dogs I'm shooting are moving around.  I've felt the life of a battery set is pretty good, but I've been using nice rechargeable ones.  Definitely get a set of 4, then you have 2 to use and 2 as a backup set.  The settings are pretty easy to figure out and change and 99% of my photos were taken on the "auto" setting and came out pretty good.  As others have indicated, indoors - without flash - can produce blurry photos, but that's the nature of almost all cameras, not unique to this model.  Glad I bought it and would highly recommend it</review_text>
I really like this camera! It is fairly simple to use, takes great pictures and is packed with features. It fits nicely in the hand and is compact enough to slip in a coat pocket or purse.We bought this camera for our daughter's birthday. She is using it with ease & especially loves the movie with sound option. In my opinion, the camera is a winner for any adult or kid wanting a good all around digital camera.My only negative is that it is a battery hog. As with most digital cameras, you will want to make sure you get rechargeable batteries and large memory card</review_text>
This camera is an exelent camara. It has plenty of effects, plenty of modes, plenty of scenery options. The image quality is 3.2 megapixel, but its quite good. The pictures you take without the flash do end up getting a bit blury, where as if you take it with the flash, it comes out exelent. And sometimes it takes a long time for the picture to get taken with out the flash, and sometimes it happens imediatly. But all these flaws are only with my version.But if you are looking for a good camera with a great price, this is your best option</review_text>
I gave this camera 5 stars because of it's awesome features. This camera is the perfect size for kids and you can put a video on this camera. I love this camera. I think it takes awesome pictures</review_text>
Cute, compact, easy to use - these are just a few ways to describe Canon's cool A400! This stylish digital camera is lightweight and perfect for snapping shots on the go. Mine is Sunset Gold.Plus, there are perks like macro mode (which lets you snap sharp pictures from as close as 2 inches), and lots of shooting modes (like Snow and Fireworks).And Movie Mode lets you capture video clips with sound.This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Just what you would expect from  Canon</review_text>
This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Even close-up photos turn out great. You would think this camera had more than 3.2 megapixels! You will have to get a much larger memory card though, as is the case with most digital cameras</review_text>
Wow... this is such a great case.  Fits my D40x tightly, but still has room for an extra memory card, etc.  Material is very good, as well.  Great deal, great case</review_text>
just what i needed for my camera. and just like sony to make something that isnt universal</review_text>
great simple case for your compact camera... slick design combing a hard and soft case.. Extra pouch great for spare battery or card</review_text>
The case is great, easy to use and the camera fits in it well.  It is nice to have the option to put a belt thru it and the extra little case to hold batteries/extra memory cards is nice too.  Would recommend it to anyone</review_text>
Great design and firm body protects the camera against bumps and knocks. I saw only two problems:First, the carrying strap is too soft and gets wrapped up in itself.Second, the case does not permit the installation of a tube and UV filter on the camera. It simply isn't deep enough. You need both of these items in order to protect the lens. It would be a simple redesign to fix the issue.</review_text>
I bought this camera case for my DSCW5, it is a perfect fit for the camera.  It's sturdy enough that it will protect but soft enough to carry easily on your person.  Great case for the money, I recommend it</review_text>
Good all around and works well; however, external case gotta go.  Sony should have made the case to fit the battery and the memory sticks inside</review_text>
I bought this case for my Cybershot DSC-W1. The camera fits beautifully into the case. I especially like that the shoulder / neck strap is detachable.One thing that is indistinguishable in the photo: There are two zippers that run up on each side of the case. They are connected to a smaller strap (seen in the photo - much like a wrist strap) that you can pull to zip or unzip both sides at once. The side zippers do not run along the top or bottom of the case, so there is less danger of your camera accidently falling out when you are removing the case.The color of the case is less of a blue-siver, as shown in the pic. It is more of a taupe-silver, but it looks quite fly with a brushed metal plate on the front.Please note that the mini-pouch does not fit INSIDE the camera case. However, it has a velco flap which allows it to attach securely to the shoulder / neck strap. I have attached mine to the smaller wrist strap, but will probably end up storing it in my purse. I can easilly fit a pair of replacement batteries in their plastic case, and two memory cards into the mini-pouch.I would have given five stars if the mini-pouch had fit inside the camera case - thus my 4.5 star rating</review_text>
I am a professional photographer.  I looked around at many cases and decided on the QBP-3 for myself.  I use this case for the times that I don't want to  drag around my full SLR kit.It is a very nice size.  The case can accept my Panasonic DMC-LX1 digicam, 60gb Video iPod w/earphones, 2 additional SD memory cards, a spare battery, and still have a little room left for a lens cloth and my license or Credit Cards/Cash.It is made to hold a small/medium digicam in the main compartment.  If you have a smaller digicam like the LX1, Sony T series, Casio Exlim, or Pentax Optio there is enough room left for an iPod.  It's construction means that there is padding between the camera and my iPod so neither gets scratched.  There is also a pass-through slot in the top of the case for the digicams "hand-strap".  That is what makes this case work with an iPod quite well because it is perfect for headphone pass-through, just make sure you have a remote.The back pocket has nice webbing pockets made for memory chips.  It also has a larger size zippered interior pocket for misc flat stuff.On the exterior there is a snap open belt clip that is over three inches tall and uses elastic to allow a little play in what fits beneath it.  The back and front of the case is constructed of a reinforced "armored" ballistic nylon that has been quite durable so far.  The center area is just plain heavy duty ballistic nylon, but still what I would consider very strong.This case has been ideal for me to use as a run around.  I purchase this after looking at cases from Lowepro, Tenba, Quantray, Domke, and Tamrac.  I still didn't find a case that fit a small digicam as well as this one.</review_text>
As with all of Tamrac's products it is inexpensive and well made. This is the 5th Tamrac bag that I have bought for various cameras that I have. The first one I bought is still holding up almost 10 years later.</review_text>
A really nice camera bag for compact digital cameras.  This bag will hold most accessories a compact digital camera owner want to carry and can be either used with the shoulder strap or the belt loop</review_text>
After a little work with the camera measurements (I have a Lumix DMC-F27) I decided the Tamrac 5696 just could be the perfect bag.  This turned out to be correct.  There is just enough room for the camera and a few accessories.  It is very easy to carry and treats the camera quite well.  I wouldn't want a smaller or a larger bag.  It is very well made and easy to use.  I'm very pleased with the bag overall</review_text>
This is the best bag for S2 IS, I can carry my camera, 58mm adapter attached, cloth to clean, 4 battery, CBK4 200 charger and two filter in it`s cases....all in one bag and still i got enought space to TCdc58B....... What else can you ask for</review_text>
Tamrac makes a great camera case, and this one was no exception.  Sturdy and well-made.  It was advertized as being the right fit for my Fujifilm S-9000, but it is actually a bit too small for this camera.  By the time I got the camera pushed in, the surrounding pouches were squeezed so tight little else would go in.  I should have gone with a bigger case</review_text>
I needed a case for my Canon S2 and bought this one.  It does a great job.  I keep the following in my case:Canon S2 with Lensmate 58mm adapter attachedAdapter End Cap2 58mm Hoya Filters (In filter case)Canon CBK4-200 Rechargeable Battery and Charger KitAMBICO V-0615 Extendable Mini TripodSima Lens PenLens Cleaning ClothSpare Memory CardHope this helps all you S2 buyers</review_text>
Just as described for the Panasonic digital camera . Excellant constuction, good fit , handy for all battery and chip storage</review_text>
As I was shopping for my digital zoom camera the idea that a digital camera with a zoom wouldn't collapse enough to fit into a bag never occurred to me. But, that's what happened. Upon receiving my Panasonic, DMC-FZ20, I was surprise by how light it is and yet how big it is. To those shopping for a bag which will hold one SLR w/lens this is a great bag! I've purchased other Tamrac Digital series bags with satisfaction.The material quality, craftsmanship, & design are all excellent. This bag will hold-up to world travel and various family outings. But, if you have more than one lens, a flash, or want to hold a battery charger (or a loads of spare film) this container's too small!Tamrac makes such a good product that I'm replacing this Digital-6 with a System-3 unit. Only note of caution: when purchasing a parts bag (any bag) use a tape measure, arrange you parts, then measure them in a typical configuration, and use the "real" dimensions to shop for the bag (take note of inner and outer dimensions as some bags are padded and there's space loss when the bag arrives).</review_text>
I've had this digital camera for almost a year. It's the fourth camera I've owned. I spent quite some time searching for a compact camera that I could carry everywhere. Being an amateur photographer (and mostly taking pictures for myself and not others), I didn't want to lug around an extra bag just for my camera. It fits discreetly in your pocket or a small purse (for formal nights out). The size and weight of this camera is its best feature, and this carries through to the newer generations of this camera, too.This has been the perfect camera for everything from selling items on-line to landscape scenery. My pictures have always turned out beautifully, with wonderful color and crispness. I have discovered that the "automatic" lighting feature is not always the most ideal, but you can re-program just about anything on this camera.It's really quite a good camera, and given its price these days with the newer generations out there, it's a steal</review_text>
I simply love this camera.  I have been using for over 1 year now with no issues or problems.  However, you must learn to use the functions properly for optimum photo quality. Auto setting are great. Many of my photos look like professional portraits.  Everywhere I go people want to check it out.  Wouldn't trade for another. And I paid a high price when it first came out.  So at today's prices it is WELL WORTH the money</review_text>
I had a Nikon Coolpix which was small but too big to shove into my pocket so I bought the Sony.  I love that it's small, had to get used to making sure my fingers were not within the lense view.  Extra battery and memory sticks will run up the cost (but that goes for any digital camera).  It's easy to use since I'm not much of one for reading the instruction books yet have been able to figure things out fairly easily.  I don't do movies so can't comment on that but straight photos turn out really well (which surprises me since I've always been a really lousy photographer).  I like that I can carry it with me all the time, which I do.  I do wrap the whole camera in a small cloth envelope so the LCD doesn't get scratched up.  And I added a neck lanyard usually used for a computer flash key so I can wear the camera around my neck or wrap the strap around my hands just in case it slips out of my fingers--camera is so lightweight.  The only complaint I have is that the shutter door, which slides effortlessly to turn on the camera, slides effortlessly even when you don't want it to.  I've used up the battery many times while the camera was sitting in my pocket (so I always carry an extra battery with me).  And extra plus is loading the pics onto the computer is a breeze (no extra software needed, just the cable that comes with the camera).  There is still a slight delay between depressing the button to take a picture and when the camera actually takes the picture but it's not as bad as the Nikon.  I assume the newer versions of this camera have only gotten better.  Well worth the money (I just wish I could lock the shutter cover)</review_text>
It's everything i expected, works great and Amazon's partner service was very goo</review_text>
If you are looking for a good small camera, and have no intentions of being ansel adams, this is a good camera choice. I travel alot, and this camera is perfect because it can fit in my pockets or a small purse. It also takes pretty good pictures</review_text>
NO WORDS FOR THIS ITEM, THIS IS THE BEST CAMERA I EVER BOUGHT, THE PROGRAMS TO DOWNLOW THE PICTURES ITS FENOMENAL, IF YOU HAVE THE OPORTUNITIES GO FOR IT, BUYIT</review_text>
My Grandparents have one and love it. Its very easy to work. Takes great pics. Its also easy to share your pics on the TV.They love it I love it.</review_text>
I love this camera.  It is handy, goes in my purse everywhere.  Sure it isn't a Canon Rebel or remotely like it, but it is fast fast fast, holds a charge, takes a great wide angle shot and takes superb macros.  I don't use the movie feature but it has it.  There is a lot to offer in this little camera.  I have people stop me all the time and ask what brand it is.  Buy it and be happy :</review_text>
I have owned Canon Powershot S-series (S330), A-series (A540, A570is) and the S2 IS.  I wanted a 28mm wide angle point and shoot, so I bought this because Canon's SD800 IS is outrageously priced.  I'm a Canon fanatic, so be prepared for multiple comparisons.  However this camera is worth crossing over to Panasonic for.PROS - I definitely enjoy the 28mm feature.  The bright rear display is wonderful, the OS is quite intuitive as well.  Also it gets great battery life.  The ~ 300 shot estimate in the specs is pretty realistic.CONS - Compared to Canon cameras this is my conclusion -All of Canon's camera have much truer white balance presets.  Even with RED & BLUE fine tuning options, indoor dim lighting is really hard to do, as is snow lighting.This camera takes much more saturated and contrasty photos than Canons do.  Even when the FX01 is set to be less-vivid, it's way more saturated than Canon's most vivid setting.  The end result is a dramatic and unrealistic photo sometimes.The CCD noise is another issue.  This camera's sensor is much noisier than Canons'.  Nothing dramatic and deal-breaking, but don't expect the same crisp, clean shots a Canon will take.Finally Panasonic image stabilization.  It really does not hold its own against Canon.  I used the 570 IS and handheld shots that were a 1/4 second, and sometimes longer, with decent results.  The same goes for the S2 IS (which I HIGHLY recommend as a digital camcorder/super zoom hybrid).  The panasonic's sensor doesn't seem to match the ISO standards that you set it to, and it wants slower shutter speeds at f2.8 ISO 100 than a Canon set at the same f-stop and ISO.  So, despite the FX01's Mega OIS, its longer shutter speeds mean you still get shake that you wouldn't with an equivalent Canon.I know Canon, Canon, Canon.  Well, I told you I'm biased.  After reading these cons, why would you get this?  It's 1/2 the price of the SD 800 IS (if you shop around) and it's a must have for city photos, big landscapes (skies look so cool with wide angle) and it's vital for indoor group shots!Buy it, but don't expect the world from it</review_text>
I am accustomed to using a larger point and shoot zoom. This is a sleek pocket sized point and shoot that gives exceptionally sharp pictures. It focuses very swiftly I would suppose due to the Leica lense. The battery life is good. I do notice that photos tend to calibrate a little to the blue range. I like to have a little more zoom. Overall,I like it very much</review_text>
this is my fifth digital camera, and i like it the best by far.  it's also the cheapest.  it's my first wide-angle and my first silver-not-black:  as someone else said, i don't see how i would ever go back to a non-wide-angle after this; but i do wish mine were black.  i have noticed the colors are faded in fluorescent light, but for macro it is excellent--much better than the more expensive camera i already had bought for macro purposes (canon.)  i also love the battery, which seems to last forever.  i bought a replacement lenmar battery which is also great, and cheap, but it got some bad reviews because it was described as being for the wrong model camera, not the fx-01.  (if you read the customer reviews, you can figure out which one is the right one for you.)i do have problems understanding the display, which shows options that don't correspond to any place on the camera you can select the options at.  (i guess i should look at the manual.)  also, i don't like the software and decided not to download it at all.i bought this because i wanted a camera made by a computer company as much as a camera company, that is, i wanted it to work.  also, someone had sent me an email about the history of leica, and how they saved a lot of jews from the concentration camps.  the other nice thing about this camera is that i use it a lot more because i carry it with me every day:  it is tiny and the battery always works, so why not?as for the graininess, on my desktop the pics look fine, and i would not be raving about this camera if it were not very easy to take good pics with--but i have to admit i haven't used it for printed pics so far</review_text>
I bought this camera more than half a year ago. My intention was to get a decent camera for images, but then also be able to use it for filming short movies.I'm very pleased with its performance. In good lighting conditions, colors come out to be amazing. I really really did not expect them to be so vivid and sparkling! In darker conditions, well, it still works fine, not nearly as bad as I expected from some other reviews. Photos might be grainy or not as vivid anymore, but the stuff is still perfectly suitable to show the photos to people.As about filming, it's terrific. I mean, resolution is great (sth like 848 by 640 or so), better than what one could possibly expect from a regular camera. And the quality is super awesome, looks very neat on computer screen. Respect.It has to be pointed out that you cannot zoom while filming, but not many cameras out there can do that.Oh, it's also very small with a gigantic screen and great battery life. A great buy</review_text>
Good product but the color was not so attracticed</review_text>
now i know that you should never bye elctronic things online. i bought an expensive camera, after 3 days it didn't work without any outer influence. i tried to contact the seller, but they didn't react at all. there was only an email adress, nobody responded. i didn't even have an adress from ANTonline. then i asked amazone about the adress to send the defective camera back, they didn't give it to me. i did't get an replacement or a refund. i will never do that again, nobody was reachable or helped me</review_text>
I enjoy this camera and I carry it in my pocket wherever I go.  It takes great pictures and videos.The only problem I have is that it is hard to turn on and off with big fingers</review_text>
I got this camera a month ago for my birthday. When i opened it up i was astounded. The camera is tiny and extremely thin, yet it has a giant bright screen on the back. I'm an artist and i like to have my camera at all times, making this one perfect since it fits in my pocket along with many other things. There are many pros and few cons. First off in other reviews people said the flash was week and sound playback quiet.  These are both completely false, both are outstanding to what i have seen in other cameras.Feature wise it's decent.  It has a lot of good themes for taking pictures of certain things, and its extremely comprehensive.  Changing simple settings like flash on/off and macro mode are extremely good and easily visible on screen.  The one quible i would have is the lack of extra specific adjustments for getting the picture just right.  If your not a big time photographer the features are by far enough.Now for picture quality etc.  First off this camera has a rediculous number of pixels for its size.  This is both good and bad.  Lots of pixels means lots of detail, and with the right lighting this camera can get some very crisp shots.  However in low lighting pictures can be blurry and if you blow up the pictures big enough you can see little bloches of color.  For the most part this is no problem especially if you are proficient in photoshop.  Video recording is excellent the quality can completely replace your video camera (aside from the zoom).  Which reminds me, zoom isn't great, but there's so much detail in the photo that you can just crop it down and it looks just as good.In conclusion this camera accomplishes all of the following- wow your friends, fits anywhere, easy to use, takes good big pictures, takes great video, and is generaly a great dea</review_text>
Great pictures for such a small camera.I recommend this for the intermediate user who has some knowledge of depth of field and contrast as this will not replace an SLR type camera for the pro.As small as a package of cigarettes and for that matter easy to lose as sometimes you forget it's in your pocket.My wife loves this camera for it's easy to use features and portability.The Red will do as I could not find this model in the fiesta orange.A neat little camera.Love it</review_text>
This camera is pretty fast and is small enough to be kept in your pocket to be used if a photo opportunity occurs.  It also offers wide screen modes for taking videos (704x384) in addition to an excellent standard resolution (640x480).My one concern was it looked like all the pictures I took were blurry in the review screen on the back of the camera; after I take a shot, the image appears for a few seconds for review and then goes back to capture mode- and all of the review shots looked out of focus.  I uploaded the images to my computer and they looked fine.  I also went back to the camera and put it in play mode and they also looked great- so I think that the scaling of the review image (from 7.2MP t0 230K) after taking a picture is to blame for this; and (perhaps) will be fixed with a future firmware update.All in all, this is a great camera.  I keep it with me as much as possible and it has given me some awesome pictures.</review_text>
I love this camera. It has been so easy to use and there are so many accessories for it. I got it for a great price so it was definitely worth the money. I have two other Fuji cameras and a Pentax that have been great but this has been the easiest to travel with by far and the pictures come out awesome. It is small, light weight, easy to use and set, and an I-pod screen protector fits it perfectly.</review_text>
This is a very well made camera case - fits our FinePix S3000 very well.  Its only drawback, and one which is clearly identifiable from its picture - and therefore it was no surprise to us, is that it has no storage space for any batteries or other items.</review_text>
When you buy a product that is designed and meant to fulfill certain needs, just expect the best performance out of those features.The PC55 is a camera for the everyday home shooter, easy to use and made with the best SONY quality for one of the smallest MINI DV camera ever created.If you are thinking about buying this camera don't hesitate one minute, this camcorder is one of the kind, it gives you pretty much the flexibility and video quality of a regular camcorder but with the amazing bring-it-in-the-pocket size and all the coolness and attention that it brings along (let it be your best Ice breaker, believe me it works like heaven!). I work for a camera store and let me tell you: we haven't received one return of this model during the time I've worked there (8 months), which proves the high quality SONY has built into this model. I have been using mine for a few months now and all I can say is that "the product is great... period!".Let's get real, the 500 bucks you are paying for it is not for the film quality kind of movie you get in the picture (for that you need to spend at least a couple of thousand dollars) but the portability and worriless of no need of the big luggage a camcorder used to be in the past" (some times people don't realize a motorcycle couldn't be compared with a truck or vise versa).About the picture shooting option, well let's see! A camcorder is for videos and a digital camera is for photos, if you want to have them both in one package, that brings excellent quality, you'd have to spend a lot of more money than if you bought them separately, let me explain you in a few words, the average photo quality for a MINI DV camcorder is 1.3mp or lower (the same quality you get out of your cell phone camera)  to be honest with you, the manufacturers add this option just to give it an extra feature and at the same time take more money out of your pocket, with tape less digital cameras it happens the same way, the video and sound quality are very poor; so why bother paying more for a camera with both functions being excellent (there are quite a few out in the market now, starting around $1200 for models of similar size) instead buy two little cameras, one for each use, for half of the price.If you are looking for a cool, high quality & durability MINI DV camcorder with the smallest size available in its kind, The SONY DCR-PC55 is your BEST option.To finish, I just want to wish you all enjoy, more than the product, the unmemorable moments you will live with your loved ones because of this little fellow</review_text>
The camera is one of the best considering the price and the size of it. The only problem I found is that it has not a light, so you will need to buy the external one, if not all the shots that you do at night will be very dark</review_text>
If you want to capture every precious moments, this is the right camcorder for you. It's easy to operate and the video is crisp and clear. The sound is pretty good as well. You can also take still picture and video at the same time (thanks to the memory stick).Don't burn your video using your computer, it took me time to download to a CD or DVD. Instead burn them as you watch them. It's quicker that way.You will love it the first time you use it</review_text>
Had this camcorder for few months now and it has been put to a lot of use. Compact, light, and easy to carry around. Tons of features which takes getting use to since most of it is touch screen.  Battery life is pretty good. Video quality is excellent as well. Very happy with the purchase, and I have had no problems so far</review_text>
goo</review_text>
Pros: Compact, lightweight, portability, easy to use, big screen, good reproductionCons: Microphone sensitive to wind, getting used to not having a viewfinder, bad low light performance.Summary: I picked this camera as an upgrade for my old Canon ZR10. The first reason I chose it was the small size and portability. With a good light conditions, this little beast do its best shots, but in low light conditions this camera disapointed me (specially compared with mi old ZR10). Please don't buy it if you have plans to use it for stills shots because it has a low resolution.The included handycam station have all the ports (Firewire, USB, power, video) you need to conect it.The big touch screen is a must, because the screen is the only way to access the camera controls (besides some of them in the edge of the screen).You can have a camera with more characteristics and better image quality for the same price, but if your concern is the size and portability this will be your best choice in the world of the mini DV format</review_text>
I totally love this camera.  Very easy to use and beautiful pictures.  Perfect for scrapbook and give away to grandparent pictures</review_text>
This was a great value. I purchased this for my husband for Christmas and he was using it that same day. It takes great pictures and the instructions were very easy to follow. We're never disappointed with HP products</review_text>
I can't really belive the Quality of this Product until I manage to Make a Print out of my HP 8050. I may need to Upload the Picture. If You have plan to buy one camera around $100.00 I do belive this would be the Right Choice.</review_text>
The main reasons I bought this (now discontinued) model are: it has 3 ccd chips (great for color and detail, especially outdoors), it's size and feel, and the fact that it has an accessory shoe and mic input.I use it for family videos, and for short videos for our church's youth group.  The clarity is great, and the sound is good for such a small camcorder.  The backlight compensation feature works great! Battery life is about average for the industry, I recommend buying a bigger Energizer brand battery.The only gripes I have are: it doesn't have a true night-vision like Sony's Handycam, and you can't shoot in true widescreen (though there is a "widescreen mode", but it loses resolution.Bottom line: the best features for the lowest price I could find on the market.  Too bad Panasonic has discontinued this model, and replaced it with a 1 ccd model without a mic input!</review_text>
When I was looking for a camcorder, this seemed like the best bet:  it had almost all the features I wanted, although I was concerned about how it would deal with low-light situations.  Still, I was discouraged to read all the descriptions of how the camera worked with Windows; would it work with my Mac?  I emailed Panasonic to find out, and Panasonic told me I'd need to hook the camera up via firewire.So my parents got me the camera for Christmas, and they let me open it early so I'd be familiar with it when Christmas arrived.  As I glanced through the manual, I noticed with trepidation that there were more references to Windows.My husband gave me iLife '06 for Christmas and set it up before I tried out the camera.  I relaxed a bit as I used the camera; it was easy to figure out how to do stills (even while shooting video), switch between widescreen and fullscreen, record, play back, etc.  The sound seemed to be doing well, too.  So I had my sample video and still shots--would I be able to retrieve them easily in OS 10.4.8?Importing the video was a piece of cake, I found.  I plugged the camera in with the firewire we bought (it's not included, since Windows users only have to use USB), and iMovie offered to import the video as soon as I launched it.  As I played the movies, iMovie even interpreted where breaks were to make separate clips.  I exported the first three segments as a QuickTime file with medium sound quality, and my husband and his friends were still raving about how fantastic the quality was.  I was pleased with how the camera dealt with light in an indoor situation--it produced significantly better video quality than my mom's digital camera (which, admittedly, is primarily intended for stills).The USB cable is still necessary to transfer still photos to the computer.  My first impression is that stills shot during video recording are not as high-quality as stills shot separately.  A flash might help, too; the still shots give the impression of less light than the movies do.  The images aren't shockingly better than the ones produced by our hand-me-down ~2.1 MP still camera, but I'm sure they are a bit better.Figuring out the menus can be a bit confusing if you don't initially realize that the different settings on the camera (like motion vs. still) have different menu options.  We had to look in the manual to figure out how to set the time.  The most basic camera functions, though, are very intuitive.With a bigger battery than the included battery (maybe twice the capacity?), I probably got at least an hour of total operating time; I used the LCD screen for most of that time.  The viewfinder is electronic, so I can't think that it really sucks up a lot less energy than the flip-out screen, but I haven't experimented with their comparitive energy suckage.Overall, I'm extremely pleased with the camera; it's just what I was looking for.  Now I just need the disk space to support it</review_text>
I bought the Panasonic PV-GS180 2.3MP 3CCD MiniDV Camcorder to replace an earlier Panasonic model that I had had to send to their repair facility twice for various problems, and when the tape transport quit working, I decided to go for a new camera rather than send it in a third time. So I was a little concerned about the reliability of Panasonic camcorders. But I wanted to jump to 3CCD technology, and this was one of the lowest price camcorders offering that feature.I have had this camera for three months, and it has worked flawlessly for me so far. It is more compact than my previous camera, and thus by necessity the controls are closer together. This took a bit of getting used-to, but the thumb-activated joystick control is very easy to use, and enables the user to change the camera's settings quickly. The zoom control is more sensitive than the one on my previous camera, and I  still occasionally zoom in or out faster than I intended, but I just have to remember to be less ham-fingered.I was pleasantly surprised by the quality and resolution of the still images captured using the photoshoot function. Before I owned this camera, I was constantly juggling between my still and video cameras when recording the activities of my grandchildren, but now I often just use the video camera for both still and video shots.I don't notice a great deal of difference in video quality between my earlier 1 CCD camcorder and this 3 CCD one, because the colors and resolution were and are very good on both. My videos seem to exhibit less jerkiness with this one than the previous one, however, due to the EIS (Electronic Image Stabilization) function (which can be turned off if you find it makes the images a bit blurry - I don't), and also to the fact that it is smaller and thus easier to hold steady.All in all, an excellent product, which I hope will continue to work well</review_text>
I bought the GS180 prior to my trip to China. I also bought a 4 hour after-market battery; I've since bought another one. That's what you'll need if you are touring all day and using the LCD screen all of the time. With the battery, the viewfinder becomes just about useless since it doesn't tilt up.Another review says that the camera doesn't come with a lens cap; mine did. I've had a remote for my Sony Digial 8 but have only used it a few times. This camera does haves some options that are only available through the remote, though, such as audio dubing and variable speed search. It is an aftermarket accessory,Picture quality is very good. Stills taken in sunlight are also very good; however, they are subpar for low light situations.Contrels are fairly self-explantory. Outdoor stills are very acceptalbe; you can produce them while shooting video which is nice when you see something that you kow will make a good still. With a large SD card, you can shoot 1000's of these. I had an opportunity to shoot a lion dance and just fied way, clicking constanlty, getting great sitills while capturing video.I only havea couple of functions that I need to learn from the manual; the cmaaera is fairly straagiht foward. The joystick works great for moving around on the tapes that you have recorded (I avoid doing that on one I am working with so I don't mess up the time code). It really beats the membrane control panel on my old Digital 8 which is beginning to fail.The size of the camer makes it easy to carry and put ito your carryn computer bag for the plane.I shot 15 hours of tape in three weeks.  The only times I was diappointed was when the battery died before the end of a long tour day with no break to return to the hotel for recharging. With an extra batery bought in Beijing, I am prepared for further excusions.this is a great camera that is easy to use and produces good quality pictures</review_text>
It's a great, light little camera. Very handy for field work. I'm  very pleased with it. it can take still photos. I find the USB 2.0 video transfer very useful: saves me the trouble of buying and installing a firewire card.It does not get the full 5 stars because, unlike many, if not all, the previus models of the same line, it DOES NOT include the hand remote control. Too bad, because it woould have been a mayor bonus. A friend of mine has the GS65 model, which has less megapixels 'n such, BUT DOES include the remote. Heck, my manual talks about the remote and everything, kinda throws it in your face a bit. Oh well, It's still a very good camera for the price, I mean, 3 ccds, that's just too cool</review_text>
Got my hands on one of these babies this weekend for a no-budget short film.  Loved it.  So easy to use, and the picture is great.  It's true, the finished look is not "cinematic", which is a fair criticism, but for the price it is great if you're looking to upgrade to a high-def digital picture.  Watched the playback on a 16:9 widescreen TV before editing and it was beautiful.  However, you can't rely on the auto-functions.  Tried using auto-focus and auto-iris at the start, but ended up doing both manually for the most part.  A small complaint considering a real filmmaker shouldn't be using them anyway.  Otherwise, a great camera</review_text>
truly a dream come true.  even received a phone call to tell me when they would be delivering it since it is a higher dollar item.  very professional</review_text>
Camera is way better than the sony HC1. Night shooting is great and colors appear natural and there is not much noise or smudging of colors. Would recommend it in a heartbeat. My 37 inch 1980x1080 LCD becomes an window when I hook up this camera to it. Great buy</review_text>
I just recently purchased this camera, and haven't had a chance to use it professionally yet. I did use it to shoot a school event for my daughter. I shot with two cameras and the picture quality of the fx1 was beautiful(actually too good to edit in with the other camera's shots). I will definitely be buying a second one soon!! Only for the serious videographer this camera would be overkill for someone looking to shoot home videos.</review_text>
Indie Filmmaker here, always looking out for a better camera!The Sony HDV series is an astonishing technologyDon't let people tell you that the footage is "too compressed" ---- technically, it is, but once it gets on screen, it looks stunning!I haven't done much filming with this camera ---- but I have seen its footage and edited its footageBoth on television and the computer monitor, I was impressed with its 'look' ---- very detailed and extremely clearEditing was a BREEEEEZE with this footage! I edited on Final Cut Pro and could composite 5 layers all above each other, each with a different opacity, and FCP's real time engine kept up without having to render! Thus, the compressed footage makes editing EASY - but Sony has managed to make a beautiful picture out of this stuff tooFor the Indie Filmmakers out there ---- test one out before purchasing..... I find the Sony HDV to be the most clear look out there --- emulating a beautifully shot NFL game on HD..... but for cinematic looks, I still may stick with the Panasonic DVX100, as there is a more cinema feel to that onehope that helpsHAPPY BUYING!!!</review_text>
The quality of the HD video is equal to that of HDTV cable and DBS channels</review_text>
Hello, I bought my Sony HDR-FX1 about a month ago from amazon.com and let me just say that this camera is amazing. The resolution, when on a computer is 1920x1080. That right there is enough to sell the camera! Its great for me because i work with CG and CMI, the higher the resolution, the more accurate you can be. This is also great for blue/greenscreening as the high resolution, and the amazing color. There are several different modes to shoot in (all are customizable) you will mostly want to make sure you shoot in Cinemaframe30 or Cinemaframe24 because it will look just like film. You can also adjust how much color is allowed in, standard it is at "0" but you can up the color so much that its more vibrant then most movies. The new willy wonka movie has broad, powerful colors and this camera can easily achieve that. I would talk more about this camera but im out of time (great DOF). So dont get stuck in the Canon Xl2 fad where you pay 3,000 more dollars for a crappier camera</review_text>
Every great camera needs great editing software. I am sure most people already know, but ALL of Apple's editing programs support the HDV format of this camera natively, WITHOUT the need to purchase any additional video cards.This is true for Apple's Final Cut Pro HD, Final Cut Express HD and even for iMovie HD!High definition video from this camera can be edited even on an iBook with the new iMovie HD right out of the box. This is what I call truely amazing</review_text>
Addendum 3/30:  To correct the guy correcting me 2 reviews above. In regular mini-dv mode with widescreen, there is definitely a wider picture.  Focus on one item and switch modes, you will see the picture get wider.  HD mode is anamorphic 4:3 - stretched to fit 16x9, but keeps the aspect ratio so everything doesn't look stretched. I've run tests and know what I am saying. Do you?Recently shot my Uncle's wedding in Widescreen, and played the video back on his widescreen TV. The aspect ratio of the image is accurate and not stretched.  Yes, this shoots in widescreen, but not in hi-def at the same time.Original review:My first "prosumer" camcorder I ever owned and I love it. The color reproduction is phenomenal and has great features.  A few caveats may scare away people looking for something more, but this is more of a VERY HIGH END consumer item. Not for the novice, but someone with more shooting talent than the average person. If you want a TRUE HD professional camera, spend 15+ grand and stop knocking this one.A bother to me was that regular mini-dv can record in true 16:9 mode. While the HD mode is anamorphic 4:3. (Stretched to fit 16:9) The wide-angle lens can fix that for about $500 more.But if you are transferring to regular DVD's, you can still shoot mini DV widescreen because DVD doesn't record in HD.So, unless you are transferring to HD DVD, like blu-ray, you have the BEST consumer/prosumer widescreen camcorder available.Rated at about 3lux, low light doesn't harm this baby much. I find the accessories can be pricey too, but that is the cost you pay when you go prosumer.  Everything else is for beginners and amateurs.Tip: Get a long life battery.  Sony 970 is recommended for longest life, but the 960 served me well for a days shooting/standby with plenty time left over. Get the light too!Did I mention women love men with big camcorders? {:-pNP-970 Battery:http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/tg/detail/-/B0006G3BHW/ref=cm_aya_asin.title/002-0715528-1432846?%5Fencoding=UTF8&v=glanc</review_text>
I am a student filmmaker and I just bought this camera from sonystyle.com. Its a great consumer camcorder. It does not offer true HD picture quality but it does offer true HD resolution. If you want a HD camera that rivals film cameras expect to spend 50 to 100 thousand dollars.The best thing about the camera is its resolution and true 16:9 aspect ratio. If you hate the 16:9 squeeze mode on other camcorders this is the camcorder for you. some people are disappointed about the camcorder lacking a progressive scan mode, 720p. its debated if 720p is true HD. the HDR-FX1 shoots 1080i which is true HD resolution. If 1080i shot progressive scan it would go outside the bandwidth limit. So if you plan to transfer it to film one should get software with de-interlacing capabilities.Over all the minor flaws will piss off professionals, but they have to realize at the moment true HD is only 1080i not 1080p. The lack of XLR inputs will also hurt the camcorder but there are ways around that to. One big worry is the amount of compression that occurs while shoot HDV on a MiniDV tape. From what I have experience the compression is not a major factor to worry about yet until I do more testing. Over all this is a superior camcorder compared to regular DV camcorders. 24p is not the only thing that give the film look. Aspect ratio and detail are very important as well. The resolution and detail is far superior to any other consumer camcorder. If detail and resolution are top of your list, than this is the camcorder for you, once the editing software comes out for it</review_text>
I shopped around for a while before I bought this camera.  I checked out many reviews and I have to say, I'm VERY happy with this camera.  I wanted something that worked in low light.  This was the most important feature I was looking for.  I had a Canon video camera, and I now have very few videos of my daughter growing up because if there wasn't enough light it would make interference on the tape.  This camera works very well with normal indoor lighting.  You don't have to turn on extra lights.  (It also has nightvision which works in very low light)The only complaints I have are 1) the battery doesn't last more than an hour - but I don't video that long anyway 2) the memory stick doesn't hold many pictures - but I'm spoiled with my digital camera holding lots.In general, I would highly recommend this camera.  You can download the video to you PC really easily and burn it to DVD.Oh, and in some reviews it mentions that the zoom is hard to use.  I don't find that to be true at all.  It is sensitive, but not hard to use.</review_text>
after six months of use it's one of the best handycam i ever tried, you just need to get an extra battery and of course a touch screen protector.update: Now it's almost 18 month with this handycam, i love it, its simple so my kids can use it with the easy button  and for the professional you still can go deeper in the setting and set it. it worth every penny i paid for it</review_text>
Tons of features, love the touch screen!  Easy to use in "Easy Mode"  Superior picture quality.  Typical Sony stuff, ya gotta love it</review_text>
Was upgrading from an old Sony Trv-130 hi-8 digital camcorder. What a difference in every aspect. From size to options to exposure there is no comparison. What almost looked dull pale reddish, bordering on black and white and full of high grain from my old 130 now comes out crisp, colorful with no real visible grain from the HC90. Unfortunately as with any camera this camera will perform the best in adequate light. My problem with my trv-130 was that I do mostly shooting indoors and pro lighting setups on a whim are unrealistic for me so I have to make do with 100 watt bulbs and they do the trick with this camera. Awesome color, and crisp detail and I really lovethe true widescreen and progressive modes. They give my videos a unique film like look to them. Other than that you will love this cameras low light capability which was the clincher for me in getting this unit. That all the features combined make it a must buy</review_text>
The DCR-HC90 is a fantastic little camcorder that performs well in all types of settings. It might be the best consumer camcorder for recording in low/dim light. For more information, photos and clips, visit my website:(...</review_text>
This flash has a powerful blast and many bonus controls. Like the three second flashing option, where you can negotiate all the shadow and lighting options before having to actually shoot your first shot</review_text>
This is one of the best bargains that i've seen, "essentially" you get 3 filters for the price of one. The image quality with these filters is great, the 812 (warming) filter is by far a favorite giving back the color richness that flash photography so often washes out, that is unless you have the patience for constantly tweaking your flash power. Aside from the 812 the UV protector is basically a clear protective filter. While it obviously has advantages over clear glass, I tend not to think of it as any different. This too is a great filter which I use about half the time because it doesn't affect color hues or change f stop values too greatly while it takes the worry out of carrying the camera around ready for any candid shots that may occur. Finally included is the circular polarizer. This filter adjusts the amount of uv light entering the camera by spinning the filter to the direction the uv rays are entering (or turning the thingy till things look better). This lens is great for sunny days and will take surface glare off lakes and glass making them transparent again. It also makes colors more crisp in general when photographing buildings and other large "reflective" man-made things. So things sound great so far, but now to why I only give this item 4 stars. While Tiffen is known to be one of the best at photo and video filters, they have quality control issues that do no live up to thier reputation. In my case the 812 filter arrived with a discoloration in the glass. While it was didn't hurt image quality, with the flaw being towards the edge of the filter, I none the less didn't want to find a situation in which the flaw would diminish quality. Seeing as it was not amazon's fault my first e-mail went to Tiffen for a replacement which they said they would gladly do, but only after I send them the filter and they recieve it would they ship my replacement (not an option in my circumstances). Instead Amazon's wonderful customer service shown through again, and within 3 days they had replaced the entire set. The second set arrivided without flaw but since my other two filters were in perfect condition I traded just the 812. I havn't had any other issues and i'm very satisfied with my filters. The only other word of warning would be to that of the circular polorizer. While I recieved 2 that were flawless occassionally I have read in reviews customers have received ones that were assembled backwards making the lens useless. A quick way to check to see if your CP is working correctly is to hold it, thread facing yourself, and look at an LCD monitor or TV and spin it until the picture dissapears(obviously working correctly). I still wouldn't pass up this deal knowing what I do now, chances are everything will show up perfectly but none the less if you're concerned order it before you need it and check everything over carefully. Amazon is always the best for returns and will often ship a replacement the next day with overnight shipping.And a little further insight...I was recently doing some black and white film photography, and decided to use my 812 warming filter as a protective lens as I was carrying 3 lenses with me. Just thought that I would mention that using this filter will produce a "White" sky in some outdoor photographs. The shots were taken with a gradient blue sky to which the entirety showed up white, even on bracketed sets, that should have shown something in one of the series. While itself was a interesting effect for some shots, it mostly just caused me frustration in the darkroom. I just wanted to add this as fair warning. I discovered this on accident, so I don't know if it applies to all sky conditions as I didn't do a lot B&W sky shots, I might test it using Photoshop later as I see they have the 812s effect built in. Anyways, good luck and have fun photoing</review_text>
I usually buy a set of filters for each size lens I have. Tiffen has always provided great value. These are no exception. I would recommend these to everyone</review_text>
I too purchased this camera online. I believe that the camera itself took quality photos, but upon the lense no longer telescoping. I contacted the repair line only to find out that they quoted me $150 for the repair! I could not locate my receipt, even though I purchased it new online and registered it, they would only say, "no receipt, no warranty". Valuable lesson learned.Keep receipt... nice camera</review_text>
I have never been an avid photographer, preferring much more to experience and enjoy the moment rather than fumbling around with a camera trying to get the perfect shot.  This camera, with its ease of use and great picture quality, gives me the best of both worlds.  I've had it for over 6 months now and have been very pleased with it.  The only reason I give it 4 stars instead of 5 is for one piece of misleading advertising.  The camera is touted as running on AA batteries, but when you read the manual you learn that "standard" AA alkaline batteries are not recommended.  You must use lithium or rechargeable batteries instead.  This is probably the reason for many reviewer complaints about battery life and about the camera shutting itself off - it just doesn't run on alkalines.  But I've had no problems running it on lithiums and rechargeables.I also can't make any recommendations about the software one way or the other.  I did the custom setup and installed the USB drivers only, which work fine.  I use Adobe Photoshop Elements to do my editing and am thrilled with the results</review_text>
I'm fifteen years old, and photography is a major hobby of mine already.  I had been using my father's way-out-of-date 2.1 megapixel camera for about 2 years, and wanted an upgrade to a better camera.  When I was searching, this was not on my list of cameras to buy.  I was looking at ones such as the much more slim Sony Cyber Shot DSC-W5.  I made sure to give my mom a list of all of the ones I wanted, since Christmas was approaching fast.When I opened my gifts and found the Z700, I wasn't sure what to think, and I admit I may have been a bit ungrateful.  From the package, it appeared to be clumsy to hold, because since I'm left-handed I tend to take pictures up-side-down so that I can hold a camera with my left hand.  The design of this prohibited me from doing that, because the grip on the side was a bit awkward and manufactured for right hands.  It also appeared really bulky against other cameras I've seen, because the grip plus how far the lense zooms out makes it a big camera compared to others.  It also runs on normal batteries, but it CANNOT use alkaline.  They last all of about 5 shots.  You have to buy either special batteries from Kodak, or lithium batteries, both of which are extremely expensive.  With my first few uses, it was hard getting used to the large design, and the LCD screen was smaller than I had expected as well.After about a month or two, I started getting used to it.  Once I got past the size, I realized it takes very crisp pictures.  The digital zoom is useless because it adds pixelation, but the normal zoom is very good by itself.  The LCD pretty much washes out in bright light, but the viewfinder is very helpful.  THe same happens in low light.  It has a lot of settings that are found to be useful, such as night portrait, night landscape, text and documents, and self-portrait.  The sports setting is also useful.  It's hard to focus on closeup stuff in auto mode, but the self-portrait option takes care of any closeup stuff.  It is also a heavy camera, which makes it feel a lot more sturdy than some of the lightweight aluminum cameras now.  The dial is a little hard to turn, and the buttons are a little hard to press, but everything is really easy to figure out, and you'll be taking great pictures in no time</review_text>
I use the camera for taking pics for our commercial web site and the photos are very good.  Easy to work with, light weight, the auto-focus works well.  The manual settings are easy to figure out too.You don't need to install the software for many computers:  just insert the card into the slot and there might already be software that was included with the pc.  Also don't need the docking station if you have a media drive.I haven't had problems with excessive battery consumption nor sudden shutting off.  I think many of the camera brands have pulled back on quality control in favor of mass production.  If the camera fails quickly, you can return it.  I had an Olympus (which I loved) die after a couple of years and the repair costs would have been as much as a new camera.  It's not just Kodak.And for sure, get an extra memory card and use that.</review_text>
I love this product. I'm not much of a camera person. But it takes great pictures. Two other people I know both have it and they love it too.</review_text>
A winning combo! The 4MP digital camera takes vivid pictures and will allow clear enlargements up to 11" x 14". The 5X optical zoom lets you get a little closer look than most 3X optical zoom digital cameras. The neatest feature on this camera is the built-in lens cap that automatically shields the lens when the camera is turned off. Kodak digital cameras are #1 in ease of use for a reason - they are point-and-shoot simple for everyday users, but have the extra settings to tweak if you want more specific control. This camera will take compressed video clips depending on the size of your memory card. You will want to purchase a larger SD memory card than what is included with the package. With the included cords, you can hook the camera up to a TV to view pictures you have taken or have it display a live view. This is indispensible if you are babysitting. Kids love to see themselves on TV! The printer dock Series 3 lets you dock the camera to recharge the batteries, print pictures, and one-touch transfer the pictures to a computer for touch-up or emailing. You don't need to have the computer on to print pictures. It will print 4 x 6" or smaller multiples of a picture. The photo paper and cartridge refills are available online or from most large retailers. They aren't cheap, but it lets you have your own photo lab at home. Hard to beat the Amazon price.Camera + printer dock = pictures, prints, battery charger, and computer interface.</review_text>
This camera is a lot of fun. It's not just for snapshots; many pictures can be distorted through the Fisheye lens for artistic pictures</review_text>
This camera is sure to give you a new photo experience. Although it takes a little practice to get perfect photos, the result is definitely something you have never experienced! Unmatched by other cameras, the fisheye lens has become a favorite of mine. I'd recommend this camera to anyone wanting to get some interesting and beautiful pictures</review_text>
This is a great, fun camera. Just load the film and shoot. It's easy to use and easy to sneak up on your subject because theirs no focusing and fooling with it. You can use the camera with one hand, including turning the wheel to the next frame. Worth the low price</review_text>
Being a long time photo nut, for the holidays, my wife bought me the fish eye, in gold no less.I shot Fujicolor 400, took pictures of my car from all kinds of crazy angles, streets, people, all were shot with the awarness that the viewfinder just was an aid.Took the the film into a one hour developer, with the following instructions, no prints, just do the negatives and put them on a cd, he did that,got them home and viewed them.They were wonderful, did a little work on them with Picasa 2 and converted some to black and white, it seems like artwork.Today in Queens NY, Floyd Bennet Naval Air Station, the Concord was taken off the deck of the Intrepid and is now on view to the Public, am taking the Lomo with me, should be fascinating.My only negative about the Fisheye is that the film advance is a bit raggedy, but really works fine.I love this camer</review_text>
This camera is a pretty basic cheap film camera, but it takes surprisingly good photos.  I love how some of my photos came out with it, I caught a hot air balloon show, and the fish eye view makes it look totally surreal.  this is definitely worth the money</review_text>
everything was great about this camera. the shipping was quick (2 days), no problems with the product, it was everything i asked for. i was hesitant to purchase this item because i was unsure if it came with a lens cap, which it did</review_text>
This lens is a good way to extend the capabilities of a general purpose camera for an amature photographer. Overall all quality and color accuracy of the digital images is good.  The large lens diameter blocks the view finder, forcing one to rely on LCD screen for framing.  The camera sometimes gets confused during action shots taking longer than normal to auto focus - a minor inconvenience.Lens requires an adapter - a seperate piece to keep track of.</review_text>
I've owned a PowerShot G5 for better than three years now, and while I've never used any of the lens accessories, I couldn't be happier with it.  I also have an EOS A2 and it met all of my needs for a film camera.  I thought I would be giving up a lot when I got the G5 to go digital, but so far, I haven't been disappointed.  In fact, I've been surprised with how good the G5 is; since I bought my G5 I haven't even once picked up my A2, let alone actually used it.  The G5 does everything I need it to do.  The one and only drawback of it compared to my A2 is that it took me a little while to get used to the longer latency between shots; with my A2 I got used to having lighting fast latency (the A2's built in powerwinder goes at 6 fps) so it was a bit of an adjustment, but I'm not a sports photographer, so I've learned to live with it.My next camera will also be a Canon digital, but I'm going to make sure to get one that's got a good latency between shots that replicates the powerwind on my A2</review_text>
let me explain what this really does because i had to buy it to understand.  MAybe that is me :)  ok what this does is basically "pull" you back into the camera more.  so that when you are taking a picture you can actually see the outlining of the lens, making it a circle picture.  not what i was expecting but its interesting i am new to "real" photography so i am not sure if this is usefull or a really good thing but i just wanted to make it clear what it really does so you do not have to spend the money to buy it :</review_text>
I never thought I would brag about a point and shoot camera, but the Canon G6 is remarkable. And, the add-on lens is equally suprising. Granted, this is not an interchangeable SLR lens, but it's great for use with all the subjects one would shoot with this camera. I am glad I chose the Canon brand lens. Note: I use the Lensmate adapter.</review_text>
Very nice.  Attractive and stylish.  Fits in purse, very compact. Has good clasp, well made from good leather. Places for spare chips.Not one thing I was disappointed in. not disappointed in any thing about the case.You will be pleased with this product</review_text>
I'm anal about a lot of things.  This item makes me feel good about it.  I keep all my spare batteries in it in my backpack.  I always have batteries, and I always no which are ready to go and which are dead.  If you carry a camera or any electronic device that uses AA or AAA batteries and you are needing to get them out of the bottom of your bag or purse, this is what you'll need</review_text>
I have been looking for something exactly like this ever since I bought my digital camera. I have used several kinds of boxes, including a cassette tape case. I am presently using my cell phone leather case and would like to put it back to where it belongs.  I like this so much I may buy some for my Brother and Father to use for thier cameras. Thanks a million and keep up the good work....</review_text>
I have been a Nikon user for nearly ten years. My first Nikon was a used N70 and I loved it. It wasn't until after I read a review that I learned it was supposed to be confusing, somewhat difficult to master, and not quite up to Nikon's standards. I loved the results and loved my Nikon camera. When the N70 needed repairs and the cost was prohibitive, I purchased its replacement, the Nikon N80 which in all likelihood will be my last film camera (I've just purchased the Nikon D70S).The N80 has the best features of the N70: an automatic mode and programs for portrait, landscape, night shots, action shots, and close up, settings that allow for manual focus and the ability to set specific apertures and shutter speeds, bracketing, and red eye reduction. It has more features than the N60, but works in a similar manner omitting some of the dials of the N70 that seemed to confuse many people who were used to earlier Nikon models. It's a light weight camera with an excellent. The features are easy too master and it allows a person to take sophisticated and creative photographs. It's also sturdy and I hope to use it for many years to come.My guess is that some people reading this review may be asking should I invest $300 for a film camera when I could also purchase a digital SLR camera for just a bit more. Digital is the wave of the future and the future is now, there's no question about that, and as I mentioned I own a digital camera. I believe that a  film camera teaches a person to be a more careful photographer. I see a lot of people take lousy digital shots figuring they can be erased and miss great shots. While it is true that with digital the results can be seen, the screen is awfully small and until the images are downloaded and viewed on eth computer, what appears to be a great shot may in fact be junk. Film cameras teach the photographer to carefully frame  a photograph if for no other reason than film costs money. Photography is also supposed to be fun, and seeing the results of film whether it be prints or slides can be fun. Also even though Photoshop can create a black and white portrait for a digital shot, nothing will ever beat the darkroom experience. Most serious amateurs and professionals I know use both digital and film and I'm assuming that for the foreseeable future I'll be using digital for candid shots and film for scenics, landscapes, and nature shots. If you are serious about taking good photographs and are looking for a film camera, the Nikon N80 is an excellent choice. It is reasonably priced for what it offers, is easy to use, and allows for the opportunity to take great photographs. To me, it's well worth the investment.</review_text>
I've been a serious amateur and occassional professional photographer for over 40 years. My experience spans the early SLR entries up to the present.I've also been a long-time Nikon groupie. In my opinion, they manufacture the best equipment of this type available, though in recent years the quality provided by a few of the tops seems to be closing the gap. By that I mean Canon specifically.That having been said, I'm the type of photographer that drags around a select few lenses and a couple of bodies so I can mix and match lenses and films.Speaking of which (films): I am not technology-averse. I love the idea of digital. I shoot home movies direct to DVD on Sony equipment. I also scan my 35MM negs/prints using the Canon 9950F (an excellent print scanner) or Nikon 5000ED Coolscan (the best slide/neg scanner)to digital files for further action in Photoshop.HOWEVER, that being said, I still shoot my stills in 35MM film.Several reasons:  Current digital camera bodies simply do not afford the flexibility in speed, sensitivity, or versatility that film does.I HATE the fact that the CMOS sensors effectively double the focal length of all my lenses (with currently only one exception, by Canon, I think).I'm recording my images to the only currently available archival medium: film. Yes, I know bytes and bits are supposedly archival. But 50 years from now, is your DVD still going to be readable by any then-current technology? Remember Beta? Or 8 track tapes?However, Daguerre's and Matthew Brady's prints(both from the 19th Century) still will be. As will mine -- and yours if you shoot in film.That having been said, a few years back, as I decided my eyes no longer afforded me the luxury of manual focus and I decided to go for the auto-focus capabilities now available, I stuck with Nikon and bought my first N-80.I am so happy I did! This camera is simply outstanding in every way, affording you the ability to use it as a simple point-and-shoot if you wish (due to its extremely fast and sharp system coupled with the Matrix Metering system, and on-board pop-up flash), as well as the option to take direct control over every aspect of the creative photo process with intuitive and easy-to-use systems.I liked it so much that a couple of years later I bought a second as a backup and system enhancer (meaning two loaded bodies with different lens/film combinations).An additional benefit is that as the current fad seems to be toward digital bodies, N-80 prices have gone down significantly.An interesting phenomenon that merits a quick observation: in order to get the same quality of resolution available with a good film/camera body/lens combination as far as cropping or enlargment capability goes, you have to spend in the neighborhood of $3000 to $4000 for a body-only camera, and you're STILL limited as to the duplication of film sensitivity. Try duplicating a 3000ASA film speed on a digital camera. Good luck! You'll be blasted by "noise" on the image; what we used to call "grain" for film, i.e. a loss of resolution and sharpness.I'm finally making the move up to my next big camera purchase. Guess what? It's a Nikon F-5. Another film body. What does that tell you?Buy this camera! It's great!</review_text>
I bought this camera almost a year ago before I went on a trip to Italy... I was kind of worried about it because I had never had an SLR before, but I really wanted one, and I wanted to make sure I didn't have cheap looking pictures from my trip which I often had before.It worked perfectly!  I only got a chance to use one roll of film on it before I went, but ALL of the pictures came out great!  I just love this camera, I still use it all of the time.  I am learning all of the features, like how to use the bulb setting.  I used it for 4th of July fireworks, and they also came out wonderfully.I would highly recommend this camera</review_text>
I have had several digital cameras, including the Nikon 8700, I feel that digital is still got a way to go, they are wonderful, yet can be very tiring, printing gobs of prints for friends and family is tiring , tedious and expensive.The cameras unless using some exotic means still cannot focus well in low light, also dont like taking pictures at a place and the whole world standing over my shoulder.Soooo, happily back to film with the N80 and a Nikon 28-100 Nikon that I bought in a kit.Its so great to be back in film, now I can get some control back.As far as the N 80, it really is beautiful done and highly intuitive to use, well made, features are wonderful, a joy to own and use.  I made the right move, know that now, shot a few roles of Kodak Color 200, results were so good, if I still want to get lazy, can have the photo processor put the shots on a disc, havnt done it yet, enjoying the prints too much, think I,ll run out and get some Echtekchrome. Photography is an important component for me in my life, the N80 is bringing it all back in a slick very competent manner and I completely enjoy it</review_text>
As a serious student photographer who worked with old metal bodied all manual SLRs I thought the transition to an automatic camera would be difficult. Too many cameras on the market are made of cheap, lightweight plastic that feels like it's going to crumble in my hands. I like a camera that has weight to it, but won't require a visit to the chiropractor after a day of shooting. The N80 is great for this. It has a very solid construction, and a comfortable, weighted feel in my hands. The grips on both sides are well sized and well placed and I feel that I have optimal control at all times.The thing that sold me on this camera over similar models was its ease of use. As someone who never wants to read an instruction manaul, but still wants to use the bells and whistles, this was a great camera. The controls are the most intuitive I've seen on any camera of its kind, whether you're on your way to becoming a professional, or you're just starting out, the combination of versatility and ease of use is perfect.It's extemely self explanatory to change from automatic/program mode, to aperture priority, to shutter priority. Its also easy to use the timer and the multiple exposure controls. bracketing, similarly is easier. I've had the camera ofr 6 months and enver needed to consult the instruction book, hopwever there are many features I can explore in the book if I so choose.The focusing is about the same as you get for most cameras in this price range. The focus lock works very well, as do the zones. The on;y problem is focusing in low light conditions, but this is typical of these cameras.Overall, I've found this camera to be a perfect blend of great price, great variety of accessories, utter ease of use, and bells and whistles for the serious student or amateur or aspiring professional</review_text>
Just got the camera and from what I've seen so far it is a wonderful piece of equipment.  My only complaint is that Amazon misrepresented the battery type saying it is, "powered by EN-EL3a or EN-EL3" which is not true and disappointing to anyone who is upgrading from a camera that does use those batteries (ie D70)  The D200 uses the EN-EL3e which doesn't have the same fit as the EN-EL3a or EN-EL3.Be aware of this if you are upgrading</review_text>
This is my 2nd Digtial SLR.  In the film days, I was using Nikon products.  In my initial foray into digital photography, I switched to Canon (10D) just to see what's on the other side of the fence.  After about three years, I switched back to Nikon because the Nikon products suits me better.No, this is not a "Canon sucks, Nikon rules" review.  One thing I learned about digital photography is that you should really decide not on the camera body itself, but on the whole lineup...including the lenses and accessories.  For me, the Nikon lens line-up works for me better, not because Canon has worse line-up...I'm sure a lot of photographers find the Canon line-up much more sensible.Now, on to the camera itself: I've own this camera for over a year and has sold a number of stock images using this camera.  Suffice to say, I'm very satisfied with its performance; I'm not going to re-iterate the praises that's been said in the previous reviews.What I am compelled to say are the not-so-great characteristics of this camera: in ISO400 and above, it is not very forgiving to underexposure.  if you did not nail the exposure, even in RAW you will see noise in the shadow area when you try to correct the exposure in the RAW software converter.  This is why you hear a lot of whining from D200 owners regarding "noise."  Most of them don't nail exposure the first time and try to adjust in RAW converter...and then BAM! noise in the shadows.Auto White balance becomes iffy as well in underexposure; everything becomes biased to magenta in underexposure; and this is very hard to correct even in post-processing.The Nikon Creative Lighting System is I believe the feature that makes Nikon a little better than Canon in artificial lighting exposure.  Basically, Nikon has designed their flash system with multiple flashes in mind.The Nikon auto-focus engine is better than most Canon folks tend to evangelize.  With AFS lenses I'm positive it's as fast as any Canons.  If there's one thing I would like to change in future iterations of this product: I NEED MORE THAN ONE CROSS-TYPE AF POINTS!  The newer Pentax DSLR has NINE out of its 11 AF points!  This is beneficial to a more accurate focus.So my recommendation...if you already have Nikon lenses, and thinking if it's worth the price difference to jump from a D40/D50/D70.  It's unequivocably a "YES."  If you're just starting with a DSLR system, I say look closely on what Nikon/Canon/Pentax/Olympus/Leica/Sigma has to offer as a whole system then decide.  IF you decide on Nikon, you won't be yearning to own a higher D2-series model with this camera; it's almost the same feature set at a lower price</review_text>
A great choice for first time buyers. This camera is easy to learn and it has advanced features that you can learn as you go... and when you master these you will realize that you are shooting like a pro.The vast array of nikon lenses and accessories were a big selling point for me as was the ability to control Nikon speedlights remotely via the camera for some really great shooting setups.The D200 is my dream come true. It provides all the professional features that an amateur would want at a price that is affordable.The D200 incorporates most of the latest enhancements available in digital imaging including a 10 megapixel censor, MATRIX II metering, detailed battery indicator, large buffer for continuous shoots and much much more.Buy this Nikon</review_text>
The Nikon D200 is an amazing camera. This review is about Amazon packing procedures.This review is to alert prospective buyers that Amazon does not pack these cameras well. I just purchased one and it came packed like a book, with very little padding. I called Nikon and their recommendation was to return the item pronto. I have returned the camera (with much trepidation)and will purchase from another trusted source. Just wanted to give you all a heads up</review_text>
The ergonomics: Perfect. The D200 is not completely rubber-encased. There's rubber where your hands need to hold it, and plastic where your hands rarely touch it. The hand grip is comfortable and nicely concave where the tips of your fingers can dig in.The battery door and the memory card door are made of plastic, and hinge-pinned. A simple slide latch opens the battery door....and some have warned the latch could be easily (accidentally) tripped. The memory card door latch, however, uses a more secure 45 degree pivoting latch.USB 2 and Video Out/DC-in doors are made of flexible rubber, and these doors extend into the body of the camera as the hinges themselves.The English language operating manual is a work of art. Each operating concept is alpha' & numerically numbered at the pictoral diagram, and to the page where the function is explained in perfect English. The reader will quickly catch on to how this well thought out manual is organized.I like the depth of field preview, the mirror lock-up, and the multiple-exposure capability.The continuous servo autofocus does a better job than any human at following and focusing on any moving object.If you have the old manual-focus, film-based Nikon SLR lenses from the '70's and '80's, except for a few rare exceptions, will fit on the D200.All these positive attributes remind me of the best, most highly-evolved film camera SLR's. No wonder so many photographers have been won over to digital media.</review_text>
I have been waiting for an affordable Nikon digital SLR on which I could use my older Nikon lenses (AI, Series E, etc.).  I know, I could have spent thousands on a D2, but that would have been overkill for me.  Suffice to say, the D200 is a joy to use.  It is fast, solid, and intuitive.  For those owners of Nikon film SLRs who are considering a D200, to me it "feels" just like a Nikon film SLR.  I have previously owned several high-end digital point and shoot cameras, and the D200 blows them away in terms of its capabilities, the degree of control it offers, and the resulting quality of the pictures you can take with it.  It has all the features an advanced amateur photographer could possibly want.  I'll probably never even scratch the surface of all of its features, but its nice to know they're there if I want or need them.  I highly recommend the D200 to anyone who, like me, has been waiting for the right digital SLR to come along</review_text>
Nikon has always been the leader in photography/ camera/ lenses.  Others have nobly tried but a Nikon remains the high bar that others only hope to reach.When the shift from film to digital began, there was some speculation if Nikon could keep up with the competition.  Well, rest assure that not only have they kept up, they continue to lead the way.  The latest example of this is the D200.Like the D70/ D80 - this is a solid piece of equipment.  Just the feel of it tells you that you are holding an excellent piece of technology.  But the proof will always be in the end results and again, the combination of the Nikon know-how and Nikon lenses lead even a beginner to come up with excellent pictures.Gone is the "lag between shots".  You can fire up and shoot multiple pictures in seconds so action shots are all yours.  Without even "tweaking" a picture with a computer program, you can print top of the line photos at home.People have cited the cons:  Expensive.  Yes.  The camera does come with a hefty price tag but it should be kept in mind that this is a piece of machinery intended for serious photographers.  If you are a "vacation and holiday" picture taker, then you should elect to buy a cheaper camera.  The same is true with the difficulty of the multitude of small buttons, dials and switches.  There are too many and they can be overwhelming but only to someone who is in the "point and shoot" school of picture taking.  Anyone else will relish the options that Nikon has provided us with on the D200.Room for improvement?  Well, the battery life is nowhere near as good as the D70 which I upgraded from but that is a weak complaint as you can still get hundreds of shots on one charge.  Also, it would be a boon if the flash would automatically pop up when needed like in former models.So if you are serious about photography and always have one at the ready, this is the one for you</review_text>
My first professional digital SLR was the Nikon D1X.  I got great pictures with it but it was too large and heavy to lug around for extended periods.  I also had some issues with its operation.  But now, Nikon seems to have solved my issues with the D200.  I purchased the dedicated SB-800 flash and 18-200 lens recommended in the D200's manual.  The whole system is much improved over my other digital SLR.  Both focus and metering seem to work more reliably.  It works better in available light.  The optical anti-vibration aids in overall picture sharpness (plus for those of us who are not rock-steady).  I am getting use to the button sequence required to enlarge the picture preview and really like the amount of magnification possible.  The menuing system seems quite extensive and well-organized.  I would like more latitude in the picture quality settings (e.g. contract, saturation, and sharpness).  The help screens really tell me something when I'm confused.  I appreciate the "modeling" feature.  It is useful when attempting to compose in a dark situation.  It also lets me see reflections BEFORE they are committed to the picture.  Unfortunately this feature does not work using the built-in flash.  I wish Nikon could add some type of lock on the continuous-single-manual focus selector on the front of the camera.  My finger seems to move that switch unknowingly.  I would appreciate a battery charger with a built in plug rather than the detachable cord.  As a person who still wears thick glasses, I wish Nikon could make the viewfinder more like the one on their old N8008.  Or maybe it's time to do away with pentaprisoms and mechanical mirrors  and give us a truly pro camera that mimics the high-end pro-sumer models with electronic viewfinders and adjustable view screens</review_text>
I think the point a lot of people are not mentioning about the d200 is quite obvious.  Let me be the first to say that the main reason I bought the d200 over the d80 was to increase my credibility and prestige as an amateur photographer, make other photographers jealous of my kit, and to brag about the obscene amount of money I spend on camera equipment while my co-workers can't even pay their rent.  I bought the grip because I thought it looked really cool, and it increased the size and visibility of my camera to other people.  The question that really sold me on the d200 was: will strangers that I might want to photograph be more likely to say yes standing on the other side of a d80 or a d200?  Will people have less doubts about me holding this thing opposed to a smaller model?  Which one looks cooler?If I was completely loaded would I buy the D2Xs? Without a second thought.Of course I talked to a lot of camera people making minimum wage hoping that they would have some technical insight about purchasing a Nikon or other camera.  Of course they let me down and said a lot of bogus things to me most saying something like: "the d200 is way to much camera for me."  None of them knew how to change the exposure settings, they were contented with the wheel and "child mode," on top of the d80 and recited this to me several times as if I looked like a soccer mom.  As usual I was offended by the human experience of buying in the real world, especially the atrocious mark up of several hundred dollars, I refused to help pay those employees wages.  The breaking point I think was the time an associate instructed me to buy one camera over the other because, "when she dropped this camera it broke and the other one didn't."  So I turned to the internet where I only have to say hi to the UPS man as he leaves.I studied and studied all things technical, sometimes just staring at pictures of cameras for long periods of time without blinking.  I poured over thousands of photographs taken by all kinds of cameras and amassed a photographic library while I decided.  Basically I went way overboard and let the decision of buying a camera engulf my life until I was dreaming about it.So one night I just bought the d200 after being on the fence over the d80 or the d200.  And after two days it arrived and I was impressed with it.  The thing is literally a cold hard photographic machine.After being broken in on the d50 I was firstly impressed with the size, and then secondly all of the dials and switches to change things that I used to have to dig through the menu to get to.  Thirdly I liked the blazing fast 2 frame rate.When I go out at night I snap the 50mm f/1.8 onto it and crank the iso up.  A lot of people in the forms were complaining about the noise in the high iso of the d200 but I thought it was fine.  I feel most people from that camp want perfect clarity all the way up into the highest isos but I think that is artistically limiting.  I read one scathing review written by a veteran film user saying that basically high iso in digital has a lot less graininess than film basically saying that the d200 is a step up but some people still want to complain.  As far as the d200 goes versus the d50 at iso 1600 it is leaps and bounds better in my opinion.  The noise is way reduced without NR and there isn't that pixel chunkiness I found in the d50 at high isos.Another thing that stands out on the d200 is the enhanced colors.  In reality the ultra vivid setting on the d200 makes a lot of things look sort of fake, but it does make people who don't have a sun tan look like they have one which is a plus in my opinion.  It can make your dull green lawn look like a lush paradise, skies are ultra blue, and reds are spectacular.  I remember when I used the d50 I would steer away from photographing violets and red roses because it would blow them out, not so with the d200.  For some reason coming from point and shoot it always used to annoy my that the d50 didn't have b&w or sepia.  The d200 has b&w but no sepia.  The nerds in the forums would just say, "use cs2, or a photo editor," but I say no because I should be able to do everything in camera.The viewfinder is so awesome.  I literally hated electronic viewfinders and the d50's viewfinder was so small that it hindered my framing at times.  The d200 has a big bright viewfinder and a huge lcd that sucks down batteries like nothing.  As far as my evolution goes in photography sometimes I feel like I can literally climb into the viewfinder because its so big compared to what I was used to.Like I said the grip is awesome and I really like it.  I kind of like having as many accessories as possible and that kind of steered me away from the D2Xs into the d200.  Watching the percentage marks count down as the batteries drain is always fun.  The best thing about the d200 is little things like that because they make me feel like I have greater control over my pictures because I know exactly how many I can take.In conclusion buy the d200 over the d80 I am really happy with it and I am not happy with anything.  If you're having trouble considering what you want photographically try and pull yourself away from forums and outside sources and really consider what got you into photography in the first place and where you intend to go with it, I think that is the important part.  Advertising and gear collecting never made anyone a better artist</review_text>
I bought this camera as a back-up to my D2X and so I wouldn't have to change lenses as much on a trip I'm taking to Alaska this summer. Well let me tell you, the D200 with the 18-200mm VR lens is incredible. It is fast, quiet and a pleasure to use. I've read in forums that the 18-200 is a little soft. So far I totally disagree, the pictures I've taken have been very sharp. I wish this would have been available when I bought my D2X. If it had, I would own two D200's instead of one of each. Highly recommended !!</review_text>
I'm glad I purchased this accessory kit for my new Canon S80--the extra long lanyard allows one to carry the camera in an easily accessible way while hiking.  And having a second battery is invaluable.  The case is leather and fits snuggly--it is useful for protecting the camera when it is carried in a purse or backpack, but I am finding I set it aside when I'm on the move taking pix</review_text>
All three items are worth having, and the package represents a good value - but these three don't always play well together. Obviously, with a digital camera, it always pays to have a spare battery to keep you shooting when the other goes flat. The leather case is also worthwhile and well-made, providing impact and scratch protection, particularly important for keeping the lcd screen in good shape. Oddly, the cut-out in the case flap isn't really large enough for the metal strap to pass easily through. Thr strap is rather stiff and while it can be forced through, the rectangular juncture near its end is just too large. But leaving it inside the case flap against the end of the camera virtually guarantees it'll be grinding away at the camera finish while in transit. Truthfully, the metal strap looks great, and works well for the ultra petite Digital Elph models, but the extra weight of the S-series mean the strap will begin biting into your neck over time.</review_text>
I love this little records. It's light and takes great movies. Has great audio and video quality. Haven't used it enough to give an expert opinion, but so far, I am really happy with my purchase. My child loves it too. She is a wiz with it</review_text>
You won't go wrong with a Panasonic DV.  I've had a few models.  I have several of this model for my business.  They're rock solid reliable, nice and small for portability, and the quality of the recording is very good.</review_text>
I purchased this camcorder just over two weeks ago and must say that I am more than pleased w/ its performance.  After reading countless reviews of camcorders and handling several at local stores, I selected the SDR-S150 based on:- size- reviewed video performance- SDHC recording formatI wanted a camcorder that was very compact so that I wouldn't mind carrying it anywhere.  Being the size of an average digital camera, the SDR-S150 fits the bill nicely.  Video performance is very good.  Being able to pop the SD card into a card reader on my computer makes transfering videos pretty much effortless.This camcorder costs a bit more than others out there, but I feel the extra $$ is well spent due to it's video quality, ease of use and expected durability.  Since it doesn't have tapes to jam or hard drives to crash, it should have a long life v.s. other units that do.One concern I had prior to purchasing this camcorder was whether it could be used indoors, as the reviewers said it suffers more than some in low light situations.  My concerns were put to rest after seeing my first indoor video.  It works just fine under normal indoor lighting.Another concern I had was whether I would have enough recording time using SD cards.  Happily, I find that there is little if any difference (to my eye) between the best quality and the medium quality modes. I tend to record using the medium quality setting, giving twice the recording time over the highest quality setting. My 8 gig card = 4 hrs recording.I can highly recommend this camcorder if size & video quality matters to you.</review_text>
After opening the box and charging the battery, I had it shooting without cracking the user manual. Easy to use and confidence-inspiring. The menu system is mostly self explanatory, the only changes I made were to put it in XP (highest) quality mode, 4:3 instead of widescreen aspect ratio, disable digital zoom. Most of the options you'd want are there.This is a tiny device, about the size of my 4-yr old 3x zoom digital still point and shoot. As such, the screen size is a little small, particularly if you are shooting 4x3 instead of widescreen. The case is mostly plastic but feels solid nonetheless. Be sure to attach the included grip extender to the tripod socket. This is crucial for one-handed operation of the zoom.I like the use of thumbnails to identify each clip. So you can delete unwanted clips in the same way you would delete photos from a still camera.I was pleased with the image quality. I tested it indoors in daylight and with bulbs and fluorescent lights. I didn't see the low-light problems some people have mentioned, but I wasn't shooting in candlelight... I've heard good things about the still image shooting so having a still camera with 10x optical zoom is a nice bonus.I had no problem with the Mac connection, just download Mpeg Streamclip and Apple's $20 mpeg2 plugin, and you can convert to DV format for iMovie. Though some users may find this difficult or annoying.</review_text>
This is a great video camera.  My only complaint is the uncomfortable and awkward  hand positioning when "taping" or even while taking still pictures.  I end up having to use two hands (luckily I have an extra one) to steady the camera, especially while using the wide angle / telephoto feature.  It is even difficult to press the "record" button to stop recording without a fair amount of movement.</review_text>
Panasonic SDR-S150 is a wonderful camera.I am extremely happy with it - and recommend it to everyone.Popular Mechanics magazine has named it the best in itsclass - and I completely agree.I bought mine in the end of September of 2006 and was usingit every day for the last 3 months.The sales person at J&R store has recommended it to me,based on customers feedback - and I am grateful to him for good advice.The camera makes very decent videos.Excellent optics, 3-CCD, and true image stabilization do their job.The videos are bright, sound is excellent.But most important for me is how easy it is to work with the cameraand with the video clips once you made them.One can use the cable and software provided with the camera,but I like things simple. I take the SD card out, insert it into a$10 USB card reader - and copy the files onto my computer with the mouse.Then I rename the clips - I change extension MOD into MPG.These clips are in true mpeg-2 format, which is the same format asin regular DVDs. So many DVD players will natively play thoseclips without any editing or converting. Also on most computersyou can simply double-click on the clip to make it play. If not - youcan dowload one of the many free or low-cost software players.I like the VLC player (just google for vlc player) - it isavailable for both Window and Mac and it is free.I made our grandmothers very happy. I burn a collection of videoclips of our baby on a regular CD (yes, CD, not a DVD) - and mailto them. They can play those video clips on a computer or on aDVD player (portable Phillips is a good choice).The camera is very easy to operate.The built-in battery lasts for ~ 70 min (use a spare oneor use an included power supply if you need more).Camera also makes decent still photos.I have many more expensive cameras at home (photo and video),but I found that once I bought this camera I use it almostexclusively. Partly becase of ease and convenience.With this camera I don't need huge disks, powefull CPUs, lotsof RAM, or hours of video editing. It makes your video productionvery easy and fun.Camera comes with its own editing software.I prefer to use Adobe Premier Elements ($99).There is also some good software for Macs.So I can easily make videos with titles and menus, ormake mp4 or flash videos for iPod or web.Cons:1. No input for external microphone. But the built-in stereomicrophone is very good - I tested it by making a recordingof a concert violin - and then extracting the audio andanalyzing it using Adobe Audition software.The recording is very clean, because there are no motorsin the camera.2. The compression artefacts can be visible when you makingfast movements with the camera. This is rare, though.Camera can be mounted on a standard tripod.It is very light and small.Overall - I really enjoy it.</review_text>
I have been using this camera for several weeks in lots of different conditions: indoors, outdoors, action, stills, etc. Overall, it is a great camera if you are looking for good video performance, acceptable still performance for a video camera, no tapes, and an incredibly small size which truly does fit in your pocket.I have not had any of the dark video issues mentioned above.I have owned many previous miniDV cameras including a JVC, Canon Elura, Panasonic 3CCD, and Sony DCR-PC1000. To my eye, the video this camera produces video as good as the others in terms of sharpness and color accuracy. I tested it side-by-side with the Sony (the most recent model of those shown), and it performed about the same to my eye as the Sony with video, although color was a little more accurate on the Panasonic, and the still images were noticeably better. I was concerned about getting an MPEG2 camera thinking the compression would cause artifacts and have trouble with action video. I have had no problems with either.The real reason I tried this camera is that all of the above cameras have broken after a couple years of use due to a broken tape handling mechanism, and I was thrilled about the idea of a tapeless camera! The battery lasts much longer due to not having to drive a tape, and the startup time is great since it doesn't have to get the tape across the recording heads after you switch it on. I also prefer no hard drive for durability and battery life issues, and none of the hard drive cameras are even close to this in size.Now the trade-offs you make with this camera. At first I thought it didn't go very wide-angle which was disapponting (44mm 35mm equivalent, I think?), but I tested it side-by-side with the Sony and it was nearly identical, and I never noticed lack of wide angle on the Sony. Also, the MPEG2 format is a bit of a pain. I use Final Cut Express and iMovie on a Mac, and neither reads MPEG2 directly. That said, there is a free utility which seems to be very good called Streamclip, or you can buy a $20 add-on for your QT player to play and convert MPEG2, but it's still an extra step in the process. I believe that Premiere does not support it either. Just be aware that it's not as compatible with as many editing apps as ubiquitous miniDV and a conversion step is required.The only other camera I seriously considered (after ruling out tapes and hard drives) was the Sanyo Xacti VPC-HD1A, which is also an SD-based camera. Despite having a 5MP still image resolution, most video reviews for it were extremely negative. Some surmised that this is really a still camera at the core, marketed as a video camera. Furthermore it does not have optical image stabilization, which I consider a near-must for such small cameras if you want smooth video. It does indeed record in HD, but at least one review said the video quality was poor enough that it didn't really matter. It does indeed record in MPEG4, though, which is natively read by iMovie.So if you don't mind a significantly larger camera and tapes, there may be more compelling options like the Sony HDR-HC3 which records in HD, or perhaps one the hard-drive models. But if you're looking for a tapeless video camera, and especially an SD-based one which takes truly high quality video, this appears to be the only real choice out there at the moment (Nov 2006)</review_text>
This is a amazing deal works great and it does not take long for the batteries to charg</review_text>
You know what I hate about video tapes in camcorders? You never really know where the record heads are:"If I hit record now, am I taping over something else? Now let's see, the last time I played back the tape, I think I fast forwarded back to the current record mark... or did I? Ooops, I missed my chance at a great clip... again."With a hard drive, there is no chance of recording over older clips. The camera is always ready to record, if the battery is still charged. Yes, the battery it comes with lasts about an hour. I have never ever in my entire life of video camera using/owning needed to record more than one hour at a time. When I am not using this camera, it sits in the camera bag charging off the AC adapter. This isnt a hard thing to do, so I dont know why so many people complain about the battery life.The still camera capabilities are not too bad really. Sure, the still pics are at the same resolution as the first digital camera I ever owned, but I still got some good images at ~1.3MP. Changing into still camera mode is ver easy and done with the switch, vs. through the GUI.I did not know about the CF slot when I bought the camera, so that was a very nice bonus to me, as all of our digital cameras use CF as well.Having the 30 gigs of space is nice, but in hind sight, the better glass on the lens is what this model is all about when compaired to its siblings.I leave the video quality on the highest resolution, and occasionaly copy the videos to my external HDD for editing, backups, etc.I got this model video camera because we have a new baby, and I was tired of putting energy into making sure I wasnt taping over priceless moments.With this video camera, that fear is gone, and I am able to get on with capturing our memories</review_text>
This is the second camcorder that I have owned, and I love it. Its smple and easy to use, and the picture quality is a whole lot better than my old higher end samsung mini dv, very easy to transfer and work with your videos, Very compact, very good camera would suggest to any friend</review_text>
Please note that since there have already been many user reviews written, this may not seem like much of a "review", but I thought I would touch on a few things I was wondering about myself before buying the camera in case it might help someone else.This hard drive-based camcorder is wonderful. Well done JVC! I was going to buy the next model up, the MG70, but since I don't use it for photos, I don't believe I would benefit from the increased megapixel CCD. Besides, the MG70 only had 10x optical zoom, and was missing the video light and F1.2 bright lens. I'm happy with the MG50.In case you haven't noticed, this camcorder has no viewfinder so you must use the flip-out LCD screen.Video quality: The hard drive feature is brilliant! The only quality level you should avoid is Econo (37 hr mode), since it reduces the resolution by half and also records only about 15 frames per second. Ultra-fine (7.25 hrs) is the best, but I couldn't notice much of a difference when I lowered the quality level to Fine (10 hrs) or Normal (14 hrs). On the highest 3 modes (ultra fine, fine, and normal), the camera records full 720x480 resolution. As far as I can tell, it really is sampling that many lines of resolution. Other digital camcorders I've used (mini-DV) have had very noticable "stair-step jaggies" in parts of the picture, especially along the borders between high-contrast elements of the picture. On this hard drive camera, however, the resolution is significantly higher and these jagged lines (aliasing) are rarely noticeable at all, if ever.As for how the camera records files onto the hard drive: It creates a new .MOD file (it's an MPEG-2 video file with Dolby Digital audio) every time you start/stop the recording. So, all your clips are conveniently seperated, but of course you can combine them with your video editing software later if you prefer. The camera will record for 12 hrs continuously if needed, but will create a new .MOD file for every 4GB of footage.You may have read in other reviews about the following trick: rename the .MOD files that the camera records to .MPG for increased compatibility. Well, I tried it and it works like a charm, regardless of whether your video footage is in 4:3 or 16:9 aspect ratio. This makes it easy to use your favorite DVD-burning or video editing software with this camera, as well as ensuring future compatibility. I haven't found even one program that couldn't play the files perfectly after I renamed them. Even Windows Media Player 9 had no problem. If you leave them as .MOD, then you won't find many programs that support it (at least not yet). The only ones I found that did were the one that came with the camera (Cyberlink), and Adobe Premiere Elements 2.One thing I should mention about the files that the camera saves. It numbers them in hexadecimal (1-9 then A-F (eg. MOV009, then MOV00A...)), so some people may find this a bit annoying. Also, my Windows XP computer alphabetizes the files A-Z, then 0-9, so they end up being displayed in the wrong order. I'm not sure why my computer is doing this and don't know if all windows XP computers will do it (it worked fine on my Windows 2000 computer), but you can always list them in chronological order if you need to correct this. I believe most video editing software will, however, list the files in the correct alphanumeric order (1-9 then A-Z). Mine all do.The camera has a handy feature called "File# Reset". Every time you activate this, it creates a new folder on the hard drive and begins saving all future clips into it. This is a handy way to seperate your recorded "events", in case you tend to fill up the hard drive before copying it to your computer, and you may have months worth of footage on the camera. So you can have your daughter's birthday party in one folder, your trip to the zoo in another, etc...Playback: Playback of sequential clips on the camera (either on the LCD or onto a TV) is seamless. There is no pause between scenes - it plays back just like a tape would with clean cuts between recordings. Also, you can locate specific clips by viewing thumbnail images (9 per screen) or by listing by recording date. Then, of course, after playing back clips, there is no need to fast forward the tape back the next available blank part for recording. When you go to record again, the camera will not overwrite previous material.The camera allows for limited editing (deleting or rearranging of clips). Also, in case you delete a lot of clips and then continue recording, the hard drive may eventually become fragmented. The camera has a handy utility built in that will defragment the hard drive. I haven't used it myself because I haven't needed it, but it's nice to know it's there.Low light performance on this camera isn't the best I've seen, but it is still pretty good for such a small camera. My previous camera was a JVC as well (mini DV - only about 3 years old). It was slightly brighter in low light, however, I find that this hard drive JVC camera has much better autofocus performance for low light or fast movements. All recent JVC cameras (including this MG50) have "Night Alive" mode which reduces the shutter speed to about 1/2 second. This is useless unless your camera is on a tripod and your subject is not moving at all. You might as well take a picture then... However, the MG50 has adjustable shutter speeds in between as well. I find it useful in low light situations to change the shutter speed to 1/15 sec. This brightens the image considerably. It does reduce the motion a blur if things are moving too fast, but I still consider it a reasonable trade-off for the amount of extra brightness in the scene.The built-in light is useful under some situations. Be aware the effective range of the light is only about 3-5 feet, so unless your subject is within that range, the light won't make any difference. It does have it's useful moments though (like filming a pet on the floor in a dimly lit room) Also, using the light consumes less than 10% more power because it's an LED, but of course that's also the reason why it's not very bright.Photos: Image quality for still photos, in my opinion, is terrible. Not only is the resolution inadequate for most uses, it's extremely difficult to depress the shutter button without shaking the camera and blurring the image. The start/stop button (doubles as a shutter release button in photo mode) is quite stiff.Startup time: This camera has poor startup time, but I guess that's to be expected being that it's a hard drive camera. From the completely off position, it takes 10 full seconds (based on my own tests) before you can actually begin recording. Even this is only about double the typical startup time for a mini-DV camera, it might mean you'll miss that special moment you're trying to record. Even if the camera is in record-standby mode, it still takes 3 seconds from the time you press the start/stop button until the camera is actually recording.Camera noise: The camera does produce a faint hum while the hard drive is spinning, but I found that this is less noticeable on the recording than the sound of the tape machanism on the 3 mini-DV camcorders I've used. Of course, some mechanical noise is expected on compact cameras like this one. Without an external mic, it is unavoidable. Unfortunately on this camera, you cannot connect an external mic. The zooming motor is also slightly noticeable, but no more than other similar-sized camcorders. Besides, unkless you're in a completely quiet situation these sounds won't even be an issue at all for you.Lens cap: The lens cap stays in place nicely. Since it only covers the lens itself and doesn't extend any further than it needs to, it tends to stay in place (unlike other cameras I've had where the lens cap pops off while inserting/removing it from a bag or pocket).Drop detection: you may have read that this camera has a feature that senses a freefall or other motion that could potentially damage the hard drive, and automatically shuts the camera off. Well, just so you know, there is an option on the camera to turn this feature off, in case you want to make a video on your favorite rollercoaster. I'm not saying I recommend this, but I just thought I'd mention it. I myself have not personally witnessed this feature work yet, but then again I haven't tried dropping it!Overall, I highly recommend this camcorder to the casual videographer (great for vacations!). It seems to really stand up to competing cameras in it's class on most points. However, if you're a more serious videographer you might want to consider a larger, 3-CCD camera with a bright light and external mic. Otherwise, have fun!I gave this review only 4 stars because of these few issues: lack of viewfinder, slow startup time, and poor image quality for still photos</review_text>
Great compact battery charger.  It is relatively fast & is easy to take with you when traveling, due to it's size.</review_text>
I like this charger a lot, yet recently lost one while traveling. I recently made the mistake of buying a cheap replacement off of eBay. That eBay charger didn't work. In fact, I thought the eBay-charger was working since the indicator light worked, but the batteries were never actually charged. Anyway, this Canon CB-2LU charger I'm writing this review for is pricey, yet it seems worth the money if you can afford it. It's small, works, and seems to charge the batteries fast. In conclusion, beware of cheap imitation ripoffs that are sold on eBay</review_text>
This product is needed to charge my Cannon camera.  It is very small, easily fits into purse or pocket and works very well</review_text>
I received the product promptly and it works perfectly with my battery. I was a little worried that my battery would not fit. However it is a perfect match. i'd buy again from Amazon</review_text>
I recieved a Canon SD400 as a gift, well it didnt come with a charger and the batteries finally died. I looked almost everywhere for this charger and found it on Amazon. I'm a soldier currently stationed in Iraq and thanks to Amazon, I can capture every moment of my tour</review_text>
Found the exact replacement charger that came with camera, was shipped to me promptly, actually got it quicker than I expected</review_text>
I love this camera. I bought it for my trip to Paris. I found it very easy to use. One feature i didn't realize it had was video with sound. I found that very useful. I bought a 2GB memory card to go with the camera. The one it comes with doesn't hold that many pictures. The software was easy to install and use. Not really small enough for a pocket but still a great camera on a budget</review_text>
First off, let me make it clear that I am satisfied with this camera. I have had it for 8 months now and I have put it through its paces and its held up fine.But there are few things you must know:The camera has no zoom. I mean, practically no zoom. 2.2x may look decent but its pointless in any real-life situation. You WILL find yourself moving a lot with your camera to get a better shot, not standing in one place and using the zoom feature. You can never get a close wide shot - its just not possible with this camera. This camera is great for average stills but that's about it.You have to click twice to take a picture or "press halfway and then fully" according to the manual. This is a major pain. Sometimes when the battery is weak, it may take a lot of time to take a picture (and a lot of frustration), so this is not a cam to capture any special pictures or "kodak moments".Apart from these cons, the camera is great value for money and offers video and all kinds of stuff. If you're looking mostly looking to take landscape or portrait stills, this camera will do a good job</review_text>
I bought this camera six months ago for my 12 year old daughter.  It was her (and ours) first digital camera.  I read so many reviews prior to selecting this model.  The reviews for this camera were so helpful.  This camera has been so easy to use and it takes excellent pictures.  Rechargeable batteries are definitely a must! This camera is the best camera for this price, no doubt about it.  We have taken still shots and videos.  It is so fun to have the option to take a video.  We have some great clips.  All I can say is we are so happy with the camera.  We would definitely choose it again</review_text>
This is my 3rd digital camera and I bought this one to supplement my larger 10X zoom camera.  This one fits nicely into a pocket  or small camera bag to easily take it to all events or for travel.  I've found that it takes nice photos indoors when the flash is used....Even when the cats or dogs I'm shooting are moving around.  I've felt the life of a battery set is pretty good, but I've been using nice rechargeable ones.  Definitely get a set of 4, then you have 2 to use and 2 as a backup set.  The settings are pretty easy to figure out and change and 99% of my photos were taken on the "auto" setting and came out pretty good.  As others have indicated, indoors - without flash - can produce blurry photos, but that's the nature of almost all cameras, not unique to this model.  Glad I bought it and would highly recommend it</review_text>
I really like this camera! It is fairly simple to use, takes great pictures and is packed with features. It fits nicely in the hand and is compact enough to slip in a coat pocket or purse.We bought this camera for our daughter's birthday. She is using it with ease & especially loves the movie with sound option. In my opinion, the camera is a winner for any adult or kid wanting a good all around digital camera.My only negative is that it is a battery hog. As with most digital cameras, you will want to make sure you get rechargeable batteries and large memory card</review_text>
This camera is an exelent camara. It has plenty of effects, plenty of modes, plenty of scenery options. The image quality is 3.2 megapixel, but its quite good. The pictures you take without the flash do end up getting a bit blury, where as if you take it with the flash, it comes out exelent. And sometimes it takes a long time for the picture to get taken with out the flash, and sometimes it happens imediatly. But all these flaws are only with my version.But if you are looking for a good camera with a great price, this is your best option</review_text>
I gave this camera 5 stars because of it's awesome features. This camera is the perfect size for kids and you can put a video on this camera. I love this camera. I think it takes awesome pictures</review_text>
Cute, compact, easy to use - these are just a few ways to describe Canon's cool A400! This stylish digital camera is lightweight and perfect for snapping shots on the go. Mine is Sunset Gold.Plus, there are perks like macro mode (which lets you snap sharp pictures from as close as 2 inches), and lots of shooting modes (like Snow and Fireworks).And Movie Mode lets you capture video clips with sound.This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Just what you would expect from  Canon</review_text>
This camera takes great, crisp photos. It's easy to use, and a great value. Even close-up photos turn out great. You would think this camera had more than 3.2 megapixels! You will have to get a much larger memory card though, as is the case with most digital cameras</review_text>
I really enjoy this small, high quality camara. I purchased a 2.0 GB memory disk so I could take advantage of the 7.1 mega pixel.And I get great pix everytime.  I have lots of fun with it. Since its so small, it's easy to take everywhere with me. I also get lots of compliments on it's "Fashionable" sleek design.  I highly recomend his camera.</review_text>
I've read good reviews of this camera on this and other sites but I am not having the same experience. The quality of the photos are horrible so I started thinking it was me and I tried it with different settings, tried being very, very still etc but, I only get one good shot out of about ten. I have a Fuji 4mp that I bought about 6 years ago and it takes way better pictures than this. I bought this so I could give my old one to my daughter but I'm gonna end up giving this one to my daughter and and keeping my Fuji. We recently had snow here in Tucson so I took pictures with mu Fuji and compares them to the Canon and the 6 year old Fuji Finepix beat it hands down. I don't get it, did I get a defective camera or am I doing something wrong or does this camera just suck</review_text>
I just got this camera for Christmas.  I hate reading directions, so I popped the battery and memory card in and I was off!  Very user friendly, and has all the right options. Plus, its about the size of the average cell phone. The coolest thing about the powershot is that it knows which way you're holding the camera, so if you hold it vertical to get a tall shot, the viewer turns all by itself.   I also love that you can edit video on the camera and set up slide shows.  Its very easy to load pics onto my computer with the USB connection - or to set up a slide show for the TV.  It even holds voice memos and has cute sound effects when I take pictures.  This is really a great camera</review_text>
i bought this for my teen age daughter for xmas, and she loves it. it's easy to use and takes super great pictures. thanks for helping my make her happy</review_text>
The case is a good fit for the nikon S10 camera. The case is well made however I would prefer a larger zippered front pocket. A larger pocket would allow more space for a spare battery and an extra memory card.</review_text>
I tried the binoculars and sent them back.  The optical quality and IS are excellent but at a distinct cost.  The binoculars are simply bulkier and much heavier than other 10X42s and I really felt that price did not justify the improved performance.  In addition, why pay the price for expensive optics and then have no good way to protect the lenses -  the primary lens covers are terribly designed and can't stay on the lenses.</review_text>
I've only owned a couple of pairs of binoculars so don't have a ton of experience with different models. But I can't imagine it getting much better than these for general use. First off, they are very clear and bright and deliver a very crisp image, even with IS turned off. But at 10x there is noticeable shaking in the image. But then... turn on the IS and it just dampens everything beautifully. Even more detail is revealed and it kind of takes my breath away every time I use them. While this initial "wow" factor will dissipate over time, I can't imagine I'll regret purchasing these ever. They are that good.I agree with others that have complained about the lens caps. But the caps actually work pretty well now that I've installed some 52mm B+W UV filters. The caps fit pretty snuggly onto the filters. Also, the filters haven't hindered the viewing IMHO</review_text>
UPDATE:  I had these at 2 events in the last month.  1.  A local star party where the views in a somewhat dark sky will change your life as a human forever.  It was and is life changing as to how many additional CLEAR star points these binos capture!  2.  The Santana concert (At Night) The low level detail is amazing!  I would say the view is almost and I mean ALMOST what your naked eye is able to see as far as brightness. But again, for some god known reason the binos had a definate contrastier (is that a word) view than my own eyes....Its sick but true!  I ended up watching the ENTIRE concert of 2 hours through these with NO fatigue whatsoever. At 80 plus yards away, i was brought to within 15 feet with the reach of these!!!!Yes there are some minor and I mean MINOR flaws with these as you have read here BUT these are the BEST and clearest optics I have seen in a long list of equipment period!  The IS does blur a tiny bit when moved but does settle down and in a million years you would'nt trade it for anything!  I let 15 people look through these and each one is jaw dropped amazed!  I have heard 9 times that, "the optics are better then my own eyes!"  They are so good that I go looking around for crazy stuff just to look at it a different way!  its like getting top of the line super audio equipment and wanting to go back and listen to all your old cd's!  Again, they REALLY are that good!  Clear, super bright and worth every penny! The IS is simply magic, and i have spent a half hour or more looking through these things with NO eye fatigue or discomfort whatsoever.  Im 42 years of age and I have to resist feelings of wanting to sleep with them next to me at night......By the way, these are the brightest and clearest of the IS bunch!  Hurry up and order a pair and get ready for visual heaven :</review_text>
I have now had two pairs of these binocs (the 1st set was stolen from my car). Prior to that I had the Canon 10x30 IS binocs, a pair of Swarovski 8x32 and years ago some Leica 10x40 Trinovids. My main use for them is birdwatching, though I do use them for other purposes. I disagree with a prior reviewer who would not recommend these for birdwatching...if you can handle the weight.The IS works brilliantly. In my experience the view through these blows away the view one can get from ANY non-IS binocs (Leicas, Nikon, etc). The 10x42 L are much larger and heavier than the 10x30 binocs, however you gain (1) a significantly brighter, more contrasty view, (2) a much wider field of view, and (3) great ruggedness and waterproofness.The downsides have been minor: (1) Did I mention they are heavy? (Canon provides a thick neoprene strap - you might consider one of those behind-the-back shoulder straps, (2) the anodizing on the unarmormed part of the body wears off way too quickly, making them look more used than they are (both pairs I've owned), and (3) the glass of the objectives is barely rececessed making it too easy to get fingerprints on the glass.However, the first time you get some beautiful bird in the binocs, the color will knock your socks off and the detail you can see will amaze you. Now, if they could just be lighter and cheaper...</review_text>
This my my 3rd pair of IS Binoculars.  1st pair of Canons and they're the best I've had.  IS is better than previous models I've owned.  Battery consumption is much lower.  The only slight problem is the flat surface the binoculars rest on is a slippery plastic.  On boat use, the bincoulars instantly slide if you put them down. This is easily cured by gluing on a non skid material.  I would buy these again</review_text>
I concur with the other reviewers.  Although the binoculars are heavy, they're 4 ounces lighter than my old 10x50 Minolta's.  The Canon IS is sharper, brighter, smaller, and even has more magnification.  Image Stabilization works very well, although it doesn't stop moving objects (joke).  Besides the Image Stabilization, the close focus is a plus!Although pricey, I believe they're well worth it.  Now my brother wants a pair</review_text>
We've had and used it for 2 years and it works great. We have a wireless system in our house and have no problems. It does have a little static when the microwave is on, but we don't put anything in there for more than 5 minutes. The only problem is I just can't stop watching her. We're going to buy another one for our little one because our first is still young enough where we want to still see her too.</review_text>
This is my first camcorder and I am very pleased with it.  I had thought about purchasing a DVD or HD based camcorder, but stuck with the time tested mini-dv version.  This one is great.  The video looks good, the zoom is cool and the stabilization works like a charm.  The only complaint is the packaged battery.  I purchased the one that lasts 6 hours long to compensate for the short battery life one it came with</review_text>
The recent arrival of our first child prompted this purchase. I knew that I wanted MiniDV to allow me maximum editing flexibility and software compatibility. I scoured the internet for product reviews and had decided to get a Canon Elura 100 as this was widely considered the best "budget" digital camcorder.  Of course, I decided on that just as the last stocks ran out - Canon no longer make the Elura line. I was then faced with starting from scratch as all the majors had just released new cameras. I've used Canon SLRs for years and so naturally gravitated towards the Z-series camcorders. They didn't get great reviews though.Then I spotted the Panasonic PV-GS85 and was immediately grabbed by the fact that it has OIS - optical image stabilization. It uses an actual optical component to counteract hand shake as opposed to the electronic jiggery-pokery that other cameras at this price point use. I tried out both a Canon and the Panasonic in an electronics store and the difference between the effectiveness of OIS and EIS is amazing - optical stabilization is just leaps and bounds better. That is what sold me on the Panasonic.I went for the GS85 over the GS80 for the addition of snapshot capability - it will take a still photo to memory card whilst you are filming. The quality isn't fantastic, but it isn't terrible either and it is perfect for capturing stills of those magical moments for emailing to relatives when you happen to be in the middle of filming.I don't use Windows, so can't comment on the software included, but the camera works flawlessly with iMovie on my Macbook Pro and with Kino on Linux.The video quality is very good, color reproduction has so far proved excellent. The auto white balance takes a little while to adjust after turning the camera on (maybe 20-30s) so you have to be a bit ahead of the game. Startup is very quick even without the fast start option where the camera "goes to sleep" when you close the LCD rather than switching off all together.All in an excellent camera</review_text>
I bought these Binoculars for my Dad for Christmas, and he is absolutely in love with them.  The distance it can handle is slightly above average, but the clarity is really where this thing shines.  Its very easy to use, and has held up reasonably well.  I would recomend it to the casual user</review_text>
These are great for bird watching. They make things very clear from a distance. Good buy</review_text>
The only negative on these binoculars is that they come with a really cheesy plastic strap, which I promptly threw away.Otherwise they function fine for a bargain binocular</review_text>
The only knock on these binoculars is that the image can be unsteady, but that's a product of the 16X magnification, so it's not really a product fault. If you've got a steady hand, you'll love these things. Great for sporting events or the theater, and great bang for the buck. Highly recommended</review_text>
It was for my husband when he was diving he loves said it takes great pictures. The shark mode works great.The pictures were very clear</review_text>
I'm happy with the quality of case and with the speed with which I received i</review_text>
This case fits the camera snugly (but not tightly), and will fit in a purse or fanny pack perfectly.  Do not plan on carrying accesories with this case; it's the camera only, but with a big memory stick and the long life batteries, what else do you need.There is a nice belt loop on the back of the case as well as a clip on a swivel.  Also included is an extra long lanyard.  I'm totally happy with this case</review_text>
The case is well made and looks good.  It has a belt loop rather than a clip so you have to remove your belt to get it on or off.  Magnetic snap is convenient, but not super secure</review_text>
Good quality leather case.  Excellent fit for the Fuji Finepix F30 and room to store your extra memory card holder as well.  Fits easily into a shirt pocket or purse.  I just love it</review_text>
This is a very elegant and well-made ALL LEATHER Camera Case for your Fuji F30 and presumably, F20. It has nice stitching and is DARK CHOCOLATE BROWN / ESPRESSO in Color. I gave it 4 stars because it is not quite as "slim" as it could be - it could be a tad more "form-fitting" IMHO. Contrary to the other reviewer, it is much bulkier than my neosprene case I was using but again, its elegance will set it apart. Second, the magnetic enclosure doesn't seem quite as "strong" as I would like. Overall, I'm pleased but just realize it DOES ADD BULK ! And it does NOT come with a wrist strap</review_text>
The soft case is made of sturdy leather, which offers two distinct advantages: excellent protection, and space saving. I don't like the fluffy kinds because that defeats the purpose of F30's compactness. The wrest band adds the convenience, but that's just personally perference.The magnetic door functions well also... easy to open, and strong enough to enclose the camera. This is importance because I don't want to joggle around with the case and miss any shot. I can take out the camera with my fingers in position, like a cowboy bringing out his gun and ready for the kill... haahh, not a good analogy but ya know whata mean..</review_text>
These are great for bird watching. They make things very clear from a distance. Good buy</review_text>
After much research I finally found the binoculars that fit my every need.  The price was right, the delivery was right on schedule, and the product is excellent</review_text>
The only negative on these binoculars is that they come with a really cheesy plastic strap, which I promptly threw away.Otherwise they function fine for a bargain binocular</review_text>
The only knock on these binoculars is that the image can be unsteady, but that's a product of the 16X magnification, so it's not really a product fault. If you've got a steady hand, you'll love these things. Great for sporting events or the theater, and great bang for the buck. Highly recommended</review_text>
I bought this to reduce vibration on a Celestron CPC1100. It does seem to help some but not as noticeable as you would think. It does help getting the scope level since the pads have a wider base than the tripod legs when placed on soft ground.I sometimes will leave them out when I take the telescope inside so that I can repeat my viewing at the same location the following night (lots of trees in my backyard)</review_text>
Love the camera though still trying to work on the details of using color and various settings. The ease of basic use is wonderful. The pictures are excellent but what I like best is the compact and stylist package. Having paid only $180 at Circuit City made the investment bearable.</review_text>
I don't have words for this item...it's very very...I'm taking the best pictures that i never imagin</review_text>
I got it for my girlfriend because she loved the color. Didn't expect much from a cute little camera, but it amazed me. Great job Canon. Good quality pictures in low light condition</review_text>
i love this camera!! i looked and a billion cameras i wanted on affodabl and small. and this was exactly it!! i love it so much its the best. it takes good day and night pictures. its even good for kids.i recomend this camera for every age and size!</review_text>
Was a christmas gift for my girlfriend. She loves it. Small enough to always carry around. I'm actually kinda jealous...maybe i'll buy another for myself</review_text>
I just got this camera from my brother for Christmas and I love it!! This is perfect for any fashionista who loves hi tech gadgets. It's ultra stylish and has amazing capabilities.It's not only a great price but if you get the Deluxe package it includes a free matching leather case. This was an upgrade because I already had the Canon Power Shot S230. I have to say I am blown away with how much more it has to offer. The picture quality is amazing.My brother always buys me the greatest gifts and this is surely one of them. You will feel like you have gotten your money's worth with this purchase but be ready for people to stop you all the time asking where you got that cool purple digital camera from.. :0</review_text>
I received the Canon PowerShot SD30 as a Christmas present and have loved it ever since. It's my first digital camera and it's so user-friendly that I was able to use it right out of the box. The picture quality is great too.PS ~ The purple is even more fabulous is person. =</review_text>
the camera case was as expected.  no complaints, and I searched for the best price on this item, and found it here.  I just think that the shipping charges are way too high.  I know that the sellers charge these rates, but I believe that they should reconsider.  It is not unusual for the shipping charges to exceed 50% of the price for an item (such as this one) that is not so expensive.  In the future, I will be giving my business to sellers that have no shipping (or low shipping charges).  and you should too</review_text>
The perfect little black nylon case for my Olympus C765.  It's not too big or too small. It's only slightly larger than the camera itself.  It easily holds the camera and strap. It has about a 1/2 inch thick insulated sides to kind of cushion the camera.  The strap on the case is just the right length to hang over your shoulder, or it has a belt loop on the back side.  You can slide the memory card holder down inside the case with the camera, and you can put extra camera batteries in a small zippered pouch on top.  The only thing that won't fit in the case is the battery charger if you have one. It also has an easily opened velcro closing top</review_text>
Small, compact, fits the C700 perfectly.  Little pouch on top has room for extra batteries, memory cards</review_text>
Not to big or to small.  Lightly padded with a small compartment to hold an extra battery</review_text>
Great durable case, with neat zipper pocket on the top and sub compartment inside. Very happy with purchase. Fits my c725 perfectly</review_text>
Nice and neat carrying case, can fit a couple of batteries, nice and snug fit for the camer</review_text>
I like this case, it protects my Olympus camera and that is why I purchased it.  I do wish it was a little bit bigger so that I it could store my camera shoulder strap better.  Currently I have to stuff the strap in and adjust the top a few times before it velcros shut</review_text>
Good deal I got from Amazon.Plus the packaging is good.May not be the best of the cases around, but it holds the camera pretty well and also allows you to carry a pack of extra batteries and memory chips.Material is soft and provides a good cushion to the camera on the inside</review_text>
I have used this battery in my Olympus since I first got it five years ago, and I take a lot of pictures, between kids, vacations, and Ebay photos. I originally thought I would invest in rechargeable batteries, but I had such poor luck with batteries not charging or the charger not working that I decided to keep using this battery. In 5 years, I have only used 3 sets of batteries. I bought my first set at Circuit City for $20, so this is a good price here at Amazon. I felt obligated to write this review because  the first and only review had nothing to do with the battery whatsoever, yet he still gave it only one star. Go figure</review_text>
The vendor gave me the the wrong type of battery my camera so I have no opino</review_text>
If you are serious about your videography, then you need to be able to charge your batteries using something other than the supplied "through the camera" method.  I suppose if you purchase enough extra batteries you might not need this, but I still don't like plugging in my camera just to keep the battery charged.  Even with a high end HD Sony, there was not separate way to charge the batteries, and that limits you if you do lots of video.  This is one of the best and most complete charging solutions that I have seen. I highly recommend it</review_text>
This is a MUST HAVE if you are using the Sony FX7 as I am....slots for two batteries and great digital info readout...and FAST!  Also, if your cam doesn't have a direct AC plugin port...this gives you one via the "battery" slot.  Nice package</review_text>
Great little package! Small, compact, fits easily in your pocket. Took them to Giants Stadium to use from my end zone seat. Able to see action very clearly in the opposite end of the field. Easy focus for my bad eyes</review_text>
I have had this for over 6 months now and i cant really complain about it. Its compact and easy to use. However, people with glasses would have trouble using it. I use it without my glasses(there is a power caliberation that you can do to match ur eye power) and then its very clear.Easy to carry around and solid. Very good for its price</review_text>
I was a bit worried at first at the tiny size, but it is tres powerful! I bought it for a school trip to the Amazon forest and I sighted way more birds and animals than everyone else which helped get me an A in the course. Yes, these binoculars rock!</review_text>
Well, I bought the bino for my 7 year old nephew to introduce him to birding. And he loves it, infact he pronounced it "Pretty Cool". Was a good buy considering its compact and does what its supposed to do</review_text>
I have not purchased this item; however, I wanted to inform westwindtalker2 how to use these binoculars (or any other normal pair of binoculars).  First step, take off your eyeglasses.  Second step, look through the binoculars at a stationary distant object, close your right eye and adjust the focus until the object is in focus for your left eye.  Third step, while continuing to look at the same object, open your right eye, close your left eye and adjust the diopter correction until the object is in focus for your right eye.  Fourth step, open both eyes, adjust the distance between the eyepieces so the image is seen as a single object and adjust the central focus knob.  (You could also try reading the instructions supplied with the binoculars--they are available in pdf format from amazon.com from this item's webpage.</review_text>
The product was easy to use and accurate.  It is also a great buy</review_text>
I think it is very much worth it, function for the dollar, I listen to loud music, and I am very active, i use this for mp3, snapping photo's of my buddies, the lithium ion battery lasts a while for what I use it for "on the go" when i plug it into the pc it charges as i load the photo's so, that is nice. I purchased the previous version's and they took quite the beating. I stick with this brand of camera's for ease of use. Had it going with no directions, read up for the advanced functions.I say they did a great job.Only con is the little door connector, seems flimsy, but even with my abuse is still there. If you own one, you know</review_text>
The camera has all of the features you could want:- Shoots great video- Excepts 4GB SD cards- Can record in D1 resolution @ 30fps (I confirmed it with my video editing software)- USB recharge (or AC adapter) all included!- TV output- LED lights (yes, they are actually useful).- Digital photos are actually good.- 3x optical zoomThe videos are really nice, but keep in mind, these are not meant to replace professional of more expensive camcorders. The videos in sunlight are very good. Low light shots are not as good, but not the worst when you compare it with other offerings. Just be sure you have at least 60 watts of light. Compare the video with other camcorder hybrids at under $200, you can't beat this one. There is no indication of how much space or minutes you have left to shoot. Its annoying, but if you buy a 2GB SD card, the camera will run out of batteries before you run out of space. The LED lights are in fact useful. Don't except them to light up the room. Its not because the light is not bright enough, its because the lights create a small patch of light. Hey, its better then nothing. The sound is nice and clear, not muffled like the other model, the  IS-DV2 model.But here comes the biggest issue... The LOUD noisy focusing. I'm not talking about the zooming feature (has 3x optics), i'm talking about when you move the camera to a new subject. The camera is constantly and consistently auto-focuses when anything changes in the view of the lens, but it makes such a loud noise that the MIC picks it up. It ruins the video. Unless if your at a rock concert, your going to be hearing scratching noises throughout your video. And yes, it is that LOUD to be distracting. It makes a scratching like noise. The camera takes a few seconds to focus, but every time you move it slightly, or your subjects move, the camera tries to focus again, and it makes that scratching sound. I believe its because the MIC is so sensitive, it picks up the vibrating mechanical focusing unit in the lens. There is no option to "lock" the focus. Had they done that, that would have at least remedy the issue somewhat. Aiptek should have resolved this issue even before manufacturing it. If I were the CEO/President of the company, I would be very embarrassed. I understand these are "cheap" cameras, but at $200 their not exactly cheap in price. They should have at least fixed the loud focus issue before selling it.I really liked the MZ-DV features, I thought I could live with the focusing noise. But every single video I shot had that annoying noise, so I ended up returning it.I would avoid this model until Aiptek releases a better model, or replaces the noisy mechanical focus. The other model, which is the same as the MZ-DV, except it has a lower megapixel rating, the Aiptek Zoom DV, has the same focus noise issue. So I would avoid that model also.</review_text>
I got this little gadget a few days ago and I love it.  I think the negative reviews have come from people who were expecting too much.  For a device that does so many different things, it does them pretty darn well.  Granted, it isn't GREAT at any one thing, but, face it, you have to pay a lot more for ANY device that does even one thing "great."  If you are looking for professional quality videos or photos, you will have to pay a "professional" price.  If you are looking for an amazing little gadget that packs a lot of functions into one little package, look no further.For what it's worth, I took great indoor video and photos, and the pictures came out just fine</review_text>
Not sure what the other users are seeing. I have used the MPVR before from Aiptek and this product is even better. Takes great video and great pictures. Very pleased with the product. Possibly other users aren't using the auto focus properly? It did take a few tries to get used to but worked like a charm</review_text>
Bad image, blurry videos, like a cheap webcam. I returned it right away and got a Samsung SC-MM10 MPEG4 10x mini-camcorder for $60 more and I'm very happy with it</review_text>
